
<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57807 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu001_q_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TURKEY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Part 2 of Interview </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC3012180293 Ankara TURKISH DAILY NEWS in English 24 Dec 93 
p B1 </F>

<F P=103> NC3012180293 </F>
<F P=104>  Ankara TURKISH DAILY NEWS </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Final installment of a two-part interview with President </F>
Suleyman Demirel by Ilnur Cevik and Ismet G. Imset in Ankara on 
21 December] 
  [Text] Ilnur Cevik: The point we want to make is this: 
Now as a result of all of these incidents, there are a people 
in the Southeast. A people made up of citizens of the Turkish 
Republic. These people are, unfortunately, being thrown out of 
their villages in one way or another. And these people, for 
instance, are increasing the population of Diyarbakir from 
350,000 to 950,000. Don't you think this is creating a great 
social problem for Turkey? 
  Suleyman Demirel: Of course, it will. The social problem is 
this. (Showing a list of people massacred by the PKK [Kurdish 
Workers Party]). If these people were not killed in this way, 
the people there would not leave their settlements and go. It 
is not the state which is moving them. 
  Cevik: What will be done for these people? 
  Demirel: Every kind of assistance will be given for these 
people and is already being given even with deficiencies. The 
state is aware of this issue, and the issue was raised in a very 
recent meeting. It is not that the state is not sensitive to 
what is going on in Turkey. We know all of these. What is 
happening where and so on. But there is an incident. Ilnur, 
this is what I am trying to explain. These things have not been 
happening for only a year. Look, so many incidents have happened 
in the past eight years. In a decade in Turkey, 8,423 acts of 
violence have taken place--in this region. And in these 
incidents, 1,997 soldiers of the state are martyred. Why are 
they martyred? Is the state there to kill the people? No. 
There is a gang which is killing the state's soldiers, 1997 
people. This gang has also killed 2,666 citizens. These 1,997 
people are dying so that this 2,666 citizens don't die. Are the 
soldiers of the state of the Turkish Republic an occupation 
force there? 
  Cevik: Of course not. 
  Demirel: Of course not. Why are they dying? Because there 
is a gang against them. With what else could the state of 
Turkey struggle against this gang? It raids your (military) 
station. Why does it raid your station? What is the measure to 
be used against this? Is the measure to withdraw your stations 
and leave the area to them? We won't do that.. We won't do that 
in any way. 
  Ismet G. Imset: But Mr. President, there is something else 
happening in recent days. The stations specifically in rural 
areas are being closed down and being withdrawn to more 
concentrated centers. After our recent trip with Hasan Cemal to 
northern Iraq, coming back to Turkey, we sort of had to force 
our way into Turkey. The soldiers there said that after 16:00, 
one could not go out on the streets, that the PKK was in control 
of the roads, especially the Habur-Diyarbakir road. And, in 
fact, at around 17:00, they stopped us and looked at us asking 
whether we were crazy to be on the road. One of them asked, 
"How can you travel at this time of the night?" And, Hasan Cemal 
and I were surprised. Previously, we knew that one could not 
walk outside after 19:00 or 20:00, but we did not know something 
like this was going on. 
  What you have said is something we want to stress anyway. We 
want the state to be in the region more than it is. We want the 
state to be in control of the highways, roads and districts. 
But this is something which we cannot see much of. As if the 
state is getting lost. 
  Demirel: Can the state be lost? This is exactly what 
efforts are being expended to prevent. The state, in that 
corner of the country, and by making ineffective those who are 
responsible for all kinds of problems, is working to make 
justice reign without difference between day and night. Because 
of this, so many people have been martyred. The state is trying 
to guard its borders. To guard its people. So many people have 
died. The state is exerting efforts so they won't die. And for 
them not to die, children at the age of 20 from this country's 
Izmir and this country's Tekirdag are going to those mountains. 
  Imset: Sir, there appears also to be issues on the 
international scale. For instance on Armenia, we have received 
news that Ocalan is planning to move his headquarters from Syria 
to that country... Of course, this could be Syrian 
disinformation. But there is the Armenian issue, the recent 
developments in Russia. 
  With regard to regional issues, how do you see Turkey's 
position? For instance, there is something an Ankara taxi driver 
told us. He thanks God that Ozal is no longer here for, he 
explained, too many people visited the capital, the roads were 
jammed but now they are very much less congested. What is 
happening? Is Turkey's importance in the world being lost? 
  Demirel: Why should Turkey's importance in the world be 
lost? What is the reason for this? Could an Ankara driver be the 
criteria for this? 
  Imset: Of course not. I was just going to say that when we 
talk to foreign officials and ambassadors, even officials we 
know in Washington, we get the message that Turkey is on the 
wrong path and that since they are allies, they are planning to 
warn Turkey especially in the next two-month period. 
  Demirel: What is the wrong path? 
  Imset: Mainly on human rights, sir. 
  Demirel: Are the people who are being killed not human 
being? 
  Imset: They are, sir, but those killing them are working 
under the standards of "bandits." But because we are a state we 
have different... 
  Demirel: What? Should the state not kill bandits? Is this 
what is being said? Who else but the bandits is the state 
killing? 
  Cevik: They ask why the state is not protecting the regional 
people. 
  Demirel: It is because the state is trying to protect the 
regional people that these people are becoming martyrs. My 
brother, there is a fire here. Can anyone claim that the forces 
of the Turkish Republic are turning their guns on the people 
within this fire? No one can claim this. The state is trying 
to protect the regional people. I don't understand where we 
will reach hitting the state from here to there. If these 
duties cannot be fulfilled, then you will see the chaos. We are 
saying that these duties should remain to be fulfilled. 
  Now, I don't know who has come and told you these things, in 
the past six months, 14 foreign state officials have come here 
and visited Turkey. These were on the level of king, of 
president and of prime minister. 
  What has Ozal done under this Constitution that once he 
went, 
Turkey regressed? There is no need for such arguments and 
actually I don't enter such arguments. What happened when Ozal 
was here that is not happening when he is not here? 
  Cevik: In recent days what we have continuously been hearing 
in Turkey, from officials as well, is that Jalal Talabani is a 
liar or something along these lines. Is Talabani no longer a 
credible person for Ankara? 
  Demirel: There is no criteria for credibility. It is not 
possible for me, as the president of the Turkish Republic, to 
lend credibility to this or that person. Talabani's statements 
that they (Ankara) asked us to extend the (PKK) cease-fire are 
completely untrue. As we have never accepted APO (PKK leader 
Abdullah Ocalan) as a counterpart, we would never have told 
Talabani to go and say this to him. We never said this. You 
are also well-aware of this. 
  Imset: There were reports that APO was arrested. We could 
not get them confirmed. Have you received anything information 
on this? 
  Demirel: There is nothing that has reached me to this 
effect. I am not in a position to confirm or deny the reports. 
But I don't think they are true. 
  Imset: Do you believe that there has been a change in the 
attitudes of Syria and Iran? 
  Demirel: I have spoken with the Iranian first vice 
president. He appears to be very sincere and interested in the 
issue of cooperating against terrorism. 
  Imset: Then can something really be expected? Perhaps a 
joint operation with Iran in the region? 
  Demirel: It is possible. These issues are being discussed. 
  Cevik: As we enter 1994, political turmoil is apparent in 
Turkey. This is especially evident within the country's 
political parties and, particularly, within the True Path Party 
(DYP) which is in power. Do you feel that since you have left 
the prime ministry, Turkey has entered a period of instability? 
Will there be changes in the political spectrum in the new year? 
  Demirel: There is no instability. Stability is this: The 
game has its rules and you play by the rules. Fair play. Look, 
what is being ignored is this--and we have a capability of 
ignoring good things: In the past 30 years, the election of a 
president in Turkey has always become an incident. Today, 
Turkey does not even feel that a president is being elected. 
Governmental problems used to surface when the president was 
elected. And they did surface. But weren't they solved there 
and then? You may like or dislike who comes to power. This is 
your personal right. But the regime has worked in Turkey. It 
has produced the government. Turkey has a government. This 
depends on the trust of the Grand National Assembly (TBMM). The 
Turkish Grand National Assembly is on top of its 
responsibilities. And, the Turkish Grand National Assembly has, 
in the past two years, handled 25 motions, 27 general debates, 
39 investigations and 420 verbal questions. In other words, all 
institutions of the Turkish state are on top of their 
responsibilities and I believe this is very beneficial. Just go 
and see whether you would find this in Poland or in Hungary. 
The Turkish state has institutions, it has a judiciary which 
everyone should be proud of. It has created this judiciary in 
70 years. It has supreme courts, whether you like or dislike 
their decisions. There is the prosecution whose door you can 
knock on without having to try to claim your own rights. And, 
there is nothing like instability in Turkey. Turkey's mission 
is being fulfilled. Whether good, bad, too little or too much, 
it is being fulfilled. It has a government, Parliament, police, 
courts, governors, everything. And, I must say clearly that the 
value of Turkey must be recognized. 
  But everyone must realize the value of this democracy in 
Turkey without forgetting what kind of past we have had. Today, 
just compare the city of Ankara with its population of three 
million to European cities of the same scale. See what happens. 
At any time of the night, in this city of Ankara, you can 
easily walk with your hands in your pockets... 
  Compare Istanbul, a city of 10 million, with cities of the 
same size. When you compare it, the number of incidents are 
less than forty-to-one. And, the state is in control even in 
the most remote corners of the country... 
  The problem is only in the southeast region. Turkey's 
problem is inside the corridor staring from Tunceli--Tunceli, 
Bingol, Kulp, Sirnak, Mardin and Hakkari--and connecting to 
northern Iraq. Until the recent incidents in Adiyaman, there 
had not been a single occurrence there. In Erzurum and 
Erzincan, there have been incidents only in the areas close to 
Tunceli. 
  I certainly do not agree with view that the Southeast 
problem 
has spread and become a problem of the eastern region as well. 
I went to Erzurum where the governor there is quite content 
with his position. I went to Kars and observed the Liberation 
Day celebrations. 
  The Turkish state is not a state that is crumbling. It must 
function in a better way and many things should be improved. 
But if you say we won't improve, that nothing can be done with 
us or that neither our democracy or our state is worth anything, 
such claims simply cannot be. 
  Imset: Recently in a newspaper article, you had made a 
statement that was said to have been related to the Democracy 
Party (DEP). There you said whoever sympathizes with the bandits 
are murderers. Some columnists even commented on this and said 
it could have been a remark made in error. The DEP is a party 
that emerged from the elections with 17 deputies. One of them 
has been killed. When you look at the DEP what do you see? How 
do you regard this party? 
  Demirel: I don't have to comment on this. Is there any 
reason? Don't you see what it is? Why are you asking me what 
the Democracy Party is? Have you not watched its congress? Did 
you not hear what the man was saying at its congress? Why ask 
me? Write it exactly like this: The DEP is whatever was seen 
in its congress. As far as the incident involving the Democracy 
Party... Would the chief prosecutor have demanded the closure of 
a party out of nowhere? 
  Cevik: Sir, Ismet wrote an article which was in the form of 
a declaration asking the Democracy Party to condemn the PKK for 
the killing of women and children, but they didn't do it. 
  Demirel: Then why ask me? 
  Imset: I asked because of this. Within the Democracy Party 
there are a group of deputies whom we know are not pro-PKK. In 
fact, they have sought a dialogue with Ankara, sort of looking 
for a bailout. But when, suddenly, all levels of the state 
launched a concentrated effort against the DEP, it gave the 
impression that the state just wanted the DEP to leave 
Parliament. Alright, this may be what the public wants and 
there is a public reaction. But the PKK is also in favor of the 
DEP's departure from Parliament. When we look at Ocalan's 
recent orders and his articles, and at his attacks on the Ahmet 
Turk family, what he is saying is that the DEP should withdraw 
from Parliament. And, during that time, we were writing many 
articles in favor of the DEP's continued presence in Parliament 
because we realized that once the DEP withdrew, it would only 
serve the aims of the PKK. It appears that we (Turkey) are 
giving these people the impression that we want to force them up 
into the mountains. 
  Demirel: Who is providing this image? 
  Imset: For instance the investigations that are being 
initiated on a legal basis. For instance there are 
parliamentarians today who have been suspected of very serious 
crimes, including tax evasion, but they have immunity. Such 
crimes in the law are referred to as ordinary crimes. On the 
other hand, there is the Democracy Party. I accept that some are 
linked to the PKK and I have even witnessed Ocalan sending 
orders to them, but in the end, the government they entered 
first was your government. It appears that there is a 
contradiction. As if all of this activity against them were 
being conducted simply because the public wants it. 
  Demirel: We have come to the same point again. There is 
confusion here. There is a judiciary state. Someone commits a 
crime and the laws agree it's a crime. If nothing is done to 
him, nothing should be done to someone else who commits a crime. 
You can't ask for this. Because two wrongs don't make a right. 
The first is a mistake and the other is a mistake as well. 
Here, you as a journalist, cannot take on the duty of the judge 
or prosecutor. You can only report the incident. If you put 
yourself in the place of the judge or prosecutor after exposing 
the incident, it is no longer journalism. It takes on a 
different form. 
  Now the funerals of young children have come to the square 
of 
Turkey. Ten to fifteen thousand people participate in these 
funerals. What I fear is that the situation has gotten worse. 
Tomorrow, in various parts of Turkey--where citizens of 
southeastern origin are greater in number than those in the 
southeast region itself--there may be a demand for them to leave 
these areas and there are no measures to prevent this. There 
are measures against the man on the mountain. And I am taking 
care of this. But now these people have started to shout. You 
say you have told them to condemn those killings of children, 
but they have not done this. Alright, these man who cannot even 
raise their voices against the killings of children, are 
actually approving the killing of children, approving of the 
killing of soldiers. And, the soldiers on those mountains at 
minus 28 degrees are struggling to defend this country. When 
they return in a casket, the people ask what are these people 
doing in Parliament. And, tomorrow, the people will create 
great debates with regard to this Parliament. I told them (DEP) 
so many times, come here, get up and say we have no relations 
with this bloody terrorist gang, we condemn these incidents. 
Are you free enough to say this? Yet, they could not say 
anything... 
  I declare openly that whoever is supporting those shedding 
blood or sympathizing with them are the murderers of our 
martyred citizens. I said this even from the rostrum of the 
Grand National Assembly. If I don't say this, who will? If you 
are not going to say anything to those who kill 5-month-old 
infants, where is your humanity? 
  This is what I am revolting against. Don't misunderstand me. 
  Imset: I think what was unfortunate was that while you were 
making such statements, the chief of staff announced that the 
PKK had 375,000 sympathizers. When the two statements came 
together, the 375,000 became a target. 
  Demirel: It may be. It may be. It may even be higher. 
What, can I say there is no trouble if you say nothing to those 
killing five-month-old children and even support them? I am not 
doing this duty as a president but as a person who has given the 
best 45 years of his life for this country. 
  The situation is like this. You always take the incident in 
a single-sided way. Troops went here or there, destroyed one 
village or another, harassed the people and so on. But the 
problem is not this. And the result is it appears as though you 
are not in favor of the other man shedding blood but you do not 
view it as that much of a crime either. 
  In other words, the argument is "what should this man do? If 
the state is pushing him to and fro, he has nothing else to do." 
This is a conclusion which the West is coming to. Don't come 
to the same conclusion yourself. I must be open, I struggled 
against the West after the Cyprus issue as well. I can struggle 
with all of them. Are human beings not human beings? The men 
say nothing to them. Is this not human rights? 
  I say it again, in England, France and Germany, whatever 
there is in the form of measures to prevent human rights 
violations, the same exists in my country as well. What is 
there? I'll tell you: There is an open regime... 
  I am among the people everyday. Everyone can say anything 
they want. They can say everything, no one tells them not to. 
Again there is a free judiciary in this country. If there is a 
human rights violation, this is a crime. It is no different 
than attacking somewhere. There is a Parliament. Everything is 
said there even at this hour. Then there are squares in this 
country. Appear at the squares and protest against them. 
  Cevik: They would arrest us then, sir. Just try to appear 
at that square in Turkey! 
  Demirel: You appear there. If they take you away, I'll come 
and free you. 
  Imset: Sir, the State Security Court even opened an 
investigation of Dogu Ergil. 
  Demirel: They can. An investigation is something different. 
A verdict is another matter. A verdict can also be passed. 
  Imset: As long as the State Security Courts are open, of 
course such a verdict will be passed. You had promises related 
to these. 
  Demirel: I had no promise on State Security Courts. 
  Imset: You promised to deal with the remnants of the 
military regime. 
  Demirel: We have nothing against the State Security Courts. 
Turkey comes from out of chaos. The Turkish courts were courts 
which could not pass sentences. The State Security Courts are 
measures born out of this. We have not said a single word that 
we would abolish the State Security Courts. What would you do? 
With what would you create a democratic authority? Don't touch 
criminals! Some people should have criminal immunity! This 
cannot be democratic authority. The problem of Turkey is the 
vacuum of democratic authority!Look 6,000 people have been 
killed in Turkey. How many people were punished? Turkey's 
problem is that it could not deal with illegalities. It could 
not make the judiciary function. It caught the man, but watched 
him escape from prison. Then came an amnesty and everyone came 
out. The people who are damaged are those killed and their 
families, but no one is fighting for their rights. 
  A merciful feeling comes at one period, and then everyone 
starts defending a number of killers. This cannot be democracy. 
Such a democracy cannot be defended. You cannot make such a 
democracy function. 
  I'll say this openly; Turkey should not come to the point of 
where it will miss these days. 
  The State Security Courts can open investigations and put 
people on trial... 
  Imset: What happened to Ozgur Gundem seems to be an 
outstanding example of press freedoms. What do you have to say 
about this? 
  Demirel: I'll give you the note which has been given to me 
with regard to the search conducted at Ozgur Gundem. Can you 
defend this? No one can defend this: 
  According to telephone conversations between Ozgur Gundem 
Editor in Chief Gurbetelli Ersoz and PKK European representative 
Mustafa Karasu (code named Huseyin) as well as Faysal Dumlayici, 
who is making press statements under the name of Kani Yilmaz as 
the ERNK [National Liberation Front of Kurdistan] representative 
(recorded with permission from the republic prosecutors office), 
information has been obtained that the newspaper is completely 
affiliated to the PKK. Under a decision taken by the State 
Security Court, a search was conducted of Ozgur Gundem and the 
Zagros printing house, and it revealed the bloodstained diary 
and the bullet-riddled identification card of private Muzaffer 
Ulusata, who was martyred on March 9, 1993, in a clash with 
terrorists in the Findikli district of Sirnak. 
  This is what has been found. Documents showing that articles 
written by Abdullah Ocalan were published under the name Ali 
Firat. Documents which show that all of the executives of the 
newspaper are appointed by the PKK and are people known in the 
past to have carried out executive duties in the PKK 
organization. In fact, Editor in Chief Gurbetelli Ersoz is 
known to have been the Cukurova regional PKK executive in the 
past. An ERNK invoice of 400 million liras which shows that 
donations have been collected for the PKK. 
  Now you are calling this a newspaper office and write: 
"Today them, tomorrow us." Can you defend this? 
  Cevik: But we are not defending this. Sir, when you were 
prime minister, we wrote about these things and said them. 
Especially then there were orders being received from the PKK. 
We were even made into a target. 
  Demirel: What is Ozgur Gundem for you that you show it as an 
example for democracy in Turkey? 
  Cevik: But sir, something done to one place could be done to 
another tomorrow. I am talking not only about what has been 
done to a newspaper. This has been done even to you. 
  Demirel: No sir, I was neither an arsonist... 
  Cevik: But they did it despite this! 
  Demirel: They did nothing to me. What did the man do to me? 
He forced me to stay in my house. Did I stay I my house? I 
broke through the walls and came out. I had neither a gun, nor 
a knife nor anything else. I was only right. I mean this man 
is going to collect money for the PKK, and the same PKK will go 
and massacre 29 innocent citizens in the Sunduz plateau. It 
will kill so many soldiers and then what is being done? What 
else can be done? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57808 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu001_h_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zhirinovskiy Threatens To `Completely Destroy' Germany </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0101163794 Paris AFP in English 1608 GMT 1 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> AU0101163794 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris AFP </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [By Michael Anders] </F>
  [Text] Hamburg, Germany, Jan 1 (AFP) -- The leader of the 
Russian extreme-right, Vladimir Zhirinovskiy, has threatened to 
station 300,000 troops in Germany and "completely destroy" it 
with the launch of "World War III," the WELT AM SONNTAG 
newspaper reported. 
  The weekly newspaper to be published Sunday [2 January] 
based 
its story on German intelligence and diplomatic reports of 
Zhirinovskiy's reaction following the German government's 
rejection Wednesday of his application, made in Bulgaria, for a 
visa to visit Germany again. 
  Just before Christmas the Russian rightwing extremist did 
visit Germany, meeting with the head of a German far-right 
party, Gerhard Frey of the German People's Union (DVU). 
  Quoting a secret service tape-recording and a report by the 
German Embassy in Sofia, WELT AM SONNTAG said Zhirinovskiy 
threatened that, if he came to power, Russia would break off 
diplomatic relations and, rather than withdraw its remaining 
troops, station 300,000 of them in Germany. 
  From a figure of 550,000 in 1990, the number of Russian 
troops and their families on German soil has fallen to 70,000 
today, and they are all due to depart by August 31, 1994. 
  Asked by a member of the German Embassy in Sofia if he 
wanted 
to occupy Germany militarily, Zhirinovskiy reportedly said that 
the soldiers should "ensure the compensation for Russian damages 
suffered in World War II." Germany would have to pay, to the 
extent of becoming a "poor country," he said. 
  Zhirinovskiy told the diplomat that Wednesday's rejection of 
his visa application could lead to a "third World War" by which 
Germany would be "completely destroyed." 
  According to WELT AM SONNTAG, Zhirinovskiy also made 
personal 
threats against German diplomats, vowing that the one who 
informed him his visa application was refused would soon be 
"liquidated." He claimed to have such good contacts with 
Russian intelligence that he could make the official simply 
"disappear." 
  The newspaper also reported that the German intelligence 
services were stepping up their surveillance of the 
international and German activities of rightwing extremists such 
as Zhirinovskiy and his party. 
  To the surprise and consternation of Western governments, 
Zhirinovskiy's Liberal Democratic Party won 23 percent of the 
vote in the Russian legislative elections held December 12, 
making it the second strongest party in the Russian parliament. 
  Zhirinovskiy has widely been portrayed as a fascist with 
ideas akin to those of Adolf Hitler. He and the DVU leader Frey 
embraced warmly when they met at Munich airport last month. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57809 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu001_j_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ITALY &amp; VATICAN CITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   President Scalfaro Gives New Year Address </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0201160794 Rome RAI Uno Television Network in Italian 1930 
GMT 31 Dec 93 </F>

<F P=103> LD0201160794 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome RAI Uno Television Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Italian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Speech by Italian President Oscar Luigi Scalfaro on 31 </F>
December; place not given -- recorded] 
  [Text] Good evening and a happy New Year to everyone. In 
this encounter, which has become traditional for the head of 
state, who has the honor, the honor to pass his greetings on to 
the citizens, best wishes to everyone, to each person. Best 
wishes to those who are citizens of Italy in their homeland, and 
to those who live abroad, to those immigrants who are in this 
country for work, in particular to immigrants, hoping that they 
come to regard Italy as their second homeland and that they 
forget certain uncivil episodes. The Italian people are all 
hospitable. Best wishes to those who are guests for reasons of 
study or work, or are passing through, and are starting 1994 
with us. Happy New Year to everyone and happy New Year to Italy. 
  A year has gone by. It seemed almost impossible: the 
precarious political situation, the explosion that has already 
started and is increasing with regard to the penal emergency, 
with the widespread involvement of the political and 
economic-financial area. Then, [a year ago] in this room, I was 
holding meetings so that the first government could be formed. 
At that time, economic reality was delicate, not to say 
serious, with heavy repercussions for employment, and the 
instability of the currency, which had already been devalued, 
and the incredible succession of ministers resigning -- seven -- 
with immediate replacements and sometimes repeated, and above 
all the face of Italy before Europe and the rest of the world. 
There were many worries, perhaps even fears. How difficult it 
was to find a glimmer of optimism anywhere. How difficult it 
was to try to find hope. 
  Then there were the bombs, almost to prevent us from hoping. 
I found myself thinking of the spes desperantium, the hope of 
the desperate. I was interior minister when I went on a visit 
to Yugoslavia to sign anti-terrorist agreements. My guide was a 
professor who set great store in showing me that he had nothing 
to do with the regime, Tito had already been dead for some time. 
Suddenly he said, come with me, and took me into a church, 
leading me up to a beautiful sculpture of the Madonna, but above 
all he pointed out to me what was written underneath: Spes 
desperantium, the hope of the desperate, of those who cannot 
find hope. Many times I thought of this: The bombs in 
Florence, Milan, Rome, and the victims, and the desperation of 
relatives and work colleagues, and the terror. It was almost 
like an anxious expectation of further violence, and people had 
one inexpressible or unexpressed question: Who wants to 
destabilize, who wants to destroy the strong spirit of this, our 
people, who and why? The judges at work with the judicial 
police, were involved without respite in a search for the 
motives and the guilty, to restore security to citizens, so that 
citizens could feel safe. Sufficient thanks will never be said 
to those who carry out this work. 
  Yet the year has ended, with the efforts of parliament, and 
what efforts, and of the Constitutional Court and of the 
magistrature, with the initiatives of the Amato and the Ciampi 
governments. Allow me for a moment to remember: It was my 
responsibility and honor to ask Giuliano Amato last year and 
Carlo Azeglio Ciampi eight months ago to form and lead a 
government. In the first instance, the political moment was 
very delicate, and the second was devoid of every valid 
indication from parliament, when I telephoned Prime Minister 
Carlo Azeglio Ciampi, the then governor of the Bank of Italy, 
and I said to him: Governor, be prepared. These were choices, 
which among other things have done much to markedly increase 
Italy's standing, and not only in Europe. 
  There were the unstinting efforts of the forces of order and 
of the Armed Forces both inside and outside Italy, even in far 
off places, to serve peace efforts. There were the efforts of 
the public administration. How disappointed I am when I hear 
someone condemning the whole public administration for being 
useless, badly prepared, and inefficient. Why must we speak 
destructively, without thinking of how many people known to each 
one of us give their lives to their work. With the efforts of 
many, very many private sector operatives, the year has ended. 
  Our currency has been strengthened. The economy is showing 
signs of recovery. The fight against crime has known great 
successes. The year has ended because of the strength of 
Italians. The year has ended because of the courage and the 
active patience of Italians. Think of the admirable rebuilding 
and the perfect restoration in Florence. Think of the calm 
firmness of the Milanese, of the immediate recovery of Rome, 
whose art and faith had been wounded, and of the ever-present 
volunteers who are versatile and untiring, and of the admirable 
fire fighters who were present everywhere. Over all of this 
ruled the determination of those in charge of fine arts, to 
stubbornly restore everything to the way they were, as though 
nothing had happened. This is the Italian miracle that repeats 
itself from time to time. 
  Many people fought and hoped for this tiring recovery in 
every field. Many people paid, even with their lives. 
Recently, many people have fallen in the world of work. Many 
people have paid with their health. Who could ever forget those 
of us who have died for peace and solidarity, right up to the 
latest, innocent, and very young Red Cross volunteer whose 
generosity was only surpassed by her desire for privacy. What a 
vocation and what an example. Many people have prayed in 
Catholic churches, in all the other Christian churches, in 
synagogues, and in mosques. Many people have hoped, believed, 
and acted, spurred on only by an invincible and admirable faith 
in man. The year has ended. 
  Some observations are of comfort. The first is that 
Italians, we Italians, have a great love for this our homeland, 
and we are ready to pay the price for its rebirth. The year 
that is about to end has brought much evidence of this, a great 
deal of evidence. Furthermore, I want to say it again, the 
certainty that democracy has largely entered the veins of 
Italians and has become the life of this our people. Thus it is 
a strong and conscious guarantee against every possible folly. 
While the world is still bloodied from wars and crimes, by 
merchants of death, drugs, and arms, whose only concern is 
wealth at all costs, the European and international communities 
have acknowledged our strong will to recover and are increasing 
faith in our future. 
  A year is beginning that can and must be decisive for our 
recovery. The whole world is watching us and is expecting 
composure and wisdom from us in the upcoming general election, 
so that in each one of our choices, in the differences in the 
way we think and plan, we can place the good of Italy above all 
else. The world is watching us because it knows that Italy's 
presence is before all else essential for peace, for peace in 
the world, how important its presence is for Europe, which has 
been and always remains our primary political future, aiming 
with a strong will at a substantial and efficient political 
community. Italy's presence is essential for the peoples who, 
after the winter of the Soviet dictatorship, with their 
fledgling democracy are moving toward collaboration and their 
desired participation in the community of the free world. The 
world is watching us and is confident that Italy's role and 
responsibility in the Mediterranean and for peace in former 
Yugoslavia and the Middle East is being carried out. 
  In the last few days, two lights have been lit for the hopes 
of peace, following a great deal of work: The meeting between 
Israel and the Palestinians, and the relations between the 
Vatican and Israel. This is a great page of new life in the 
history of thousands of years. It is an exceptional testimony 
to peace, in this church of John Paul II's, to whom our 
heartfelt thanks go. 
  For this New Year the Italian people want one thing above 
all 
else: That a new leaf is turned. This was expressed 
unequivocally in the April referendum, they want a new leaf to 
be turned over a past of abuses, illegal behavior in public and 
economic life, without ever throwing away all that which is 
vital and essential for the freedom of the Italian people, all 
that is constructive and has been used from the Liberation to 
today. We must make sure that we never forget all those who 
have saved the life and freedom of man in our homeland. The 
first new page is opening. No one can deny the courage that was 
involved in the unveiling of the wounds and in the desire for 
justice and transparency. There must continue to be courage and 
willpower until this chapter is closed, with the pronouncement 
of the responsibility of the guilty and of the innocence of 
those who are found to be without guilt, with the recognition of 
the delicate and essential work being carried out by the 
magistrature. Citizens must also rediscover a constant 
serenity, must not be fearful but must have faith in justice, 
citizens must be at peace, whether they be accused or injured 
parties. Justice must be defended from a kind of politics that 
seems to want to contaminate it or exploit it, it must be 
defended from those who only grasp its spectacular aspect, and 
justice must be freed from those who have had -- it hurts to say 
this -- moments that were not peaceful as a result of the 
contagious desire for the guillotine or the pillory. As far as 
justice is concerned, these are two evil manifestations. 
Justice has the right to be universally respected and believed. 
We have a great need for calm and serenity, so that political 
life and economic activity can regain their indispensable 
efficiency and normal way of working. This goes for all of us. 
  Here is the second important page: The reforms. It is 
necessary that everything that has been elaborated since the 
very first parliamentary debates at the bicameral committee of 
this legislature, rather than being lost contributes to study 
and experience, so that the new parliament can make our 
Constitution better able to answer the more pressing needs of 
our people. We must not lose sight of those ideas that are real 
and alive, which will not die if those who say that they believe 
in them, instead of exploiting them, serve them with humility 
and disinterest. We must put into effect the great humanitarian 
principles that endure our personal limitations and give us the 
certainty that many dishonest people will never trample over 
those who are not dishonest and do not want to be. We must all 
work to rediscover and restore the richness of ideas, values, 
and history of our homeland. We will then see the strength and 
vitality of this immense richness and how it is greater than our 
poverty and our failings. I place my optimism, my stubborn 
optimism, in this and only this: It is in the existence of this 
cultural and spiritual richness, it is in the firm conviction 
that with everyone's goodwill, and the sacrifices of each one of 
us, every obstacle will certainly be overcome. 
  Then there is the social page, which is important, of 
complete importance for a state that is truly fit for man. We 
need the human issue of work to reduce and cancel the wounds of 
unemployment and the tremendous fears connected with 
uncertainties about one's job. It is an issue of civilization 
and is not an issue that disappears easily, especially when 
faced with a marked world crisis that is also hitting 
economically strong countries, and which requires above all, 
that it is truly believed that the respect of the right to work 
is the first sign of a people's civilization. Here we must 
acknowledge that the government and parliament have already made 
significant efforts. But we are fully aware of the issue, the 
issue worries us: The issue must not and cannot leave us in 
peace. When we have done or think that we have truly done all 
that is possible, let us think: Of course, we can do more if we 
believe in the rights of man. 
  At this point we come across the always burning issue of 
youth, school, and a first job. These issues are connected, 
which means that space must be given to the voice of the young, 
or rather the young are responsible protagonists. Without 
including parties, it is easier to stray into speculation or to 
make it suspected than to give advice and valid help. I have 
met and spoken to thousands of young people, even while 
president of the republic, and I am convinced that dialogue is 
the serious, useful, and valid way. I know that many times it 
has been held. It is necessary to make young people 
responsible. It is useless to discuss whether we can trust them 
to drive a car at 16 if no serious thought is given to their 
cultural and human formation, which can prepare them for more 
essential and important responsibilities in life. We ask the 
young to have faith in ideals and human values, we ask them for 
the enthusiasm to overcome many problems, we ask them to be 
generous toward those who are less intellectually gifted, are 
less physically or materially able. We ask them for solidarity 
for those who need it and for those who are suffering, and this 
is right. But we must give young people opportunities to live. 
We must give them motivation and possibilities to plan their 
futures. We must never take away their hope. But first and 
foremost we want to provide young people with our example, which 
we have lived and paid for, of hard work, honesty, and 
sacrifice, of faith in essential values. This is our most 
important duty, of each one of us, mine first and foremost. 
Once again I want to say: Young people, never surrender, do 
not think that it is easy to tell you this when we know the 
difficulties that you must overcome. Never let yourselves be 
pessimists, even when faced with tiring and unfair situations, 
do not be pessimists. You educators, have faith that the daily 
provision of your life to young people will never be lost, 
never. Happy New Year to young people. 
  Happy New Year to happy children, and above all to those who 
are not, and perhaps will never be. Happy New Year to the 
parents that live with them, and happy New Year to all those who 
sacrifice themselves specially for these unhappy children, 
without being parents. Happy New Year to old people, to those 
old people who think that they are a burden and an encumbrance 
because they do not have anyone able to make themselves rich 
with their experience. Happy New Year to everyone: To happy 
families and to ones that are suffering, because the family is 
the heart of a people's life. Happy New Year to people who are 
alone in the hope that someone realizes that they are alone, to 
those in hospital, in prison, to those who watch over the 
suffering and prisoners, to those who hope for health -- and we 
hope that it can be recovered quickly, and to those who hope for 
freedom, because once justice has been suspended the target of 
freedom is not reachable, it would not be human. Happy New Year 
to those who feel marginalized, in the hope that they experience 
the gift and warmth of community. Italy needs solidarity and 
fraternity, a little more love, but also a great need to know 
how to give solidarity, fraternity and love, only those who know 
how to give it are truly capable of human sensitivity. 
  Unfortunately we are faced with a serious evil that is 
trying 
to tear and destroy our tissue of human society. It is the 
terrible climate of suspicion, the climate of insinuation, of 
making people feel bad, of the evil that is insinuated: The 
worst problem in the life of a people. This is the typical evil 
of dictatorships, which should not exist in a free and 
democratic country because dictatorships have always been made 
stronger by these evils that divide people of every human faith, 
dictatorships have depended on fear, not only of the dictator, 
but the fear that suddenly appears between men and breaks every 
link and creates the constant anguish of not knowing what will 
happen tomorrow. There is a great thirst for truth and loyalty, 
for cleanliness, reciprocal respect, there is a thirst for 
humanity. The Italian people have a great wealth of this. It 
is the thirst of a humanity that replaces and sweeps away 
forever the climate of cohabitation, omerta [Mafia code of 
silence], lies, craftiness. Let us relieve ourselves of these 
evils that have caused and will cause much damage to our 
community. 
  Before ending, let us look for a moment at how many good 
people there are: Everyone of you will know some of the many 
people who are satisfied with their lot, who have many 
difficulties to overcome and face them calmly, without 
complaining, many sick people -- I know many, many write to me 
-- ill people without hope who spread hope and even joy, because 
hope and joy is inside us. It can be helped by events, episodes 
and meetings outside, but it is inside us. Many people who lack 
all solidarity are always ready to give it to others. Many 
people are devoted to this need without anyone ever thanking 
them. Not many evenings ago I went to speak to a caravan [as 
heard] where ex-drug addicts spend much of the night near the 
Rome railway station waiting in case some others suffering from 
the same evil problem need them. The team's doctor is the only 
one who is not a former addict. The others think of nothing 
except the giving of themselves. Many people are devoted in 
this way: Hidden unknown heroes, of solidarity and love, which 
is the richest and most human kind of heroism. Unfortunately, 
we all share this vocation. [sentence as heard] It is the 
heroism that holds its doors open to each one of us. Each one 
of us can walk down that path. 
  To the people, and they are many, who this year have been 
an example to me and my life, to those who have given me a gift 
of comfort, help, prayers and support, I offer a big heartfelt 
thank you. Everyone reminds us that we are at a delicate and 
dangerous crossroads and it is true, but beware, for we are not 
being asked to do anything, absolutely anything that is 
exceptional, nothing heroic. Let us not assume heroic tones. 
We are only being asked to do our duty well, absolutely nothing 
else. We are not being asked to save our homeland, but to serve 
our homeland, yes, and with love. If we do this, one day, 
turning back, we will see that the crossroads has been passed. 
The important thing is that the whole Italian population passes 
it on foot, everyone, and that everyone wants to and can walk 
together. It depends on all of us. It depends on all of us, to 
walk and help those who cannot, to walk because the whole 
population must walk. 
  Last year I said that Italy would rise again, and it was a 
wish from my heart. Now I feel able to say that Italy is rising 
again: and so, best wishes to Italy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57810 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu001_p_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GREECE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Papandreou Outlines Goals for New Year </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC3012133493 Athens ET-1 Television Network in Greek 1123 
GMT 30 Dec 93 </F>

<F P=103> NC3012133493 </F>
<F P=104>  Athens ET-1 Television Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Greek </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Statement by Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou before a </F>
Cabinet meeting in the Chamber of Deputies in Athens--live] 
  [Excerpt] [passage omitted] We are facing various 
possibilities and dangers internationally, but I will not expand 
on this. I will only stress: Despite secondary 
imperfections--some of which concern the interests that we keep 
pursuing--the GATT agreement found the international economy 
taking a big step forward. The danger of the world being divided 
into opposing military fronts has passed. International trade, 
one of the driving forces of post- war economic progress, has 
opened. But this is a long-term concern. 
  Now, the industrially developed areas continue to suffer 
deep 
economic recession. Europe, in particular, is suffering the 
worst economic crisis since 1930. Production has slowed 
dangerously. Some 20 million unemployed represents a social 
danger that even the most conservative governments realize. 
  The crisis is not merely a European problem. It is also a 
challenge. The European Union [EU] attempts to deal with it in 
three ways: By technologically upgrading the productive 
mechanism, by financing large inter-European networks, and by 
creating new conditions in the workplace. We have already 
rejected the third measure if it contradicts social achievements 
or the employees' living conditions. The other two measures are 
in the Greek and European interest. The first aims to increase 
economic productivity and competitiveness. The second aims to 
combat unemployment. Both measures fall within the basic 
direction of our own economic policy. 
  There must be public discipline to deal with the 
particularly 
acute problems of our own economy. The solution--getting out of 
the impasse--requires increased productivity and employment. 
This development process offers these. These are the 
development goals that we, along with our European partners, 
pursue. The country's image in the region will be judged by its 
success in achieving its economic goals. 
  Despite the difficulties, Greece today has the healthiest 
economy in the Balkans. If we maintain and strengthen this 
advantage, we will be in a position to offset any foreign 
threat. Our side threatens no one. When we reinforce our 
economy, we will be more able to play a more active role in 
restoring peace and security in the area. 
  Greece is not only a Balkan and Mediterranean country. It is 
a member of Europe with knowledge of its European mission. The 
Greek Presidency will try to strengthen the EU both in the 
institutional and socioeconomic sectors. In the institutional 
sector, the Greek president will promote the accession of the 
four new EU candidate members and cultivate the ground for 
Cyprus and Malta's accession. In the socioeconomic sector, the 
Presidency will try to make the GATT agreement more specific and 
implement the white paper's development goals. It will do so 
with some variations, but now is not the right time to expand on 
these. 
  The Greek Presidency will raise the employment issue, trying 
to place it alongside the creation of 15 million new jobs by 
2000 and on the same level as monetary unification. This is our 
major European goal. We proceed with a difficult but productive 
period in the country's life. The horizons of 1994 for the 
Greek people are: Economic development in Greece, restoring 
peace and cooperation in the Balkans, and participating in the 
great plan that opens the gates of the 21st century in Europe. 
  With the beginning of the new year, I will begin to 
systematically cooperate with each ministry to formulate and 
implement basic choices in various sectors of government 
responsibility. With these few words, I would like to wish you 
a happy new year. Thank you. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57811 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu001_n_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Finland </F>
<H3> <TI>   President Koivisto Delivers New Year Address </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0101145694 Helsinki Suomen Yleisradio Network in Finnish 
1000 GMT 1 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> LD0101145694 </F>
<F P=104>  Helsinki Suomen Yleisradio Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Finnish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [New year address by Finland's President Mauno Koivisto in </F>
Helsinki on 1 January -- recorded] 
  [Excerpts] Citizens, [Swedish Professor] Gunnar Myrdal said 
in his time that it is like winning the lottery to be born in 
the Nordic countries. We are also proud to be counted among 
this enviable group of countries. Since then, the Nordic 
welfare state model has faced difficulties and many have felt 
tempted to ridicule Myrdal's words. I think that Myrdal is right. 
  The international status of Finland has during the last 
decades become very stable and positive. In this sense there 
has been no change and there is no change in view. The Russian 
elections less than a month ago caused debate in Finland. 
Russia is still traversing a critical period, but there is no 
cause to draw hasty conclusions. The national referendum in 
Russia approved the new Constitution. That is an important step 
in creating a new political system in Russia. International 
observers did not have much to say about how the elections were 
run. The result of the elections reflects the uncertainty and 
the discontent experienced by Russians. However, no alternative 
has been shown in the direction of the reforms, although the 
speed of the reforms might change. The foreign and security 
policy in Russia is led by the president with the help of a 
democratically elected parliament. Our starting point is that 
there are good preconditions for established cooperation between 
Finland and Russia. 
  Finland's negotiations in the European Union are at their 
final stage. Most issues in the negotiations have already been 
concluded. In a ministerial meeting just before Christmas, 
decisions which largely correspond with our aims were made in 
many important questions, like the new members taking part in 
foreign and security policy cooperation. In the next few weeks 
there will be a compact and demanding stage of negotiations on 
the questions which remain open, mainly in agriculture. It 
would be desirable that satisfactory solutions could be found 
quickly. According to my view, our preconditions to reach a 
good negotiations result will not improve if the solutions were 
to be delayed until after the elections of the European 
Parliament, until the end of the year or even further. It is 
important to reach such a result which, according to the 
promises of the government, can be submitted to a national 
referendum. In all situations we must ourselves take care of 
matters and advantages concerning us, our economy, and our 
security. It is not certain that anybody else will do that for 
us. [as heard] 
  The debate on our future economic views has increased. In 
the last decade we have become used to thinking that progress is 
sure and justified, setbacks are considered to be temporary and 
unnecessary. Lately there have been comments which take a 
serious view on the alternative that we could not or we should 
not continuously aim to increase our consumption level. We are 
increasingly taking part in international cooperation and we are 
greatly dependent on what happens in the world. Matters which 
can be reliably predicted take place and unpredictable matters 
take place. The growth in the world's population continues in a 
speedy way, birth control is ineffective, and all countries that 
are able to aim to increase the standard of living of their 
population, improving the peoples' state of health, and 
increasing the average age. The increase in the number of human 
beings and their increasing needs to consume create pressure for 
natural resources and threaten the balance of nature. [passage 
omitted] 
  Poverty is absolute but it is also relative. There is an 
increasing gulf between consumption in the industrial countries 
and in the developing countries. A few recently industrialized 
countries here and there have managed to jump over this gulf, 
mainly in Southeast Asia. The example and the actions of the 
industrialized countries are putting the balance of nature to a 
severe test, mainly in those developing countries where there 
are unused natural resources. 
  Finland is one of those countries which have restricted 
natural resources and where the increase in the level of 
consumption because of that is based on exploiting resources 
from elsewhere. This phenomenon has been especially strong in 
the last few years when we have taken increasing debts from 
abroad at a speed not seen before. This sort of indebtedness has 
been possible only because we have been able to assure the rest 
of the world of our willingness and ability to fairly quickly 
stop our increasing indebtedness and start repaying our debts. 
Taking care of the debts and taking part in supporting nations 
which are in a much worse position than us will lead to the 
situation whereby there will not be any room to increase the 
level of consumption for a long time. In my view, in order to 
pay the bill we need more production, not less. However, less 
of that produced can be used by ourselves, not more. 
  The external value of the Finnish mark has now been under 
the 
influence of market forces and they have kept it incredibly low. 
The low external value of the Finnish mark, according to my 
calculations, has at least so far led to increased unemployment, 
not decreased. Our export industry now has an exceptionally 
good ability to compete with prices. If our export sector were 
more extensive and if our exports were more largely based on a 
selection of products where, from an international point of 
view, we are not a considerable producer, we would have 
extensive markets to utilize without any danger of large 
conflicts, because we have access to markets which some 
countries do not have. We have no reason to sneer at anybody on 
the basis of our exceptionally good price competitiveness. We 
should be able to increase our exports but without big 
investments. What ability we have to invest should not in any 
case be used in areas which produce little, like the 
infrastructure projects which are currently unnecessary. 
  A better balance between the services we sell abroad and 
those we buy abroad is created mainly because our ability to buy 
services has weakened faster than our ability to sell them. A 
lot has been invested lately in Finland in services, both in the 
material sense and in the mental sense. The supply and demand 
of services are endless, the question increasingly is who is 
prepared to pay for them and how they can be financed. 
  We have become used to talk about a structural change, which 
sometimes has been considered necessary; sometimes there has 
been a willingness to restrain it. What is meant within the 
structural change has not been defined. According to my view, 
what is meant with regard to structural change is that an ever 
decreasing part of the workforce should be in primary production 
and that the workforce should not increase, even in goods 
manufacturing, but that at an increasing level people should 
carry serve one another and receive compensation which 
corresponds to their education. It would have been good if the 
permanent preconditions for structural changes in society had 
been better assessed -- apparently the time has arrived for 
assessment. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57812 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu001_q_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TURKEY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Demirel Phones Saudi King on Islamic Support for Bosnia </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  TA3112193093 Ankara TRT Television Network in Turkish 1800 
GMT 31 Dec 93 </F>

<F P=103> TA3112193093 </F>
<F P=104>  Ankara TRT Television Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Turkish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Announcer-read report over still of President Suleyman </F>
Demirel] 
  [Text] President Suleyman Demirel has held a telephone 
conversation with Saudi King Fahd and has stated that the 
Islamic world should once more be mobilized to make the 
international community take the necessary steps regarding the 
Geneva talks on the issue of Bosnia-Herzegovina. King Fahd said 
that he fully shares these views and that he will initiate the 
necessary moves on the issue. 
  According to a statement issued by the Presidential Press 
Center, Demirel informed King Fahd of Bosnian Prime Minister 
Haris Silajdzic's concern regarding the course of the Geneva 
talks. Demirel reiterated the view that if the talks prove to be 
unsuccessful then there will be no valid reason to continue the 
arms embargo imposed on Bosnia-Herzegovina. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57813 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu001_q_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TURKEY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Azerbaijani Foreign Minister Concludes Visit, Departs </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  TA3012154493 Ankara ANATOLIA in English 1525 GMT 30 Dec 93 </F>
<F P=103> TA3012154493 </F>
<F P=104>  Ankara ANATOLIA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Ankara, Dec 30 (AA) -- Azerbaijani Foreign Minister 
Gasan Gasanov said on Thursday [30 December] that no one could 
spoil friendship ties between Turkish Republics. 
  Gasanov departed Turkey after completing his official 
contacts. 
  Foreign Ministry officials commenting on the visit said 
Turkey and Azerbaijan decided that Nakhichevan Autonomous 
Republic's border could not be changed by force. 
  It went on saying that the two countries decided to set up a 
study group to prepare a new protocol about a joint border 
between these two countries. 
  Foreign Minister Hikmet Cetin said Turkey will extend 
Azerbaijan $10 million credit within the framework of a protocol 
which was earlier signed between the foreign ministries of 
Turkey and Azerbaijan. 
  The credit will be used in the construction of diplomatic 
buildings that are to be set up in Baku. 
  President Suleyman Demirel invited Azeri President Geydar 
Aliyev to Turkey and Gasanov said the visit will probably take 
place in Jan. 
  Gasanov said a summit meeting of Turkish Republics which 
will 
be held between Jan 21 and 22 in Baku will show the other 
countries that no one will be able to spoil our friendship ties. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57814 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002aa_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   NATO Role Needs To Be Redefined To Manage Crises </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0301141594 Brussels LE SOIR in French 3 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> BR0301141594 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels LE SOIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Commentary by Armand De Decker, president of the Liberal </F>
Group in the Assembly of the Western European Union: "The 
Summit of Errors"] 
  [Text] The Atlantic alliance is at a crossroads. 
Disoriented by the implosion of the USSR and the dismantling of 
the Warsaw Pact, it is trying to get its breath -- so far 
without success. 
  Yet the challenges are many. Europe has never known such a 
threatening period, one so laden with risks since the time when, 
in the face of Stalinist imperialism, it decided to create the 
WEU [Western European Union] and then, in 1949, to join NATO. 
  It is true, however, that the great ideological battle 
between communism and capitalism is dead, more because of the 
resounding failure of the former than the victory of the latter. 
  Many Western governments, including that of the United 
States, have unfortunately made the mistake of believing that 
the disappearance of this opposition of two blocs would 
necessarily lead to the dawn of an era of peace and the 
disappearance of the risk of a major conflict in Europe. 
  Nothing could be further from the truth! 
  The death of the great dragon of communism allowed the 
reappearance of the old demons of nationalism, racism, religious 
fanaticism, intolerance, and populism, which, in interaction, 
could just as surely lead to widespread war in Europe. 
  Yet the United States has withdrawn more than 200,000 
soldiers from Europe, leaving just a symbolic contingent of 
100,000 men, which certain congressmen would like to reduce even 
further. 
  The countries of West Europe, hard hit by an unprecedented 
structural crisis, are also blindly reducing their military 
budgets and staff, even though the American disengagement should 
make them more responsible for their own security. 
  Of course the WEU has been revitalized and was officially 
assigned in Maastricht to become the military wing of the 
European Union, but its budgets and resources remain 
ridiculously insignificant. 
  In this context, the NATO summit to be held in Brussels on 
10 
January will take on special importance. 
  Either the allies will recover their self-control, define 
priorities, and give NATO a new mission, or we risk seriously 
compromising the capacity of the Western democratic world for 
managing crises which will surely rock Europe in the near future. 
  The main challenge to be taken up by the alliance in the 
short term is to respond to the pathetic appeal of the countries 
of Central Europe that are seeking protection and security. 
  Czech President Vaclav Havel has explained better than 
anyone 
else why his country wanted -- legitimately -- to join NATO. 
  NATO exists to defend democracies in Europe -- even new ones 
-- wishing to live in liberty and a rule of law state. 
  The Iron Curtain did not fall so that we could take the 
states that were victims of Soviet totalitarianism for more than 
40 years and toss them into the insecurity created by their 
Russian neighbors. If that was the desire of the governments of 
the alliance, the Brussels summit would just as shamefully take 
its place in history as did the sadly famous Munich accords, and 
even the Yalta accords. 
  And yet, under the influence of the hesitant diplomacy of 
the 
Clinton Administration, the member countries of the alliance are 
preparing -- in response to applications for membership from 
Poland, the Czech Republic, Slovakia, and Hungary -- to propose 
a bogus form of membership called Partnership for Peace, which, 
in the eyes of the candidate countries, will soon look like a 
blunt refusal. 
  Indeed, like in Cold War times -- not wanting to collide 
with 
the large and still powerful Russia -- the United States, which 
naively thinks that we can still trust the Russian leaders and 
Boris Yeltsin in particular, is preparing to obey the veto that 
Moscow has put on any expansion of the alliance. 
  What a mistake! 
<H5>  A Window of Freedom That Risks Being Closed Again </H5>
  The implosion of the USSR and the fall of the Iron Curtain 
have opened up a window of freedom to the East that risks being 
closed again very soon. 
  Russia is in the midst of an anarchy that is preparing the 
ground for a new dictatorship. With every day, the Army is 
regaining more of the power it temporarily lost, while fascist 
forces are trying to take power via elections. We have already 
seen this somewhere else.... 
  In this context, it is normal that the instability being 
experienced in the USSR, just like the traditional imperialism 
of the greater Russia, should frighten her neighbors. 
  It is our duty to respond to this generously, firmly, and 
clearly! 
  Not to do so would risk costing us very dearly in the long 
term. 
  History constantly reminds us that peace and freedom must be 
earned every day. 
  Have we fallen so deep into the cowardice and blind egoism 
which are already sadly guiding our steps in the former 
Yugoslavia? 
  Have we lost so much moral sense that we are no longer 
capable of defending our primary interest: peace in liberty? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57815 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002aa_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   UN Forces Commander in Bosnia Criticises Policy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0301143194 Groot-Bijgaarden DE STANDAARD in Dutch 3 Jan 94 
p 6 </F>

<F P=103> BR0301143194 </F>
<F P=104>  Groot-Bijgaarden DE STANDAARD </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Dutch </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Commentary by Dirk Achten: "Understandable"] </F>
  [Text] A demoralized General Francis Briquemont, the 
Belgian commander of the UN forces in Bosnia, is bitter in his 
criticisms of the international community, the United Nations 
and the European Union. The UN Security Council passes lofty 
resolutions, creates safe areas, on occasion makes threats, but 
on the ground the resources are lacking to even start with these 
tasks. It is enough to make a person despair, and clearly 
things have reached a point where they make even the general in 
charge feel unusual bitterness. 
  In his first weeks on the ground, Briquemont thought that he 
had some power to stop the arbitrariness and madness. When 
Serbian militiamen shot at his troops in July, he threatened 
retaliation if it happened again. A day later that situation 
indeed arose and nothing could be heard from the tough general. 
When two weeks later NATO, which is after all not an unknown 
institution to a Belgian soldier, said it was in favour of 
possible bomb attacks on Serbian positions, Briquemont was a 
vehement opponent. The confusion is total, he said, and my 
soldiers are dispersed. In these circumstances bombing would 
solve nothing. 
  Half a year later the confusion is still total and 
Briquemont's UN soldiers are part of it. Who still knows what 
the UN has come to Bosnia to do? To give food to the needy, who 
then fight on or are shot dead? To protect safe areas? To 
sponsor negotiations? To clean things up a bit? Or simply to 
wander around, a question of knowing what is going on? 
  Therefore General Briquemont's demoralization is not 
surprising. He tried and then discovered that it did not lead to 
much. He thought that the persuasive power of the African 
discussion would produce some result. He hoped for an 
international community which could impose respect and had a 
clear objective. Of course that was not the case. The UN 
soldiers in Bosnia are taking part in terminal care and like 
indignant tourists watch ethnic cleansing and the destruction of 
a piece of European culture. 
  And even that is not without risk. Every now and then a UN 
soldier dies. Recently a group of Canadian soldiers was 
kidnapped and mistreated by Serbian militiamen. The incident 
was noted and it was hoped that it would go no further. The 
West, the United States, and certainly Europe does not want a 
firm intervention. The policy is one of containment, the 
Bosnian conflict must remain limited, a local issue. Within 
these limits much, if not anything, can happen. So that less and 
less people still follow the news, so that Bosnia becomes 
folklore, the little local war which can provide striking images 
now and then, but ever less frequently. 
  And further? Foreign Affairs Minister Willy Claes is very 
angry with the Serbians -- in any case he has been angry with 
them many times in the past -- and is threatening new sanctions 
to stop aggressive Serbian expansionism. As if sanctions have 
any effect here any more. A clearly outlined policy on this 
Serbian violence, with support to victims and neighbors and a 
clear message to Serbia, is a very different matter. 
  But, as Claes of course knows, that presupposes some 
unanimity within the European Union on this conflict. What is 
involved here is not a large-scale military intervention, but an 
assessment of the situation. It seems that Europe is not able 
to even manage that. The general, who must sort things out on 
the ground in these circumstances, is becoming depressed. A 
perfectly understandable reaction. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57816 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002aa_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Commentary on U.S. Role in Khan's Arrest </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0301155294 Brussels LA LIBRE BELGIQUE in French 31 Dec 93 
p 6 </F>

<F P=103> BR0301155294 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels LA LIBRE BELGIQUE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Commentary by Michel Rosten: "Amanullah Khan and Willy </F>
Claes"] 
  [Text] After 72 days of detention in Brussels, Amanullah 
Khan has returned to Pakistan. It is amazing that a man who had 
committed no crime in Belgium and who in no way threatened the 
interests of the country could be kept under lock and key for so 
long. The authorities will of course argue that the name of the 
president of the Jammu and Kashmir Liberation Front (JKLF) is 
listed with Interpol, and that is reason enough. 
  We will not therefore continue to labor this point. On the 
other hand, it would be wrong of us to close the matter just 
because Mr. Amanullah Khan has been released. Too much doubt 
remains at various levels not to give us cause for concern. 
Thus, firstly from a diplomatic point of view, we should repeat 
once more the conclusions of certain analysts who are convinced 
that the arrest of the JLKF leader in Brussels on 18 October was 
organized at the request of the cabinet of Mr. Willy Claes, keen 
to serve a foreign power -- not to put too fine a point on it, 
the United States -- irritated at seeing the European Parliament 
participate in the Kashmir crisis. In the light of this, it is 
interesting to note that a magazine published in Hong Kong, and 
specializing in Asian questions, recently carried an in-depth 
article on Washington's particular and recent interest in 
Kashmir. As the saying goes, there is no smoke without fire.... 
  On a domestic level, certain points at the Foreign Ministry 
also attract attention. Reliable sources say that Mr. Claes's 
cabinet may have been informed beforehand of the invitation 
issued to Mr. Amanullah Khan by the British socialist group at 
the European Parliament. There is no reason to doubt it, since 
the Belgian foreign minister is president of the European 
socialists -- between comrades, it is a fairly logical thing to 
respect the customs required by simple politeness, a point that 
the German and French diplomatic heads for their part found it 
convenient to ignore when, during a recent visit to Warsaw, they 
offered to implement a process of rapprochement between Central 
Europe and the Western European Union. 
  Indeed, Mr. Claes, who had other things on his plate these 
last six months, was perhaps not personally informed of Mr. 
Amanullah Khan's visit before he arrived in Brussels. This is 
what he claims. If he is telling the truth, however, why then 
does he not censure the leader of his cabinet, Mr. Willems, who 
is said to have played a major role in this affair. Moreover, 
if Mr. Claes is as innocent as the proverbial lamb, why is the 
minister so keen to drag his ambassador in Islamabad in the mud 
when his successor, Wilfried Geens, has already been secretly 
appointed? Could not Mr. Staes too have been unaware of the 
plot that was being hatched in the office of one of his 
colleagues -- the consul, in fact. That being said, it is 
nonetheless significant that Mr. Staes, this noncommissioned 
officer, this balding and scruffy individual, accused by the 
minister of having committed "a serious error" will not, it 
appears, pass before a disciplinary committee. He will "only" 
be subject to an administrative inquiry. Informed sources say 
that he will be reprimanded or given a black mark in his file 
before being invited to wander like a suffering soul through the 
corridors of the ministry for the good reason that the minister 
cannot lose face! It all depends on whether you are a prince or 
a pauper.... 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57817 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002cc_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTER-EUROPEAN AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   European Economic Area Takes Effect </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0301150594 Groot-Bijgaarden DE STANDAARD in Dutch 3 Jan 94 
p 11 </F>

<F P=103> BR0301150594 </F>
<F P=104>  Groot-Bijgaarden DE STANDAARD </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Dutch </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article signed CB: "The European Economic Area Is the </F>
Biggest Market in the World -- Integration Is Far Less Extensive 
Than Within the European Union"] 
  [Text] Brussels -- Since 1 January the European Economic 
Area (EEA) has become a fact, creating a large single market of 
372 million people from the member states of the European Union 
[EU] and Austria, Iceland, Norway, Sweden and Finland. However, 
in a few years the EEA is in danger of being undermined when 
four of the five countries mentioned are to become full members 
of the EU. 
  The EEA dethrones the North American Free Trade Agreement 
(NAFTA), which made the United States, Canada, and Mexico into a 
large market, as the biggest market in the world. NAFTA may be 
bigger in terms of surface area, but the EEA has a larger 
population, larger production, and a larger share in world trade. 
  The EEA has 372 million inhabitants compared with NAFTA's 
360 
million. The EEA has a joint GNP of $7,500 billion (270,000 
billion Belgian francs [BFr]) compared with NAFTA's $6,770 
billion (BFr244,000 billion). The EEA exports $3,878 
(BFr140,000) per inhabitant, compared with $1,683 (BFr60,500) in 
NAFTA. 
  Originally the aim was that all seven countries in the 
European Free Trade Association (EFTA) should join the EEA. But 
the Swiss voters decided otherwise in a referendum at the end of 
1992. The treaty had to be quickly adapted to accommodate 
Switzerland's dropping out and be ratified again. In addition, 
Liechtenstein, which has a customs treaty with Switzerland, was 
also unable to join for the time being. 
  Somewhat ambitiously, the EEA is sometimes called the 
biggest 
single market in the world. However, the current negotiations 
on Norway, Sweden, Finland and Austria joining the EU make it 
clear that EEA membership is still some distance from EU 
membership. 
  First, the EFTA countries involved have no representatives 
in 
the European institutions, they do not take part in 
decisionmaking procedures within the Union and are adopting 
nothing of the Union's political ambitions. But, on the 
strictly economic level, integration does not go so far as 
within the Union. 
  Agriculture and fishing are outside the EEA agreement; the 
free movement of goods between the Union and the EFTA countries 
can be limited for reasons of public safety or public health and 
there is no joint trade policy. Restrictions continue to apply 
to the purchase of real estate and direct investment in the EFTA 
countries. 
  But the EFTA countries are adopting the EU's rules on free 
competition. They are setting up their own "Supervisory 
Council," which is to ensure that rules of competition are 
respected. From now on the five countries will also be involved 
in the preparation of new EU laws. 
  For these reasons many observers see EEA membership as 
merely 
an interim step to full EU membership. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57818 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002cc_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTER-EUROPEAN AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Euro-ISDN Telecommunications Network Links 17 States </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401093994 Brussels LE SOIR in French 15 Dec 93 p 6 </F>
<F P=103> BR0401093994 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels LE SOIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Philippe Berkenbaum: "The First Information </F>
Highway"] 
  [Excerpts] The "information highways" so dear to the 
president of the European Commission did not wait for the 
publication of his white paper -- adopted last Saturday [18 
December] at the Brussels summit -- to become a reality. 
Yesterday, still in Brussels, Jacques Delors was to have 
inaugurated the first truly trans-European telecommunications 
network: Euro-ISDN (Integrated Services Digital Network). 
Prevented at the last minute from attending the ceremony, the 
Commission president charged the director general of DGXIII (EC 
Commission directorate general responsible for 
telecommunications) to represent him and to welcome the event on 
his behalf: "We are moving from the industrial era to the age 
of information." 
  [passage omitted] ISDN has remained relatively confidential 
until now for two reasons. The first reason was the national 
and incompatible nature of the early networks, leading to a lack 
of crossborder services. The second reason, an immediate 
consequence of this, was the scant enthusiasm shown by terminal 
manufacturers and service suppliers to invest in a market that 
was certainly promising but which was too limited because of the 
adaptations needed for each country. 
  It was to remedy this problem that, in 1986, the EC launched 
the idea of a jointly operated and standardized ISDN. Three 
years later, in 1989, 26 European telecommunications operators 
(including Belgacom) undertook to provide a basic set of 
pan-European services by the end of 1993. They rose to the 
challenge, and Euro-ISDN was born. The network already connects 
17 countries. Including the vast investments needed to develop 
the applications, the global cost is estimated to have already 
reached ECU50 billion or 2,000 billion Belgian francs. 
  [passage omitted] Some people, however, are wondering if 
Euro-ISDN is not arriving just a little late. It is merely 
foreshadowing the future network known as broadband ISDN, which 
is expected to be introduced on a large scale as of 1995. This 
network, also backed by the European Commission, will offer much 
greater data transmission capacities and a better integration of 
services. Bringing high-resolution color faxes, high-definition 
interactive television, the transfer of medical images, etc., it 
will pull Europe headlong into the era of multimedia 
communications. Pilot projects already exist, developed by the 
major manufacturers with the backing of various European 
programs. 
  The ambition stated in Brussels last weekend is to free up 
the resources needed to put these services within everyone's 
reach by building trans-European networks. In its white paper, 
the Commission reckons that the development of 
telecommunications in Europe will cost some ECU150 billion over 
the next five years. To be sure, such expenditure will not be 
in vain -- by the year 2000, telecommunications should represent 
6 percent of GNP of the Twelve and boost growth by 6 percent 
over the next 10 to 15 years. Its depths have yet to be plumbed. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57819 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002cc_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTER-EUROPEAN AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   ECU20-Billion Multimedia Network Planned </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401105194 Paris ELECTRONIQUE INTERNATIONAL HEBDO in 
French 16 Dec 93 pp 1, 6 </F>

<F P=103> BR0401105194 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris ELECTRONIQUE INTERNATIONAL HEBDO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Didier Girault: "ECU 20 Billion for a European </F>
Asynchronous Transfer Mode Network"] 
  [Text] Research is being carried out into plans for an 
immense European multimedia network. Its infrastructure will be 
based on ATM [Asynchronous Transfer Mode] technology and will 
use fiber optics. 
  The leaders of the member states of the European Union have 
just voted in favor of adopting measures recommended in Jacques 
Delors' white paper to ensure that Europe is better prepared to 
"enter the information era, a transformation comparable to the 
first industrial revolution." 
  At the heart of the project is the setting up of a 
high-speed 
communications network. According to figures in the white 
paper, its installation would cost ECU20 billion over the 
1994-99 period. In spite of our insistence we were unable to 
find out what this ECU20 billion would cover in practice, as all 
the directors concerned were busy in Brussels. We only know 
that this network should use ATM technology and fiber optics. 
Its installation should be a godsend for European suppliers of 
ATM equipment such as scramblers, concentrators, and access 
networks. 
  The first stage in this project would be to set up 
fiber-optic infrastructures; in this field France is the most 
advanced country in the Union. 
  The spin-offs from this project should be at least as 
important as the project itself. For example, the white paper's 
insistence on the creation of information services should result 
in the use of numerous database servers. As a parallel 
development, impetus would automatically be given to the 
widespread use of multimedia equipment (videophones, pay TV, 
multimedia PC's, storage media). In general, the creation of 
the European information network should boost progress on the 
European telecommunications services markets, currently worth 
ECU84 billion per year with annual growth of 8 percent, and in 
telecommunications equipment (ECU26 billion and 4 percent 
growth). 
  The major problem to be solved by those taking part in the 
program is apparently that of network interoperability. This 
should, however, be helped by the opening up of telephony 
markets in Union countries in 1998. 
<H5>  Emphasis on Services </H5>
  Thanks to the implementation of European information 
networks 
allowing the transmission of data, voice, and images, access to 
huge databases will be assured and telecommuting will be 
promoted. This implementation will be accompanied by the 
creation of new services, which in itself will generate new jobs 
as happened in France with the minitel, which was behind the 
creation of 350,000 new jobs in the service sector. 
  In voting for this project, representing an overall cost 
(equipment, services, and applications) of ECU150 billion over 
10 years and ECU67 billion in the 1994-99 period, the leaders of 
the Union countries have shown their willingness to keep Europe 
at the forefront of technology. The project to which they have 
given their support corresponds to the super information highway 
program dear to Bill Clinton and Al Gore (an overall investment 
of ECU85 billion), and to the equivalent Japanese project 
supported by Tokyo as part of its economic revival plan. 
  A task force working under a mandate from the European 
Council will identify the consecutive steps to be taken, draw up 
a timetable, and study the deployment of resources. It should 
report to the president of the European Council on 31 March 
1994, so that work can begin by mid-1994, following the approval 
by the European Council. 
<H5>  [Box, p 6] </H5>
<H5>  Proposed Trans-European Telecommunications Networks </H5>
  The total investment involved for the networks and services 
described below is ECU67 billion. 
<H5>  Advanced Interconnected Networks </H5>


  -  Installation of 
high-speed communications networks: This will require an 
investment of ECU20 billion over the 1994-99 period. It is 
deemed to be necessary for the development of multimedia 
services, and will use the most advanced data transmission 
techniques (ATM technology, fiber optics, etc.). 
  -  Consolidation 
of the integrated services digital network: With an investment 
of ECU15 billion over the next five years, such networks should 
be found throughout the Union before the year 2000. 
<H5>  General Electronic Services </H5>

  -  Electronic access to 
information: This will require an investment of ECU1 billion 
over the 1994-99 period, and will involve the uploading of 
information (administrative, scientific, or cultural) in 
databases accessible to any user in the Union. 
  -  Electronic mail: 
Also for an ECU1-billion investment, various commercial 
electronic document transmission services will be developed and 
made interoperable (particularly important for small- and 
medium-sized companies). 
  -  Electronic images, interactive video 
services: An ECU10-billion investment will be required to 
ensure the interoperability of new, flexible services 
(pay-per-view, video on demand) at the European level by 1997. 
<H5>  Data Communications Applications </H5>

  -  Telecommuting: There 
will be Community support to the tune of ECU3 billion over five 
years for pilot programs aimed at setting up a cross-border 
network of human resources management. 
  -  Remote administration: 
An investment of ECU7 billion over 1994-99 will help the 
implementation of data exchanges between administrative bodies 
(customs, statistical organizations) and give companies and 
private individuals access to such data. 
  -  Distance training: 
This will involve an investment of ECU3 billion and will result 
in the setting up by 1996 of a network linking more than 100 
universities or colleges in order to make shared teaching 
modules accessible. 
  -  Distance health care: this will require an 
ECU7-billion investment over the 1994-99 period for the 
installation, between now and the year 2000, of a multimedia 
network linking up the major anticancer centers, bone marrow 
banks, and the principal Social Security centers. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57820 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_a_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> AUSTRIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Serb Arrested Trying To Cross Border With Explosives </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0301193294 Vienna ORF Teletext in German 1836 GMT 3 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> AU0301193294 </F>
<F P=104>  Vienna ORF Teletext </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Spectacular discovery of explosives at the border 
checkpoint of Heiligenkreuz between Burgenland and Hungary: It 
has only now been announced that on 30 December a Serb, carrying 
detonators and fuses, wanted to enter Austria. The man was 
arrested. 
  It is still unclear for what purpose the explosives were to 
have been used. However, it has been confirmed that the 
explosive cargo is of the same "type" as the explosive found 
after the double murder of two german border policemen on the 
"Danube Courier" train. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57821 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_a_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> AUSTRIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Explosives Destined for Switzerland </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0401102394 Vienna DER STANDARD in German 4 Jan 94 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> AU0401102394 </F>
<F P=104>  Vienna DER STANDARD </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [APA report: "Explosives Seized in Bus at Border"] </F>
  [Text] Eisenstadt -- The state police are investigating 
the discovery of explosives at the Hungarian border at 
Heiligenkreuz. On 30 December a Serb carrying 1.5 kg of 
explosives with fuses and detonators wanted to enter Austria. 
The explosives were hidden in a traveling bag in the baggage 
compartment of the bus that he was driving. The driver and 
owner of the vehicle, who operates a bus line between Belgrade 
and Switzerland, was not transporting any passengers. During 
the interrogation, he pretended not to know anything: He said 
that he was unaware of the explosives. The bag was to be handed 
over to somebody in Switzerland. 
  The Serb was arrested. The purpose of the explosives was 
still unclear on Monday [3 January]. It is not known whether 
the material was to be sold for profit or used for attacks. 
  A link with the bomb threat against [Vienna's] Schwechat 
Airport on New Year's Eve has been ruled out. It has only been 
confirmed that the explosive found after the double murder of 
the German border policemen on the "Danube Courier" train was of 
the same "type." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57822 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_b_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> BENELUX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Government Wants To Recall General Briquemont in Bosnia </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0401092694 Paris AFP in English 0859 GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> AU0401092694 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris AFP </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Brussels, Jan 4 (AFP) -- Belgium has told the United 
Nations that it wants to recall the outspoken commander of UN 
forces in Bosnia-Herzegovina, Belgian Lieutenant-General Francis 
Briquemont, Defence Ministry officials said here. 
  Briquemont succeeded French General Philippe Morillon as the 
UN's top soldier in Bosnia in July last year, and like Morillon 
has frequently expressed anger at the UN Protection Force's 
(UNPROFOR) lack of means to protect civilians in Bosnia and stop 
attacks on UN aid convoys. 
  Briquemont's one-year stint as UNPROFOR head ends in July. 
But the defence officials said Belgium had asked UN Secretary 
General Butrus Butrus-Ghali to release him earlier. 
  The Belgian military authorities would give no official 
reason for its request to recall Briquemont, apart from saying 
that he was needed to help restructure Belgium's defence force. 
  Briquemont recently demanded reinforcements for the 
12,000-strong UNPROFOR contingent in Bosnia, and said he no 
longer bothered to read unheeded UN resolutions on the civil war 
in the ex-Yugoslav republic. 
  The Belgian radio station RTBF said Briquemont might be 
recalled as early as the end of January. A Belgian Defence 
Ministry spokesman said Belgium would nominate another top 
military officer to serve out Briquemont's term. 
  On Monday [3 January], French General Jean Cot, commander in 
chief of the 30,000-strong UNPROFOR force in ex-Yugoslavia, 
complained of the "humiliations" suffered by the UN troops and 
said it was ready for an "offensive intervention" in Bosnia. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57823 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_b_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> BENELUX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tobback Reacts to Turkish-Kurdish Communities Clashes </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0301141694 Brussels LA LIBRE BELGIQUE in French 3 Jan 94 p 
2 </F>

<F P=103> BR0301141694 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels LA LIBRE BELGIQUE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Gerald Papy: "Not Spontaneous"] </F>
  [Text] On Sunday [2 January], Louis Tobback, Belgian 
interior minister, agreed to share his thoughts with us 
following the violent events of the previous day. He largely 
refutes the idea that the Turkish reaction to the meeting of the 
Kurds in Saint-Josse was spontaneous. 
<H5>  Other Events Have Passed Without Incident </H5>
  The minister stressed that the demonstration by the Union of 
Patriotic Intellectuals of Kurdistan, who arrived from Bonn, had 
been authorized by the German and Belgian authorities. The 
march through Liege and an overnight stay in Hasselt -- both 
towns with a high concentration of Turks -- passed without 
incident. 
  The visit to Saint-Josse -- the militants were to occupy the 
Flemish cultural center in the rue de la Commune for four days 
-- should not have been any more cause for tension, believes 
Louis Tobback. 
  Did not the proximity of a large Turkish community in the 
area suggest possible problems? The interior minister does not 
think so, arguing that larger pro-Kurdish events have already 
been organized in other areas of the capital where many Turks 
live and they went off without incident. 
<H5>  What Good Would Banning Do? </H5>
  Is the unfurling of the Kurdish flag enough to explain the 
sudden eruption of violence by the Turks? The interior minister 
does not believe so; he does not accept that the street 
demonstration was a spontaneous event and suggests another 
analysis. "To my knowledge, the incidents were not provoked by 
the Kurds," explains the minister. "The clashes were not 
spontaneous. On the basis of the report by the gendarmery, I 
note that the Turkish demonstrators included many members of the 
far right organization known as the `Grey Wolves.' This was not 
by chance." 
  The interior minister goes further and does not exclude the 
possibility that the clashes were provoked in Brussels in order 
to induce the government to ban the activities of the PKK 
[Workers Party of Kurdistan] and its satellite organizations, as 
Germany and -- to a lesser degree -- France decided to do at the 
end of November and the beginning of December 1993. Could this 
outcome be envisaged in Belgium? Louis Tobback is very 
skeptical. "First of all, our constitution provides no legal 
basis to allow us to ban a political party. Secondly, what good 
would it do? It is not by banning the PKK that you will cause 
it to disappear. But if we can bring to light the offenses 
committed by its militants, we will then take the necessary 
sanctions against them." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57824 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_b_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> BENELUX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Turkish Envoy: Tobback `Misinformed' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0301180694 Brussels La Une Radio Network in French 1700 
GMT 3 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> LD0301180694 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels La Une Radio Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Yildirim Keskin, Turkish ambassador to </F>
Belgium, by correspondent Jean-Pierre Jacquemin on 3 January; 
place not given -- recorded] 
  [Excerpt] [Passage omitted] There were many contacts 
between both capitals [Brussels and Ankara] today. Jean-Pierre 
Jacquemin has just interviewed Yildirim Keskin, the Turkish 
ambassador in Belgium. He has confirmed Ankara's accusations 
against the Belgian authorities: 
  [Keskin] My ministry believes that the Belgian authorities 
should not allow the PKK [Kurdistan Workers Party] to hold a 
meeting in the Turkish district. 
  [Jacquemin] When [Interior] Minister Tobback says that the 
violent demonstrations by young Turks are not spontaneous, what 
do you say? 
  [Keskin] I say that he is misinformed, because I have spoken 
with the people who witnessed these incidents: Everything 
happened very quickly and spontaneously. 
  [Jacquemin] Does this mean that, according to you, there are 
no Grey Wolves, these members.... 
  [Keskin, interrupting] I do not know about that. It may be 
the case. But according to me, nothing was planned in advance. 
  [Jacquemin] This morning you met Belgian Foreign Affairs 
Minister Willy Claes. 
  [Keskin] Yes. This is only a hitch, we agreed on the fact 
that violence could not settle anything and that the heat should 
come off all this. 
  [Jacquemin] According to you, will things quiete down over 
the next few hours? 
  [Keskin] But things have already calmed down, I think. 
  [Jacquemin] Yes, that is also what we thought yesterday, but 
there were more riots.... 
  [Keskin, interrupting] No. I believe that the PKK group 
which came from Bonn is to leave Belgium this evening or 
tomorrow morning, and that is it. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57825 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_b_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> BENELUX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Claes: PKK Supporters To Be Deported </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  TA0301184494 Ankara TRT Television Network in Turkish 1700 
GMT 3 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> TA0301184494 </F>
<F P=104>  Ankara TRT Television Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Turkish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Announcer-read report over still of Foreign Minister Cetin] </F>
  [Text] Foreign Minister Hikmet Cetin spoke with Belgian 
Foreign Minister Willy Claes on the telephone and expressed his 
regret over the incidents in Brussels. Claes pointed out that 
the Belgian Government and the municipalities had no knowledge 
of the developing incidents, adding that the PKK [Workers Party 
of Kurdistan] supporters would be deported tonight. 
  The foreign ministers discussed ways to prevent such 
regrettable incidents. Cetin pointed out that following the 
German and French ban on the PKK, the terrorist organization 
transferred its activities to Belgium. Cetin indicated that PKK 
supporters congregate in areas heavily populated by Turkish 
citizens as a method of provocation. He added that Turkey 
expects the Belgian Government to show sensitivity on this 
issue. Cetin pointed out that the press statement issued by 
Louis Tobback, the Belgian interior and immigrant affairs 
minister, was unfortunate. He warned Claes not to meet with the 
supporters of the separatist terrorist organization. 
  Claes, in turn, stated that these kinds of incidents were 
also not approved by the Belgian public. Pointing out that they 
will not tolerate terrorism, Claes thanked Turkey's ambassador 
to Belgium for his efforts in assuaging the situation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57826 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_b_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> BENELUX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ankara Reportedly Supports Gray Wolves </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401135094 Brussels LE SOIR in French 4 Jan 94 p 13 </F>
<F P=103> BR0401135094 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels LE SOIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Alain Lallemand: "Turkish Extreme Right, </F>
Ankara's Objective Ally"] 
  [Text] Who are these Gray Wolves in Belgium which Interior 
Minister Louis Tobback is accusing of leading the anti-Kurd 
demonstrations of recent days? 
  Their official name is "Turk-islam Federasyonu" or "Belcika 
Turk-islam Kultur Dernekleri Federasyonu," which can be 
translated as "Turkish-Islamic Federation" or "Federation of 
Turkish-Islamic Cultural Associations of Belgium." The Belgian 
headquarters of this federation is in Beringen, and its European 
headquarters are in Frankfurt. It is also supported actively at 
international level by the Turkish Government, which denies 
this, as might be expected. 
  As an extremely dangerous extreme right movement, it is an 
avatar of Colonel Alparslan Turkes' fascist nationalist party. 
Highly active in the late 1970's and 1980's, its members 
specialized in guerilla warfare and the murder of progressive 
politicians. They also engaged in heroin trafficking in order 
to finance their activities. 
  However, they are even better known for their direct 
involvement in the failed attempt against Pope John Paul II in 
May 1981. If we are to believe the Turkish daily, MILLIYET, the 
person who fired the shots in Saint Peter's square in Rome, Ali 
Agca, was allegedly harbored for a while with the Belgian 
representative of the Gray Wolves, Selahattin Saygin, in 
Maasmechelen. 
  Do the Gray Wolves also benefit in Belgium from the relative 
leniency of the Turkish authorities? Of course: In 1986, 
during the third conference of Gray Wolves of Belgium, the 
fundamentalist Turkish newspaper, DUSUNCE, reported that apart 
from Selahattin Saygin, the Turkish consul from Antwerp, Feyha 
Enc, and the Turkish minister of health, Halil Sivgin, also 
appeared on the podium. 
  Belgium is also used by the Gray Wolves for heroin 
trafficking. This information has already been published several 
times in LE SOIR, but it should again be pointed out that one of 
the Gray Wolves' most famous activists, Oral Celik, alias Bedri 
Ates (borrowed name), was arrested on 10 November 1986 in 
Halluin by the French customs authorities, while leaving our 
country with 3.6 kg of heroin. Concealed under a false 
identity, he has since admitted that he was indeed the extreme 
right activist fingered by his fellow terrorist, Ali Agca. 
  Further evidence of the criminal activity of the Gray Wolves 
in Belgium was the presence in September 1990 in the Liege 
suburbs of Ahmet Esensoy, who was involved in heroin trafficking 
and was the right-hand man of Rifat Yildirim, one of the most 
famous Gray Wolves terrorists. Esensoy, who has since been 
apprehended, was in transit. A generally reliable source says 
that there are allegedly comings and goings between Belgium and 
the Frankfurt "city bazaar," the preferred spot of the Gray 
Wolves. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57827 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_b_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> BENELUX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Socialist Party Chairman Reviews Past Year </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR2912160793 Groot-Bijgaarden DE STANDAARD in Dutch 28 Dec 
93 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> BR2912160793 </F>
<F P=104>  Groot-Bijgaarden DE STANDAARD </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Dutch </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Pol Van Den Driessche: "Consultation Model Gets </F>
a Second and Possibly Final Chance"] 
  [Text] Brussels, 28 Dec -- During the next two months 
employers and unions must prove that the famous 
interprofessional consultation is still meaningful, SP [Flemish 
Socialist Party] Chairman Frank Vandenbroucke stated in a talk 
concluding his political working year. Together they have a 
second and probably last opportunity to speak, in an ambitious 
way, about employment. For the SP leader, the precondition for 
success is social partners' readiness to depart from cheap 
cliches and "simplistic thought patterns." If the consultation 
fails, they will also be responsible for the negative employment 
results. 
  Vandenbroucke said that he had reason to look back with 
satisfaction on the past political year. In particular his 
party's major renewal, both structurally and substantially, 
visibly pleases him. He has succeeded in overturning the SP's 
almost fossilized structures and in gradually constructing a 
modern, political membership party. He reminded listeners of 
his successful referendum, in which more than 95,000 SP members 
were given an opportunity to express their opinions, an 
invitation which almost half of them accepted. "Did you know 
that a few years ago we didn't even have a central members' 
register?" Vandenbroucke quickly added. 
  Moreover, the recent party congress agreed to update the 
contents of the traditional socialist message. "For a long time 
social progress was equated with purely materialistic progress. 
We broke with this vision, and now insist that social 
emancipation also involves raising the quality of life and 
society. Contrary to some opinions, this is very much a 
message of and for the average Fleming, i.e., not just for 
intellectuals." 
<H5>  New Spring </H5>
  The chairman concurs that the six hearings the SP organized 
aroused enthusiasm primarily among intellectuals. "Possibly 
this has more to do with the death of the culture of meetings 
than with the rich contents. You cannot get average people out 
of their homes any more for a meeting, only professionals still 
make this effort." 
  The party leader went on to state that a new generation of 
socialists was ready to embody this doctrine. "It is these 
newcomers who made the success of the SP congress two weeks ago. 
At the risk of forgetting names, I would point to the rich 
contribution of people like Jan Peeters, Johan Vande Lanotte, 
Leo Peeters, Renaat Landuyt, Anne Van Lancker, Carlos Lisabeth, 
Dany Vandenbossche, and Francy Vanderwildt. They seem to be the 
first blossoming buds announcing a new spring for us." 
  Vandenbroucke answered the question as to whether this 
renewal would also be apparent in the list of candidates 
prepared for the communal elections, with the statement that 
local policies cannot be dictated from SP headquarters on 
Brussels' Keizerslaan. "The local departments received a clear 
suggestion from me to give the enlargement a chance in the 
communal elections. In Mechelen and Ghent they have already 
made the first moves in this direction. For me, the real test 
only comes in December 1995, with the next parliamentary 
elections." 
  He was not ready to give away much about the preparation of 
the SP list of candidates for the June 1994 European elections. 
"I wanted first of all to know whether the government would 
survive. Now that I am certain, I am beginning my talks." 
  He recognizes that European Commissioner Karel van Miert in 
first place would "be a particularly good thing, but, for 
various reasons, this is not a simple matter." Insistent 
questions as to whether he would head the list were brushed 
aside with enigmatic smiles: "You'll hear about it, the question 
is not that urgent yet." 
  We noted the same reserved attitude when the Vanvelthoven 
affair was placed on the table. "We expect total integrity from 
our mandataries. Louis [Vanvelthoven] [Former president of the 
Flemish Council] acted consistently, I don't want to say 
anything more about this." Vandenbroucke finds it very 
irritating that this affair is mentioned in the same breath as 
the SP scandals. 
  At the same time he appears very conscious of the problems 
threatening the [Prime Minister] Dehaene cabinet if Deputy Prime 
Minister Guy Coeme is pressed further into the corner by the 
courts [for his alleged involvement in the Agusta helicopter 
bribery case] and should this Walloon politician eventually 
refuse to act upon this appropriately. 
<H5>  Voting Rights </H5>
  For Vandenbroucke, 1993 was the toughest year for Flemish 
socialists since the split of the BSP (Belgian Socialist Party) 
at the end of the seventies. "We continued to participate in the 
government after an election defeat; the budget preparation and 
control were difficult and demanded considerable effort; the 
economy is doing particularly badly, forcing us to prepare a 
crisis plan. Despite this we note that the opinions polls once 
again give us a slight edge. Although it's not enough yet. At 
the end of the government's term of office, we should end up at 
our true level, a good 20 percent," the SP chairman 
philosophized. 
  With his negative opinion on granting voting rights to 
migrants, he was asked if he is not rejecting a number of 
left-wing intellectuals, while some "brown thinking" supporters 
consider him just a little "too flexible" when it comes to 
foreigners? "I am in favor of votes for migrants via 
naturalization, let's be clear on that. But arguing about this 
right now plays only into the hands of the extremists and to the 
disadvantage of the tolerant center." 
  A little later, Vandenbroucke openly recognized that his 
participation in the "hand-in-hand" demonstration through 
Antwerp did him no electoral good. This by no means implied 
that he will not appear in future antiracist demonstrations. 
  The socialist leader is counting on the government to 
implement its crisis plan with a triple aim: to prove the 
prophets of employment doom wrong, to achieve the reform of the 
pension system and health insurance, and to give solid results 
by 1995 in the fight against fraud. 
  At the same time, the Flemish Government received a 
compliment in this festive period from Vandenbroucke for its 
recent decision to encourage the distribution of work by giving 
the so-called second check. "I hope that the federal social 
partners will take equally creative paths, in order to proceed 
to the necessary redistribution." 
  Almost passionately he went on to add: "I would ask the ABVV 
[Flemish wing of Socialist Trade Union] and the ACV [Flemish 
wing of Christian Trade Union] to show, after the new year, that 
the unemployed are as important for them as the employed. 
Indeed it is high time that we spoke a little less about what 
is impossible, and a little more about what is possible?" 
<H5>  VLD [Flemish Liberal Democrats] </H5>
  Finally, Vandenbroucke has no plans to soften the discussion 
about what future we want for Flanders and the Flemings. As a 
result he continues to challenge the VLD to disclose its 
alternatives. "Moreover I notice a steadily increasing 
similarity between the VLD and the `Reaganomics' of the early 
eighties: the relating of totally unbelievable statistics to 
ideological coherence, i.e. only the rich fare better. In 
concrete terms, the middle class is entitled to hear from the 
VLD how much it is really going to cost them." 
  In 1994, politically interested Flanders will therefore 
again 
be able to witness several rounds of powerful verbal-ideological 
fighting between the SP and the VLD. Just as long as this does 
not become personal, it is -- at times -- even very interesting. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57828 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_b_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> BENELUX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Body of Emigre Bosnian General Prazina Found </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0301101694 Paris AFP in English 1007 GMT 3 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> AU0301101694 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris AFP </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Brussels, Jan 3 (AFP) -- The body of a Bosnian 
general shot dead was found in a car park along the main highway 
between Liege in eastern Belgium and the German border town of 
Aachen, legal sources disclosed here Monday [3 January]. 
  They said two Romanian hitchhikers found the corpse of Yusuf 
Prazina at Walhorn overnight Friday. Prazina, 30, who had been 
in the fighting in Sarajevo, settled in Liege last August. He 
went missing early last month, the sources said. 
  Belgian public service radio said Prazina, regarded as a 
moderate, had deserted and taken refuge in Belgium. He often 
went about armed and accompanied by bodyguards who were his 
former soldiers. 
  The radio said he disappeared with three of them on December 
3. It said the bullets to his head matched the calibre of the 
weapon of one of the bodyguards and that the general was killed 
some three weeks ago. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57829 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_b_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> BENELUX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Firm Participates in PRC Remote Sensing Venture </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0301132694 Antwerp DE FINANCIEEL-EKONOMISCHE TIJD in Dutch 
23 Dec 93 p 9 </F>

<F P=103> BR0301132694 </F>
<F P=104>  Antwerp DE FINANCIEEL-EKONOMISCHE TIJD </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Dutch </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article signed VDB: "Eurosense Enters Chinese Market With </F>
Joint Venture in Peking; Its Partner Is Beijing Remote Sensing 
Corporation"; spelling of Chinese names as published] 
  [Text] Wemmel (TIJD) -- Eurosense, a company based in 
Wemmel which specializes in orthophotography, has recently set 
up a joint venture in China together with the Beijing Remote 
Sensing Corporation (BRSC), a Chinese state enterprise 
specializing in cartography. Eurosense holds 51 percent of the 
joint venture, currently capitalized at 10 million Belgian franc 
[BFr]. The new company is called Eurosense Beijing Aerospace 
Mapping Company Ltd and its offices will be in one of Beijing's 
new industrial development zones. 
  It is the first time that China has entered into an 
agreement 
on such a sensitive matter as cartography with a Western 
country. BRSC is a coordinating company in which all the remote 
sensing and photogrammetry activities from six different Chinese 
ministries are brought together. According to Eurosense 
Chairman Emile Maes, it was the Chinese who for about a year had 
been pressing for the setting up of a joint venture with 
Eurosense. 
  The joint venture will accept civilian orders exclusively; 
no 
military matters are included in the contract. The aim is to 
enable the Chinese to catch up quickly in the area of 
orthophotography. Thus, initially Eurosense will transfer a 
great deal of technology to the Chinese, both know-how as well 
as equipment. 
  According to Emile Maes, the Chinese can learn a lot from 
Eurosense, not only in the areas of photographic quality and 
processing methods, but also in cost control. For instance, 
several study visits by Wemmel technicians revealed that their 
Chinese partner is using heavy military aircraft for overflying 
areas, which are very expensive as far as fuel is concerned. 
<H5>  Training </H5>
  Emile Maes has just returned from Beijing where he signed 
the 
joint venture together with the managing director of BRSC, Guyan 
Haiyan. He estimates that the Chinese project will cost 
Eurosense some BFr50 million during the initial phase, 
particularly for the training of personnel. Maes and Haiyan 
will both have a seat on the board, which will consist of four 
people. 
  Eurosense will hire a Chinese to monitor the Chinese joint 
venture. This person will be trained next year [1994] and will 
operate from an office in Wemmel. In addition, Eurosense will 
provide training to another five Chinese, who in turn will 
transfer their acquired know-how to the new joint venture. 
  Initially, most orders received by the joint venture will be 
carried out at Wemmel, according to Maes. Subsequently, the aim 
is to subcontract as much work as possible to BRSC, which 
currently has a staff of 1,650 including 50 percent engineers. 
  The joint venture's employment structure will depend on 
future developments in Chinese state enterprises, which tend to 
shove more and more jobs toward private industry. Thus, it is 
possible that BRSC will attempt to transfer some of its current 
responsibilities to the joint venture. 
  Via this joint venture, China particularly wants to set up a 
digital file with orthophotographic maps whose accuracy equals 
that of topographic maps and which can be retrieved 
electronically and processed on a computer. In this way, large 
areas can be mapped far more quickly and accurately than was 
previously possible. 
  In addition, China is particularly interested in Eurosense's 
"Beasac" coastal detection technology. Chinese harbors have to 
cope with erosion and silting up, and the coastal areas with 
flooding. The joint venture will transfer the Beasac technology, 
which is now being used on the Belgian coast, to a Chinese 
hovercraft. 
  According to Emile Maes, 1994 will be a training year for 
the 
joint venture and orders will to a large extent be completed 
from Wemmel. The Chinese partner BRSC also wants to attack 
overseas markets with the joint venture. It is aiming 
particularly at Vietnam and Indonesia, as well as those other 
countries where it already has good contacts. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57830 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_b_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> BENELUX </F>
<F P=101> Netherlands </F>
<H3> <TI>   Deputies Oppose Defense Cuts, Cite Zhirinovskiy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401131894 Rotterdam NRC HANDELSBLAD in Dutch 31 Dec 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> BR0401131894 </F>
<F P=104>  Rotterdam NRC HANDELSBLAD </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Dutch </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Rob Meines: "Chamber: Zhirinovskiy's Success </F>
Calls For Strong Defense"] 
  [Text] The Hague, 31 Dec -- A majority in the Second 
Chamber wants to see no further cuts made to the defense budget. 
According to the parliamentary groups of the CDA 
[Christian-Democratic Appeal], VVD [People's Party for Freedom 
and Democracy], and D66 [1966 Democrats], the recent political 
developments in Russia are reason enough to stop further cuts to 
Netherlands defense budget. Of the four main groups, only the 
PvdA [Socialist Workers Party] considers it "still too early" to 
make a similar decision. The PvdA wants to retain its own 
proposed plan of budget cuts worth more than 900 million 
guilders for the next legislative period. 
  However, according to the CDA, VVD, and D66, the Priority 
Memorandum accepted earlier this year by the Chamber [Memorandum 
to the House outlining the government's priorities] must be 
carried out "to the letter." Spokesmen for the CDA, VVD, and 
D66 also expect that a fundamental debate on conscription will 
have to be conducted all over again as soon as the necessary 
constitutional amendment is put on the agenda. "If a man like 
Zhirinovskiy were to come to power, we should not give him a 
chance to say: The West can do nothing because their armies are 
powerless," CDA foreign affairs spokesman De Hoop Scheffer said. 
Consequently, the CDA "is wary of the PvdA's call for further 
defense cuts," Hillen, CDA vice chairman of the [House] Defense 
Committee said. Van Heemskerck Pillis-Duvekot, the VVD's 
defense spokesperson, also senses -- both in her own party "and 
beyond it" -- a real unwillingness to implement further cuts 
right now. "We had already reached the limit, and certainly now 
that the situation in Russia has developed in this way, we 
cannot allow further reductions to our armed forces." Eisma of 
D66 also believes that the bottom has been reached. 
  Nonetheless, PvdA finance spokesman Melkert wants to adhere 
to the [PvdA's] analysis that further cuts are possible. 
However, he said that "if NATO were to give further security 
guarantees to the countries of Central Europe and if extreme 
rightist-nationalist Zhirinovskiy managed to strengthen his 
power base in Russia, then we would have to reconsider the 
configuration of the Netherlands Army." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57831 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_b_94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> BENELUX </F>
<F P=101> Netherlands </F>
<H3> <TI>   KLM Airline Merger Canceled Due to U.S. Warning </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401104194 Rotterdam NRC HANDELSBLAD in Dutch 30 Dec 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> BR0401104194 </F>
<F P=104>  Rotterdam NRC HANDELSBLAD </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Dutch </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Max Christern and Michel Kerres: "KLM Renounces </F>
Merger Under U.S. Pressure"] 
  [Text] Amsterdam, 30 Dec -- The fear that U.S.-Netherlands 
relations could be damaged played a prominent role in the 
cancellation of a merger between the European airlines KLM, 
Swissair, Austrian, and SAS -- [a move code-named] operation 
Alcazar. KLM was willing right up to the very latest stages of 
the merger negotiations to drop its present U.S. partner, 
Northwest Airlines. This emerged from talks with negotiators 
and supervisors and top members of the staff of the four 
airlines concerned. 
  The Netherlands Government and KLM feared that the United 
States would frustrate the intended European airline 
conglomerate in the U.S. market. During the final weeks of 
negotiations, the U.S. Government made clear that an agreement 
between the four airlines and Delta Airlines, which has close 
links with Swissair, would not be given the same rights in the 
U.S. air market as the ones currently being enjoyed by KLM and 
Northwest. In order to make the most of the airline merger, the 
possibility of favorable international air traffic contracts had 
to be available to the Alcazar-Delta conglomerate. "Ultimately, 
it was a question of expectations. The data pointed in the 
direction of Alcazar. However, we sincerely believed that the 
United States would frustrate Alcazar if KLM caused difficulties 
for Northwest. We did not believe that the Americans were 
bluffing. That belief won through in the end," said one KLM 
official. 
  At an early stage of the negotiations, the four partners had 
already informally agreed that they would work together with 
Delta Airlines, Swissair's partner. In doing so, KLM had shown 
its willingness to drop Northwest. The informal agreement was 
scrupulously kept secret for months, for fear of legal steps on 
the part of Northwest. 
  Northwest, in which KLM holds a 20 percent stake, has barely 
any chance of survival without KLM. If KLM were to drop its 
U.S. partner in favor of a European alliance it could face 
claims worth millions from Northwest shareholders. 
  Two days before [operation] Alcazar was called off, KLM 
reached an agreement with the Netherlands Government. KLM opted 
for Northwest, thus saving U.S.-Netherlands relations. In 
return, the government revoked the 1986 promise never again to 
provide financial support for the national airline, and promptly 
expressed its intention to participate in an upcoming shares 
issue planned for next spring. 
  "It was rather simple," said one KLM official. "We told the 
government that if they attached such great importance to good 
relations with the United States, then they had the moral 
obligation to provide financial backing for KLM right now." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57832 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_h_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kinkel Would Consider Visa </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0401134094 Berlin N-TV in German 1100 GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> LD0401134094 </F>
<F P=104>  Berlin N-TV </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Foreign Minister Klaus Kinkel has spoken out in 
favor of a political dialogue with the Russian nationalist 
leader Zhirinovskiy. In an N-TV interview, Kinkel explained the 
conditions that might lead to an entry visa being issued for the 
right-wing extremist: 
  [Begin Kinkel recording] I would not be worried about 
getting 
involved in a discussion with him, not be concerned that we 
could not be a match for him and for his extremist theories and 
arguments. I did not say, however, that I was prepared to invite 
him to Germany tomorrow for a discussion or to take part in a 
discussion. However, if he does get invited, for example, to 
take part in a specific discussion by a political foundation or 
is invited by someone here in Germany at some point, if we have 
the opportunity to tell him quite clearly what we think of his 
theories, and if the right people would debate him, then I would 
say we could and should think about it at least. [end recording] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57833 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_h_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kinkel, Olechowski Discuss NATO Membership </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0301202794 Berlin DDP/ADN in German 1530 GMT 3 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> LD0301202794 </F>
<F P=104>  Berlin DDP/ADN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Bonn (DDP/ADN) -- German Foreign Minister Klaus 
Kinkel expects the NATO summit in Brussels on 10 January to make 
a decision of general principle on the expansion of the alliance 
to include the states of East and Central Europe. Germany would 
act as an advocate for these countries in this process, Kinkel 
assured his Polish counterpart Andrzej Olechowski in Bonn today 
during talks lasting about two hours. However, complete 
membership will not happen quite as fast as the Central and East 
European countries wish. Cooperation without the guarantee of 
mutual assistance is conceivable, to start with. Joint 
maneuvers could also be considered. 
  Olechowski said his country wants to join NATO so that 
Poland 
can get out of the "grey zone." History had shown that if 
Poland stays in that zone, the consequences could be disastrous. 
Poland expects the NATO summit to offer it definite and 
specific prospects for membership. However, the Poles are also 
aware that systems as complex as NATO cannot be joined 
"overnight." Poland also does not want Russia to feel isolated 
by Poland's membership of NATO. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57834 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_h_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   SPD Manager Verheugen Views 1994 Elections </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0401122994 Munich FOCUS in German 3 Jan 94 pp 26-27 </F>
<F P=103> AU0401122994 </F>
<F P=104>  Munich FOCUS </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with SPD Federal Manager Guenter Verheugen by </F>
Nicola Bruening and Olaf Opitz; place and date not given: "The 
Role of the Favorite Constitutes Risk"] 
  [Text] [FOCUS] Mr. Verheugen, you have now been in office 
for more than 100 days. Supreme party manager of the Social 
Democratic Party of Germany [SPD] -- is this a dream job? 
  [Verheugen] Certainly not. In practice, the federal manager 
is responsible for all the flops, while the others claim credit 
for the achievements. 
  [FOCUS] Your predecessors were not exactly treated leniently 
by your party .... 
  [Verheugen] ...which is why I am rather surprised about the 
support that I have found. 
  [FOCUS] How would you describe the state of your combative 
troops before the super election year? 
  [Verheugen] We have at least reached a point at which the 
SPD is no longer giving contradictory signals. The leadership 
is standing shoulder to shoulder and is ready to act. There are 
no pending controversial issues. The party congress resolutions 
have been accepted by the individual minorities. 
  [FOCUS] It is hard to believe that the SPD should have 
assumed the mood of victor so quickly? 
  [Verheugen] Some risks will always remain. One risk is of 
being the favorite, something into which we have grown. I am 
warning my friends in the party: We are far from having 
achieved what we want. The election will only be won after we 
have polled sufficient votes. Another cause of insecurity is 
the situation in terms of foreign policy. After all, 
conservative politicians might like to see a lasting crisis in 
Russia, which they could use for domestic policy purposes. 
  [FOCUS] How should Germany react to the situation in Russia? 
  [Verheugen] We must not build up a new enemy image of 
Russia. Some people in the Christian Democratic Union/Christian 
Social Union [CDU/CSU] will try to exaggerate the citizens' 
security needs and turn it into an issue in the election 
campaign. How this works was shown by the CDU during the Cold 
War of the fifties and sixties. 
  [FOCUS] It was then that it won majorities. What do you 
suggest? 
  [Verheugen] What would be more important now is a policy 
that is coordinated with our Western allies and the European 
Union that would make it possible for Russia really to use its 
chance for democratic reform and economic renewal. 
  We must continue to support the democratic forces, which do 
not only include Boris Yeltsin. 
  [FOCUS] Not everybody takes a great interest in politics 
across national borders, which can be seen in the German 
discussion on Europe. 
  [Verheugen] In this connection the SPD is sometimes closer 
to the chancellor than his own sister party. As far as the 
necessity for European unity is concerned, we share Helmut 
Kohl's view. Edmund Stoiber's hostile policy toward Europe is 
populistic, irresponsible, and dangerous. His only objective is 
to make the CSU win more than 5 percent in the European 
elections. Stoiber's claim that European unification was no 
longer up-do-date proves his absolute ignorance as far as the 
European security situation is concerned. 
  The decisive guarantee for peace is that there is no relapse 
into a policy of national interests. Since Stoiber continues to 
spread his theses, an anti-Europe party is now being founded. 
  [FOCUS] The SPD will also be fighting for every single vote 
in the coming 18 elections. What tricks do you have in store? 
  [Verheugen] Solid ones. After all, I do not think that the 
people expect any gimmicks from the parties. We have to conduct 
an election campaign that is completely different from previous 
years. The only effect of the traditional sharp controversies 
and mudslinging would be for the citizens to turn their backs on 
the parties in disgust. First of all, we must regain the 
non-voter's interest in politics. This group constitutes more 
than 40 percent of the population.... 
  [FOCUS] ... and they do not want to hear any more shallow 
promises. 
  [Verheugen] Which is why we must give concrete answers to 
their questions. Honesty in the run-up to the election is 
imperative. This applies to finance, the labor market, social 
issues, the environment, and the personalities of our government 
team. 
  [FOCUS] The SPD has so far not offered any details. 
  [Verheugen] This will change once our government program is 
completed in late March. It will contain in great detail all 
the burdens that the people can expect, how much we can save, 
the areas where a fairer distribution is necessary, and what we 
intend to do to improve the labor market. 
  [FOCUS] The election campaign will be tough this year. Can 
a fairness agreement between the parties prevent uncouth attacks? 
  [Verheugen] We had that before, in 1980. But it did not 
work. A new attempt would have to be given much thought; but I 
do not rule it out. What we certainly need is for the parties 
themselves to promise to limit the mudslinging and to treat 
their political opponents fairly. 
  [FOCUS] There are plans to abolish the television debates 
because extremist parties have filed court complaints against 
their exclusion. 
  [Verheugen] As far as I am concerned, the discussions 
between the leading candidates of the parties are the climax of 
an election campaign, which is why I would not scrap these 
programs, even if representatives of the radical Party of 
Democratic Socialism [PDS] or the Republikaner were to 
participate in them. We must force these parties to say what 
they really stand for. CDU headquarters would prefer the 
federal chancellor not to participate in such rounds. Still, I 
do not expect the leaders of the democratic parties to leave the 
field to Mr. Gysi or Mr. Schoenhuber, no matter how eloquent 
these gentlemen may be. 
  [FOCUS] In previous television discussions in Bonn after the 
landtag elections only a select group of people would sit 
together. 
  [Verheugen] And what was the result? After the Hamburg 
Burgess election the bizarre situation arose that the Greens, 
who won more than 10 percent of the vote, were not represented 
at all. It was then that I said that I would not do that again. 
However, there are signs of a change. 
  The decision on a new plan will be made this week: According 
to the public radio and television stations all the parties that 
are represented in the Bundestag should participate in such 
rounds, that is to say including the Greens and the PDS. 
  [FOCUS] In the United States the election campaign is 
dominated by the electronic media. When will German politicians 
stop appearing in local taverns? 
  [Verheugen] An assembly in the back room of some cafe 
certainly does not make a lot of sense. However, particularly 
in the election campaign I would not like to do without talking 
directly with the voters. Of course we also need television. 
However, we are still limiting ourselves to conventional spots. 
We simply cannot afford to buy time on private stations. No 
party would financially survive an electronic election campaign. 
In the United States television commercials of up to 20 minutes 
are nothing unusual. 
  [FOCUS] Such spots cost about 3 million German marks [DM]. 
  [Verheugen] Exactly, and we have reduced our budget for the 
1994 European and Bundestag election to just under DM100 
million. Still, the U.S.-style election campaign on television 
is bound to come. As soon as one party starts it, the others 
will have to follow suit -- maybe as early as in 1998. 
  [FOCUS] Nevertheless, this year you will have to think about 
the fragmentation of the party landscape in Germany. 
  [Verheugen] I am greatly worried about the continuing 
split-up of our party system. It is threatening the 
predictability and stability of the democratic parliamentary 
system. Even now the classic three-party system has been 
smashed -- incidentally, with the effect that the Free 
Democratic Party of Germany [FDP] has been drawn into a struggle 
for survival. 
  [FOCUS] Former Chancellor Helmut Schmidt sees the republic 
in danger, which is why he is pleading for an English- or 
U.S.-style majority voting system. 
  [Verheugen] I would, generally, warn against meddling with 
the electoral law with the sole purpose of evading current 
political difficulties. One would always have to pay for it. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57835 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_h_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   CDU Chairman Schaeuble Outlines Party's Course </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0301183094 Hamburg DER SPIEGEL in German 3 Jan 94 pp 24-27 </F>
<F P=103> AU0301183094 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DER SPIEGEL </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Wolfgang Schaeuble, chairman of the CDU/CSU </F>
Bundestag group by Paul Lersch and Klaus Wirtgen in Gengenbach; 
date not given: "Strong or Weak State?"] 
  [Text] [DER SPIEGEL] Mr. Schaeuble, be honest: Your 
senseless proposal to permit the use of the Bundeswehr for 
missions at home by changing the Basic Law was intended to take 
the attention from the most important issue: unemployment and 
social security. 
  [Schaeuble] No, honestly, that is not true. The first time 
I came across this issue was during the 1985 world economic 
summit in Bonn. There were rumors of a possible air attack. 
Only the Bundeswehr would have been able to prevent such a 
strike. Yet due to the strict regulations under the Basic Law, 
the Bundeswehr is not allowed to get involved in such a case. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Even friends from your own party fail to 
understand what made you bring up this preposterous subject in 
the peaceful time before Christmas? Was it intended to sharpen 
the CDU's profile? 
  [Schaeuble] No, I am concerned about the matter itself. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] You certainly knew that the necessary Basic 
Law amendment would not achieve a two-thirds majority in the 
parliament. 
  [Schaeuble] Well, I think that in the foreseeable future we 
will get a decision on the framework of the Basic Law for 
Bundeswehr missions. It will be a good opportunity to continue 
this debate. The first reaction by the Social Democratic Party 
of Germany [SPD] somewhat reminded me of the Pavlovian reflex: 
When you show the dog the sausage it begins to salivate. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] The name of the sausage was: With this 
subject Schaeuble wanted to impress friends on the right fringe. 
  [Schaeuble] No, not at all. There is a broad common 
agreement -- this includes the SPD -- that we have to do more 
for internal security, which is why I thought it important to 
broach this subject in view of the beginning of a new year. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Let us come back to your example of the world 
economic summit. Nobody can prevent terrorists from firing 
missiles at Bonn from some place -- neither the Bundeswehr, nor 
the police nor the Federal Border Police. 
  [Schaeuble] I felt very uncomfortable at the time. Let us 
take an example that is technologically less ambitious, a model 
aircraft carrying explosives. Of course one could do something 
against it, namely shoot down such a flying object; yet, the 
Bundeswehr is not permitted to do that. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Why do you not ask: How could one improve the 
equipment of the Federal Border Police to enable it to deal with 
such threats? You are looking for a subject that creates 
controversy. 
  [Schaeuble] I do not see it as such. If the result of the 
discussion was that more is done for the Federal Border Police 
it would be a good consequence. The ridiculous thing about the 
debate is that people in Germany act as if my proposal were an 
axe looming over the roots of democracy. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] There are historical sensibilities. 
  [Schaeuble] One must not rule everything out from the very 
beginning or regard it as taboo by pointing to special 
experience from our history. I certainly do not underestimate 
this objection. However, I am asking myself - particularly 
regarding the Germans' historical experience -- whether it is 
good to do everything differently from other countries. 
Sometimes we could really adopt something from traditional 
democracies. From France to America and New Zealand -- it is 
possible to use military forces everywhere for missions at home 
also. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] You have yourself mentioned an example from 
the United States, namely the attack against the World Trade 
Center, which was blamed on Islamic fundamentalists. The 
Americans did not resort to the Army. 
  [Schaeuble] What is certain is that the borderline between 
internal and external security can no longer be defined as 
clearly as in the past. Therefore, it must be possible to 
resort to the Bundeswehr as a kind of security reserve. It is 
stupid to conclude from this that one should shoot at 
demonstrators . 
  [DER SPIEGEL] During the debate on emergency laws in the era 
of Christian Democratic Union [CDU] Chancellor Kiesinger the 
idea was discussed to use the Bundeswehr also against 
demonstrators and strikers. 
  [Schaeuble] I fear that the liberal democracy is threatened 
once people get increasingly worried about the state no longer 
being able to sufficiently guarantee their protection. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Do you think that the state is too weak? 
  [Schaeuble] Of course one can say that the history of 
Western democracies is the history of the limitation of state 
powers to guarantee the freedom of the individual. That is 
undoubtedly true. Yet, today I am worried that the people regard 
the state as too weak and that this might constitute a danger to 
freedom. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] So you are in favor of a strong state. 
  [Schaeuble] I would like to see the state as strong enough 
to prevent people from thinking that they have to turn to some 
kind of radical forces for shelter. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] None of the examples that you mentioned, not 
even that of "international migratory movements," requires the 
use of the Bundeswehr for missions at home. 
  [Schaeuble] This is a case that I took over from Polish 
President Lech Walesa. He said that he would open his country's 
borders in the east and west so that refugees from Russia could 
travel on to the FRG. Still, I do not want to press for a 
discussion on individual examples because I might then be 
accused of trying to scare people. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Your colleague Gerster mentioned as a first 
example the "import of organized crime." Should the Bundeswehr 
perhaps be used to fight crime in the future? 
  [Schaeuble] I think that Johannes Gerster's considerations 
were correct: We must be able to respond to any conceivable 
situation. And I have explicitly invited everybody to discuss 
this. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] You have yourself said that taboos have to be 
broken: using the Bundeswehr for missions at home now that 
missions outside the NATO area are being tried out. The 
existing consensus is thus being smashed in decisive points. Do 
you want a different republic? 
  [Schaeuble] Certainly not. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Other profound changes such as limiting the 
right to asylum or bugging apartments show how the course is set 
for a new direction. 
  [Schaeuble] I do not consider those to be profound changes. 
All I want is to guarantee security for the citizens at home and 
toward the outside. I think that my worries -- namely that our 
efforts in this connection are rather too lax than too great -- 
are shared by the majority of the people. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Why do you not frankly say what you want? 
Maybe your demand for a strong state and your appeal to 
national feelings will help you to gain the necessary support 
for continuing the coalition between the CDU/Christian Social 
Union [CSU] and the Free Democratic Party of Germany [FDP]. 
  [Schaeuble] You are constantly suggesting that I want a 
different republic. No, I want to preserve this republic. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Recent surveys do not indicate that the 
citizens are impressed with your ideas: According to Emnid, 
support for the CDU/CSU was 27 percent in December, which means 
that is was only 4 percentage points ahead of the group of those 
who said they would abstain in the election. 
  [Schaeuble] I can fully understand that the people are 
confused; constant controversies and negotiations on every new 
issue. Many Basic Law amendments are required; in the Bundesrat 
there is a different majority, which is doing some awful things. 
Since people are unable to see the exact difference they blame 
it on the government. We must now focus on the main subjects: 
the economy, the labor market, and internal and external 
security. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] The policy you offer in these areas only 
appeals to the conservative, loyal segment in your party, maybe 
30 percent of the electorate. Have you stopped competing on the 
SPD for the votes left of center? 
  [Schaeuble] I do not think very highly of a race intended to 
show who is able to promise more. After all, this is not what 
the great majority of people expects. The people feel that in 
this difficult time we are unable to preserve all our 
well-acquired rights and that they have to put up with greater 
changes than those to which they have been accustomed so far. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Your address to the party congress in Berlin 
was clearly directed to such faithful conservative voters. You 
criticized the social system and called for more patriotism and 
national feeling. Is the era of a party with a broad base, 
which used to range from Strauss to Bluem, over? 
  [Schaeuble] Do you really think that Norbert Bluem does not 
share my opinion in issues such as patriotism and national 
solidarity? 
  [DER SPIEGEL] We are thinking of the social system. This 
has become obvious in the controversy over nursing-care 
insurance. 
  [Schaeuble] Come on: We have been trying hard for years to 
create the basis for nursing-care insurance at a time the 
framework conditions for a further increase in labor cost do not 
exist. This is what Bluem has quite rightly described as 
"rebuilding." This is a much nicer word for something related 
to compensation -- that is to say compensation for higher costs 
on the part of the employer. Bluem's, Geissler's, and my 
priority is to get nursing-care insurance now by accepting cuts 
in other spheres of our social security system. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Mr. Schaeuble, you are covering up the 
problems of this debate. Together with the chairman of the FDP 
Bundestag group, Solms, and the employers' associations you led 
to a culmination of the controversy over one or two public 
holidays of compensation, which almost led to the resignation of 
the labor minister. Just as with the SPD, Bluem considers one 
day to be enough. 
  [Schaeuble] What is true is that we had to make concessions 
to the SPD whether we liked it or not, even though Bluem and I 
were of a different opinion: We had to drop our proposal of 
making people bear part of the risks themselves for continued 
wage payments in case of sickness. This would have been the 
correct compensation. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Are you intending to foil nursing-care 
insurance because of a difference of one public holiday? 
  [Schaeuble] Considering our weak economy the compensatory 
effect of abolished public holidays regarding the cost of labor 
is problematic. We opted for this path only to win the SPD's 
support for nursing-care insurance. But, two days are the 
absolute minimum. Besides, this does not mean that bearing parts 
of the risk of continued wage payments may not be discussed 
again in the next legislative term. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Kurt Biedenkopf has now repeated his old 
thesis and you supported him: As of the year 2020, pensions 
will no longer be safe. Are you planning to bring up the 
pension issue in the election campaign? 
  [Schaeuble] No. Bluem as well as myself are saying that the 
pensions for the current generation of pensioners and those who 
are near retirement age are safe. Still, politics is never made 
for eternity. Considering the foreseeable demographic 
developments -- more and more pensioners, fewer and fewer 
working people -- we now have to think of how pensions can 
remain secure and how they can be financed in a more distant 
future, too. On this issue I cannot contradict Biedenkopf. Why 
should one not discuss difficult and long-term problems also in 
an election year? 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Do you agree with your colleague Volker 
Ruehe who has linked the fate of this government to the way in 
which it will fill the gaps in the federal budget? 
  [Schaeuble] If I remember correctly the 1994 budget already 
passed the Bundestag. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Correct. Yet, the various ministries still 
have to effect 7.5 billion German marks [DM] in cuts. The 
chairman of the Budget Committee, Rudi Walther, even estimates 
that the gap will be DM15-20 billion. FDP officials Solms and 
Lambsdorff have called for a supplementary budget and a budget 
safeguarding law. 
  [Schaeuble] I was a Cabinet member for longer than most 
current government members, which is why I know that strict 
implementation of the budget can save much more than many people 
will admit today. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Lambsdorff has described people who make such 
proposals as "fools." 
  [Schaeuble] I suppose that Mr. Lambsdorff just approved of 
the budget. Look at the dramatic developments in the labor 
market: When we devised the 1993 budget we thought that we could 
do without subsidies to the Federal Labor Office. Now we need 
some DM20 billion. Considering these huge amounts it does not 
make any sense to use such militant arguments as Mr. Lambsdorff 
likes to apply at times. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] The Kohl government will have to enter the 
election campaign with the burden of a very large number of 
unemployed. 
  [Schaeuble] This is why we are considering possibilities to 
introduce work contracts with a time limit on a permanent basis. 
We also want to break up the Federal Labor Office's monopoly in 
the labor exchange in the entire FRG. What we will certainly 
have to do is to examine crucial points in our transfer system: 
Those who have a regular job -- even if it is only on a 
temporary or seasonal basis -- must have higher incomes than an 
unemployed person. This has nothing to do with social coldness, 
of which I have been accused, but with the concern that the 
unemployed people will accept the jobs they are offered in 
Germany. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Could a government reshuffle polish up the 
government's image before the election? 
  [Schaeuble] No, not as far as I am concerned. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Is it necessary to have a new face at the top? 
  [Schaeuble] Are you referring to the federal president when 
you say "at the top?" 
  [DER SPIEGEL] No, we were thinking of the cabinet head. 
  [Schaeuble] You are familiar with my opinion: In this time, 
which has become so insecure through the many changes, it is a 
great asset for our country to have such an experienced, 
reputable federal chancellor, who is also a strong leader. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Could it not be that, in comparison to the 
United States, the feeling that "it's time for a change" begins 
to spread in Germany, too? 
  [Schaeuble] If I were in the opposition I would also bring 
forth such an argument. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Do you regard it as necessary that the person 
who is chancellor is also party chairman? 
  [Schaeuble] Absolutely. In a parliamentary system in which, 
for the duration of one legislative term, the government is 
nothing else but the organized majority in the parliament, the 
government's and the government head's leadership power is based 
on the solidarity in his or her own political camp. Helmut 
Schmidt today regards it as his biggest mistake not to have been 
chairman of the major government partner when he became 
chancellor. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] In your capacity as Bundestag group chairman 
do you regard it as your duty to advise the chancellor to step 
down if you think that this is the only way to maintain your 
party's chances in the election and to save the coalition? 
  [Schaeuble] There is a difference between 
practical-political and academic discussions. You can say a lot 
about the abstract duties of Bundestag group chairmen. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] SPD Chairman Rudolf Scharping has said what 
many other people, including CDU Bundestag deputies, think: 
Schaeuble has become tougher and more embittered. 
  [Schaeuble] I do not see that. This was meant to hint at 
the change in my living circumstances. There can be no doubt 
that such an event changes one's pattern of behavior. One 
begins to see many things with a greater distance. However, I 
have the feeling that I have become more open for many things of 
which I did not know the first before. This not only applies to 
the concerns of handicapped people. I have also learned that 
affection and human coexistence are much more important than 
other things. 
  It has upset me that leading SPD officials -- Mr. Vogel was 
the first one to do so in your magazine; Mr. Scharping has been 
the last one thus far -- have tried to label me with a cliche. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] What cliche? 
  [Schaeuble] That a disability must embitter a person. This 
is how unjustifiedly prejudice against the handicapped is being 
used for political purposes. This would not only hurt me but 
also run counter to my cause, namely to prove that handicapped 
people can be as active in all spheres of human life and with 
the same rights, responsibilities, chances, and opportunities as 
people who are not disabled. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Do you not have to welcome the fact that as a 
handicapped person you are able to demonstrate your efficiency 
in the election campaign under even more difficult conditions? 
  [Schaeuble] Actually, I do not have to prove anything. I am 
grateful that I can make a contribution to politics with what I 
am able to do. 
  [DER SPIEGEL] Mr. Schaeuble, thank you very much for the 
interview. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57836 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_h_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tietmeyer Views Inflation, Interest Rate Policy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0301163194 Hamburg WELT AM SONNTAG in German 2 Jan 94 pp 
23-24 </F>

<F P=103> AU0301163194 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg WELT AM SONNTAG </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Bundesbank President Hans Tietmeyer by </F>
Bernhard Blohm in Frankfurt; date not given: "Regarding the 
Price Increase Rate This Year, a 2 Before the Comma Is Possible"] 
  [Text] [Blohm] Mr. Tietmeyer, you have been Bundesbank 
president for three months now and have to defend an annual 
result that is not very gratifying in stability policy terms. 
The economic output decreased approximately 2 percent in 1993, 
whereas prices increased approximately 4 percent. 
  [Tietmeyer] This result is definitely not what we would like 
to see. But it is probably a transition situation that was 
inevitable following the poor developments at the beginning of 
the 1990's. Regarding the price trend, we have always made 
clear that it is unacceptable for us and that we must return to 
clearly lower prices. It is important, however, that while the 
average annual increase was about 4 percent, the price increase 
slowed down in the second half of the year. 
  [Blohm] What are you expecting this year? 
  [Tietmeyer] We assume that there will be a better result in 
1994. We do not rule out that we will have a 2 before the comma 
in the course of the year. 
  [Blohm] The Bundesbank's current policy has been described 
as a policy of small steps. Do you think the 1993 end result 
would have been worse if the Bundesbank had decreased the key 
interest rates faster and more extensively? 
  [Tietmeyer] It is correct that we pursued a policy of small 
steps. But this was urgently necessary, because it was 
absolutely impermissible for us to jeopardize the positive 
assessment of the German mark by investors, in particular 
abroad, or the credibility of the German central bank's policy. 
All in all, we have made considerable progress. On the one 
hand, we have preserved the confidence of international 
investors. On the other, we clearly lowered long-term interest 
rates, and that is decisive. One thing is sure: Our interest 
rate policy has not had a negative influence on economic 
development, but has created the basis for an upward trend in 
the next few years on a new and sound basis. 
  [Blohm] You said recently that in view of rapidly growing 
unemployment, the dictate of the moment is to secure and promote 
employment. Couldn't the Bundesbank do more in this respect? 
  [Tietmeyer] The Bundesbank has done what it could. It is 
not primarily monetary policy that has to act, but decisions are 
now required in the area of the companies themselves, collective 
wage settlements, labor cost, and the area of public finances, 
which essentially influence the framework conditions. 
  [Blohm] The word "social cuts" is the keyword in 1993. You 
said that monetary policy cannot be the repair shop of public 
finances. Does this mean that the Bundesbank welcomes the 
discussion on entitlements and social cuts? 
  [Tietmeyer] I think that speaking of social cuts does not 
describe the situation or the task correctly. The task is to 
restructure the social welfare state and adjust it to the new 
conditions, nationally and internationally. I think it is 
important for us in Germany to return to the simple economic 
truth that says that one can only distribute what has been 
produced. In an open market economy system, entitlements cannot 
be retained in companies or in the social system, if the 
competitive conditions have changed. The most important thing is 
for us to interpret the term of social justice also in light of 
performance. 
  [Blohm] What do you mean by this? 
  [Tietmeyer] I mean by this that work must be remunerated 
according to the results. Payment for work must have an 
advantage over the distribution of benefits. 
  [Blohm] As of this year, the gasoline and diesel tax will be 
considerably increased. In 1993, taxes were also increased, and 
in 1995, we will again have to pay a solidarity surcharge. All 
this will, of course, also have an effect on prices. Is the 
state diminishing your stability successes? 
  [Tietmeyer] A restructuring of the tax system is in order, 
if taxes are imposed on consumption rather than 
performance-oriented incomes. An increase in the mineral oil 
tax does not have to undermine stability policy or growth and 
employment policy. However, it is of decisive importance that 
this tax-conditioned price increase not be passed on or taken as 
a reason for further income demands, which would then touch off 
another spiral. 
  It is important for us not to increase the tax quotas in the 
Federal Republic, one of the highest in the world, but to 
consolidate the public budgets, including social security 
systems, by restricting increases in expenditures. 
  [Blohm] Several days ago, the Bundesbank announced its new 
money supply target for 1994. It envisages an M3 money supply 
growth by 4 to 6 percent during the course of this year. Will 
monetary policy be continued along the line pursued since 
September 1992? 
  [Tietmeyer] It is certain that we will continue this course. 
This also includes the option of further interest rate 
reductions in case the money supply expansion slows down. We 
assume that it will decelerate in the course of this year. Then 
we will examine what the proper interest rate should be. 
  [Blohm] Are you still anticipating any leeway for interest 
rate reductions on the capital market? After all, interest 
rates on the capital market have already dropped far more 
considerably. 
  [Tietmeyer] To begin with, viewed historically and 
internationally, our capital market interest rates are 
relatively low. Currently, our capital market interest rates 
have almost reached their historical nadir. In the past, the 
rate of inflation was close to zero. On this basis, some 
observers do not expect another major decrease in interest rates 
on the capital market. In my view, it will be of decisive 
importance whether we will be able to maintain positive 
stability expectations for the next few years. The more positive 
they are, the more likely it is that long-term interest rates 
remain at a low level or decrease even further. 
  [Blohm] This year, 1994, is the 20th time that the 
Bundesbank 
has announced a money supply goal. In the first 10 years, the 
goal was missed five times, in the second nine years, six times. 
We do not see any kind of learning effect from such statistics. 
Why was this goal missed more and more often? 
  [Tietmeyer] More and more often is not correct. It is 
correct that we have not always fully reached it, but we must 
differentiate between a minor and a major deviation. There have 
been major deviations in a few years only. We hold the view 
that we must keep to the money supply concept because it 
provides an orientation for our own policy and for the financial 
markets. This is important for longer-term stability 
anticipations. In addition, all our analyses show that there is 
a close medium-term connection between the indicator, M3, which 
is the money supply watched and controlled by us, and the price 
trend. That is why we are convinced that it is the best 
indicator, which can also serve as a yardstick for ourselves. 
  [Blohm] On 1 August, 1993, the so-called fixed exchange 
rates in the European Monetary System were discarded. Now the 
exchange rates are allowed to fluctuate plus/minus 15 percent in 
the exchange rate mechanism. Does this make German monetary 
policy easier? 
  [Tietmeyer] The decision of 1 August certainly makes German 
-- and our neighbors' -- monetary policy easier. Now the risk 
involved in speculation is much greater. For us it is important 
that in our policy we must and will continue to consider what is 
happening in Europe as a whole. But we are less restricted by 
the tight corset of narrow bands. Our neighbor countries have 
to again bear more responsibility. 
  [Blohm] Are you expecting a relatively early return to 
narrower bands? 
  [Tietmeyer] Certainly not over the short term. For the time 
being, it is important to create confidence on the financial 
markets in the national monetary policy of the countries 
concerned. It is important to create the economic bases 
required for lasting exchange rate stability. In this respect, 
we have made good progress since 1 August. 
  [Blohm] Under the Maastricht Treaty, the progress made 
regarding fulfillment of the convergency criteria will be 
examined by the end of 1996. Do you think that most member 
states will then have met the prerequisites for European 
monetary union? 
  [Tietmeyer] I do not think it is possible at this point to 
forecast anything. Judging by the present data, it is not very 
likely. I do not consider it appropriate to say today what the 
situation will be by the end of 1996. The race has begun, and 
everyone should have a chance to reach the goal in due course. 
  [Blohm] You said that at the third stage of European 
monetary union, we will need a convincing and, if possible, also 
well-tested monetary policy concept. In your view, could it be 
different from that of the Bundesbank? 
  [Tietmeyer] To begin with, we think the Bundesbank's concept 
is convincing and good. That is why we will fight to make sure 
that this concept is made the yardstick and guideline of a 
European concept. But we must talk about it with our partners 
because other countries have totally different concepts. I hope 
our arguments will be convincing, so that in the end, the German 
monetary policy concept will be accepted as an orientation. 
  [Blohm] Frankfurt will be the seat of the European central 
bank. At the beginning of this year, the European Monetary 
Institute [EMI] has started work in Frankfurt. Are there any 
contacts with the Bundesbank? 
  [Tietmeyer] The EMI is an independent monetary institute. 
There is no special relationship with the Bundesbank. Of 
course, the institute cooperates with all central banks, and its 
council is composed of the presidents of the European central 
banks. So I am a member of this body, and I therefore have to 
codetermine this institute's line. However, the Bundesbank does 
not have a privileged position compared with other central 
banks. We hope, of course, that the Bundesbank's thinking and 
experience will have the greatest possible effect on the EMI's 
work. 
  [Blohm] What specifically will the EMI do? 
  [Tietmeyer] This institute has two tasks. The first task is 
to help ensure good cooperation between central banks in the 
next few years, and to help coordinate monetary policy to the 
extent that this is possible in stability policy terms. The 
second task is the specific preparation of the work of a future 
European central bank system. In this respect, the concept, the 
instruments, and the organizational things must be clarified. 
But we must be aware of one thing: This institute is a 
cooperation institute, and not a central bank. 
  [Blohm] If you want to cooperate with your counterparts in 
the other European central banks, you just phone them. This is 
the closest form of cooperation one can think of, isn't it? 
  [Tietmeyer] This will be continued in the future, but in 
addition, we will meet in Frankfurt once every month, and not in 
Basel at the Bank for International Settlements. But this is 
only one side. The other side is that the European monetary 
institute will have its own staff and will prepare its own 
documents. In addition, there will in the future be a very 
intensive form of cooperation below the level of central bank 
presidents. This means that a large number of committees will 
try to find common positions for individual areas of the central 
banks' work. This is the form of cooperation that we want. 
However, at the second stage, as long as we do not have 
monetary union, the national central banks will in the final 
analysis be responsible for their policy themselves. There can 
be no majority decisions in the EMI that would bind a central 
bank in its policy. 
  [Blohm] Does this also hold true for the currency reserves? 
  [Tietmeyer] It holds in particular true for the currency 
reserves. There is an option allowing individual countries to 
transfer all or some of their currency reserves to the EMI and 
to ask the EMI to manage these reserves as an agent. The German 
side does not intend to make use of this option. We can and 
will continue, for the time being, to manage our reserves 
ourselves. 
  [Blohm] There is talk everywhere about structural crises and 
necessary adjustments in the economic sector and society. The 
judgment on the Bundesbank ranges from "bronze rock" to a 
creature from Jurassic Park. Where do you see the Bundesbank? 
  [Tietmeyer] For some people to see the Bundesbank as a 
"bronze rock," seems to me to be an attribute that is not wrong. 
However, the metaphor of the dinosaur is certainly 
inappropriate. The Bundesbank has won a high degree of 
credibility. I hope this will also play a relevant role 
regarding the further European policy orientation. We will not 
be those who want to determine everything, so to speak, but we 
will bring in our arguments, and we will fight for our 
experience being taken as a yardstick. The common goal is and 
must be to develop a stability community in Europe. 
  [Blohm] Nonetheless, it is correct to describe the 
Bundesbank as a preserving element in a rapidly changing 
financial world. 
  [Tietmeyer] You addressed a right point. Compared with many 
other central banks, we have pursued a more conservative 
monetary policy -- conservative in that we have pursued our 
policy in a stability-oriented way. I think our policy has 
helped keep the financial markets in Germany more stable. They 
have developed more calmly than elsewhere. You can see this by 
the fact that in our country, long-term credit relations play a 
much larger role than in other countries with lower monetary 
stability. We want to maintain this basis because we know from 
experience that this not only furthers the stability of our 
currency, but is also an indispensable basis for growth and 
employment. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57837 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_h_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Rexrodt Rejects `Basic' Pension, Demands Reform </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0401111394 Munich FOCUS in German 3 Jan 94 p 14 </F>
<F P=103> AU0401111394 </F>
<F P=104>  Munich FOCUS </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed report: "Rexrodt Demands Discussion on </F>
Reforms"] 
  [Text] Economics Minister Guenter Rexrodt is demanding a 
reform of pension insurance during the next parliamentary term. 
  Rexrodt told FOCUS that pensions are "by no means" 
safeguarded after the year 2010. The Free Democratic Party of 
Germany minister thus rejected attempts by Labor Minister 
Norbert Bluem and Christian Democratic Union [CDU] social expert 
Heiner Geissler to stifle the discussion on pensions. 
  "Populist-oriented politicians fear that this encourages a 
weariness with politics and that elderly people could turn their 
backs on the CDU." Bluem "must now have the courage to say: In 
the interest of 30-year-olds we have to think beyond the year 
2010." 
  The economics minister suggests that the time spent bringing 
up children should be taken more into account in calculating 
pensions. 
  Rexrodt rejects the idea of a basic pension, suggested by 
Saxony's Minister-President Kurt Biedenkopf, because "this would 
mean that nonachievement would also pay." Hundreds of thousands 
of people would no longer pay any contributions if they got a 
basic pension anyway. "You would have to be stupid to pay," the 
minister said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57838 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_h_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Employment Chief Optimistic About Future </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0301212594 Berlin DIE WELT in German 3 Jan 94 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> AU0301212594 </F>
<F P=104>  Berlin DIE WELT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Bernhard Jagoda, president of the Federal </F>
Employment Office, by Gernot Facius and Hans-Werner Loose; place 
and date not given: "I Do Not Get Nervous When the Instruments 
of Torture Are Shown"] 
  [Excerpt] [DIE WELT] Cassandra is in: At the turn of the 
millennium mass unemployment of about 6 million people is being 
predicted. Weimar 2000? 
  [Jagoda] Unfortunately, Cassandra was right with her somber 
predictions. Therefore, I refuse to give this name to 
pessimists, who are currently very popular. The renowned 
Prognos Institute in Basel expects a decline of unemployment all 
over Germany to about 3 million by the turn of the millennium. 
  [DIE WELT] Good prospects for a late improvement, but things 
are getting worse at the moment. How many unemployed will there 
be in 1994? 
  [Jagoda] I assume an annual average of about 3.8 million 
unemployed -- about 2.6 million in the west and about 1.2 
million in the east. These would be 300,000 to 400,000 more 
than in 1993. 
  [DIE WELT] Will the labor market in united Germany remain 
divided? 
  [Jagoda] Yes, and the situation is slowly improving in the 
east. Signs of that are multiplying. In the worst case we will 
keep stability at a low employment level in the new laender. 
  [DIE WELT] By means of job creation with the taxpayers' 
money? 
  [Jagoda] In the new laender in 1994 we will no longer be 
able to cushion 1.4 million people with an active labor market 
policy. This is, however, also due to the fact that the 
instrument of retirement transition money and early retirement 
will no longer be so effective. Many of the 900,000 who have 
made use of that are now reaching retirement age. In job 
creation we can do a bit more again than in 1993. Basically, I 
say: Things in the east are improving gradually; in the west 
economic development will start again; the increase in 
productivity will, however, be approximately as high as growth, 
which means that nothing is left for more employment. 
  [DIE WELT] Light in the east, darkness in the west? 
  [Jagoda] Unfortunately. The increase in unemployment will 
mainly hit the old laender. 
  [DIE WELT] Is a new wave of layoffs threatening in the west? 
  [Jagoda] Some structural adjustments will be unavoidable. 
We are entering the new year with a high number of unemployed. 
In 1993 job losses were concentrated primarily in the 
manufacturing industry. A total of 90 percent of the people 
working short hours come from this sector. The danger is not 
yet over, but there is reason for hope. 
  [DIE WELT] Where do you see the silver lining? 
  [Jagoda] In working short hours, which is not free. I 
interpret this as a hope that companies will be able to overcome 
the problems and keep their employees. 
  [DIE WELT] For the time being it is still primarily the big 
companies that are stumbling. Will the medium-sized companies 
also get into turbulent waters? 
  [Jagoda] The medium-sized companies will also feel the 
harsher wind of competition. However, they are able to react 
more flexibly and quicker. This is an opportunity. Much has 
already been done to improve the position of the companies. I 
expect that his will begin to pay off in 1995 at the latest. 
  [DIE WELT] This is an alleviation of the suffering. When 
will recovery come? 
  [Jagoda] Unemployment can be reduced to a tolerable level 
only if more is again invested in jobs. For this purpose, our 
economy has to develop new markets. In addition, unemployment 
could be considerably reduced by expanding part-time work. 
About 16 percent in Germany have part-time jobs, in the 
Netherlands about one-third. 
  [DIE WELT] Which means.... 
  [Jagoda] ...that we could employ up to 2 million people more 
and thus have 2 million unemployed less if we had Dutch 
conditions in Germany. We need an offensive to create more 
jobs, e.g. by distributing work differently. We are not in the 
lead in this field in Europe. 
  [DIE WELT] Are the contributions to unemployment insurance 
sufficient to pay the army of unemployed? 
  [Jagoda] No. Therefore, the Federal Government will help 
the Federal Employment Office also in 1994: 18 billion marks 
are allocated as subsidies in the federal budget. Another 8 
billion are ready to be used as liquidation aid. 
  [DIE WELT] Are your mechanisms sufficient to control the 
ailing labor market? 
  [Jagoda] We can only play the accompanying music. Even if 
more jobs are abolished than are taken into consideration in the 
Federal Employment Office's budget, which I consider unlikely, 
everyone will still get his unemployment benefits. Unemployment 
benefits are a compulsory service; here the Federal Government 
has to pay what is needed. 
  [DIE WELT] Do you still have money left for labor market 
policy measures? 
  [Jagoda] The Federal Employment Office, too, must make great 
efforts in view of the difficult financial situation. But we do 
not capitulate, and in 1994, too, we will spend considerable 
amounts of money on labor market policy in order to prevent 
additional unemployment of 1.5 million in west and east. 
  [DIE WELT] And when will the state again put its fingers 
into the pockets of those who have jobs, to fill the gap? 
  [Jagoda] At the moment the contribution is 6.5 percent. 
This will remain so in 1994. I do not think that a raise is 
possible. The social contributions that burden the companies and 
the employers have reached the upper limit. 
  [DIE WELT] And this will remain so? 
  [Jagoda] Hopefully not. When the labor markets in the west 
and the east grow together and the structures are comparable, 
the contributions will go down. 
  [DIE WELT] To what level? 
  [Jagoda] At first to a 5 in front of the decimal point. 
  [DIE WELT] Wolfgang Schaeuble wants a clear difference 
between wages for working people and wage compensation payments 
for unemployed. Do you agree? 
  [Jagoda] Our benefits for unemployed are not excessive. 
There is no fat left that could be removed. Whoever has paid 
contributions all his life, loses his job at 55, and does not 
have children, gets 60 percent of his last net salary from us. 
If I reduce that, I cross the threshold of pain and drive 
people into illegal employment. 
  [DIE WELT] Does new work fall from the sky like manna? 
  [Jagoda] Certainly not. But instead of complaining, we 
should think back to our strengths. From 1983 to 1991 the 
German economy created more than 3 million new jobs. Why should 
that no longer be possible in the future? 
  [DIE WELT] Have our managers slept through the future? 
  [Jagoda] At least 40 percent of the west German 
manufacturing industry companies have not engaged in any 
activities for innovations over the past two years. This gives 
food for thought. 
  [DIE WELT] Can we still catch up with the technological lead 
of the competition from Asia and the United States? 
  [Jagoda] We have certainly not been left behind by 
technological development. Others, however, have caught up and 
can produce some things more cheaply. If one has recognized a 
deficit and starts to remedy it, this is progress. In this 
respect, the recession and structural crisis were certainly very 
instructive for some companies. 
  [DIE WELT] Do only economic refugees still see Germany as an 
attractive business location? 
  [Jagoda] This is highly exaggerated. However, we must 
become aware of our importance as a business location. Many 
decisionmaking processes are still far too protracted in our 
country. In the future, it will not be the big ones that devour 
the small ones in competition but the quick ones that devour the 
slow ones. Research in Germany has to be conducted far more 
intensively and with more cooperation. Not only the patent 
statistics show that the brakes must be released a bit. We must 
roll up our sleeves again and struggle for the world market. 
  [DIE WELT] Heinz-Werner Meyer, chairman of the German Trade 
Union Federation, spoke in DIE WELT of a "real danger of 
strikes" -- in the west German metal industry. Would a strike 
counteract efforts for new jobs? 
  [Jagoda] A strike is always bad. However, strikes are a 
legitimate recourse in the wage conflict. One should not moan 
if the culture of struggle is exercised. I do not get nervous 
when everyone puts his instruments of torture -- here a strike, 
there lockouts -- on the table. The German partners to the wage 
negotiations have been very responsible about strikes in the 
past. This will not change this year, either. Right now, it is 
shown that the partners to the wage negotiations are also able 
to find new answers to new questions. This should give rise to 
optimism. 
  [DIE WELT] Is one of the answers that you positively assess 
the four-day working week, or is this just camouflaged working 
short hours? 
  [Jagoda] Not if it is the usual working hours in a specific 
company. The four-day work week at Volkswagen is a model for 
new distribution of work, a real innovation that breaks many 
taboos. 
  [DIE WELT] Can this model be transferred to other companies 
and branches? 
  [Jagoda] Not just like that, but the topic of "flex time" is 
now on the table. Wherever one works with great efficiency and 
high productivity, I can imagine this very well. This has 
nothing to do with the size of the company and the branch. 
However, a four-day work week is possible only in those places 
where wages are far above average and where it is compensated 
not from another cash source but through renunciation. [passage 
omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57839 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_j_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ITALY &amp; VATICAN CITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Social Benefits Targeted for Cuts </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94ES0202A Milan IL MONDO in Italian 13-20 Dec 93 pp 16-18 </F>
<F P=103> 94ES0202A </F>
<F P=104>  Milan IL MONDO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Italian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ettore Tamos: "Without Any Taboos"] </F>
  [Text] The bonus paid for a 13th month? After their 
elimination from the budget and from the social services, they 
could disappear. Severance pay? It could all go into the pension 
funds. The unemployment compensation fund? Its days are 
numbered. Everything is now on the table, including even the 
integrated labor contracts and the contracts that cover an 
entire category of workers. 
  You are no longer electrocuted when you touch the live wires 
of the labor unions' gains. RAI [Italian Radio and Television 
Broadcasting Corporation] President Claudio Dematte did not get 
a shock when he let it be known that the company plans to delay 
implementation of the extremely expensive integrated labor 
contract, and not even when he announced the delay of payment of 
the 13th month's wages. And the government did not get a shock 
when it decreed that a government employee will be penalized for 
his first day of absence. Today, it is no longer impossible to 
bring up the issue of severance pay or lifetime job security in 
the public sector without causing an uproar. 
  The contractual totems are crumbling. The certitudes that 
were won are evaporating, just as many cathedrals of labor no 
longer appear to be inviolable. What is happening? Is it the 
logical result of the economic crisis? Or is it the result of an 
unstoppable trend toward deregulation? 
  Both of these hypotheses appear to be valid. "In fact," says 
the economist Mario Deaglio, "the one is actually linked to the 
other" and adds that if this reaction had not occurred, the 
damage would be substantially greater within a few months. "It 
is an epochal change," he says. There is no social perception of 
the phenomenon, however. Although the initial countercurrent 
experiments have been visible and concrete, no heated debates or 
widespread confrontations are taking place. Jobs are the Maginot 
Line, while an ill-concealed abstentionism prevails on the other 
fronts. The fear of seeming to be excessively free-market 
oriented is apparently predominant, and the most cherished 
secret hope is that this difficult moment--which entails doubts 
and dilemmas--will pass. For the moment, therefore, the problem 
is not being dealt with nor even discussed, and yet it exists. 
<H5>  Farewell to Severance Pay </H5>
  The proposal with respect to severance pay could help to 
involve employees in the salvage and revival of their companies. 
It was discussed during the negotiations concening Olivetti's 
surplus workers. Should severance pay be converted into shares 
of stock? Why not? These are only the initial references to the 
problem, which is no longer taboo. "Basically, the practice of 
setting aside this pay--referred to in the jargon as TFR 
[remuneration paid upon termination of the employer-employee 
relationship]--is already being used as a means of financing 
companies," notes Bruno Manghi, for many years the very active 
head of the CISL [Italian Confederation of Trade Unions], who is 
today an advocate of a free market economy. 
  The proposal to channel these sums into the pension funds 
has 
received the support of the labor unions and the business 
community and could soon become reality. "It will depend on the 
extent of the tax reductions," Manghi predicts. This prospect 
could also displease those who have always counted on receiving 
their severance pay. Actually, no one has called into question 
the rights that have been won. To be sure, the sterilization of 
these set-aside sums--which have not been completely 
indexed--has now been accepted following so much controversy, 
and it is motivating many employees to request advance payment 
of these sums so that they can buy a home or merely safeguard 
their capital, hopefully after supplementing it with capital 
gains. This is the objective of hundreds of employees and 
managers of the Italian Credit Bank, who have acquired the stock 
of the bank--which is being privatized--at a 10 percent 
discount, paying for it with an advance on their severance pay. 
A different approach is taken by those managers [preceding word 
in English] who are profiting from the crisis of corporate 
groups--and the transfer of the ownership of companies--by using 
their credit to take over their respective companies in MBO 
(management buyout) [preceding two words in English] 
transactions. 
<H5>  No More Pay for a Thirteenth Month </H5>
  A general experiment was carried out in connection with the 
payment of wages for a 14th month and the other supplementary 
monthly payments. In many labor contracts--for example, that of 
the journalists--these supplementary payments have been frozen 
and diminished by inflation. Now the pay for the 13th month is 
coming under fire. There is nothing concrete in this connection, 
merely some warning signals (RAI is refusing to make the 
payment)--which in other times would have been the prelude to 
the bankruptcy of the companies--and some warnings by 
economists. "Today," the economist Mario Deaglio explains, 
"production can migrate quickly to countries that are more 
competitive, and there are many countries that do not pay wages 
for a 13th month." The problem is obviously not so much the 
tradition of a one month's Christmas bonus--which is, moreover, 
already reduced by tax adjustments and by year-end household 
expenses--as it is the complicated Italian wage structure. And 
the 13th month wage payments will probably also be included in 
the reform. 
<H5>  Overalls Are Not Mobile </H5>
  "Even in Japan they are coming to realize that a company--or 
a job--is not a lifetime thing," Stefano Micossi, director of 
research at Confindustria [General Confederation of Italian 
Industry], points out. "We should accustom ourselves to changing 
companies and cities," he warns. Millions of immigrant workers 
are competing--with modest pretensions--for the marginal and 
less desirable jobs in the developed countries. And although 
white collars and blue overalls do not migrate, the production 
does. "There is also mobility with respect to hours and 
contractual conditions," Micossi emphasizes. "Today," he 
explains, "there is only one type of contract. You work from 
0900 to 1700 hours. And if there is an attempt to introduce 
variants--such as part-time [preceding word in English] or 
temporary employment--in order to adapt to a company's operating 
conditions, there are regulations and controls that tend to 
discourage initiatives and to restore the typical situation." In 
the view of Confindustria, the next challenge will be posed by 
the concept of contract labor, as envisioned in a new 
legislative measure. The goal: contract freedom. 
<H5>  Custom-Made Pact </H5>
  The next step would be individual bargaining, which is 
opposed by the labor unions but is now--in 
practice--increasingly widespread in the higher professional 
categories, in the specializations, and in the services. 
Individual hiring is the rule, and individual superminimum wages 
are a productivity incentive. "A greater differentiation in 
wages is imperative," explains Sergio Ricossa, one of the 
principal exponents of Italian economic liberalism, who is 
convinced that individual bargaining would fuel the recovery of 
Italy, Inc. "We must provide incentives for productivity rather 
than penalize it, as is occurring under the system of graduated 
taxes," Ricossa believes. "Two tax brackets would be enough." 
<H5>  A Single Fund </H5>
  It is the old battle against wage leveling, which is more 
accentuated when a company is in crisis and the unemployment 
compensation fund is involved. The benefit paid is the same 
(slightly more than 1 million lire) for blue-collar workers, 
white collar workers, and managerial levels. "It is an unfair 
penalty imposed on those who are accustomed to a larger income," 
Manghi acknowledges, "and for this very reason the creation of 
an initial graduated scale of benefits is now under discussion." 
Another previously untouchable taboo has therefore come under 
close scrutiny. 
  Moreover, the unemployment compensation fund is no longer by 
definition extendable ad infinitum, without limits. Some 
companies that have been closed for years have employees who are 
still receiving the benefit. Now, however, after two years the 
benefits expire and mobility status begins. Another two years, 
and the guarantees expire. This system motivates people to 
accept jobs that were originally rejected. "Mobility status 
works in areas that have an industrial tradition," Manghi 
discloses. In Turin, one out of three jobseekers has found other 
employment. "The unemployment compensation fund is not a product 
of welfarism," Deaglio insists, in commenting on the exhaustion 
of the fund's liquid assets. If one must choose, he adds, "it is 
better to abolish the fictitious jobs and preserve the fund." 
The reference was obviously to public employment. If job 
security is endangered in the private sector, the days of 
welfarism in the public sector would appear to be numbered. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57840 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_n_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Norway </F>
<H3> <TI>   Doctor Says Stroke Affects Holst's Speech, Coordination </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0401115094 Paris AFP in English 1136 GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> AU0401115094 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris AFP </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Oslo, Jan 4 (AFP) -- Norway's Foreign Minister Johan 
Joergen Holst, who suffered a stroke last month, still has 
problems with his speech and walking, a medical report from his 
doctor said. 
  Holst, 56, fell ill on his return from an official visit to 
Madrid on December 16. 
  The first medical report, issued shortly after the incident, 
said Holst's intellectual capabilities were not affected. 
  The doctor's statement said the foreign minister was 
improving and that he would be transferred to a special center 
outside Oslo for further rehabilitation. 
  Holst's doctor, Professor Rolf Nyberg-Hansen, said the 
stroke 
had affected his speech and the coordination of his walking and 
that he would be off work for some time. 
  Holst was first admitted to hospital in November, suffering 
from overwork and exhaustion. He had just resumed limited 
duties when he suffered the stroke. 
  Holst last year helped broker the so-called "Oslo Treaty" on 
limited Palestinian self-rule in the Jericho area and the Gaza 
Strip through a series of secret meetings in Norway. 
  A spokesman for Prime Minister Gro Harlem Brundtland said on 
Tuesday [4 January] that she was not planning to have Holst 
replaced. 
  Both family members and Foreign Ministry officials often 
visit Holst at the National Hospital in Oslo. 
  On Sunday the Israeli-PLO peace negotiators Uri Savir and 
Abu 
Ala, who were in Oslo to receive a Royal medal of merit for 
their peace efforts, paid him a visit. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57841 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_n_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Sweden </F>
<H3> <TI>   Defense Minister Warns of Danger From Russia </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM2912173093 Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER in Swedish 20 Dec 93 p 
A4 </F>

<F P=103> PM2912173093 </F>
<F P=104>  Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Swedish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Defense Minister Anders Bjorck under the </F>
"Debate" rubric: "Give Consideration to Increased Defense 
Spending!"] 
  [Text] Almost two years ago, on 23 March 1992, I spoke in 
Lund about the security situation in the world around us. I 
pointed to the problematic political, economic, and social 
developments in Russia and noted that despite everything it had 
proved possible to more or less control the situation in that 
country. But my summary of the situation did contain one 
proviso: 
  "The possibility should not, however, be ruled out that 
further deterioration could create a breeding ground for the 
populist message. The fascist, Vladimir Zhirinovskiy, who won 
six percent of the vote in the Russian presidential election, 
wants to restore what was once the Russian empire.... For 
Zhirinovskiy it goes without saying that both Finland and the 
Baltic states should form part of this Russian empire. 
  "Today it is possible to dismiss Zhirinovskiy as a mad 
demagogue, but what happens tomorrow in a Russia which has never 
in history been the liberal democracy it ought ideally now to 
become? This gives us an idea of what uncertainty the future 
holds for Russia and the CIS." 
  The debate on Swedish defense and security is often 
dominated 
by domestic considerations. The day-to-day debate's ups and 
downs for views on everything from neutrality policy to tanks 
seem to have a greater effect on the views of many who take part 
in the debate than developments in the rest of the world. What 
is currently fashionable is of crucial importance when it comes 
to voicing views about the size of the defense budget. 
  But sometimes the real world makes itself felt. As when the 
Russian people in last Sunday's [12 December] parliamentary 
elections sent a useful reminder to all the pundits who had 
dismissed the risk of setbacks in developments inside our 
powerful Eastern neighbor. 
  The first predictions sent a shock wave through Europe. It 
looked as if ultranationalist agitator Vladimir Zhirinovskiy 
would win over half the seats in the revamped parliament, the 
Duma. When more votes were had later been counted it emerged 
that the result was not quite so devastating for the democratic 
forces. But the fact remains: Almost one quarter of the 
Russian people voted for Zhirinovskiy. 
  Zhirinovskiy generally describes himself as a strong 
anticommunist. However, the fact is that his political program 
contains many thing that are similar to things contained in that 
of the communists. He is no fervent support either of 
democratic or market reforms. He and the communists share the 
aggressive tone vis-a-vis the rest of the world, and the 
covertly threatening talk of "protecting" allegedly oppressed 
Russian groups in "nearby foreign countries." These apparent 
extremes are also united in their loud demands for more money 
for the Russian military and military industry. 
  Both Zhirinovskiy and the communists play on a distrust of 
the West that is deeply rooted in Russian popular consciousness. 
Peter the Great in his day considered himself forced to execute 
Russians for their attitude of hate toward foreign advisers and 
their influence. It is an obvious conclusion to reach that it 
is the West and Western-inspired reforms in Russia will be 
today's scapegoats for the almost unbearable living conditions 
of so many people. 
  In the West too this myth seems to have gained ground. 
People blame today's problems on "Yeltsin's shock therapy." 
But, on the contrary, the political situation has blocked 
radical but necessary market reforms and the transition from a 
plan to a market economy is still only half-implemented. The 
countries which really have carried out radical market reforms 
-- Poland, Estonia, the Czech Republic, and Hungary, too -- can 
point to palpable positive results in contrast to the Russian 
crisis. 
  Last Sunday's election did not bring to an end the 
confrontation between president and parliament. On the 
contrary, today it seems as if this confrontation will continue 
for the foreseeable future. Yeltsin's opponents have won a 
political victory. The power of parliament may have been cut 
back a little as a result of the new constitution, but it has on 
the other hand won new legitimacy. It will be difficult for 
Yeltsin to dismiss his opponents in the same way as before. 
  When the Swedish Riksdag adopted the current Defense Bill in 
the spring of 1992 the view was taken that the deep-seated 
problems in Russian society make long-term prognoses impossible. 
The risk of setbacks was assessed as great. However, at the 
time certain people tried to assert that this view was 
excessively pessimistic. What has happened since then has not 
proved them right. We do not know how the confrontation in 
Russian political life will end. Victory for the democratic 
forces is by no means certain. 
  In the short term the new political situation in Russian 
does 
not represent a threat to Sweden. At the same time the risk 
that Russia is entering a period of nationalism, increased 
expansionism, and a less open and more implacable attitude 
toward the West has not lessened. This affects our long-term 
assessments, and it is these which are of significance for 
defense and security policy. 
  The reemergence of Russian nationalism reinforces our 
reasons for joining the European Union [EU]. Membership is our 
chief protection against crises and conflicts in the East. Our 
own immediate environs will become part of the Union's immediate 
environs. There is less of a risk that Sweden would be seen as 
an isolated part of Europe and could therefore find itself at 
the center of attention of a possible future aggressive regime 
in Moscow. It is unthinkable that an attack on one of the EU's 
member countries would not lead to very difficult repercussions 
-- political and other repercussions -- for the attacker. 
  Today's Swedish defenses are a legacy of the defense policy 
of the seventies and eighties. And today we are shaping 
tomorrow's defenses. We are now embarking on the analysis and 
planning work for the next defense bill, in 1997. In the run-up 
to this work of analysis there have been calls for dramatic 
reductions in defense spending. A figure of minus 30 percent 
per year has been mentioned. 
  What has happened in Russia -- in combination with the 
fact that the Russian combat forces which are to be found in 
Sweden's immediate environs have not been disarmed -- means that 
it is more urgent than ever to also look at a continued increase 
in investment in defense. If in a time of unrest characterized 
by growing Russian nationalism and rearmament Sweden wants to 
continue to assert its nonalignment, there will be a price to 
pay. 
  We do of course hope for developments in Russian in the 
direction of democracy, prosperity, and far-reaching integration 
with the West. However, we must not be so naive as to mortgage 
this brightening future today. This would be the same as 
repeating the madnesses that occurred on the Swedish property 
market in the eighties. Mortgages were taken out for ever 
rising property prices until the market collapsed. The risks 
linked to repeating the same mistakes in the field of defense 
and security policy are considerably greater than the billions 
in credit losses which were a consequence of the property 
carousel. 
  It is important that Sweden's future defense policy is 
characterized by more realistic security assessments than has 
been the case in some quarters. 
  The 1992 Defense Bill meant considerable investment in 
modernization and quality. The so-called stabilization bill did 
eat away at the edges of the bill a little, but not so much that 
it will be impossible to implement the Defense Bill in all 
important respects. 
  As long as developments in Russia involve a great deal 
of uncertainty the calls for cutbacks in Swedish defenses must 
be firmly rebuffed. The Defense Bill must be implemented. If 
in the run-up to the next defense bill in 1997 we are to analyze 
the effect of 30 percent cutbacks, it seems just as important to 
analyze the effects of an increase on the same scale. 
  If we do not have the clarity of vision to realize the 
dangers inherent in Zhirinovskiy's successes we run the risk of 
repeating the irresponsible defense policy of the twenties and 
early thirties. 
  It is not difficult to see before us an unpleasant scenario 
in which an aggressively nationalistic government in Russia puts 
significant resources into recreating its scope for large-scale 
military action. At the same time Sweden has chosen to remain 
outside the EC and the opportunities it offers for increased 
stability and security. We would then be completely dependent 
on our own capacity to defend our nonalignment, our peace, and 
our independence. If we have also mismanaged our defenses so 
that they no longer appear credible in the eyes of the rest of 
the world we would be very exposed. More exposed than at any 
time since 1945. 
  It is of course possible to raise the objection that such a 
scenario is unthinkable. But who thought a mere five years ago 
-- and five years is the normal defense planning cycle -- that 
the Soviet Union would break up, that three new Baltic states 
would be set up on the shores of the Baltic, or that the Russian 
people would go to the polls and in free elections cast their 
votes for a man who has talked about reincorporating Finland 
into the Russian empire? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57842 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_o_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> CYPRUS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Greek Guards Fire Shots at Turkish Cypriot Positions </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  TA0301193394 Nicosia Bayrak Radio in Turkish 1630 GMT 3 Jan 
94 </F>

<F P=103> TA0301193394 </F>
<F P=104>  Nicosia Bayrak Radio </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Turkish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Greek Cypriot national guards opened fire at 
Turkish Cypriot positions today. Although there was no apparent 
reason for the shots, Turkish Cypriot soldiers did not respond 
thereby preventing a further exacerbation of the incident. 
  The shots were fired around 1120 [0920 GMT] at the positions 
situated near Madenlikoy [Ayios Yeoryios]. The Greek Cypriot 
national guards fired first one then two shots at the Turkish 
Cypriot positions. No one was hurt or injured in the incident. 
  The Turkish Cypriot security forces protested to the United 
Nations Forces in Cyprus. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57843 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_o_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> CYPRUS </F>
<H3> <TI>   UNFICYP Spokesman Comments </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0401081094 Nicosia Cyprus Broadcasting Corporation Radio 
Network in Greek 0530 GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> NC0401081094 </F>
<F P=104>  Nicosia Cyprus Broadcasting Corporation Radio 
Network </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Greek </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] The Turkish side made new allegations yesterday by 
claiming that there were incidents on the confrontation line. 
In an Istanbul dispatch, ANATOLIA News Agency reported that the 
Rauf Denktas regime reported to the UN Forces in Cyprus 
[UNFICYP] that the Turkish positions were fired upon by Greek 
Cypriots. According to the news agency, the so-called incident 
took place at noon yesterday. 
  A UNFICYP spokesman to CyBC [Cyprus Broadcasting 
Corporation] 
said last night that he has no information about the Turkish 
allegations. At the same time, the National Guard General Staff 
stressed that the Turkish allegations are a new attempt to 
create problems. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57844 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_p_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GREECE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Remarks by Turkey's Cetin Spark Spokesman's Reaction </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC3112211393 Athens ET-1 Television Network in Greek 1900 
GMT 31 Dec 93 </F>

<F P=103> NC3112211393 </F>
<F P=104>  Athens ET-1 Television Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Greek </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Nikolaos Meletis] </F>
  [Text] Turkish Foreign Minister Hikmet Cetin expressed 
pessimism for the future of Greek-Turkish relations with the new 
Greek Government and referred to Greece's hostility toward 
Turkey, which could lead Athens to irreparable mistakes since, 
he said, the imaginary Turkish threat has become an obsession. 
Cetin also said that during the meetings he will have on 20 
January with the British and German foreign ministers, he will 
ask for the release of European Union funds to Turkey, something 
that Greece has blocked in the past few years. Referring to the 
Cyprus issue, Cetin stressed that it is up to Greece to support 
and encourage the timetable for the negotiations. 
  Replying to Cetin's remarks, Greek Government spokesman 
Evangelos Venizelos stressed that the invasion of Cyprus by 
Turkish forces and the continuing occupation of 40 percent of 
the island's territory, the virtual disappearance of the Greek 
minority from Istanbul and the promotion of Turkish demands 
against Greece are neither imaginary nor a fantasy. They 
constitute historical experience, he said. The government 
spokesman concluded by saying that the Turkish leadership should 
realize that contact with Europe depends on respect for 
international law, human rights and the principles of the state 
of justice, which are basic elements of European civilization. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57845 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_p_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GREECE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Press Reaction to Greek EU Presidency Viewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0301180594 Athens ELEVTHEROTIPIA in Greek 3 Jan 94 p 8 </F>
<F P=103> NC0301180594 </F>
<F P=104>  Athens ELEVTHEROTIPIA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Greek </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [From the "Views" column: "Our Responsibilities"] </F>
  [Text] "Attention Europe: Greece is presiding!" This is how 
the French newspaper LIBERATION announced to its readers that 
Greece had assumed the European Union [EU] presidency. 
  The front-page headline would have honored Greece if the 
well-known "leftist" Parisian newspaper had not intended it to 
sound like a police warning about an fugitive thief or murderer. 
  It is a fact that the foreign press has recently begun a 
recital of attacks against our country, particularly since PASOK 
[Panhellenic Socialist Movement] has returned to power. They 
have written about everything, especially the PASOK government 
and Greece.... 
  Many of us will rush to conclude that there is an 
international conspiracy against our country designed by some 
dark forces to hurt us as a people and a country. 
  We would not rule out some biased voices that are never 
missing, not even from reliable foreign mass media. But let's 
not exaggerate. Besides, we always find it easy to blame the 
foreigners and their secret services. 
  First of all, we must admit our responsibility. We have had 
nothing remarkable to show in the international arena over the 
last few years. We used to receive one or two Nobel prizes. We 
had Maria Callas, Manos Khatzidhakis, Mikis Theodhorakis. We 
were "in" with our Sirtaki dance and our islands. We used to be 
heard. We used to be respected. 
  Now we have fallen into nonexistence and disrespect. We 
proved to be incapable of promoting Greece abroad. Our 
diplomacy is nil. And instead of promoting an aggressive foreign 
policy and intervening in the Balkans, we have ended up grousing 
and constantly complaining. 
  Especially about Skopje. After not demanding our rights for 
45 years, we suddenly woke up one morning and, carried away by a 
thoughtless, sentimental--not to mention nationalistic--view, 
eliminated all the alternatives and now speak of an upcoming 
national defeat and humiliation. 
  Unfortunately, we did not plan or weigh the risks. The 
leading parties showed concern only for the political costs in 
their handling of this issue. 
  In their judgments of Greece, the foreigners certainly made 
malicious exaggerations, but we gave them the right to do so. 
By being unbearably divided, incapable of charting a minimum 
national strategy, and making frequent accusations containing 
the words "treachery," "lowest bid," and "submissiveness," we 
have given foreigners the right to treat us like international 
crooks. 
  We assumed the European presidency the day before yesterday. 
It is a good opportunity to preside seriously and dynamically. 
The government and the prime minister are assuming a great 
responsibility: To shut the mouths of those who are insulting us 
and prove that Greece is not what they are hysterically 
declaring. It is a country they should respect, not just 
remember it during wartime. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57846 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_q_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TURKEY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Ministry Blames Brussels For Incidents </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  TA0301145994 Ankara TRT Television Network in Turkish 1300 
GMT 3 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> TA0301145994 </F>
<F P=104>  Ankara TRT Television Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Turkish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Announcer-read report] </F>
  [Text] Turkey has formally asked the Belgian government 
for information on the truth of the statements issued by the 
Belgian interior minister and reflected in the press as though 
the Turkish citizens are to blame for the incidents in Brussels. 
Turkey announced that preventing the PKK [Kurdish Workers 
Party] terrorist organization activities is above all the 
requirement of international law. 
  A statement issued by the Foreign Ministry notes that 
blaming 
Turkish citizens is an unacceptable stand. The statement 
further notes: We have no doubt that the Belgian authorities 
are responsible for the incidents when they granted the PKK 
supporters permission to hold a demonstration in an area heavily 
populated by Turkish citizens, totally disregarding their 
feelings. Belgian authorities prepared the groundwork for this 
incident by not following Germany and France and banning the 
PKK. Above all, preventing PKK terrorist activities is a 
requirement of international law. 
  It was indicated in the statement that high-level 
initiatives 
were undertaken in Ankara and Brussels to communicate all the 
above stated points to Belgian authorities. 
  The Foreign Ministry statement further expresses the wish 
that Belgian authorities adopt a position which is in accord 
with international regulations and in accord with the friendly 
relations it has with Turkey. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57847 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_q_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TURKEY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Cetin's Foreign Policy Statement Detailed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0301221294 Ankara TURKISH DAILY NEWS in English 1 Jan 94 
pp 1, 12 </F>

<F P=103> NC0301221294 </F>
<F P=104>  Ankara TURKISH DAILY NEWS </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Ankara -- Foreign Minister Hikmet Cetin, assessing 
foreign policy developments in 1993 and making projections for 
1994, suggested on Friday [31 December] that major developments 
awaited Turkey in the new year in terms of international 
relations. 
  He placed particular emphasis in this context on relations 
with Greece, the European Union, and Azerbaijan. 
  In a hard hitting message to Greece, in response to recent 
statements from the Greek government, Cetin cautioned Athens 
against miscalculating Turkish calm and reserve, thus leading to 
consequences it could not deal with. 
  Cetin, who was addressing reporters at a press conference on 
the last day of the year, also announced that Turkey was going 
to prepare a new border accord with Azerbaijan. 
  Diplomatic observers interpret the announcement as a warning 
to Armenia, which has escalated its aggression on Azerbaijani 
territory. 
  Recalling that Armenian aggression was today widely 
condemned 
by the international community, Cetin said there was no way that 
Armenian invaders would be allowed to stay in Azerbaijan. "With 
the dismemberment of the Soviet Union, Ankara now shares a 
border with Azerbaijan. Turkey is now preparing to sign a new 
border accord with Azerbaijan. Turkish and Azeri officials are 
currently studying previous documents," he said. 
  Cetin added the accord with Baku was expected to be signed 
during the visit of Azerbaijani President Geydar Aliyev to 
Turkey in January. 
  Foreign Minister Cetin also predicted important activity in 
the new year regarding the transportation of Caucasian and 
Central Asian oil. 
  "The two set points in the proposed Azerbaijani pipeline's 
route have been specified. These are Baku, the starting point, 
and Ceyhan, on Turkey's Mediterranean port. How these two 
points are connected is not important for us and will be talked 
about," Cetin said. 
  Ruling out the use of the Turkish straits for major oil 
transportation due to heavy traffic, Cetin said Turkey could not 
accept heavy tanker traffic in the already congested straits. 
He recalled the dangers that a city like Istanbul with a 
population of 10 million would face in the event of the extreme 
increase in high tonnage tanker traffic. 
  Cetin said contacts with Russia, Turkmenistan, Kazakhstan 
and 
Western oil companies on this subject would continue. "We 
suggest the oil should be transported through Turkey to the 
Mediterranean. It could be directly over Turkey by pipeline, or 
it can be brought to the Russian port of Navorossisk and then 
brought to Turkey. It can go over Georgia or Iran, or, if peace 
is secured, it can even come over Armenia," Cetin said, 
signalling that the way Baku and Ceyhan were connected was 
ultimately not significant for Turkey. 
  Referring to recent announcements by the government of 
Andreas Papandreou in Greece, particularly in connection with 
the illegal arming of the Greek islands just off Turkey's coast, 
Cetin noted that these left little to be optimistic about 
Ankara's relations with Athens in the new year. 
  He said, however, that Ankara had no plans at the preset 
time 
to bring these provocations by Athens up at international fora. 
He suggested that Turkey was satisfied with seeing Greece 
alienate itself internationally through its behavior. 
Indicating that Ankara's wish was to maintain the channels of 
dialogue with Athens, Cetin nevertheless cautioned that Turkey 
was ready for any eventuality in the face of potential Greek 
adventurism. 
  He also expressed exasperation with continued Greek 
obstructions in Turco-European Union relations, reminding again 
that means to overcome the problem of the Greek veto in this 
context should be found. 
  He said if a solution was not found to this problem, then 
future problems between Turkey and Greece would automatically 
become problems between Turkey and the EU [European Union] 
which, he suggested, would be debilitating. 
  Referring to the Customs Union between Turkey and the Union 
proposed for 1995, Cetin said Turkey was ready to shoulder its 
share of the burden. 
  "But the Union should also do its share. Under the 
Additional Protocol, Turkey has to receive financial support 
from the Union. The 4th Financial Protocol has not materialized 
due to the Greek veto. Neither has the fifth. Together with 
these and the 6th Financial Protocol, the support which Turkey 
is now entitled to is about $3.5 billion," Cetin said. 
  Cetin said the financial support which the Union should 
provide for Turkey would be one of the items in the upcoming 
talks between the foreign ministers of Turkey, Germany and 
Britain which is scheduled for January 20. 
  Cetin stressed that 1993 had been a difficult year but one 
which also brought fruitful results for Turkey, which he said 
had now become a major center of diplomacy in line with a wish 
expressed by Ataturk so many years ago. 
  The foreign minister underlined the following developments 
in 
Turkish policy in this context: 
  In the last year Turkey has become a country that is no 
longer on the periphery, but on the crossroads of the Caucasus, 
the Balkans and the Black Sea. Through the Balkans we are 
connected to Europe, with the Caucasus to Central Asia and with 
the Black Sea to Russia and Ukraine. 
  The institutions of the Black Sea Economic Cooperation are 
now prepared. The Economic Cooperation Organization, on the 
other hand, has now been enlarged with the Central Asian 
Republics and its members number 10. It is also ready to 
activate further cooperation. 
  Ankara has enhanced its relations in the Balkans. Our ties 
with Russia are based on good neighborliness and common 
interests. 
  We have also established institutionalized ties with the 
Central Asian republics. We have taken 7,00 students from those 
republics last year giving them full scholarships. We have 
extended $1 billion dollars in eximbank credits to them, and 
some 300 million of this has been used. Our private sector has 
made $2.48 billion in direct investments in Central Asia. Our 
foreign trade with the region has increased to $287 million in 
the first eight months of 1993. Turkish Airlines now flies 
twice a week to most Central Asian capitals. 
  There is also great deal of cooperation in the communication 
sector. Today, the Turkish TV channel Avrasya is only surpassed 
by the CNN as the most-commonly watched channel. 
  A Turkic Summit, which President Demirel will attend, will 
be 
held in Baku on January 21. 
  Turkey has made its European allies understand the nature of 
PKK terrorism, to condemn it and to ban PKK activities. With 
Iran we have launched fresh cooperation on security and are 
keeping our channels of dialogue open with this country. We are 
also ready for dialogue with our neighbor Syria, but this 
depends largely on Syria's attitude. Our attitude toward 
terrorism was explained to Damascus. Our political security 
mechanisms with this country continue to operate. A Turkish 
delegation will hold meetings in Damascus in the new year. 
  We are going to hold a tripartite meeting with Iran and 
Syria 
in Istanbul at which we will discuss regional problems and the 
issue of security. Bilateral issues can also be discussed 
during the bilateral meetings of the foreign ministers. 
  Turkey has no problem with Iraq. Iraq's problem is with the 
international community. We are of the strong belief that the 
3.5 years of isolation Baghdad has suffered is enough, and all 
parties, particularly Iraq, should strive for this country's 
reintegration with the world. 
  A delegation from the Iraqi Foreign Ministry will come to 
Turkey to discuss what could be done with the oil in the 
Yumurtalik-Karkuk pipeline. There are two major problems in 
this context: What will be done with Iraqi portion of the oil 
once it's taken out of the pipeline, and how will the pipeline 
be filled again to prevent damage? We are also discussing this 
issue with the Americans. 
  Operation Poised Hammer (Provide Comfort) is here due to 
regional conditions. Its removal or continuation will not solve 
anything, although its going may aggravate the situation. What 
will solve the problem in this context is talks between the 
northern Iraqi leaders and the Baghdad government. 
  Our enhanced partnership with the United States has been 
furthered during Prime Minister Tansu Ciller's visit to 
Washington and the intense diplomatic efforts which followed. 
Cetin went on to say that 1993 had underlined the need for new 
policies based on new political realities. 
  Cetin stressed the search for a New World Order which would 
replace the former bipolar world. 
  "There is little that causes us to be optimistic," he said. 
"On the contrary, it is clear that this period of disorder will 
continue in the coming days, and this situation is particularly 
valid for our part of the world." 
  Stressing that "long-term planning was necessary in domestic 
and foreign policy," Cetin said: "In 1993, which seemed to be 
longer than a normal calendar year, Turkey had to deal with a 
multitude of foreign policy problems and crises, and at the same 
time. Unlike some other states, we did not have the luxury of 
concentrating on a single thing." 
  He added the developments in the field of diplomacy in 1993 
were not always black and white. 
  "The problems we confronted, the lack of will in the 
international arena, the double standards in the world and the 
inaction in the face of major crises is not something Turkey can 
be accused of having taken part in," Cetin said responding to 
criticism that Turkish foreign policy had been ineffective. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57848 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_q_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TURKEY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Economic Cooperation Agreement Signed With Russia </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  TA3012145993 Ankara TRT Television Network in Turkish 1100 
GMT 30 Dec 93 </F>

<F P=103> TA3012145993 </F>
<F P=104>  Ankara TRT Television Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Turkish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Announcer-read report over video] </F>
  [Text] The first round of meetings of the Turkish-Russian 
cooperation working group set up with the aim of securing the 
transfer of information in the fields of industry and advanced 
technology has ended. A memorandum of understanding envisaging 
Turkish-Russian cooperation in various fields was signed at the 
end of the talks. It was signed by Osman Unsal, the deputy 
secretary of the Treasury and Foreign Trade, and by Valeriy 
Mikhaylov, Russia's first deputy minister of economy. 
  In a statement at the signing ceremony, Unsal said that the 
cooperation secured between the two countries will positively 
contribute to preserving regional stability at the desired 
level. Mikhaylov said that the friendship and cooperation 
established by the prime ministers of the two countries have 
been consolidated at these talks. The memorandum of 
understanding envisages a review of the existing economic and 
trade relations, cooperation in the fields of energy, 
transportation, and communications, and the transformation of 
Russian military installations into civilian use. Furthermore, 
the memorandum aims at increasing possibilities of cooperation 
to include the transfer of advanced technology in all fields. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57849 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_q_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TURKEY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ciller Gives News Conference in Diyarbakir </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  TA0101111594 Ankara TRT Television Network in Turkish 1610 
GMT 31 Dec 93 </F>

<F P=103> TA0101111594 </F>
<F P=104>  Ankara TRT Television Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Turkish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [News conference by Prime Minister Tansu Ciller and Deputy </F>
Prime Minister Murat Karayalcin at Dicle University in 
Diyarbakir -- live] 
  [Excerpts] [Ciller] Valuable citizens of Diyarbakir and 
prominent members of the press and television, I salute you. We 
arrived to embrace the citizens of Diyarbakir and southeast 
Anatolia. I want to say that the warm welcome and the support I 
saw made me very happy and confirmed once more the fact that we 
are truly a united entity. The empathy we received here 
constitutes our greatest force. We came here to extend support 
and we leave here next year, that means on 1 January, stronger 
than ever thanks to the devotion of our people. 
  All we wish is to be able to protect our citizens, children, 
babies, and old people. Our sole wish is to be able to bring 
life security as well as the state and the government to the 
people of the region. What we witnessed here today proves that 
whatever happens our historical unity cannot be easily 
disrupted. The state is great and strong, and all our citizens 
from all regions are happy to belong to such a beautiful 
country. We are determined to bring the strength of the state 
to all our citizens -- be they in Diyarbakir, Izmir, or Istanbul 
-- who are free to live anywhere they want and when they want. 
For this reason, we invested 1.6 trillion Turkish lira in 
Diyarbakir last year and this year we are endeavoring to invest 
an additional 3.7 trillion Turkish lira, which has already been 
included in the budget. We have arrived in Diyarbakir bringing 
with us approval of this additional amount within the framework 
of planning. [passage omitted] 
  [Unidentified correspondent] It has been reported that due 
to financial difficulties, there has been a stand still in the 
GAP [Southeast Anatolia Project]. What are your views on this 
issue? 
  [Ciller] There is no slowdown in the GAP. We are aiming at 
bringing water to Urfa by means of an internal pipeline until 
summer. We had a mild backlog on this issue due to a difficulty 
the contractor confronted but we want to help him. We will 
overcome this problem by using state mechanisms and negotiating 
with various banks, among them the Development Bank. The income 
we will receive from the transportation of water will cover our 
additional expenses. We are determined on this issue and I am 
persuaded that we are going to solve this issue in a couple of 
weeks. On the issue of the Birecik Dam: We first laid the 
foundations of the dam and then started looking for financial 
help. The most important event was obtaining [word indistinct], 
that means Germany's, guarantee and France followed in Germany's 
footsteps. We are at this moment in contact with the other two 
countries who belong to the consortium, but I do not envisage 
any problems on that account because Germany's guarantee was the 
most important step in the establishment of the consortium. The 
construction of the Birecik Dam will begin very soon. [passage 
omitted] 
  [Unidentified correspondents] [passage indistinct] 
  [Ciller] As the 50th government, our main duty is to take 
care of the problems and the life security of our citizens in 
southeast Anatolia. We have recruited the world regarding this 
issue and explained to them that we have to act together in 
securing these people's right to live, their most important 
right. I can say that the results we achieved were the most 
positive results in the last 10 years. We have secured the 
support of Germany, France, Britain, and the United States -- 
not achieved till now. We have also started a shuttle diplomacy 
with our neighbor countries in the east. [passage omitted] 
  We found an opportunity to express Turkey's views on the 
Bosnia-Herzegovina issue to the world. At the same time, we 
were explaining our citizens' problems and trying to secure 
their lives within the framework of human rights. What is 
happening in Bosnia-Herzegovina today is a disgrace to humanity. 
We have also pointed out that this disgrace -- in violation of 
human rights -- spreads the impression of being a 
Muslim-Christian conflict and therefore poses a great danger to 
world stability. Within this framework, I cannot say that the 
world progressed much regarding this issue but in the coming 
days and months, I will be going to Bosnia-Herzegovina together 
with Honorable Benazir Bhutto and Margaret Thatcher to draw the 
world's attention to this disgrace and warn the world. The 
issue of Bosnia-Herzegovina is not only an issue which is of 
concern to Turkey but also to Europe and the whole world. 
Turkey had to try and explain to the world the situation in 
Bosnia and we will continue in our efforts until a solution is 
found. This is not an issue that Turkey can solve alone. 
  Concerning Azerbaijan, we also explained to the world that 
without discriminating we launched a very big aid campaign to 
the countries which emerged following the dissolution of the 
Soviet Union. The amount of money that we have transferred to 
that region is somewhere between $1.5 and $2 billion -- a 
considerable amount in view of the fact that the total amount of 
the aid extended by the seven big countries [as heard] together 
is $5 billion. [passage omitted] 
  Today there is an unjust Armenian aggression against 
Azerbaijan and this should be condemned. Turkey is determined 
to continue with its policy of nondiscrimination within the 
framework of human rights, as it did in Kuwait, Iraq, Somalia, 
Bosnia-Herzegovina, and Azerbaijan. Turkey is against all 
unjust attacks. We expressed this view when we went to Russia. 
We pointed out to Russia that it has to cooperate with Turkey 
on the Azerbaijani issue. We have also warned the world in the 
same way. We warned the world that one day nationalism may 
raise its head in Russia and we called on the world to assess 
Turkey's importance in the region as well as other regional 
balances. [passage omitted] 
  The issue of Cyprus is a completely different matter and 
great steps will be taken there in the very near future. I 
think that we have been able to relay a very different picture 
to the world public. When we first went to the United States, 
President Clinton said: Turkey has done the best it can. It 
was very important for us to have Clinton acknowledge that 
Turkey did its best because till then we were being blamed for 
being unjust. [passage omitted] We are reiterating that we 
should not use Cyprus as a tool in foreign policy and this is 
what we ask from our neighbors and Greece: Let us not make the 
Cyprus issue a tool for internal politics. Let us not use the 
Cyprus issue as a means for exploitation. Let us find a 
solution to this issue together, jointly. The most important 
point in this issue was the Cyprus administration coming to 
power by democratic means. We are witness to the last stages of 
this democratic process and once the government is established 
we will have the opportunity to tackle this issue under the 
leadership of the Turkish Cypriots, because they will have to 
decide their own fate and make the proper decisions. 
  [Unidentified correspondent] There is concern regarding 
the difficulty in holding elections in the region as well as the 
designation of candidates. [passage indistinct] 
  [Ciller] Let no one worry. I am going to say this openly. 
Elections will be held in this region and throughout the 
country. Every kind of security measure will be taken and there 
will be justice and freedom. We are taking every measure in 
order to hold the elections under these conditions. I want to 
assure the citizens and I call on them to be calm and peaceful. 
[passage omitted] 
  [Karayalcin] I agree with honorable Ciller's statement. I 
have not heard anything as to the Social Democratic Populist 
Party [SDPP] mayors not submitting their candidacy for the 27 
March elections. As the leader of the SDPP, I do not want my 
statements to be taken as an assessment that the present SDPP 
mayors' candidacy will be automatically renewed. We have not 
yet reached any decisions on this issue. [passage omitted] 
  As the honorable prime minister expressed, there is no 
reason 
for the elections not to be held here. The elections will take 
place and all the parties that can participate will participate. 
[passage omitted] 
  [Unidentified correspondent] In your speech, you noted that 
the population of Diyarbakir increased two to threefold in the 
past two years. [passage indistinct] Over one thousand 
villages have reportedly been evacuated. Does your government 
have any plans to secure the villagers' return to their homes, 
to guarantee their safety, and failing that, to help these 
people financially? 
  [Karayalcin] There are no evacuated villages in the region. 
There are approximately 600 empty villages. Of these, 78 have 
been abandoned for economic reasons. There are also those that 
have been left for security reasons, but I believe that the 
phrase evacuated villages does not apply here. For us, the 
resettlement of our citizens who are experiencing this internal 
immigration is extremely important -- be it in Diyarbakir, 
Batman, Bismil, or any other place in the region. The honorable 
prime minister supplied figures for a move which is important 
only for Diyarbakir. Only in Diyarbakir, we are launching a 
project to include 14,000 housing units built on 280 hectares. 
As mentioned by the prime minister earlier, we are considering 
every means in order to overcome the settlement problems and 
meet the urgent accommodation needs of our citizens in other 
provinces who are living in tents. 
  Although I was not asked, I would like to make it very clear 
that it is our aim to extensively implement the rules of 
democratization in the southeast of the country as well. As the 
prime minister noted, it is one of our primary goals to reduce 
and eventually eliminate terrorism and stop the bloodshed in 
1994. In conjunction with this goal, our government will 
undertake great leaps in the field of democratization. [passage 
omitted] 
  [Unidentified correspondent] Western countries adopted a 
front against the PKK [Kurdish Workers Party] as a result of 
your visit to these countries. How long will this last? In 
Antalya, you stated that terrorism will be eliminated in 1994. 
We infer from this that the armed struggle will be intensified. 
If in the future, these Western countries pressure you to stop 
the armed struggle, then what will you do? 
  [Ciller] Our internal affairs are our own concern. We will 
be the ones to make the decision. What we did vis-a-vis the 
outside world was to tell them there are babies, women, elderly 
and innocent people among our citizens living in this region. 
These citizens are being cruelly murdered. We must protect 
these people. We are not only protecting them, but in times of 
need we also opened our borders and provided shelter and food 
for 1 million of their brothers across the border. Our problem 
is not with the people of this region. Our problem is with a 
terrorist group which is preventing us from providing services, 
investments, and state support to the region, and which is even 
trying to oust the political parties and the press from the 
area. Let us wage this struggle against the terrorists 
together. Let us do this together in all parts of the world -- 
in Somalia, Bosnia-Herzegovina, Azerbaijan, and Iraq. There is 
no question of us redirecting our policy in line with their 
various wishes, and there cannot be such a question. 
  It must be said, however, that until now Germany wanted to 
stop us using their weapons in the struggle against terrorism, 
but now the world has realized that these people are terrorists 
and they are killing our innocent citizens. If our cause is 
just, we can continue to defend it. It is important that we 
should be in the right. It is important for us to reach out to 
our citizens with compassion. To this end, we must surmount all 
the obstacles before us. We are determined in this. I believe 
that we have already achieved a significant stage in this 
struggle and that we will advance our cause even further in 1994. 
  It is impossible to say that terrorism in Turkey will 
suddenly disappear and be uprooted in 1994. We will, however, 
reduce it to the same level as the rest of the world, to a level 
where it ceases to pose a threat, to occupy first place on our 
agenda, to drain the resources of the state, or to prevent the 
state from investing in this region. In other words, we will 
achieve a significant stage in the struggle against terrorism, 
we will remove it from our priority list, and we will no longer 
allow it to eat into our resources. We are determined to attain 
this and I believe that we will. [passage omitted] 
  [Unidentified correspondent] [question indistinct] 
  [Ciller] I would like to answer the question on what the 
government plans to implement in the first part of this year. 
Our first project concerns the southeast region. As you know, 
we just enacted the elections law. Our agenda includes a series 
of bills to fight terrorism. Immediately after this, we will 
introduce the law on local administrations. Our bill on the 
turn-key model for industry will resolve the financing 
difficulties for the dams to be built in Birecik and its 
vicinity. 
  The law on local administration accords more resources and 
more power to municipal authorities. In other words, we want 
local authorities to solve more problems themselves, rather than 
involve Ankara in their solution. We will use pilot areas in 
all parts of the country because we want to overcome problems 
using experience and on-the-spot implementation. 
  More important, in the first three months of this year, we 
will provide loans for shopkeepers and small businesses as well 
as for the youth and housewives through the Halk Bank. We also 
have a project to sell agricultural Treasury lands that are 
outside the jurisdiction of the municipalities to those who are 
utilizing them within their means. We also want to include in 
our agenda the various Treasury lands in urban areas which have 
turned into shantytowns. 
  I would also like to mention that we will continue to 
allocate resources to this region with great determination. 
This will not consist only of cotton and grain. During 1993, 
we allocated 1 billion Turkish lira for tobacco to Batman. This 
will continue. As you know, we have a new tobacco project. The 
state is determined to continue to allocate resources to this 
region. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57850 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_q_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TURKEY </F>
<H3> <TI>   PKK-Related Casualty Figures for 1993 Given </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0301205794 Ankara TURKISH DAILY NEWS in English 27 Dec 93 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> NC0301205794 </F>
<F P=104>  Ankara TURKISH DAILY NEWS </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Ankara--Despite official statements that the 
outlawed Kurdistan Workers' Party (PKK) received a major blow in 
1993, official figures show a twofold increase in terrorist 
activities during the first 11 months of the year in comparison 
to the same period in 1992. 
  According to official figures provided by Turkish security 
sources and the Interior Ministry, the number of civilians 
killed this year increased by 100 percent compared to last 
year's statistics. 
  Official data shows that in all of 1992 there were 1,920 
PKK-related incidents throughout Turkey while this figure 
reached 3,901 in only the first 11 months of this year. 
meanwhile, the civilian death toll was recorded at 1,249 as of 
Nov. 30, 1993, representing an increase of about 100 percent 
from 1992's year-end figure of 618. 
  During the same period in 1993, a total of 676 security 
officials, including temporary village guards, soldiers and 
policemen, were killed. Last year, this figure stood at 634. 
Official figures, provided in writing to the TURKISH DAILY NEWS, 
revealed an increase in PKK casualties and injuries in 1993 with 
1,552 terrorists killed and 121 wounded, in contrast to last 
year's figures of 1,228 killed and 52 wounded. 
  However, the number of alleged terrorists caught by security 
forces so far in 1993 was 7,640 lower than the 7,908 terrorists 
caught in 1992. 
  While 853 civilians were wounded in 1992, the figure rose to 
1,389 in 1993. The number of wounded security personnel also 
increased in this year's figures. 
  During the first 11 months of 1993, security forces 
confiscated 3,028 rifles, 1,221 guns, 2,164 bombs and 463,378 
bullets. In all of 1992, security forces had managed to seize 
3,109 rifles, 1,290 guns, 2,368 bombs and 352,959 bullets. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57851 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_e_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> UNITED KINGDOM </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sudanese Ambassador Given 14 Days To Leave </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0401133694 London PRESS ASSOCIATION in English 1318 GMT 4 
Jan 93 </F>

<F P=103> LD0401133694 </F>
<F P=104>  London PRESS ASSOCIATION </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [By Sian Clare, PRESS ASSOCIATION lobby correspondent] </F>
  [Excerpts] Britain today gave the Sudanese ambassador 14 
days to leave the country in response to Sudan's refusal to 
reconsider its decision to expel Britain's man in Khartoum. The 
Foreign Office said its order for ambassador Muhammad 'Uthman 
Yasin to go was the "inevitable consequence" of Sudan's sticking 
by its expulsion of British envoy Peter Streams. 
  Britain would not agree to the appointment of a successor to 
Mr Yasin and there were no plans to choose a replacement for Mr 
Streams. Sudan's decision to expel Mr Streams was sparked by 
the Archbishop of Canterbury's visit to mainly Christian areas 
in the rebel-controlled south of the country. 
  Today's response by the British Government followed a 
meeting 
between junior Foreign Office Minister Mark Lennox-Boyd and the 
Sudanese Charge d'Affaires Abdurrahman Bakhit who was summoned 
this morning. In a 15-minute showdown, Mr Lennox-Boyd asked the 
Sudanese to reconsider their decision to expel Mr Streams, but 
Mr Bakhit said his government had not altered its position. 
  A Foreign Office spokesman said: "Mr Lennox-Boyd said this 
was a matter of considerable regret and disappointment. Under 
the circumstances and in light of the wholly inadequate 
explanation which the Sudanese had given for Mr Streams's 
expulsion we decided to request the withdrawal of the Sudanese 
ambassador, Mr Muhammad 'Uthman Yasin. Mr Yasin has 14 days 
within which to leave the country." 
  Mr Lennox-Boyd had concluded that the expulsion of Mr Yasin 
was the "inevitable consequence of the Sudanese government's 
action," said the spokesman. But he added: "The British 
Government did not want, however, to see the situation 
deteriorate further." [passage omitted] 
  Britain had given Sudan until today to reverse its decision 
to expel Mr Streams. But Abdullahi al-Azret, of Sudan's 
embassy in Kenya, said today that the ambassador's expulsion 
"will not be reconsidered by Khartoum as the presence of such a 
man in Khartoum cannot help our bilateral relations." 
  Khartoum's move had followed Dr Carey's refusal to go to the 
east African state as a guest of its government, saying it would 
have restricted his freedom of movement. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57852 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_h_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zhirinovskiy Threatens Germany With `WWIII' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0301135094 Hamburg WELT AM SONNTAG in German 2 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> AU0301135094 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg WELT AM SONNTAG </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Heinz Vielain: "Zhirinovskiy Threatens Germany </F>
With War and Destruction"] 
  [Text] Bonn -- If he comes to power, the leader of the 
Russian extreme right, Vladimir Zhirinovskiy, has threatened to 
station 300,000 Russian troops in Germany, declare a possible 
World War III, and "completely destroy" Germany. 
  According to information available to WELT AM SONNTAG, this 
is the contents of intelligence service tape recordings and an 
internal report sent to the German Government by the German 
Embassy in Bulgaria. At the weekend, the German Government 
expressed "dismay," and also concern about Zhirinovskiy's 
threats. Zhirinovskiy's Liberal Democratic Party (LDPR) came 
out the second strongest party in the December 12 elections for 
the first freely elected Russian parliament since the 
disintegration of the Soviet Union. 
  Zhirinovskiy made his threats to a German diplomat at Sofia 
airport. It was there that on Thursday [30 December] the head 
of the German Embassy's Consular Section in Bulgaria had 
informed him of the Federal Government's decision not to grant 
him an entry visa for Germany. 
  Following this decision, the Russian party leader threatened 
the German diplomat that he would break off diplomatic relations 
with Bonn. He furiously pointed out that there are still 
Russian troops stationed on German territory. They would "not 
be withdrawn." Instead, he would station "300,000 Russian 
troops" in Germany, if he came to power. 
  The troops should "safeguard Russian compensation claims for 
damage suffered in World War II." Germany would have to pay up 
and would become "a poor country" as a result. He said that he 
would insist that Germany return all the buildings that Russia 
had put up in eastern Germany over the last 50 years. They 
would be handed over to Russian industrialists. 
  Decisions made against him by the Federal Government, such 
as 
that preventing his entry, could lead to a "Third World War," 
Zhirinovskiy ranted, which would "completely destroy" Germany. 
  He said the German Embassy official could be sure to be 
"liquidated" soon. He, Zhirinovskiy, has such good contacts 
with Russian intelligence that he could make the official simply 
"disappear." 
  The Federal Intelligence Service (BND) and the Federal 
Office 
for the Protection of the Constitution [BfV] have been asked by 
the government to keep an even closer eye on the activities of 
international right-wing extremists in Germany in the future. 
Paul Muenstermann, vice president of the BND, which is in 
charge of foreign intelligence, told WELT AM SONNTAG that his 
office had, for instance, passed information on the activities 
of the Russian right-wing radicals and their leader Zhirinovskiy 
to the Federal Government. This particularly applies to any 
direct contact that Zhirinovskiy has with German right-wing 
extremists. The BfV was informed about the nature of such 
contacts. 
  Christian Democratic Union [CDU] Secretary General Peter 
Hintze told WELT AM SONNTAG that both the BND and the BfV would 
have to obtain information with a view to a "right-wing 
extremist international," which could become a threat to the 
whole of Europe. 
  Juergen Ruettgers, the manager of the CDU/CSU [Christian 
Social Union] Bundestag Group, told WELT AM SONNTAG: 
"Nationalists, fascists, and right-wing extremists are trying 
to set up a new cooperation network all over Europe, as has 
become apparent by Zhirinovskiy's appearances before German 
right-wing radicals." Right-wing extremism must be fought with 
all possible means not only in Germany; the BND will also have 
to step up surveillance of all right-wing extremist groups 
abroad. 
  Zhirinovskiy has close links with German right-wing 
extremists led by the chairman of the German People's Union 
(DVU), Gerhard Frey. The DVU has a membership of some 26,000 
and is considered to be the biggest right-wing extremist 
organization in Germany. 
  The most spectacular joint appearance of Zhirinovskiy and 
Frey so far took place on 2 October 1993 at a rally at the 
Nibelungen Hall in Passau. In April 1993, at Zhirinovskiy's 
invitation, Frey took part in the Russian nationalists' party 
conference in Moscow. In his welcoming speech he called 
Zhirinovskiy a great politician. 
  On Friday, a spokesman of the Australian Foreign Ministry 
said in Canberra that Zhirinovskiy has canceled a scheduled 
visit to Australia. He said this was due to numerous 
appointments that he had in Moscow. If he had applied for a 
visa, he would almost certainly have been granted one. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57853 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_j_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ITALY &amp; VATICAN CITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bomb Blast Damages Padua Social Security Office </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD3112111693 Rome RAI Televideo Teletext in Italian 1004 GMT 
31 Dec 93 </F>

<F P=103> LD3112111693 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome RAI Televideo Teletext </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Italian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Following the recent bomb attacks at the law court 
and the Northern League office, a bomb exploded last night at 
the provincial office of the National Agency for Social Security 
on Piazza Insurrezione [in Padua, northern Italy]. 
  A rudimentary device exploded at around 0300 shattering the 
two large windows of the office, damaging the ceiling, and one 
of the main doors. 
  Police went quickly to the scene after being alerted by 
local 
residents who were woken up by the blast. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57854 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_n_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Norway </F>
<H3> <TI>   EC Issue Causes Record Political Instability </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94P20l82A Oslo AFTENPOSTEN in Norwegian 23 Dec 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94P20l82A </F>
<F P=104>  Oslo AFTENPOSTEN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Norwegian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ole Nygaard: "Great Movement Within the </F>
Electorate"] 
  [Text] The 1993 Storting election resulted in the biggest 
migration within the electorate since World War II. Between 1989 
and 1993, 44 percent of the voters changed party. 
  The election study of 1993 features striking figures and it 
shows very clearly how important the EC issue is to voters. The 
study was done by two election researchers, Henry Valen and 
Bernt Aardal, and will be published in this week's edition of 
Weekly Statistics from the Central Bureau of Statistics. 
  A whopping 44 percent switched party allegiance between 1989 
and 1993. This represents the lowest level of stability in any 
election where such facts have been recorded. In 1989 the figure 
was 39 percent, and in 1985, 29 percent. There can be no doubt 
that in the 1993 election we saw the greatest movement within 
the electorate since World War II. The displacement is much 
greater than in that other election year that was overshadowed 
by the EC issue: 1973. 
  "It was in the election of 1973 that the voters' allegiance 
to a certain party started to cool, and this trend only 
intensified up until the 1993 Storting election," Aardal said. 
<H5>  The Winners </H5>
  The election's winners naturally enjoy the greatest 
stability: 87 percent for the Center Party and 74 percent for 
the Labor Party. The Progress Party's level of stability is 
extremely low: A mere 25 percent of the party's voters from 1989 
voted the same way in 1993. The Socialist Left Party also has a 
very low level of stability: 37 percent. 
  "Among the larger parties it is those to the extreme right 
and left that suffer very low stability, even when the election 
result per se is not catastrophic. The other parties have much 
greater stability than the ones that represent themselves as 
alternatives," Aardal said. 
  Historically, the Progress Party and the Socialist Left 
Party 
have had the strongest support among young voters. A mild trend 
in that direction continues, but both parties are now decidedly 
weaker among young voters than they were in 1989. 
<H5>  First-Time Voters </H5>
  A full 23 percent of this year's first-time voters (18-21 
years) voted for the Center Party. That is four times as many as 
in 1989 when only 6 percent did. The Labor Party continues to be 
weak among this group of voters, getting only 20 percent, as 
opposed to about 40 percent of the other age groups. 
  Both the Center Party and the Labor Party have attracted 
many 
voters from just about all the other parties. In addition, there 
is a significant migration from the Labor Party to the Center 
Party. The Conservative Party has lost the largest number of its 
voters to the Labor Party and the Center Party, as has the 
Socialist Left Party. The Progress Party lost the most to the 
Labor Party, the Conservatives, and the Center Party. 
<H5>  More Women </H5>
  Voter participation dropped from 83.2 percent in 1989 to 
75.8 
percent in 1993. The Progress Party's voter participation 
dropped the most. In the Conservative Party there were almost 
three times as many nonvoters among those opposed to the EC as 
among those in favor of it. Another notable fact in this study 
is that women vote in larger numbers than men, except in the 
highest age groups. For the 22-25 age group participation was 70 
percent for women and 63 for men, and in the 26-29 age group 
participation is 75 percent for women, 63 percent for men. 
  "A fundamental change has taken place in recent years, and 
it 
probably has to do with the change in the gender-role pattern. 
The EC issue also contributes in the sense that there are more 
EC opponents among women," Aardal said. 
  What is most notable is that the Center Party now gets twice 
as many votes among first-time female voters as among male 
first-timers. Even the Socialist Left Party now enjoys more 
support from very young men than from women. 
  All in all, the Socialist Left Party and the Christian 
People's Party enjoy greater support from women than men. The 
Progress Party and the Conservatives are more popular with men, 
while the Labor Party and the Center Party enjoy equal support 
from the sexes. Of the women, 50 percent vote socialist, as do 
46 percent of the men. In 1989 those figures were 48 percent for 
women, 43 percent for men. 
  The election study has a population of 2,194. The 
information 
on party allegiance switches is based on about 800 interviews 
conducted with the same people in 1989 and 1993. 
<H5>  Conservatives Hit by EC </H5>
  One-half of those who voted for the Conservatives in 1989 
became EC opponents in 1993. Only 34 percent of this group 
remained loyal to the Conservative Party in the 1993 election. 
  It is no secret that the EC issue has had a profound effect 
on the Storting election, and the Valen-Aardal study reinforces 
this. In its own analysis of its election losses, the 
Conservative Party has blamed itself for its EC profile. But no 
study prior to this one has demonstrated just how massively the 
party lost on the EC issue. In the rural areas of Norway the 
loss was enormous. Even the researchers were amazed when they 
arrived at their numbers. 
  Overall the EC supporters are more stable in their votes 
from 
1989 to 1993 than the EC opponents: 63 percent versus 52. Among 
EC supporters there is a significant migration to the Labor 
Party from the Conservatives, the Progress Party, and the 
Socialist Left Party. In the research population there was not a 
single EC supporter who voted for the Socialist Left Party. For 
the opponents to the EC the Center Party has been the great 
magnet. Both the Socialist Left Party and the Conservative Party 
gave up 20 percent of their 1989 voters to the Center Party, 
while the Labor Party and the Progress Party gave up 17 percent 
each. 
  The Labor Party has a net gain among the opponents, as 
compared to the Socialist Left, the Conservatives, and the 
Progress Party. Among those who have not decided on the EC issue 
the Labor Party is the decided winner. 
  The following shows stability in percentage points for the 
various parties in the 1993 Storting elections. The figures 
indicate the percentage of that party's 1989 voters who voted 
for the party in 1993. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Center Party                          |87                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Labor Party                           |74                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Christian People's Party              |60                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Conservative Party                    |56                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Socialist Left Party                  |37                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Progress Party                        |25                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57855 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_o_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> CYPRUS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kliridhis Hails Joint Defense Doctrine `Significance' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC3112122993 Nicosia Cyprus Broadcasting Corporation Radio 
Network in Greek 1000 GMT 31 Dec 93 </F>

<F P=103> NC3112122993 </F>
<F P=104>  Nicosia Cyprus Broadcasting Corporation Radio 
Network </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Greek </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] President Glavkos Kliridhis has hailed the new 
Greek-Cypriot defense doctrine's significance, stressing that 
peace in Cyprus will be more secure as Greece becomes more 
involved. The president said the situation would change 
significantly when the invader knows that every new aggressive 
action in Cyprus implies a Greek-Turkish war. 
  Kliridhis said the defense doctrine will be go into effect 
during the visit by Greek Defense Minister Yerasimos Arsenis and 
a delegation of senior military officials in early January. 
  The president said this to National Guardsmen this morning 
when he visited National Guard posts in Nicosia. Defense 
Minister Kostandinos Iliadhis and National Guard Chief General 
Yeoryios Siradhakis accompanied Kliridhis. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57856 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003aa_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   IAEA Waiting for DPRK, U.S. Regarding Inspections </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0501080494 Paris AFP in English 0248 GMT 5 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> AU0501080494 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris AFP </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Excerpt] Vienna, Jan 5 (AFP) -- The International Atomic 
Energy Agency (IAEA) said Tuesday [4 January] that up to now it 
had not been contacted either by North Korea [DPRK] or the 
United States regarding inspections of North Korean nuclear 
facilities. 
  A spokesman of the Vienna-based organisation said the IAEA 
was "waiting for one of the two sides to get in touch with us." 
  Contacts between North Korea and the IAEA have been 
suspended 
since Pyongyang, which is suspected of working to develop 
nuclear weapons, refused to let IAEA inspectors into all its 
nuclear facilities. 
  In December, the IAEA rejected a North Korean offer to allow 
partial inspection of its facilities. 
  The IAEA said it had insisted on being allowed to see all 
North Korea's nuclear facilities and was "ready to resume its 
inspections at any time." 
  Pyongyang said it was willing to let IAEA inspectors view 
five of its seven nuclear facilities. 
  But at the two others, a nuclear reactor and a uranium 
reprocessing plant, both at Yongbyon, North Korea said IAEA 
inspectors would only be allowed to put new film in the cameras 
already installed to monitor work at the facilities. 
  It was a request to visit these two sites, which Pyongyang 
says are military facilities with no nuclear role, which sparked 
North Korea's decision in February to suspend inspections of 
existing sites and threaten to withdraw from the Nuclear 
Non-Proliferation Treaty. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57857 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_e_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> UNITED KINGDOM </F>
<H3> <TI>   Charge d'Affaires Comments Further </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0401191194 London MBC Television in Arabic 1800 GMT 4 Jan 
94 </F>

<F P=103> NC0401191194 </F>
<F P=104>  London MBC Television </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Arabic </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] The British Foreign Office has decided to expel 
Sudanese Ambassador 'Ali 'Uthman Yasin following talks between 
Mark Lennox-Boyd, deputy secretary of state for foreign affairs, 
and Sudanese Charge d'Affaires 'Abd-al-Rahman Bakhit this 
morning. The British Foreign Office has asked the Sudanese 
Foreign Ministry to answer its request addressed to the Sudanese 
authorities to change its stance and reverse its decision last 
week to expel the British ambassador in Khartoum. 
  Our correspondent Hasan Zaytun, who met the Sudanese charge 
d'affaires following the British decision, said: 
  [Begin recording] [Zaytun] We spoke with the Sudanese charge 
d'affaires about the British Foreign Office decision and he 
expressed his regret. 
  [Bakhit] This is a diplomatic principle. The British 
Government has applied the policy of reciprocity and responded 
to our decision to expel British Ambassador Streams. 
  [Zaytun] Asked if the crisis and Sudanese-British relations 
could worsen to involve other areas, Bakhit said: 
  [Bakhit] I don't believe this will happen. We have great 
confidence that as long as the channels of dialogue remain open 
between Sudan and Britain, many issues can be solved through 
dialogue. We do not believe the crisis will worsen. 
  [Zaytun] The Sudanese charge said the British Government's 
giving the Sudanese ambassador a period in which to leave London 
does not mean the mutual expulsion decision may be reconsidered. 
But he reiterated that the two sides have said they hope the 
crisis will remain a diplomatic one. [end recording] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57858 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_e_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> UNITED KINGDOM </F>
<H3> <TI>   Adams Sees Possible Progress in Irish Peace Talks </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0401141094 London THE DAILY TELEGRAPH in English 4 Jan 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> PM0401141094 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE DAILY TELEGRAPH </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Patrick Bishop: "Adams Opens Door for Talks"] </F>
  [Text] Belfast -- The Sinn Fein president, Mr Gerry Adams, 
re-opened the possibility of dialogue on peace in Ulster last 
night when he declared that the Downing Street Declaration 
contained a "potentially significant development" on the central 
issue of Irish national self-determination. 
  In a speech to party activists in west Belfast he said: "If 
the British Government is prepared to co-operate with the Dublin 
Government to bring about Irish national self-determination in 
the shortest possible time, consistent with obtaining maximum 
consent to the process and in consultation with all parties, 
then there is a real possibility of progress." 
  He said that the declaration contained, "for the first time, 
a recognition by Britain, though heavily qualified, that the 
Irish people as a whole had the right to self-determination." 
  He added: "This right has never been acknowledged before by 
the British and this is a potentially significant development 
and an indication of the strength of this democratic argument." 
However he said that "partitionist solutions cannot create the 
conditions of peace and democracy." He called on the government 
to "make the exercise of Irish national self-determination its 
policy objective." 
  While endorsing the right of Unionists to be consulted he 
said "continued support for the Loyalist veto was a recipe for 
on-going conflict." 
  Earlier yesterday the British and Irish Governments moved to 
sooth Unionist anger following remarks by the Irish premier, Mr 
Albert Reynolds, which were interpreted in Ulster as pandering 
to the IRA. 
  A statement issued by Downing Street said there was no 
difference in the respective governments' positions on the 
interpretation of the Declaration. 
  The Irish deputy premier Mr Dick Spring, said there had been 
"some overreaction" to Mr Reynolds's statement. 
  The controversy was sparked by a statement by Mr Reynolds in 
which he called for the "demilitarisation of the Northern 
conflict" and spoke about the need for both governments and 
communities to "become persuaders for a new agreement on the 
future of the whole island." 
  He also said the declaration's stipulations for 
sel-fdetermination for all Irish people were in line with those 
revealed in public statements about the contents of the dialogue 
between the Mr John Hume the SDLP leader, and Mr Adams. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57859 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_e_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> UNITED KINGDOM </F>
<H3> <TI>   Military Contacts With RSA To Be Reestablished </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0401154494 London PRESS ASSOCIATION in English 1531 GMT 4 
Jan 93 </F>

<F P=103> LD0401154494 </F>
<F P=104>  London PRESS ASSOCIATION </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [By Charles Miller, PRESS ASSOCIATION defense correspondent] </F>
  [Text] Britain is to re-establish military contacts with 
South Africa this month with the visit of a Royal Navy warship 
and support vessel. 
  The goodwill visit will also help boost Britain's chances of 
selling military hardware as naval equipment is high on the 
South Africans' shopping-list. 
  HMS Norfolk, the first of the Navy's most up-to-date Type 23 
frigates, and its support vessel Royal Fleet Auxiliary Grey 
Rover will visit Cape Town and Simonstown from January 27 to 31. 
  The visit follows an invitation by the chief of the South 
African Navy, Vice-Admiral Robert Simpson-Anderson. 
  A United Nations ban on military contacts with South Africa 
was lifted last October, reflecting the government's commitment 
to end white rule. 
  And it is expected that sanctions preventing the sale of 
military equipment to South Africa will be lifted following 
elections in April. 
  UK Defence ministers and officials have been holding 
discussions with the South African government and the ANC 
[African National Congress] in preparation for the lifting of 
the embargo. 
  The British government and defence industry can see 
significant opportunities for sales of military equipment. 
  There is keen interest in buying naval equipment including 
offshore patrol craft, maritime patrol aircraft and helicopters 
because of concern about piracy around the South African coast. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57860 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_h_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   CDU Criticizes Kinkel for Zhirinovskiy Statement </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0501104894 Paris AFP in English 1029 GMT 5 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> AU0501104894 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris AFP </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] BERLIN, Jan 5 (AFP) -- Chancelor Helmut Kohl's 
Christian Democratic Union [CDU] criticized Foreign Minister 
Klaus Kinkel Wednesday [5 January] for recently expressing 
readiness to meet with Russian ultranationalist leader Vladimir 
Zhirinovskiy. 
  "I find Klaus Kinkel's offer to meet with Zhirinovskiy 
disconcerting," said Peter Hintze, the secretary general of the 
CDU in an interview published in the daily Berlin newspaper B.Z. 
[BERLINER ZEITUNG]. 
  "It would be a grave error to minimize or even worse to 
politically boost (Zhirinovskiy) by organizing public discussion 
with him or by inviting him for a television debate. 
  "No reasonable political official should allow himself to be 
tempted," he added. 
  Kinkel said Monday that he would be willing to meet with 
Zhirinovskiy, who heads Russia's far-right Liberal Democratic 
Party and who was refused a visa to Germany last week. 
  "Personally, I'm not scared of talking with him," Kinkel 
said. "We can't deny the fact that based on the number of votes 
he garnered he does have a following in Russia." 
  Zhirinovskiy, who was expelled from Bulgaria last week and 
is 
unlikely to be welcomed into France where authorities said they 
would also deny him a visa, threatened Germany with "a third 
world war" after his visa application was turned down. On 
Monday he sought to correct his statement by telling a German 
television station that he was "a friend of Germany." 
  He is expected to submit another visa application following 
an invitation to attend a congress of European far-right parties 
in Cologne next month. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57861 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_h_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Rexrodt Says Zhirinovskiy No Threat to Economic Ties </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0401210294 Berlin DDP/ADN in German 2012 GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> LD0401210294 </F>
<F P=104>  Berlin DDP/ADN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Berlin (DDP/ADN) -- In the view of German Economics 
Minister Guenter Rexrodt (Free Democratic Party), the recent 
threats by the Russian nationalist, Zhirinovskiy, do not 
constitute a threat to economic relations between Germany and 
Russia. In an interview with the Berlin-based national 
newspaper DIE WELT (Wednesday [5 January] edition), Rexrodt said 
Russian-German economic relations have "a sound basis" which 
have developed out of "mutual interest." Their strength was 
also proven in the difficult Cold War period. 
  Rexrodt stressed that "Yeltsin and the Russian Government 
continue to consider the further expansion of economic ties with 
the West as their top priority." It is clear to Moscow that the 
industrialized states and the international financial 
institutions play an important part in the reform process. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57862 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_h_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Industry Representatives Respond </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0501101694 Berlin DIE WELT in German 5 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> AU0501101694 </F>
<F P=104>  Berlin DIE WELT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by "HH/wtm": "Fewer Investments in Russia?"] </F>
  [Text] Bonn -- In view of the latest threats by Russian 
right-wing extremist Vladimir Zhirinovskiy, representatives of 
German industry have warned against a decreasing willingness to 
invest in Russia. The winner of the Russian elections had 
threatened with World War III; he talked about stationing 
300,000 troops in Germany and about claims to German 
compensation payments for damage done in World War II. 
  The chairman of the East Committee of the German Economy, 
Otto Wolff von Amerongen, said: "The new Zhirinovskiy element 
will not increase people's willingness to invest." The 
Bonn-based Federation of German Chambers of Industry and 
Commerce said that "the climate is deteriorating," and this 
affects all sectors of industry. 
  The Federal Government reacted to Zhirinovskiy's threat 
quite 
calmly. Economics Minister Guenter Rexrodt told DIE WELT that 
German-Russian trade relations have "a sound base founded on 
mutual interests." They have "proved solid" also in the 
difficult times of the Cold War. Rexrodt cannot see 
Zhirinovskiy's positions shaking these foundations: "Yeltsin and 
the Russian Government still consider a further expansion of 
trade relations with the West, and especially with Germany, 
their top priority," Rexrodt pointed out. Moscow is well aware 
that the industrialized nations and the international financial 
institutions must be of first importance in the reform process, 
Rexrodt said. 
  "The economy is not panicking," Karl-Hermann Fink, manager 
of 
the East Committee of the German Economy, said. He said that 
all the long-term projects are continuing. 
  Within the German gas industry, which buys some 30 percent 
of 
its supplies from Russia, there is no trace of alarm. Neither 
the market leader Ruhrgas in Essen, nor Wintershall Erdgas 
Handelshaus GmbH, the German partner of the Russian Gazprom, are 
planning any emergency measures. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57863 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_h_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Berlin Seeks Extradition of `La Belle' Attacker </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0501112094 Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG in German 5 Jan 94 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> AU0501112094 </F>
<F P=104>  Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report signed "Hz": "Alleged `La Belle' Attacker Detained"] </F>
  [Text] Berlin -- The protracted criminal proceedings 
against the suspects of the bombing attack on the Berlin "La 
Belle" discotheque could now come to life again. On Tuesday [4 
January], Berlin's judicial authorities reported that the 
Federal Government has been trying since August 1993 to obtain 
the extradition of a stateless Palestinian arrested in Lebanon, 
who is suspected of having been involved in organizing the 
attack. They said the name of the man is Yusef C. In 1986 he 
was a diplomat at the Libyan mission in East Berlin, the 
so-called People's Bureau. In the course of 1992, he was 
detained in Lebanon pending extradition, a fact the German 
authorities did not know until November 1992. 
  But the German authorities still do not know whether the 
suspect was arrested following an arrest warrant issued by the 
Berlin court in 1990 for accessory to murder. The Foreign 
Ministry in Bonn, via whom the extradition request was addressed 
to the Lebanese authorities, has not yet received an answer to 
this question. There is no extradition agreement between 
Germany and Lebanon. 
  Two American men and one Turkish woman were killed and 230 
people injured in the bomb attack on the La Belle discotheque on 
7 April 1986. The discotheque, in Berlin's Schoeneberg 
district, was mainly frequented by American soldiers. United 
States fighter aircraft bombed the Libyan capital Tripoli and 
the port of Bengazi in retaliation. 
  The extradition request is not directly linked with the 
suspension of criminal proceedings at the end of April 1993 
against a Palestinian called Imad Mahmud, suspected of having 
been involved in the attack. He was accused of having been 
involved in the planning of the attack, at least at the 
beginning, but not in the organization or even the actual 
carrying out, as Yusef C. allegedly was. The person who planted 
the bomb has still not been found. This part of the proceedings 
could be resumed shortly, since the main prosecution witness, 
Muhammad A., who has meanwhile moved to Norway, was heard by a 
court there. He is said to have confirmed all the main points 
of the statement he had previously made to the Berlin Public 
Prosecutor. 
  According to the findings of the Public Prosecutor -- which 
are contained in the indictment -- in March 1986, during the 
severe political tensions between the United States and Libya 
over the closing of the Gulf of Sirte in the Mediterranean, two 
members of the Libyan Embassy in East Berlin and the accused 
talked about carrying out an attack on American soldiers in 
which as many people as possible should be killed, without 
specifically planning the attack. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57864 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_h_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   FDP's Kinkel Expounds Election Campaign Strategy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0501094994 Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER RUNDSCHAU in German 
5 Jan 94 p 4 </F>

<F P=103> AU0501094994 </F>
<F P=104>  Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER RUNDSCHAU </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Charima Reinhardt: "The FDP Intends To Stress </F>
Its Difference From Other Political Parties"] 
  [Text] Bonn, 4 Jan -- In the 1994 election year, the Free 
Democratic Party [FDP] intends to distinguish itself more 
extensively from other political parties, including its 
coalition partner, the Christian Democratic Union/Christian 
Social Union [CDU/CSU]. The FDP will focus on performance and 
plans to further elites to a larger extent. 
  According to party chairman Klaus Kinkel, the political 
debate will be focused on the preservation of the state ruled by 
law and on combating unemployment. To create jobs, a 
"modernization thrust" of the economic sector is required, as 
described in Federal Economics Minister Guenter Rexrodt's (FDP) 
paper on Germany's economic base. In the discussion of the 
coalition on internal security, "a few things" cannot be had 
with the FDP. Kinkel mentioned as examples the great bugging 
campaign and CDU/CSU floor leader Wolfgang Schaeuble's proposal 
to use the Bundeswehr in conflicts at home. The FDP will, 
however, complete all projects adopted by the coalition "in a 
fair way and as agreed upon." They include the amendment of the 
asylum law and the nursing insurance. The FDP will not accept a 
change of course in European policy. Those who believe the 
Germans could "leave the European policy course are wrong," said 
Kinkel. 
  The foreign minister announced "massive controversies" with 
the Social Democratic Party of Germany [SPD]. He said he would 
put the blame for increasing foreign policy difficulties on the 
SPD, which rejects an amendment to the Basic Law for Bundeswehr 
combat missions outside the NATO area. In environmental policy, 
the FDP will distinguish itself from the Greens, whose 
environmental policy ideas "fail to take market economy 
considerations into account." 
  Generally, Kinkel believes that 1994 will be a difficult 
year 
for his party. "Much will be at stake" for the FDP. He called 
upon the liberals once again to demonstrate calmness and 
cohesion. Kinkel rejected North Rhine-Westphalian FDP Chairman 
Juergen Moellemann's proposal to reduce the federal cabinet this 
year. He said such a change should not be considered shortly 
before Bundestag elections. The government must now "do a good 
job." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57865 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_h_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Asylum Seekers Decrease by 100,000 in 1993 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0501092694 Hamburg BILD in German 5 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> AU0501092694 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg BILD </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Einar Koch: "100,000 Asylum Seekers Less"] </F>
  [Text] The new asylum laws are showing an effect! 
  The number of asylum seekers last year decreased by 
approximately 100,000 -- from 438,000 to 322,000, which is 26.4 
percent less than in 1992. This is what Federal Interior 
Minister Manfred Kanther (Christian Democratic Union) says in 
his latest asylum report (which is still secret). The upshot: 
"The declining tendency has stabilized." In the last month, in 
December, there were no more than 14,000 asylum applications (in 
the same month of the previous year, the figure was 32,000). 
  The main countries of origin in 1993 were what is left of 
Yugoslavia (73,000), Romania (73,000), Bulgaria (23,000), and 
Turkey (20,000). 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57866 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_h_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Unemployment Reaches `New Record High' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0401223194 Munich ARD Television Network in German 1900 
GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> LD0401223194 </F>
<F P=104>  Munich ARD Television Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Unemployment in Germany has reached a new record 
high. At the end of December, 3.7 million people in Germany were 
registered unemployed. The new data was presented today by the 
Ursula Engelen-Kefer, deputy chairwoman of the German Trade 
Unions Association [DGB], who is also a member of the Federal 
Labor Office's administrative board. According to these 
figures, the number of unemployed rose in the west by 25 percent 
to 2.5 million over the last year. In the east, 1.175 million 
were registered unemployed. This is an increase of 75,000. The 
official unemployment figures will be published tomorrow. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57867 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_h_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Economy in Old Laender Seen on `Way to Recovery' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0501134294 Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT in German 5 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> AU0501134294 </F>
<F P=104>  Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report signed "HB": "Economy in Western Germany on the Way </F>
to Recovery"] 
  [Text] Duesseldorf, 4 Jan -- Even at the beginning of the 
year, HANDELSBLATT's early indicator continued its four-month 
upward trend. It improved from minus 0.8 percent in December 
1993 to minus 0.5 percent in January 1994, and was thus 0.7 
percentage points above last year's January value. Despite the 
recently differing developments of the individual values that 
make up the early indicator, it looks as if the turn of the tide 
has meanwhile been completed. 
  Although the demand in the manufacturing industry in October 
only barely managed to maintain the value of the previous month, 
for the first time in a longer period the corresponding value of 
the previous year was not only attained but even exceeded by a 
narrow margin. It is now more than six months ago that the 
absolute low in the developments was recorded in March. Since 
then, demand has gradually picked up, all in all more than 5 
percent. 
  The demand in the main construction industry has been 
relatively steady again. After the slump of the second quarter 
of the year, which was mainly caused by public civil 
engineering, order books have meanwhile consolidated again at a 
higher level. In September another increase of almost 1 percent 
was achieved over August. Last year's level was thus exceeded 
by 2 percent. 
  The retail trade remains a problem child of the economy. 
After sales in real terms managed to get out of the low of the 
middle of the year with great difficulty during recent months, 
October was anything but a golden month for retail trade 
revenues. On the contrary, the sales adjusted for price changes 
and seasonal variations were down 3.3 percent over the previous 
month. 
  With 0.6 percent, the margin between short- and long-term 
interests slightly improved in November; temporarily prevalent 
expectations that the interest structure would normalize by the 
end of 1993 have, however, proved too optimistic. Nevertheless, 
one should not be dissatisfied with the developments in the 
capital markets; long-term interest rates, which are so 
important for long-term financing, fell by another two 
percentage points in November, while the three-month Fibor rate 
decreased even more strongly (0.3 percentage points). 
  Altogether, the economic situation at the beginning of the 
year still appears to be in a precarious state, although it is 
certainly on the way to recovery. The main positive aspect is 
that the general mood has changed in favor of the optimists. 
The Economic Research Institute index for the business climate 
in the manufacturing industry managed to recover further in 
November; with minus 27.6 points after minus 30.3 points in the 
previous month, it is now clearly more favorable that one year 
ago (minus 40.3 percent in November 1992). 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57868 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_i_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Defense Minister Stresses Role in Bosnia </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0401210394 Paris France-2 Television Network in French 
1900 GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> LD0401210394 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris France-2 Television Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Studio interview with Defense Minister Francois Leotard by </F>
announcer Bruno Masure -- live] 
  [Text] [Masure] Yesterday, live from Zagreb on our 1300 
bulletin, French General Jean Cot said his 30,000 blue helmets 
are ready for an offensive intervention if, of course, he has 
the permission of the UN secretary general. Thank you, Francois 
Leotard, for being with us this evening. Is such intervention 
conceivable and envisaged? 
  [Leotard] It is conceivable and envisaged. At this very 
moment, we have troops taking action or responding to fire in 
some places when it is necessary. One should know that this 
action should not be taken without careful consideration because 
air bombing or action to break blockades would and can have 
repercussions on our troops on the ground. In other terms, one 
should be careful when one talks about these issues. We are in 
a very difficult situation on the ground and the use of force 
should not be resorted to to worsen the situation of the blue 
helmets who are still not engaged in hostilities and who are 
there either for humanitarian reasons in Bosnia or for 
peacekeeping in Croatia. One should understand that the 
military situation as such demands a lot of sangfroid, 
abnegation, and dedication which in fact honor the blue helmets, 
be they French or from other nationalities. 
  [Masure] It seems that we are heading toward the withdrawal 
of the Canadian troops, according to what we are hearing this 
evening. Do you agree with the statement of Jacques Baumel, 
deputy chairman of the Defense Commission of the National 
Assembly, who said that the impotent presence of French blue 
helmets is meaningless? 
  [Leotard] No, I don't share this opinion and I will tell you 
why. First, we are there because the parties to the conflict 
asked us. We are there because the role we are playing at this 
very moment is still useful. We are still protecting women and 
children. We are escorting convoys that allow them to live or 
survive. Finally, we should think carefully about the 
consequences of a withdrawal. I will tell you what the 
consequences of a withdrawal would be if we are compelled to go: 
the spread of the conflict to the whole of the Balkans, the 
likely capture of Sarajevo by the Serbs, and thus a massive 
deportation of population, the capture of Srebrenica and some 
other enclaves, and the resumption of hostilities with heavy 
weapons on some fronts in Croatia. Obviously we are facing 
something which is not a success; it is undeniable and it hurts 
the heart when one looks at the pictures. However, as far as I 
am concerned, and I hope everybody would do the same, I would 
not say anything that would discourage our soldiers or undermine 
their action or their morale, and both are needed at the moment. 
  [Masure] You were reminding us a moment ago that we are 
there 
because we were asked to go by the main parties to this 
conflict. At the ceremony when he presented his new year wishes 
to the press, Alain Juppe said: We have been betrayed by 
everyone, all the factions. None of the factions wants peace, 
and all are preparing for war. 
  [Leotard] Unfortunately, what he says is true. That's to 
say, yet again we have those who are holding discussions in 
Geneva -- there they are polite, civilized, courteous, very 
understanding. And then it is the same people, or their 
associates, who, on the ground, are stepping up attacks against 
our forces, or stepping up their battles with the other sides in 
the conflict. 
  So I have every sympathy with what General Cot said. He is 
right to say it: You have to choose between these two roles. 
Either you discuss peace with us, or you make war on the 
ground. But as far as we are concerned -- and I am saying this 
publicly to the French people, because they have to know it -- 
we have not declared war on anyone. We are there because we are 
defending our values, and if we did not, it would be a terrible 
abdication of responsibility by Europe. We are there because we 
want to avoid a failure for the United Nations, for NATO, for 
Europe. And we are there because otherwise we would be 
abandoning the civilian population. 
  Of course, we are not going to stay there to the point of 
absurdity. At the proper moment, probably in spring, we will 
have to discuss with our partners, with the United Nations, the 
conditions under which we will stay there. 
  [Masure] Next Monday and Tuesday [10-11 January] there is a 
summit of the Atlantic alliance in Brussels. Alain Juppe has 
hinted at a new initiative. What might it be? Do you share the 
pessimism of David Owen, who is very familiar with the case, and 
who is talking of a possible withdrawal of all the UN 
peacekeeping forces in spring? 
  [Leotard] That would be an astounding failure, much more 
serious than today's failure. But of course, we have to look at 
all possibilities. When we hold this NATO summit next week, we 
will express the hope, we will ask the United States, for 
example, to intervene and help us, to ensure that this hotbed of 
war does not spread over the whole of southern Europe and the 
Balkans. This is our responsibility. As you know, as everyone 
knows, this is where the First World War started. So we have to 
be very careful, and France -- this redounds to its honor -- has 
stepped up its diplomatic and military initiatives to prevent 
this conflict from spreading. 
  So let us keep our cool. It is difficult. It is a very 
thankless task, but personally, I should like to express my 
support for these soldiers, most of them French, as you know, 
who are trying today, as best they can, exhausted and 
demoralized, to save women and children. We must not let them 
down, these women and children. 
  [Masure] Thank you, Francois Leotard, for having discussed 
this delicate matter with us. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57869 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_i_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Minister on UNPROFOR's Problems in Bosnia </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0401181594 Paris France-Inter Radio Network in French 1700 
GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> LD0401181594 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris France-Inter Radio Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] The French foreign minister says he understands the 
anger and revolt of UN Protection Forces [UNPROFOR] commanders 
Cot and Briquemont and thinks that the UN role should be 
redefined. Alain Juppe is interviewed by Michel Barthelemy: 
  [Begin Juppe recording] Our soldiers on the ground are 
carrying out a difficult task with admirable courage. The whole 
question is to define their mission. I think that the 
leadership of UNPROFOR was right to raise a certain number of 
questions. The current situation is intolerable. Recently, the 
European Union gathered all the parties concerned around a table 
in Brussels. We particularly asked them one question: Do you 
agree to observe a truce during Christmas? They all said yes, 
and they all went back on their word. 
  We cannot work for peace with parties to the conflict 
preparing for war. This is not a reason for one to be 
discouraged. France should continue its action as it has been 
doing for several months now. As you remember, the UN secretary 
general thought an extra 7,500 soldiers are necessary in the 
safety zones. Only France strengthened its force last July, 
when it sent more than 1,000 additional troops. Where are the 
others? Where are the missing 6,500? [end recording] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57870 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_i_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bani Sadr Alleges Complicity Between France, Iran </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401130894 Paris LE FIGARO in French 4 Jan 94 p 9 </F>
<F P=103> BR0401130894 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE FIGARO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Veziane de Vezins report: "The Cold Fury of Bani Sadr -- </F>
At His Home in Versailles, the Former President Deposed by the 
Mullahs Does Not Mince His Words"] 
  [Text] While the presumed assassins of the opponent of the 
Tehran regime, Kazem Rajavi, are heading back to Tehran, one 
Iranian, the vestige of an attempt at democracy, and the most 
highly profiled target of the mullahs' regime, is boiling with 
indignation in his freezing house in Versailles. The former 
president of the Iranian Republic, Abolhassan Bani Sadr, who 
came to power in 1981, only to be deposed by the parliament 18 
months later, rants and raves in his own particular manner, 
[which is] both oriental and Parisian. Without dropping his shy 
smile and virtual whisper, he said: "The government is 
respecting neither its laws, nor the European extradition 
treaty. Not so long ago, it was committed to `terrorizing the 
terrorists.' Who said this is the country of human rights?" 
  Not just anybody who so desires can gain access to the large 
white building, but the excessive zeal is out of place. In 
front of the railings there is a police car. Behind them, in 
the garden, there is a CRS [state security police] bus, 
converted into a spartan antechamber, for security checks. 
Visitors are always searched, but the few policemen and CRS 
officers guarding the former president confirm that neither the 
numbers of personnel nor the security precautions themselves 
have been stepped up. A secretary wearing jeans comes to fetch 
visitors on the steps, ushers them through a small door, and 
guides them along the white corridors into a bare lounge. The 
windows, in front of which two frozen cypress trees sway in the 
wind, give out onto the Jewish cemetery. "During the 10 years 
we have been here," the secretary assures me, "we have grown 
used to the cold and solitude." 
<H5>  Hypothesis </H5>
  The master of the house, who was granted political asylum in 
France, presses on angrily. How can the French government's 
refusal to extradite Mohsen Sharif Espahani and Ahmad Taheri to 
Switzerland be explained? Bani Sadr evokes the choice between 
fear of a new wave of terrorist activity and deliberate 
complicity. "Fear? I do not think so. Every time a government 
gives in to a terrorist state it is encouraging acts of 
violence. When Naccache was sent back to Iran they assassinated 
Bakhtiar. And look at Algeria. No. There is some form of 
complicity between the Iranian regime and the French 
government." He then goes on to describe Iran as the "only 
country in the world whose foreign policy can be summed up as 
[being characterized by] terrorism, arms purchases, 
indebtedness, and large-scale corruption." 
  But what complicity? Continuing his argument cautiously, 
Bani Sadr, his gaze fixed on the floor, calls to mind Gorbachev, 
abandoned by Europe, while the Iranian regime, [which is] 
"greatly weakened and highly indebted, and which is only being 
propped up by foreign support," has received $30 billion in 
short-term aid over the last four years. "It is facilitating 
the task of these governments in the Muslim world. It stands 
for Islamic fundamentalism and terrorism. It is serving to 
supplant the threat of communism and generate fear." 
  The revolt of Bani Sadr, [who remains] motionless, is 
visible 
only on his face. He interrupts himself while tea is served, 
then puts forward a hypothesis: "If the French Government 
committed the despicable act of sending back the two accused, 
then it did so because something happened regarding Algeria. 
Perhaps France obtained an undertaking from the Iranian regime 
that it would stop providing military and financial aid to 
Algerian terrorists. If terrorism effectively ceases in 
Algeria, then France will be able to say that it scored a great 
victory." 
  Was sending back the two accused the gift offered by France 
to appease the Iranian anger provoked by the return to France of 
Mariam Radjavi, wife of the leader of the People's Mujahidin and 
the "future president" enthroned by her followers? For the 
former Iranian president, the fury of the Mullahs' press, which 
denounced French complicity with the "terrorists" of her 
calibre, was only superficial and "was unleashed just after 
Charles Pasqua [minister of interior] had started to chase the 
Algerians out of France." More precisely, "when France consents 
to send back the assassins of the Muslim Brotherhood, then it 
must consider this group to be finished. The arrival of 
Radjavi's wife did not inconvenience Iran; on the contrary. It 
indicated the defeat of the Mujahidin." 
  Not a man to mince his words. He seems unaware of the danger 
hanging over him. "They say that Rushdie and myself are facing 
the greatest danger. However, others have written worse things 
than he, and his case cropped up at the right time to deflect 
public opinion from the defeat in the Iran-Iraq war." And what 
was the greatest sin committed by Bani Sadr? "Representing a 
democratic alternative for Iran, a unique case in the Muslim 
countries. I am not afraid. Liberty for Iran calls for a 
struggle." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57871 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_i_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Socialists Greet Proposal for `Social Pact' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401103294 Paris LE MONDE in French 4 Jan 93 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> BR0401103294 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE MONDE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Socialist Party Approves Concept of </F>
`New Social Pact'"] 
  [Text] Francois Mitterrand's end of the year message, 
particularly his proposal to set up "a new social pact on 
employment," were welcomed positively by the Socialist Party 
[PS]. Speaking on Europe 1 [radio station] on Saturday [1 
January], PS spokesman Jean Glavany said that he "appreciated" 
that Mitterrand had "pointed to the key problem in French 
society -- unemployment -- which undermines and ruins 
everything." "The fact that the president of the Republic said 
that our society could no longer sustain this evil (...) is, in 
my opinion, his responsibility as the guarantor of national 
unity," he added. 
  A long-time advocate of this concept, Jean Popperen was 
happy 
to see that Mitterrand adopted it as his own. "The development 
of the situation necessitates this objective," the former 
Socialist minister explained, "for otherwise, we are in for 
serious social splits (...)." This objective must now be 
implemented: It is the responsibility of the whole social 
movement. Speaking on France-Inter [radio station] on Monday, 3 
January, Laurent Fabius also expressed "the hope that the 
government and the business world will follow up this concept." 
  Officials from the Right had shown little enthusiasm on this 
as recently as 31 December. Bruno Megret, the number two man of 
the National Front, blamed the chief of state for "surfing on 
the wave of events." "With Mr. Mitterrand, politics no longer 
means action, rather incantation and good intentions" he said, 
adding that "France is now in danger." Yves Galand, chairman of 
the Radical Party, said that "calling for a new social pact 
would sound more credible if Francois Mitterrand's socialism had 
not sharpened inequalities." He added that "the president would 
be better qualified to moralize if his seven years in office had 
not been marked with `affairs.'" 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57872 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_i_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Chirac `Must Keep' Distance From Government Policy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401151994 Paris LE QUOTIDIEN DE PARIS in French 4 Jan 93 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> BR0401151994 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE QUOTIDIEN DE PARIS </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article signed E.Z.: "Chirac Keeps At a Distance From </F>
Balladur"] 
  [Text] Of course, the RPR [Rally for the Republic] 
president has not become a dissident. He still "approves of and 
supports" Edouard Balladur and his government, which "are doing 
everything they can to correct the situation." What is more, he 
"does not regret" leaving Matignon [prime minister's office] to 
Edouard Balladur: "I needed some time to assess the situation, 
to keep myself at a distance from the daily events, to think 
about the major reforms which are needed today, and all that was 
not compatible with the constraints of government," he explained. 
  Today, however, after the successful outcome of the GATT, 
after the UDF [Union for French Democracy] ministers urged their 
prime minister to run in the presidential elections, after the 
FINANCIAL TIMES consecrated Edouard Balladur as its "man of the 
year," Jacques Chirac must keep a distance -- even a minimum one 
-- from the government's policy if he wants even a small chance 
to be a credible candidate in the presidential elections; he 
also needs to put something else forward, "another political 
line," which will allow him to rally all those who believe that 
Balladur's reforms are not fast, nor strong enough. 
  This is precisely what Jacques Chirac has been doing. "We 
are going through exceptional times when the French people 
understand that deep changes are necessary and accept them," he 
explains. Thus, "a real revolution of the mind must be 
initiated, major reforms must be undertaken and developed, and 
the peoples' reactions must be taken into account." And for all 
those naive people who believe that this is exactly what Edouard 
Balladur has started to do, Jacques Chirac makes himself quite 
clear: All of this will be done during the hectic months of the 
presidential campaign, which will be of a "high level and will 
make it possible to initiate the renewal of France." Another 
dispute between Chirac and Balladur is over the date when real 
change is going to take place. For Balladur, the new era 
started in March 1993 and will continue uninterrupted after the 
1995 presidential elections. For Jacques Chirac, nothing will 
really start until then. 
<H5>  Obsolete Measures </H5>
  The first thing that applies in this context is the 
employment policy. It is true that Jacques Chirac, committed by 
his support to the government, admits that the "Giraud law is a 
step in the right direction." He adds, however, that "it is not 
enough." "Ways of thinking must be changed, another policy is 
necessary, more money must be spent actively for [social] 
integration," he recommends. 
  This reminds one of the ideas of Charles Millon [Republican 
Party] and Philippe Seguin [chairman of the National Assembly] 
on the transformation of the ANPE [National Employment Agency] 
and the ASSEDIC [expansion unknown] or also of the theories of 
Alain Madelin [minister of economic development] on the 
necessity for everyone to create their jobs. It can be said 
that the experts convened by Jacques Chirac are beginning to be 
productive. "At all events," says Jacques Chirac, "the old ways 
of fighting unemployment from a social point of view do not 
measure up to the current problems." Still, Mr. Chirac does not 
accuse Edouard Balladur, as others do, of being content with 
obsolete measures. Not yet. The prime minister understands by 
now that the Giraud law would be his weak point as a 
presidential candidate. This is probably why a further 
reduction of taxes on the lowest incomes is expected in the near 
future. 
  But the employment problem is not the only source of 
opposition between the two men. Schools could well be another 
one soon, public schools in particular. Whereas Matignon will 
announce a plan to strengthen security in public schools "in the 
next few days," Jacques Chirac yesterday called for a "large 
plan to rehabilitate and modernize public schools." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57873 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_i_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   _o_ Media Notes: Balladur Popularity Viewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94P20180D </F>
<F P=103> 94P20180D </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
Article   Type:CSO 

  [Editorial Report] 
<H5>  Contradictory Poll Results </H5>
  The results of a PARIS MATCH/BVA poll conducted from 2 to 6 
December 1993 among a nationwide sample of 966 individuals 
appeared in the 24 December Paris weekly PARIS MATCH. While 
Prime Minister Edouard Balladur's popularity remained high, a 
majority of respondents expressed dissatisfaction with the way 
the country is governed. Respondents were asked the following 
questions (all figures are percentages): 


"For each of the following personalities, can you tell me if you trust 
him/her or not?" 

                Trust              Mistrust              Do not know 

Dec             Nov      Dec      Nov        Dec        Nov 

Edouard         54       54       37         4          9        12 
Balladur 

Simone Veil     50       49       40         41         10       10 

Charles         48       41       43         47         9        12 
Pasqua 

Francois        39       41       55         50         6        9 
Mitterrand 

Jacques         36       37       47         40         17       23 
Delors 

Raymond Barre   35       39       53         48         12       13 


Jacques         35       35       57         54         8        11 
Chirac 

Philippe        34       30       45         48         21       22 
Seguin 

V. Giscard      30       31       61         56         9        13 
d'Estaing 

Michel Rocard   29       28       60         59         11       13 


Francois        28       30       59         55         13       15 
Leotard 

Alain Juppe     25       25       56         50         19       25 

Brice Lalonde   19       19       65         63         16       18 


Antoine         18       16       63         61         19       23 
Waechter 

Laurent         15       16       73         71         12       13 
Fabius 

Jean-Marie Le   13       14       81         77         6        9 
Pen 

Georges         12       11       81         79         7        10 
Marchais 




"What is your opinion of Francois Mitterrand as president of the Republic?" 


           Overall       Nov 93    Leftist       Rightist       Neither 
                                   voters        voters 

Good       44            47        80            23             40 

Bad        48            45        18            73             50 

Do not     8             8         2             4              10 
know 




"What is your opinion of Edouard Balladur as prime minister?" 

           Overall       Nov 93    Leftist       Rightist       Neither 
                                   voters        voters 

Good       56            56        36            78             56 

Bad        34            32        54            19             32 

Do not     10            12        10            3              12 
know 




"Are you satisfied or dissatisfied with the way France is governed?" 

                  Overall      Nov 93   Leftist      Rightist      Neither 
                                        voters       voters 

Satisfied         27           31       19           41            24 

Dissatisfied      65           61       76           54            67 

Do not know       8            8        5            5             9 




"Taking everything into account, would you give a vote of confidence to the 
Balladur government if you were a deputy?" 

           Overall       Nov 93    Leftist       Rightist       Neither 
                                   voters        voters 

Yes        45            45        24            75             40 

No         39            38        63            18             40 

Do not     16            17        13            7              20 
know 


  The following question was asked of 3,869 individuals from 
15 
to 18 November 1993 and from 2 to 6 December 1993: 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|"If new legislative elections took place next Sunday, for which candidate wo-| 
|uld you be most likely to vote?"                                             | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |December                 |November                 | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Extreme left             |2                        |3                        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Communist Party (PC)     |8                        |7                        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Socialist Party (PS)     |21                       |22                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Generation Ecologie      |7                        |6                        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Greens                   |5                        |5                        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Union for French Democra-|13                       |15                       | 
|cy (UDF)                 |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Rally for the Republic (-|31                       |29                       | 
|RPR)                     |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|National Front (FN)      |13                       |13                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  Writing in the 18 December Paris weekly LE POINT, Denis 
Jeambar notes the inherent contradiction between the prime 
minister's popularity and the electorate's dissatisfaction with 
the way France is governed. While Balladur works to improve 
France's economic and social conditions, he "paradoxically" 
profits from the electorate's fear that it could worsen 
conditions by contesting the government's actions, Jeambar 
writes. Economic recovery might bring down Balladur's popularity 
by "removing the danger," he concludes. 
<H5>  Balladur' s Presidential Prospects </H5>
  After Minister of Health Simone Veil and Minister of Defense 
Francois Leotard--both UDF members--strongly approved during 
television interviews of a Balladur candidacy in the next 
presidential elections, Jacques Patoz commented in the 20 
December Paris daily LE QUOTIDIEN DE PARIS that the two 
ministers' statements are really intended to block other 
candidacies and are "certainly not a naive homage to the prime 
minister." Many UDF officials wish to see Balladur as the 
conservative coalition's presidential candidate, Patoz writes, 
because they want to forestall the candidacies of UDF leader 
Valery Giscard d'Estaing and RPR leader Jacques Chirac. The 
endorsement of Balladur by Veil and Leotard was "logical" but 
"clumsy," Patoz continues. By opening the presidential debate 
and promoting confict based on party and personality 
differences, Veil and Leotard risk weakening the governing 
majority as well as the prime minister, whose strategy has been 
to place himself above partisan quarrels, Patoz writes. If 
Balladur is indeed considering a run at the presidency, being 
viewed as the UDF's favorite places him in a delicate position 
in his own RPR among those who disapprove of his policies or 
remain Chirac loyalists. Veil and Leotard's embrace of Balladur 
indirectly reinforces Chirac's position, Patoz concludes. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57874 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_i_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   _o_ Media Notes: New Political Division Viewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94P20180B </F>
<F P=103> 94P20180B </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
Article   Type:CSO 

  [Editorial Report] 
  As the traditional divide between right and left becomes 
less 
important, a new rift based on different attitudes toward trade 
and protectionism has split France into two camps, commentator 
Alain Duhamel contends in the 11 December LE POINT. One camp 
has reacted to the economic crisis by demanding protection from 
foreign competition. The other believes in opening up new 
markets for France and in placing the country in a "forced 
march" to modernization. This split first emerged during the 
campaign to ratify the Maastricht Treaty and was deepened during 
the GATT negotiations, Duhamel continues. Politically, the 
first group is made up of communists, FN [Front National] 
sympathizers, ecologists, and followers of National Assembly 
President Philippe Seguin. According to Duhamel, members of 
this group feel nostalgic for a France of "disparate but always 
protective traditions" and support protectionist devices such as 
"safeguard clauses, Community preference, and national 
exceptions." This group also tends to "curse American 
hegemonism...mistrust German ambition...and be suspicious of the 
selfishness of the powerful and of treason by the elites," 
Duhamel writes. The second group is characterized by Duhamel as 
"determined, dynamic, and resolutely positive." Its members 
come primarily from the white-collar class, see themselves as 
reformists, and nurse fewer suspicions about the Maastricht 
Treaty and the GATT. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57875 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_i_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   _o_ Media Note: Arms to Libya, Iraq Pondered </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94P20180C </F>
<F P=103> 94P20180C </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
Article   Type:CSO 

  [Editorial Report] 
  According to Brigitte Rossigneux, writing in the 15 December 
Paris satirical weekly LE CANARD ENCHAINE, "It is easy to 
sidestep the arms sales embargo against Libya or Iraq." 
Rossigneux affirms that the Czech Republic is willing to play 
the role of intermediary in such a transaction. She cites as 
evidence the minutes of a 20 October government-industry meeting 
in Paris and a report on the results of a 25-27 October visit to 
East European countries by the Aeronautics and Space Industries 
Group (GIFAS) commission in charge of exports. At the 20 October 
meeting, Rossigneux reports, the Ministry of Defense delegation 
on international relations asked French arms manufacturers to 
submit their sales proposals "as massively as possible," with 
special emphasis on "sensitive countries, notably Taiwan and 
South Africa." She cites an excerpt from the GIFAS commission 
report explaining the advantages of working with the Czechs: 
"Czech officials offer Western companies qualified and 
inexpensive manpower, a capable and underemployed labor 
instrument, and access to export markets such as Algeria, Libya, 
Iraq, Thailand, and New Zealand." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57876 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_j_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ITALY &amp; VATICAN CITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Berlusconi Interviewed on Economic Objectives </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401152694 Milan L'INDIPENDENTE in Italian 4 Jan 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> BR0401152694 </F>
<F P=104>  Milan L'INDIPENDENTE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Italian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Fininvest President Silvio Berlusconi by </F>
Mario Sechi; place and date not given: "Berlusconi: There Is a 
Limit to Taxes"] 
  [Text] He has not tasted the bitter cup yet but he already 
wants to change the Constitution to put the brakes on a tax 
mechanism that has gone crazy and is chopping up the savings of 
Italians. Silvio Berlusconi proposes a maximum tax levy (35 
percent) and his allies are [National Rebirth Pact leader] 
Mariotto Segni (who has criticized Ciampi's maneuver), [Radical 
leader] Pannella, and the Northern League. And those who 
thought that Berlusconi was ready to incite a tax revolt, 
perhaps being struck by [League ideologue] Miglio's ideas, have 
been disappointed. The Knight [Berlusconi nickname] has made 
[Democratic Party of the Left (PDS) Secretary] Occhetto's and 
[PDS Deputy Secretary] D'Alema's moustaches stand on end with 
these words: "More than 47 percent of what we produce ends up 
in the State's coffers. This means that each Italian works from 
1 January to 28 July for the government and works for his family 
only from 29 July on." The PDS response was immediate. 
  [Sechi] Occhetto has called your proposals demagoguery and 
has added: "Berlusconi should tell me how many old people he 
wants to turn out into the street, how many schools and 
hospitals he wants to close." What is your reply? 
  [Berlusconi] What old people on the street. How dare 
Occhetto talk of old people. He is the one who has contributed 
to destroying the real value of wages and pensions by forcing 
old people to live in poverty, by being the accomplice of a 
system that should have been opposed and not supported by an 
opposition party. My proposal focuses on increasing wealth and 
employment in Italy. It has been primarily the demagogic 
choices made by the PCI [Italian Communist Party] and the PDS 
that have damaged the national economy. 
  [Sechi] The tax ceiling is just the foretaste of a broader 
program for economic recovery. Can you provide an outline, give 
an anticipation of some points to our readers? 
  [Berlusconi] The program we are working on is at an advanced 
stage and will be made public in due course. The only 
anticipation I feel like giving is that it is a change in course 
compared to what has happened over the past 10-15 years. Our 
objective is to restore to Italians the liberties that politics 
has confiscated from them. It is a matter of freeing ourselves 
from the bureaucratization of society and the politicization of 
life. 
  [Sechi] You are saying "Stop the blank checks to governments 
that devour money." How can the Italians say stop. The League 
tried with their tax strike but with little success. 
  [Berlusconi] What I maintain is that when effective 
constitutional rules are lacking, the people in government are 
exposed to the almost irresistible temptation to acquire 
consensus and popularity by abusing public expenditure. 
Fortunately tax revolts are rather rare events and can lead to 
undesirable consequences. If we want to avoid these we must set 
our hands to reforming the state to move from a system based on 
trust in those governing to one that is based on the 
predictability of well-defined regulations. 
  [Sechi] You have been defined as being a fan of the 
capitalistic Far West but propose a tax code, barriers, rules. 
Does this not seem to be contradictory? 
  [Berlusconi] The capitalistic Far West is a folkloristic 
expression used by those who have still not understood that the 
market is a rule. I prefer a market economy and therefore it is 
perfectly in harmony with my partiality for constitutional 
rules. The supporters of the market economy are also the 
advocates of the state -- free traders in economics, liberals in 
politics. When the Left sees a contradiction between the market 
and rules it shows that it is insufficiently aware of the 
principles of a free economy. 
  [Sechi] Who may your travel companions against supertaxes 
be? 
  [Berlusconi] I strongly doubt that today there is anybody 
who 
is convinced that taxes should be increased. There is no 
self-employed person, shopowner, or businessman who is not aware 
of the fact that in Italy there has been an intolerable abuse of 
tax pressure. The success of the League is one of the many 
confirmations of this fact. Only the Left has not realized this 
yet, even if they are careful not to openly suggest tax 
increases. 
  [Sechi] Miglio says that your program has been copied word 
for word from that of the League. 
  [Berlusconi] Miglio knows very well that the introduction of 
a tax ceiling is not something new but has been supported for 
many years and in the most varied countries. However, the 
problem is not to determine the paternity of the idea but rather 
to make it accepted and translated into state legislation. 
  [Sechi] The PDS states that you could not care less about 
the 
deficit and that you want to maintain consumption high to keep 
your group's revenues up. 
  [Berlusconi] Like before, the postcommunists are masters in 
the art of misinforming. As for the deficit, which is 
threatening the financial solvency of our country and to whose 
increase the postcommunists have largely contributed by 
proposing ever increasing expenditures, the past year shows that 
tax experiments do not solve the problem. Taxes have increased 
enormously but the deficit, far from decreasing, has also 
increased. In order to balance the government budget one must do 
precisely what the Left does not want to do: cut public 
expenditure. As for consumption, I am not the one who is saying 
that private consumption has decreased, it is the official 
figures. Finally, the fact that those asking that available 
income be restored to families and workers are doing so in their 
own interests, and this shows how little "those of the Left" are 
worried about the well-being of the Italians. 
  [Sechi] Is the Left eating balance sheets or has it really 
converted itself to capitalism? 
  [Berlusconi] Everything is possible. But is seems highly 
unlikely that those who have preached statism and disdained the 
market economy and capitalism suddenly become supporters of 
economic liberty. If we ask ourselves why the enemies of the 
market economy suddenly proclaim themselves liberals and free 
traders, the answer is obvious: Statism has produced mourning 
and ruins wherever it was attempted and it has thrown such 
discredit upon itself that it is in nobody's interests to 
proclaim oneself a statist. 
  [Sechi] Professor Martino has proposed a pay packet without 
any deductions and the abolition of withholding taxes to unhinge 
an old and oppressive taxation system. Do you agree? 
  [Berlusconi] The abolition of withholding taxes would make 
workers know exactly how much taxes they must pay. Once again, 
this must be a rule: Taxes must be clear and visible. Whether 
this will then contribute to changing the tax system depends on 
the taxpayers' reaction in determining the amount of taxes that 
each has to bear and primarily to what extent those in 
government will take this reaction into account. 
  [Sechi] How can expenses be reduced? Everyone has tried but 
without success. 
  [Berlusconi] There are expenses that can be reduced 
immediately and expenses that require radical reforms to be 
reduced, but one thing is certain: In order to reduce public 
expenditure it is first of all necessary to want to do this 
(even though this is not sufficient). Nobody can deny that this 
is a difficult task but it is not an impossible one if there is 
a desire to see it accomplished. It is the task of politics to 
accomplish things that are desirable. 
  [Sechi] Do you think that the problem of tax evaders can be 
resolved? They say that you are their new Robin Hood. 
  [Berlusconi] Tax evasion must be fought without hesitation 
in 
order to have justice. However, if we really want to reduce 
evasion and not limit ourselves to talking about it then we must 
act on the causes: When income taxes are too high, this 
discourages the production of income and encourages attempts to 
avoid paying them in various ways. For this reason, I think 
that we will have to follow the example of many countries, such 
as Sweden and the United States, which have reduced tax rates 
precisely to reduce evasion. Less exasperated progressive taxes 
provide incentives for production and increase state revenues, 
as the experience of other countries has confirmed. Second, if 
it is true that we have a great number of useless taxes that do 
nothing or little for state revenues, we should do away with 
them. In doing so we will simplify the taxpayer's life and the 
work of the tax authorities who could dedicate themselves to 
seeing that the taxes that really contribute to increasing 
revenues are paid. In any case, though we cannot give up the 
battle against evasion, this is certainly not the road to 
balancing the government budget. 
  [Sechi] If you were Ciampi what would you have done in 
Crotone [scene of industrial unrest]? 
  [Berlusconi] What distinguishes the statist from the 
politician is that the first is willing to run the risk of 
becoming unpopular in pursuing the interest of all, while the 
second does not hesitate in placing his political career before 
the interest of the public. This does not mean that there are no 
exceptional circumstances that call for specific, pragmatic 
solutions. I only want to say that these exceptions must be 
rare and not part of normal behavior. 
  [Sechi] Let us talk about savings. How can you convince the 
army of BOT [government bonds] people that you are not against 
them? And above all, how can you convince them to have faith in 
joint-stock companies, in the Stock Exchange? 
  [Berlusconi] I really do not see why the people who hold 
government bonds should be afraid of those who have always 
defended savings and the right of ownership. Those that should 
be afraid are those that have tried to criminalize these people 
for years by accusing them of being parasites, the owners of 
financial income, and responsible for the balance of payments 
problem. Italian savers will turn to shares if the recovery of 
the Stock Exchange can convince them of the advantages of 
investing in shares. 
  [Sechi] Prof. Raffaello Lupi who is Minister Gallo's 
consultant has said: Berlusconi seems to be like Zhirinovskiy: 
He promises less taxes and more vodka. Rather than Einaudi, 
according to the Left, you are a demagogue whose only expertise 
is debts. What is your reply? 
  [Berlusconi] I would like to remind you that Zhirinovskiy is 
a postcommunist nationalist Russian who calls himself a liberal 
democrat. If there is somebody that resembles these people it 
is not me, it is those that have acclaimed the Soviet Union for 
years and that now proclaim themselves democrats just like the 
tenants of Botteghe Oscure [PDS party headquarters]. As for the 
content of this strange affirmation, I think that it confirms 
the importance that the postcommunists give to the well-being 
and liberty of the taxpayers. 
  [Sechi] When will you taste the bitter cup of politics? 
  [Berlusconi] We will see. Perhaps soon, perhaps never. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57877 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_j_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ITALY &amp; VATICAN CITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Mariani Succeeds Venturoni as Navy Chief of Staff </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401134694 Milan IL GIORNALE in Italian 2 Jan 94 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> BR0401134694 </F>
<F P=104>  Milan IL GIORNALE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Italian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Guido Azzolini: "New Navy Chief; Mariani Brought </F>
In"] 
  [Text] Rome -- After almost two years, Vice Admiral Guido 
Venturoni has transferred his post as Navy chief of staff to 
Vice Admiral Angelo Mariani, in order to become Armed Forces 
chief of staff. "This transfer," he said at Friday's [31 
December] ceremony, "elicits mixed feelings," because it is not 
easy to leave the love of your past 40 years. 
  Taking his leave of the Navy, Venturoni took stock of his 
two 
years at the top, citing the many tasks -- from Somalia to 
Albania and the surveillance in the Adriatic still under way -- 
that have provided useful confirmation of the service's 
promptness and efficiency but that have also highlighted the 
need to enhance its amphibian capability. Despite the increased 
activity and the reduction of resources, Venturoni said, the 
level of efficiency has been very high, and, confident of being 
able to maintain it, the Navy has adhered to a number of 
international cooperation programs such as that for the 
Italo-Franco-British frigate. 
  "But in the longer term," he stressed, "it will be essential 
to bring resources into line with requirements if we want to 
avoid not only failing to meet objectives of efficiency but even 
irreversibly jeopardizing our operational mechanism." 
  Admiral Mariani highlighted the importance of the valuable 
legacy of history, attitude, and traditions which Navy personnel 
both guard and share. "Within society," he said, "there is a 
strong demand for principles, following the failure of the 
ethics of success. There are expectations of honesty, of a 
spirit of service, of dedication to the common good." 
  But Mariani added that another obligation is that to do your 
job properly -- which will not be easy in view of the limited 
resources available. It will therefore be necessary to take all 
possible measures to make the Navy more "economical," developing 
the skills of its personnel, who remain the cornerstone of the 
system, in order to have sailors "who are not only capable of 
standing international comparison but who can constitute a 
professional reference point for other navies." 
  The tasks facing the Navy, and that it is already carrying 
out, Mariani continued, are to stabilize the Mediterranean and 
to work for peace in the international field. Hitherto the Navy 
has been able to perform them well because it had good ships -- 
"the result of far-sighted decisions made 20 years earlier. Now 
many of them are on the decline." So our ships are becoming 
fewer and older, while financial resources are inadequate, thus 
preventing the necessary investments. Therefore, "if we want 
the Navy to be able to continue to perform its tasks 
efficiently, we must promptly draw up a long-term plan based on 
reliable hypotheses of availability of financial resources," as 
happened with the Navy Law of 1974. "It will not be easy to 
achieve a similar objective at a time of economic crisis," he 
said. It will therefore be necessary to create broad consensus 
around the Navy, to make it understood that it "is part of 
everyone's heritage, and that we are merely its custodians." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57878 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_k_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> PORTUGAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Minister Interviewed on Policy Aims </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0401143894 Lisbon RTP Internacional Television in 
Portuguese 1200 GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> LD0401143894 </F>
<F P=104>  Lisbon RTP Internacional Television </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Portuguese </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] The toughest battle for Portuguese diplomacy for 
1994 will be the defense of Portugal's specific interests in the 
context of the European Union, the Portuguese foreign minister 
told RTP this morning. Durao Barroso is chairing a seminar for 
ambassadors, heads of missions and top-ranking Foreign Ministry 
officials in Lisbon. It started this morning and will continue 
tomorrow. The aim of the seminar is to define the main 
objectives of Portuguese foreign policy. Human rights and East 
Timor are the main concerns. Candido de Azevedo reports: 
  [Azevedo] The Portuguese foreign policy team has been 
meeting 
since this morning at Necessidades Palace [Foreign Ministry 
building] with Foreign Minister Durao Barroso. For two days, 
ambassadors, heads of missions and top-ranking officials will be 
appraising 1993 and looking at the best way to achieve 
Portugal's main diplomatic objectives in 1994. 
  [Begin recording] [Barroso] There are many important 
sectors, 
but our main battlefront, if you like, is Europe and the 
European Union: To deepen the process of European union while 
always affirming Portugal's permanent and specific interests in 
Europe. 
  [Azevedo] Minister, I noticed that you paid particular 
attention to the question of Timor in your speech. At the 
moment is there a possibility of positive developments coming 
from Indonesia? 
  [Barroso] As I said, it is too early to draw that 
conclusion. 
There was recently a positive gesture, namely the release of 
seven Timorese students, but the basic question is far, very far 
indeed, from being resolved. Only with perseverance and much 
patience will we be able to envisage some progress in the future 
regarding this matter. 
  [Azevedo] Minister, just one more question: The question of 
Africa, namely Angola and Mozambique. At this stage of the 
peace process, do you believe 1994 could see the end of the war 
in these countries? 
  [Barroso] I do not want to make a prognosis, but I want to 
express a wish, and the wish is precisely that 1994 will be the 
year in which Angola and Mozambique finally find the peace their 
peoples so deserve. [end recording] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57879 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_m_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SWITZERLAND </F>
<H3> <TI>   Government Comments on France's Expulsion of Iranians </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0301143394 Paris LE MONDE in French 2-3 Jan 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> BR0301143394 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE MONDE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Jean-Claude Buhrer: "Bern Regrets That Paris </F>
Failed To Reciprocate" -- all names as published] 
  [Text] While taking care to once again state that they have 
"excellent relations," the Swiss authorities scarcely 
appreciated the New Year's "nongift" from the French Government. 
In any case, Bern reacted strongly to the expulsion by France 
to Tehran of two Iranians wanted by the Swiss justice 
authorities for the murder in April 1990 -- in Coppet, close to 
Geneva -- of Kazem Rajavi, brother of the people's Mujahidin 
leader. 
  Following an oral demarche, the Swiss Government repeated 
its 
protest in writing on Friday, 31 December. In a memo sent to 
the Quai d'Orsay [French Foreign Ministry], he regrets the fact 
that France respected neither the European Convention on 
Extradition of 13 December 1957, nor the convention of 27 
January 1977 on the repression of terrorism. Bern felt that 
this was "a flagrant violation of international law." 
  "The French attitude surprised us even more since, until 
that 
time, our two countries had always cooperated perfectly in the 
area of extradition," said the spokesman for the Federal 
Department of Foreign Affairs, Juerg Schneeberger. Thus, 
Switzerland agreed to hand over to France two Iranians accused 
of participating in the murder on 6 August 1991, near Paris, of 
the Shah's former prime minister, Shahpur Bakhtiar. Arrested a 
short time later in Geneva, the first suspect, Ali Vakili Rad, 
was extradited on 27 August 1991, while the second suspect, 
Zeyal Sarhadi, who was apprehended four months later in Bern, 
was extradited in turn on 26 May 1992. These extraditions 
caused a diplomatic crisis with Iran, which lead Bern to 
temporarily close its Embassy in Teheran. 
<H5>  "The Incident Is Closed" </H5>
  Bern was expecting a reciprocal gesture in order to get back 
two of the presumed killers of Kazem Rajavi. The arrest of 
Mohzen Sharif Esfahani and Ahmed Taheri on 17 November 1992 in 
Paris was the fruit of a long and patient inquiry undertaken by 
the Vaud judge, Roland Chatelain, who also handled the Bakhtiar 
case. Despite the objection by the Iranian authorities in 
response to the repeated demarches, the judge never relaxed his 
grip. "What I am interested in," he explained, "is arresting 
all the killers, because I cannot allow Switzerland to be used 
with impunity for settling political matters in this way." 
  Since the beginning of the inquiry, judge Chatelain has 
pointed out that "one or more Iranian departments are directly 
involved in the murder of Kazem Rajavi." His investigation also 
allowed him to notice that in cases where Iranian opposition 
members are murdered, there are "common parameters" and 
"meticulous preparation." 
  The day after the arrest in Paris of the two Iranians 
suspected of killing Kazem Rajavi, the Swiss authorities used 
two arrest warrants issued by the Vaud judge as a basis for 
submitting a formal request for extradition to France. Last 10 
February, the Paris Court of Appeal, approved the request. On 
18 November, Switzerland was officially informed that the French 
government had approved the extradition. 
  On 3 December, during a visit to Switzerland by Francois 
Mitterrand, the matter was not even raised since it was 
manifestly clear to the Swiss Government that the extradition of 
the two Iranians was imminent. So, while everything had been 
set in place to receive the two suspects, sources in Bern said, 
on Wednesday [29 December] the Embassy in Paris was informed 
that they would not be handed over to Switzerland -- before 
learning the next day that they had already returned to Iran. 
  Caught unaware, Switzerland could only express its 
disappointment. "This incident does not mean that the excellent 
relations with France will be called into question," Mr. 
Schneeberger said nevertheless. "Due to the lack of an 
authority of recourse from the diplomatic point of view, this 
affair is considered closed." Perhaps this conclusion suits 
everyone. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57880 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_n_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Norway </F>
<H3> <TI>   * South Notes Increase in Snow Acidity Levels </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94WN0106Z Oslo AFTENPOSTEN in Norwegian 4 Dec 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94WN0106Z </F>
<F P=104>  Oslo AFTENPOSTEN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Norwegian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Oivind Loraas: "Snow in South Norway Is </F>
Extremely Polluted"] 
  [Text] Grey-black snow has fallen over the southeastern 
part of Norway over the last few days. Pollution from England 
and East Europe has made the snow extremely acidic. 
  Tonsberg--The snow that fell over the southeastern part of 
the country earlier this week was extremely polluted. At the 
regional college at Bo in Telemark the pH value of the 
precipitation measured 3.4. The pH value shows how much acid 
there is in the water. The lower the number, the more acidic the 
water. 
  "We took a sample of the precipitation on Thursday [2 
December], after personally observing how dirty-grey the snow 
was," says teacher Synne Kleiven in the Department of 
Environment Protection at the regional college. 
  "The tests we made show that the pH value of the 
precipitation was 3.4. The normal pH value of precipitation over 
Telemark is 4.4. This means that the snow that fell this week is 
10 times as polluted as normal. In a fishing lake anything alive 
will die long before the water becomes as acidic as the snow was 
this week." 
  Kleiven says the water has been filtered and great 
quantities 
of soot particles have been found. "The filter we used became 
completely grey as we filtered the water," she says. There is a 
layer in the snow almost 2 centimeters thick that is almost 
completely grey. We think this is the snow that fell the night 
before Wednesday. 
  "So far the pollution remains in the snow. The problem 
arises 
when the snow melts in spring. If this happens rapidly water and 
rivers will get an acidic pollution shock that might result in 
the death of fish and great damage to the environment," says 
Kleiven. 
  The National Pollution Inspectorate (NPI) has also received 
reports about the extremely acidic precipitation. 
  "We received the statistics from some 30 measurements 
carried 
out by the Norwegian Institute of Atmospheric Research (NIAR) 
yesterday. The numbers show a concentration of acid that is up 
to five times the normal amount in the precipitation that fell 
this week," Chief Engineer Tor Johannessen of NPI says. 
  "The measurements show a pH value ranging from 3.4 to 3.9 in 
the snow that fell last week. This is far below the normal 
value. The tests also show large concentrations of soot 
particles," says Johannessen. 
  Johannessen says that the acidic precipitation has fallen 
all 
over the southeastern part of the country, from the Agder 
counties to as far north as Osen in Hedmark. 
  "Periods with an extreme amount of acidic precipitation are 
something that we experience from time to time," he says. This 
is no acute crisis, but it might result in a large amount of 
local pollution when the snow melts. It might be especially bad 
if large amounts of acid collects in the snow during the winter. 
  The fact that there is so much soot in the snow indicates 
that the pollution is coming from East Europe where cleaning of 
emissions is quite poor. According to the Meteorological 
Institute the precipitation of the last few days has come from 
both the southeast and the southwest. This means that large 
amounts of pollutants have come down over Norway from both East 
Europe and England during the last days. 
<H5>  [Box, p 3] </H5>
<H5>  This Is Acidic Precipitation </H5>

  -  Acidic precipitation is polluted snow or rain. It is first 
and foremost sulphur that pollutes, but there can also be large 
amounts of soot particles in the acidic precipitation. 
  -  The 
pollution is coming from heat-generating stations and industries 
that use oil or coal as a source of energy. Sulphur is released 
into the air and then comes back down as sulfuric acid along 
with the precipitation. 
  -  England, Germany, Russia, and the other 
countries in East Europe are the greatest users of coal and 
oil. 
  -  The Agder counties and Telemark in particular have been hit 
by acidic precipitation, but such pollution has been registered 
as far north as Sogn and Fjordane. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57881 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_n_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Sweden </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Minister Urges `Firm' Approach With Russia </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0401172694 Stockholm SVENSKA DAGBLADET in Swedish 29 Dec 
94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> PM0401172694 </F>
<F P=104>  Stockholm SVENSKA DAGBLADET </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Swedish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Foreign Minister Margaretha af Ugglas under the </F>
"Focus" rubric: "Russia Needs More Support And Cooperation"] 
  [Text] The successes for the extreme nationalist forces in 
the Russian elections have given rise to great and justified 
concern in the rest of the world, even if the distribution of 
seats has gradually shifted in a more positive direction for the 
reformist parties. 
  At the same time it is also too early to draw any firm 
conclusions from what has happened. We would be wise to wait 
and see what future developments bring, and above all give 
consideration to how we can best maintain and strengthen our 
support for democratic developments. 
  The conclusion which in my view should be drawn from the 
election result is that Russia needs more, not less contacts and 
cooperation with the West. 
  The transformation of Russia is a protracted process. We 
surely have every reason to expect several years of uncertainty. 
The election result COULD be a step in the direction of a 
destructive policy for Russia itself and also, in a worst-case 
scenario, for the rest of the world. But it can also be 
interpreted as one of a series of sudden lurches, inevitable in 
the phase of transformation in which Russia finds itself. 
  Russia's development toward democracy is uncertain and can 
hardly be expected to be a linear process. In the future too 
the situation is bound to be unstable and contain contradictory 
tendencies. 
  The Russian scene is neither black nor white, but 
increasingly gray. The distance between what is economically 
necessary and what is politically possible will remain great -- 
something that prepares the ground for tensions. Developments 
would not have been smoother even if the reform-oriented parties 
had had a better election. 
  However, we should remember that there is a possibility for 
President Yeltsin to continue the policies of reform by building 
coalitions in parliament on important issues. It is the duty of 
the democratic parties in the Duma to make special efforts so 
that this first free parliament since 1917 can be made to play a 
constructive role. The rest of the world also has a 
responsibility to develop contacts with the new parliament to 
the greatest possible extent. 
  Among the glimmers of light -- for these do nevertheless 
exist -- is the fact that Russia has by and large succeeded in 
holding completely democratic elections. Despite the election 
result, for the time being at least there are no persuasive 
signs that support for fascism is widespread, either in public 
opinion or in the Russian establishment. 
  It should also be noted that the reformist parties have 
achieved good result in many places, not least in Moscow and St. 
Petersburg. 
  It is also important to note that economic factors and 
limitations will be of will be of great significance for the 
direction Russian politics will take in the coming years. Here 
every government faces the same limitations, even in the event 
of a line of developments in which antidemocratic forces have a 
decisive influence on politics. 
  Thus the next Russian government -- just like the government 
which began the work of reform in 1992 -- will have limited room 
for maneuver. The reason is the same now as it was then: The 
Russian economy is seriously out of balance and at the same time 
undergoing a far-reaching transformation. The rate of inflation 
is still high but under control, after previously being close to 
the level of hyperinflation. A relapse is by no means out of 
the question. 
  Thus even in the short term there is not much room for 
maneuver. This is a result of the way in which the economy, the 
state edifice, and the relationship between the center and the 
periphery are linked in today's Russia. There is no easy way 
out in the shape of a return to the old system of the command 
economy. 
  For political and social reasons compromises vis-a-vis what 
is economically necessary have been inevitable and will remain 
so, but this balancing act is a precarious one. 
  A significant budget deficit and high inflation are probably 
unavoidable in any event. However, there is a limit beyond 
which the continued subsidization of old-fashioned industry and 
other major items of expenditure run the risk of leading 
developments along a Ukrainian path. 
  Both in Russian and in the rest of the world there exists 
the 
idea that it is the economic reforms which are responsible for 
the difficulties which have hit Russia. But this is to ignore 
the fact that these difficulties date chiefly from 70 years of 
ruthless exploitation and deformed modernity, and the absence in 
the historic legacy of a thoroughgoing tradition of development. 
  Added to this are the collapse of Comecon and the Union with 
the accompanying disruption to trade and the division of labor 
and, not least, the financing of major deficits and credits 
through the printing of money The reforms are an attempt to 
find a way out of the sum of these difficulties. 
  Many observers inside and outside Russia seem to think that 
the central bank's printing of money has been part of the 
so-called shock therapy, when macroeconomic stabilization should 
in fact be one of its cornerstones. The problem with the 
reforms so far is not that they have been too far-reaching, but 
that it has been impossible to pursue them consistently enough. 
  The concern that has followed in the wake of the election 
result is justified. We in Sweden must follow developments with 
a watchful eye. The alarmed reaction in Sweden and 
internationally must not, however, be allowed to obscure the 
fact that the main thrust of Swedish policy is the same as 
before the elections -- namely, to support as far as is possible 
the democratic and reform-oriented forces in our neighbor to the 
east. 
  The work to incorporate Russia into the broader European 
community, with all that this means in the way of reciprocal 
efforts and undertakings, must continue. On this point our 
policy will bear the mark of continuity. In particular our 
contacts with those parts of Russia in our immediate environs 
must be deepened and developed further. 
  The conclusion we should draw from the election result is, 
as 
I have already said, that Russia needs more, not less support 
and cooperation. It is now more important than ever before not 
to create an impression of wanting to exclude Russia from the 
rest of Europe. 
  At the same time we must remain firm on the demand that 
Russia must respect agreements entered into and commitments 
made, just as it must respect the generally accepted principles 
which are the foundation of ties between states. The 
surrounding world should continue to be firm but constructive in 
its dealings with the new Russia. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57882 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_o_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> CYPRUS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Spokesman Calls Turkish Reports on Shooting Unfounded </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0401123894 Nicosia Cyprus Broadcasting Corporation Radio 
Network in Greek 1130 GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> NC0401123894 </F>
<F P=104>  Nicosia Cyprus Broadcasting Corporation Radio 
Network </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Greek </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Government spokesman Ioannis Kasoulidhis rejected as 
entirely unfounded Turkish allegations that shots were fired on 
the confrontation line. Mr. Kasoulidhis said that these 
allegations, which have not been confirmed by the UNFICYP [UN 
Forces in Cyprus], are aimed at creating tension and are not 
irrelevant with statements by Turkish officials against Greece 
on allegedly intransigent positions. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57883 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_o_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> CYPRUS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Atun Reacts to Kliridhis Proposals, Border Incidents </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  TA0401145194 Nicosia Bayrak Radio in Turkish 1130 GMT 4 Jan 
94 </F>

<F P=103> TA0401145194 </F>
<F P=104>  Nicosia Bayrak Radio </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Turkish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Prime Minister Hakki Atun has declared that if 
Glavkos Kliridhis, Greek Cypriot Administration leader, 
sincerely wants to solve the Cyprus problem, then he should 
immediately put an end to armament activities, border 
provocations, the hostile policy pursued in the international 
arena, and the embargoes. Kliridhis must also accept the 
proposal repeatedly put forward by the Turkish Republic of 
Northern Cyprus [TRNC] for signing a nonaggression treaty, Atun 
added. 
  Atun issued a written statement regarding the 
demilitarization proposal -- which Kliridhis will reportedly 
submit to the NATO summit meeting -- as well as the recent 
shooting incidents against Turkish Cypriot positions. Atun 
remarked that this attitude is aimed at turning the Cyprus 
problem, which is an intercommunal issue, into an international 
one. He described Kliridhis' proposal as a stale tactic 
designed to eliminate the guarantee and alliance agreements, 
apply international pressure on motherland Turkey, and undermine 
the intercommunal negotiating process. 
  Atun stressed that the fact that the Cyprus issue is not an 
international problem and that it is an intercommunal problem 
between the two communities on the island and not one between 
Turkey and Cyprus as claimed by the Greek Cypriot side, has been 
acknowledged by the United Nations and confirmed in the summit 
agreements. The prime minister underlined that Turkey is not an 
occupation force as charged by Kliridhis, but a guarantor state, 
that instituted peace by preventing the attempts to achieve 
enosis on the part of the Greek-Greek Cypriot pair, which 
destroyed the legitimate order, occupied the Cyprus Republic 
through the use of force, and massacred the Turkish Cypriot 
people. 
  Atun stated that if Kliridhis is sincere in his quest for a 
solution, then he must accept these facts and stop his efforts 
to stage cheap shows, to further complicate the issue by 
dragging it into the international arena, and to hinder the 
basis for negotiations. 
  Strongly protesting the shooting incidents against Turkish 
Cypriot fighters yesterday, Atun announced that the TRNC 
Government will adopt the necessary measures against these 
senseless provocations aimed at disrupting the peace, which has 
prevailed on the island for 20 years, within the framework of 
its right to legitimate defense. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57884 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_o_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> CYPRUS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Mikhailidhis: Proposals Not To Replace Confidence Moves </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0301123094 Nicosia Cyprus Broadcasting Corporation Radio 
Network in Greek 1130 GMT 3 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> NC0301123094 </F>
<F P=104>  Nicosia Cyprus Broadcasting Corporation Radio 
Network </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Greek </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Foreign Minister Alekos Mikhailidhis said President 
Glavkos Kliridhis' proposals for disarmament, dissolution of the 
military forces, and withdrawal of the occupation troops have 
received favorable comment. No one has suggested they should 
not be promoted. 
  Asked about his statement [broadcast] by CyBC [the Cyprus 
Broadcasting Corporation], Mikhailidhis said the proposals do 
not aim to substitute the confidence-building measures or 
represent a way out of the measures the philosophy of which the 
government has accepted. He said the proposals for disarmament 
will not be submitted at the negotiating table but will be 
promoted in international organizations, since the military 
situation is the main reason for the Cyprus issue remaining 
unresolved. 
  Mikhailidhis noted that in May, the Greek Presidency [of the 
EC] is expected to submit the proposal for setting a date to 
begin negotiations for Cyprus' accession to the European Union. 
He said the proposal does not clash with the reexamination of 
Cyprus' accession to the Community in January 1995, since, 
according to the interpretation by the Cypriot Government, 
reexamination will concern the result of the accession talks, 
not the opening of the talks. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57885 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_o_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> CYPRUS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Spokesman Cited on Response to Demilitarization Issue </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0401200494 Nicosia O FILELEVTHEROS in Greek 4 Jan 94 pp 1, 
9 </F>

<F P=103> NC0401200494 </F>
<F P=104>  Nicosia O FILELEVTHEROS </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Greek </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Stavros Angelidhis] </F>
  [Excerpt] There has been no response whatsoever to the 
comprehensive proposal for the complete demilitarization of 
Cyprus that President Glavkos Kliridhis submitted to the UN 
secretary general and the five permanent members of the UN 
Security Council. Responding to a question from correspondents 
yesterday, the government spokesman said the ambassadors who 
received the president's document on 20 December as well as the 
UN officials who received it three days earlier had commented 
favorably but so far there has been neither a written reply nor 
any public statement by the recipients that would even imply 
support for the Kliridhis proposal. 
  The only official position adopted in the meantime was the 
Russian Foreign Ministry statement that called upon the parties 
to cooperate for the implementation of the confidence-building 
measures. Political circles interpreted this statement as 
advice for the Cyprus Government to put aside the idea of 
demilitarization and focus its attention on the realization of 
the confidence-building measures. The same sources also pointed 
out that this is the approach being proposed by all the Security 
Council members. 
  The issue was raised yesterday to government spokesman 
Ioannis Kasoulidhis, who confirmed that the president would be 
sending messages to the leaders of the NATO member countries 
concerning his suggestion for the demilitarization of Cyprus. 
The messages will be sent on the occasion of the alliance's 
summit which will be held on 10 January in Brussels and the 
Cyprus issue will be discussed on the summit's sidelines. It 
has already been announced that President Bill Clinton and UK 
Prime Minister John Major will raise the Cyprus issue at their 
private meetings with Turkish Prime Minister Tansu Ciller. 
  It should be noted that three leading NATO countries--the 
United States, Britain, and France--are also permanent Security 
Council members and received the Kliridhis suggestion 15 days 
ago. However, no letter will be sent to Mrs. Ciller because, as 
Mr. Kasoulidhis explained, Cyprus does not maintain diplomatic 
relations with Turkey. 
  The spokesman was also asked whether the government has 
considered, provided it accepts them, the ways suggested by the 
two groups of experts for the implementation of the 
confidence-building measures or whether it is prepared to 
discuss them. 
  His response was: "We cannot regard the documents submitted 
by the experts as being official or binding on us because the 
experts' report does not deal only with the technoeconomic 
questions, which fall under their jurisdiction, but also tackles 
political arrangements concerning the implementation of the 
confidence- building measures and will be the subject of 
negotiations if the Turkish side also accepts in principle the 
three documents. Official documents are the three documents that 
have been proposed by the UN Secretary General." [passage 
omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57886 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_o_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> CYPRUS </F>
<H3> <TI>   U.S., Russian Ambassadors Comment on Developments </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0401132594 Nicosia Cyprus Broadcasting Corporation Radio 
Network in Greek 1130 GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> NC0401132594 </F>
<F P=104>  Nicosia Cyprus Broadcasting Corporation Radio 
Network </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Greek </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] U.S. Ambassador Richard Boucher said that the United 
States will intensify its efforts to help achieve a Cyprus 
solution this year. Mr. Boucher made this statement upon his 
arrival, with other members of the diplomatic corps, at the 
Presidential Palace where they were received by President 
Glavkos Kliridhis on the occasion of the New Year. Mr. Boucher 
also said that State Department's Coordinator Robert Lamb will 
visit Cyprus, but the time has not been set. 
  When asked by correspondents if he had any statement to 
make, 
British High Commissioner David Dain confined himself to 
expressing good wishes for the New Year. 
  Russian Ambassador to Cyprus Boris Zenkov expressed the wish 
that 1994 will be the last year of Cyprus' division. Asked 
whether Russia intends to appoint an observer to the Cyprus 
issue, he said that his country will wait until the talks begin 
and then consider how it can offer more help. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57887 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_q_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TURKEY </F>
<H3> <TI>   PKK Members Reportedly Train at Camps in Armenia </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0401200694 Istanbul CUMHURIYET in Turkish 27 Dec 93 pp 1, 
15 </F>

<F P=103> NC0401200694 </F>
<F P=104>  Istanbul CUMHURIYET </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Turkish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Gorsel Polat: "PKK Will Attack With ASALA in the </F>
Spring"] 
  [Text] Ankara--It has been reported that the Kurdish 
Workers Party [PKK] members, who train in several camps in 
Armenia, and ASALA [Armenian Secret Army for the Liberation of 
Armenia] militants will carry out joint operations against 
Turkey through Armenia's border in the spring. 
  The General Directorate of Police has compiled a file on 
"PKK 
activities in Armenia." A document in the file notes that the 
PKK established its camps around villages close to Turkey's 
border, villages that are mostly inhabited by Kurdish citizens 
and Armenians who are hostile to the Turkish people. 
  The file indicates that the PKK members are training with 
the 
ASALA militants in al-Biqa' valley in Lebanon and the Zeli camp 
in northern Iraq. Regarding PKK's links with the Armenians, it 
said: 
  1. The terrorist ASALA militants have trained the PKK 
members in the PKK camps in Jordan [as published] and Syria, 
recruited new members for that organization, and supplied arms 
and other required material to them. ASALA continues to support 
the PKK. 
  2. PKK leader Abdullah Ocalan is supported by Armenia and 
ASALA. He personally supervises PKK's links with Armenia. 
Ocalan has established training camps near Armenian villages 
close to Turkey's border. His militants train in those camps at 
the present time. The Armenian Government is aware of PKK 
activities and supports them. PKK training camps are located 
around villages close to Turkey's border, which are mostly 
inhabited by Kurdish citizens and Armenians who are hostile to 
the Turkish people. 
  3. It is believed that the PKK members and ASALA militants, 
who train in those camps, will attack Turkey through Armenia's 
border in the near future (beginning in spring 1994). 
  The file noted that the Armenian Government is aware of the 
support given to the PKK in Armenia. The following Armenian 
villages are listed as having helped the PKK: Mirek, Ria Taza, 
Elegis, Shengavit, Derek, Afsin, Suphan, Chumyshvan, and Senger 
in Aragats district; Baradzh, Hakko, Gelto, Sorik, Kabaktapa, 
Tellik, and Sechanly in Amri Taze, Talin district; Ferik in 
Baysyz Echmiadzin district, and Samiran in Ashtarak district. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57888 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_q_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TURKEY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ankara Reportedly Ready To Receive Iraqi Delegation </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0401221194 Istanbul HURRIYET in Turkish 29 Dec 94 p 20 </F>
<F P=103> NC0401221194 </F>
<F P=104>  Istanbul HURRIYET </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Turkish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Muharrem Sarikaya: "First Official Contact With </F>
Iraq"] 
  [Text] Ankara--The Turkish Grand National Assembly passed 
the government bill on the extension of the Hammer Force mandate 
yesterday. Meanwhile, the government conveyed a message to the 
Baghdad administration informing it that Ankara is prepared to 
receive a delegation from Iraq headed by an under secretary. 
Foreign Minister Hikmet Cetin said: "They have asked for talks 
for a long time. We have responded to their request. The 
matter is not very important. The question of the oil pipeline 
between the two countries will be discussed." 
  According to Foreign Ministry circles, for a long time the 
Baghdad administration had asked Turkey at every opportunity to 
agree to an official visit. However, considering the UN embargo 
on Iraq, Ankara has rejected the request so far. 
<H5>  The Oil in the Pipeline Will Be Withdrawn </H5>
  The Foreign Ministry officials have said that the main topic 
at the talks with the visiting delegation, which will be headed 
by an under secretary, will be the pipeline. They recalled that 
Prime Minister Tansu Ciller convinced the U.S. Administration 
when she visited the United States of the need to withdraw the 
oil in the pipeline between Karkuk and Yumurtalik and said: 
"The only problem on the matter is the question of sharing the 
oil that will be withdrawn from the pipeline. The UN officials 
have proposed that the sides concerned each receive one-third of 
the oil in the pipeline. However, we have proposed that Turkey 
receive 50 percent of that oil. We shall discuss the matter 
with the Baghdad administration. Iraq maintains an approach in 
Turkey's favor. We are trying to convince the UN officials to 
agree. The United States is involved in the matter. Meanwhile, 
the UN secretary general's decision has to be considered. If he 
agrees, then Turkey will receive 50 percent of the oil in the 
pipeline." 
  The officials also said that the developments in northern 
Iraq will be discussed with the visiting delegation. They 
asserted: "We have said at every opportunity that Iraq must not 
be divided. We shall outline our views on the developments in 
northern Iraq and the need for Baghdad's compliance with the UN 
resolutions." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57889 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_q_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TURKEY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Transportation Minister Leaves for Kazakhstan </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  TA0401082494 Ankara Turkiye Radyolari Network in Turkish 
2100 GMT 3 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> TA0401082494 </F>
<F P=104>  Ankara Turkiye Radyolari Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Turkish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Transportation Minister Mehmet Kostepen left for 
Kazakhstan today on an official visit. In a predeparture 
statement at Ankara's Esenboga Airport, Kostepen said his visit 
to Kazakhstan will be extremely useful in raising the level of 
bilateral relations. 
  The two countries will exchange permits governing passenger 
and cargo transportation between Turkey and Kazakhstan, Kostepen 
explained. He expressed the belief that during his visit, 
concrete moves will be undertaken toward the establishment of a 
joint railroad car factory in Kazakhstan, in line with a 
previous agreement. Kostepen noted that Kazakhstan's request to 
purchase railroad cars, as well as ships for internal sea and 
river transportation, from Turkey will also be discussed during 
his visit. He added that the question of nonstop television 
broadcasts will also be raised. The transportation minister's 
visit to Kazakhstan will last three days. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57890 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_q_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TURKEY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Inflation Rate for 1993 Registered at 71.1 Percent </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  TA0401120994 Ankara TRT Television Network in Turkish 1100 
GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> TA0401120994 </F>
<F P=104>  Ankara TRT Television Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Turkish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Announcer-read report over still of Turkish map with </F>
statistical figures] 
  [Text] The inflation rate in 1993 was 71.1 percent. 
During December, prices increased by 3.6 percent. According to 
a statement issued by the State Statistics Institute, the 
consumer price index increased by 71.1 percent and the wholesale 
price index by 60.3 percent in the past year. In December, 
consumer prices rose by 3.6 percent, while wholesale prices 
registered an increase of 2.9 percent. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57891 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_p_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GREECE </F>
<H3> <TI>   EU's Delors, Commissioners Arrive for Talks </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0401194294 Athens Elliniki Radhiofonia Radio Network in 
Greek 1800 GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> NC0401194294 </F>
<F P=104>  Athens Elliniki Radhiofonia Radio Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Greek </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by correspondent Mina Asimakopoulou from Ellinikon </F>
Airport] 
  [Excerpt] Jacques Delores, European Union [EU] Commission 
president, and EU commissioners arrived at Ellinikon Airport a 
short time ago and, without making any statements, left 
immediately for the Grande Bretagne Hotel. Prime Minister 
Andreas Papandreou will host a dinner in Delors' honor. 
Alternate Foreign Minister Theodhoros Pangalos welcomed the EU 
commissioners. 
  Delors and Papandreou will meet tomorrow to discuss the 
general guidelines for implementing the white paper on 
development, employment, competition, and foreign policy issues. 
[passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57892 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_p_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GREECE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Papandreou, Delors Comment </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0401215894 Athens ET-1 Television Network in Greek 1928 
GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> NC0401215894 </F>
<F P=104>  Athens ET-1 Television Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Greek </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Statements by Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou and </F>
European Commission President Jacques Delors at a dinner in the 
Grande Bretagne Hotel in Athens--live; Papandreou speaks in 
Greek followed by French translation; Delors speaks in French 
followed by Greek translation] 
  [Text] [Papandreou] Ladies and Gentlemen Commissioners, we 
are very pleased to welcome you to Greece and with your presence 
inaugurate the third Greek Presidency. I believe this reflects 
the very fruitful cooperation of past Greek Presidencies with 
the European Commission. Together we have solved many problems. 
I will not list them now but I will remind you of the joint 
funds, the term cohesion and its meaning, and the Mediterranean 
programs. These are not the only issues. We have worked 
closely with common goals and we have succeeded. We hope this 
Presidency will develop in the same way. Cooperating closely 
with you, we will proceed to lay another foundation stone in 
building the European Union [EU]. 
  We are assuming the Presidency at a very difficult time for 
the world, Europe in particular. There is major recession and 
we cannot see its end on the horizon, at least not on the near 
horizon. A large part of the workforce is unemployed. There is 
recession and unemployment. We are called upon to deal with 
these problems at a period when economy has become a universal 
problem, when economic borders among states are collapsing fast 
and technology is racing forward. 
  This is why the latest EU summit in Brussels, which approved 
Jacques Delors' white paper, is a great historical step. For 
the first time, employment--apart from the prominent monetary 
and symbolic goals--becomes a primary issue for a united Europe, 
focusing on reducing unemployment and increasing 
competitiveness. Delors' contribution is great, leading us to 
believe that the 1996 intergovernment conference will openly and 
clearly include employment and development in the Maastricht 
Treaty. 
  Indisputably, the two goals--competitiveness and 
employment--are often contradictory. The measures that are 
often adopted to increase competitiveness can harm employment. 
I believe our own effort should focus on improving 
competitiveness without reducing or losing the achievements of 
the working class in Europe. When there is a contradiction, we 
must consider that the workforce alone cannot pay for 
competitiveness. 
  I close my short welcoming statement by saying it is a 
special honor for us to host European Commission President 
Delors, whose contribution to a united Europe's course remains 
decisive. It is with great pleasure that I raise my glass to 
you and your associates and wish you every success. 
  [Delors] Prime Minister, Dignitaries, Ladies and Gentlemen, 
first, allow me to thank you for your most friendly and warm 
welcome to me and my European Commission colleagues. I would 
like to make a friendly statement to the Greek people, who are 
full EU members, never mind what you may read here and there. 
The European structure surely represents a very ambitious plan. 
The European people show many differences and have special 
characteristics. Europe is rich in differences and 
characteristics. Prime Minister, we will cooperate with the 
Greek Presidency and the Greek Government--as we did in the 
past--to serve the goals you have set out. 
  The European structure has reached its 37th year. It is a 
unique attempt to unite sovereign peoples who have chosen this 
road without any of the members being sovereign or in charge and 
is happening at a time that is free of the Cold War's 
limitations or fears. Prime Minister, as you have stressed, 
Europe is going through the worst recession since World War II. 
Along with the other goals of the Maastricht Treaty, Europe 
wants to give the European people the right and the dignity of 
work, the right to employment. The European Commission 
submitted and presented the white paper; no member is forced to 
follow it closely. But the principle of assistance will be 
implemented everywhere. Every member state will implement its 
own rules keeping in mind the principle of assistance. Every 
member state will be based on the strong points and try to 
overcome any weaknesses. So, Prime Minister, I would like to 
thank you and assure you that we will cooperate as effectively 
as possible. 
  The world has changed. The world has moved faster than us. 
But, thanks to recent efforts, we are now in the pleasant 
position of watching the developing countries on the road to 
prosperity. We see the South approaching the North's level of 
prosperity and living conditions. But we must not let this go 
unexploited. We must continue our efforts, because everyone 
must deal with the fear and danger of decay. We must now deal 
with problems caused by refusal to talk and by intolerance. As 
you have very correctly stressed, Prime Minister, this economic 
effort should lead us to new efforts. We must show even more 
courage and anticipation. This spirit must prevail in all our 
efforts. Greece's geopolitical position is particularly useful 
in this. Because of you, Prime Minister, we can become more 
familiar with today's Europe. I raise my glass and thank you 
and Mrs. Papandreou and wish the Greek Presidency every success. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57893 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_p_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GREECE </F>
<H3> <TI>   _o_ Media Notes: Relations With Skopje Discussed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94P20168 </F>
<F P=103> 94P20168 </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
Article   Type:CSO 

  [Editorial Report] Developments in the Balkans have been 
the subject of reporting and commentary in the Greek press. 
<H5>  U.S. Role in Balkans Favored </H5>
  In the 12 December Athens weekly TO VIMA TIS KIRIAKIS, Nikos 
Marakis reports on the views of the Greek Government and the 
opposition regarding the role the United States and the European 
Union (EU) should play in the Balkans. In a departure from past 
policy, Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou now believes that 
Greek interests in the Balkans and elsewhere are served "almost 
exclusively" by a complete harmonization of Greek and U.S. 
foreign policy. This view, Marakis says, is shared by Minister 
of Foreign Affairs Karolos Papoulias and Minister of Defense 
Yerasimos Arsenis. 
  Marakis also writes about the discussion of the issue within 
the opposition New Democracy (ND). Party luminary Andreas 
Andrianopoulos believes that Washington, to establish "control" 
over the southern Balkans, will promote the establishment of a 
new Yugoslav federation under Serbian hegemony including the 
Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia (FYROM). According to 
Marakis, Andrianopoulos worries that aligning Greek policy too 
closely with that of the United States might involve the country 
in a potentially "explosive" contest for influence in the 
Balkans, pitting France and Germany against the United States. 
Another ND luminary, Yeoryios Souflias, argues that Greece 
should follow its natural pro-European orientation and 
simultaneously maintain good relations with the United States, 
Marakis writes. 
  A contrasting view is held by ND official and former 
Minister 
of Defense Ioannis Varvitsiotis who, according to Marakis, 
believes that the U.S. reaction to former Prime Minister 
Konstandinos Mitsotakis' Balkans policy was so negative that 
Washington succeeded in engineering the fall of the Mitsotakis 
government. Varvitsiotis represents an "anti-Atlantic" faction 
in the ND which includes almost all Eurodeputies and deputies 
from areas favored by EU grants, Marakis writes. 
<H5>  FYROM Recognition by European Countries Viewed </H5>
  The decision by six European countries to establish 
diplomatic relations with the FYROM stems from their disdain for 
Greek demands, Thodhoros Rousopoulos writes in the 19 December 
Athens KIRIAKATIKI ELEVTHEROTIPIA. Even Sweden and Finland, 
whose application for European Union membership will be reviewed 
during the Greek EU presidency, were part of this initiative. 
While a Greek veto on membership is unlikely, Rousopoulos cites 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs sources as saying that Greece may 
use delaying tactics to postpone entry of these countries in the 
EU. According to Rousopoulos, however, Greece lacks leverage in 
the EU, and other member countries are likely to grant 
diplomatic recognition to the FYROM. 
<H5>  `Macedonian Struggle' Lost </H5>
  Rikhardhos Someritis writes in the 5 December TO VIMA TIS 
KIRIAKIS that Greece has now lost the "Macedonian struggle." 
Even should the FYROM disintegrate from internal pressures, as 
some Greeks hope, the result would be a resort to extremist 
organizations even more dangerous to Greece and to peace in the 
Balkans, Someritis believes. Probable integration of FYROM 
territory by Bulgaria, Serbia, or Albania would add to regional 
instability. The Greek Government should focus on the huge 
costs of prolonged "Skopje-mania," Someritis warns, noting the 
courageous policy of reconciliation adopted by South Africa, 
Israel and the PLO, and others. Dialogue and honest compromise 
can never be considered "treason," Someritis concludes. 
<H5>  Greek Economic Relations With FYROM </H5>
  Stavros Tzimas reports on economic relations between Greece 
and the FYROM in the 16 December Athens daily TA NEA. A large 
quantity of goods such as aluminum sheeting, mineral ore, 
phosphates, lumber, wheat, and oil transit the Greek port of 
Salonica on the way to Skopje, and about 100 Greek companies 
have been established in the FYROM. Many have ceased operations 
due to the political crisis, but some Greek firms continue their 
activities, Tzimas reports. About a dozen jointly-owned or 
Greek-owned firms are located in the Monastir area and a Greek 
entrepreneur is the majority shareholder of a private bank that 
recently opened in that city. A large Greek clothing company and 
an export-import firm are presently active in Skopje, while a 
food-packaging company is said to be ready to start operations 
again as soon as the crisis ends. 
<H5>  Poll on FYROM </H5>
  A brief article in the 19 December TO VIMA TIS KIRIAKIS 
reports the results of an opinion poll on the "Skopje problem" 
conducted by the MRB organization in Athens and Salonica between 
2 and 12 December with 1,OOO respondents. Opinions were about 
evenly divided between those (4O.1 percent) who said that the 
situation has taken a "negative turn" for Greece since the 
October elections won by PASOK, and those (42.8 percent) who 
said that it has remained "unchanged." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57894 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_p_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GREECE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Eleven Hurt in Blast at NATO Offices, Naval Base </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0401164494 Paris AFP in English 1613 GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> NC0401164494 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris AFP </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Athens, Jan 4 (AFP)--Eleven people were injured in 
an explosion followed by a fire at the Ayia Paraskevi naval base 
near here Tuesday [4 January], police announced. 
  The defense ministry said the blast and fire which was 
rapidly brought under control was caused by a short-circuit in a 
high-tension cable. 
  Investigators earlier suspected a malfunction in an 
underground generator. 
  All those injured had breathing problems and were taken to a 
navy hospital for treatment but only one navy employee was still 
in hospital late Tuesday, said Admiral Khristos Limeris, chief 
of staff of the Greek armed forces. 
  The Ayia Paraskevi base is the general NATO headquarters for 
the eastern Mediterranean. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57895 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003aa_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Lithuanian Request for NATO Admission Confirmed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0401190694 Paris AFP in English 1855 GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> AU0401190694 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris AFP </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Brussels, Jan 4 (AFP) -- NATO confirmed Tuesday [4 
January] that it had received a request for admission from 
Lithuania and said the former Soviet republic's bid would be 
considered "in due course." 
  Although several countries in the old Eastern bloc are 
publicly pressing to join the North Atlantic Treaty 
Organisation, Lithuania was only the second to make a formal 
approach. Albania requested membership last year. 
  A NATO spokesman said the 16-member alliance had received a 
letter from Lithuania. "The letter has been distributed to 
member nations and will be considered by the alliance in due 
course," he said. 
  The issue of NATO membership for East European states has 
become a delicate one, with Russia strongly opposed and Western 
leaders wary of doing anything to upset Moscow's reform 
programmes. 
  NATO sources said Lithuania was likely to be steered towards 
the Partnership for Peace programme of East-West military 
cooperation which the alliance's summit next week is expected to 
adopt. 
  The scheme provides for joint peacekeeping planning, 
training 
and other activities, as well as consultations in times of 
crisis. But it stops short of full membership or outright 
security guarantees. 
  The summit was expected to give a signal separately of 
NATO's 
intention to eventually expand, but without providing a list of 
membership candidates or timetable. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57896 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_b_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> BENELUX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ankara, Brussels Disagree on PKK Incidents </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401151494 Brussels LE SOIR in French 4 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> BR0401151494 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels LE SOIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Agnes Gorissen and Alain Guillaume: "Ankara and </F>
Brussels Split Over Interpretation of Incidents"] 
  [Excerpt] The violent clashes that took place this weekend 
between groups of Turks and Kurds in the Brussels communes of 
Saint-Josse and Schaerbeek have had rapid repercussions. 
  On Monday morning [2 January], the Turkish Government issued 
a communique stating that the Belgian authorities were 
responsible for the incidents. They were responsible firstly 
for allowing Kurdish intellectuals from Bonn -- whom the Turkish 
Government claims are supporters of the separatist Workers Party 
of Kurdistan [PKK] -- to "demonstrate in an area with a large 
Turkish population," and then for "laying the way open for the 
spread of such incidents" by the decision not to ban the PKK in 
Belgium, as has been done in France and Germany. 
  In particular, the Turkish Government was outraged by the 
"inadmissible" statement of Belgian Interior Minister Louis 
Tobback who had "shifted the blame" for these incidents onto the 
Turks. 
  The result was a veritable diplomatic merry-go-round, with 
the charge d'affaires at the Belgian Embassy in Ankara being 
summoned to the Turkish Foreign Ministry while Belgian Foreign 
Minister Willy Claes received the Turkish ambassador before 
speaking directly with his Turkish counterpart, Mr. Hikmet Cetin. 
  According to the semi-official Turkish press agency, 
ANATOLIA, Mr. Cetin again stressed the need to extend the ban on 
the PKK to cover Belgium. The same source claims that Mr. 
Claes, for his part, stated that the demonstrators would be 
"expelled" from Belgium and that Brussels "in no way accepted 
the use of violence," adding that his government "would not 
tolerate terrorism and terrorists." 
  These reported statements were quickly denied by Willy 
Claes, 
who made it known that any possible expulsions could only be 
decided on in agreement with the other government departments. 
This statement was in line with the moderate tone taken 
yesterday afternoon by the foreign minister when he received -- 
another sign -- a delegation from the Union for the Protection 
of the Kurdish Culture [YRWK], which had organized Saturday's 
meeting. 
  According to the Foreign Ministry communique, "the 
delegation 
informed the minister of the Kurdish people's hopes for the 
recognition of its identity." In response, Mr. Claes "expressed 
his understanding for the Kurdish problem but condemned the use 
of force as a way of fighting political battles." The minister 
added that "Belgium, with its tradition of hospitality for 
political refugees," nevertheless refused "to become the stage 
for violent confrontation between foreign groups." 
  This Belgian-Turkish incident comes precisely at the time 
when Ankara has launched a major campaign to neutralize the PKK. 
This campaign operates at every level: Observers say that 
there is pressure on "friendly countries" and NATO allies -- and 
the Turkish Government will not fail to stress the useful 
geostrategic position of Turkey and the barrier it provides 
against the Islamic regimes. 
  There are also diplomatic moves afoot in Syria, Lebanon, and 
Iran to obtain assurances from these countries that they will 
cease backing the PKK. Only Monday, the Turkish daily newspaper 
HURRIYET reported that the Turkish Prime Minister Mrs. Ciller 
intended using the NATO summit to be held in Brussels on 10 
January as an opportunity to ask President Clinton to put 
pressure on Damascus during his meeting with President al-Asad. 
  The PKK rebellion has cost Turkey dearly -- $7.5 billion 
last 
year -- not to mention the cost in lives for the Turkish Army, 
the PKK fighters, and the civilian population. The ANATOLIA 
agency claims that 21 people, civilians and rebels, have been 
killed since 1 January in the Anatolian southeast, although 
these official figures should not be considered definitive. 
[passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57897 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_e_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> UNITED KINGDOM </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sudan's Ambassador on Expulsion, Bilateral Relations </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501112294 London ITV Television Network in English 1900 
GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> LD0501112294 </F>
<F P=104>  London ITV Television Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Sudanese Ambassador to Britain 'Ali Muhammad </F>
'Uthman Yasin by Jon Snow; Snow in London, Yasin in New York; 
from the Channel 4 newscast -- live] 
  [Text] [Snow] Ambassador, the British foreign secretary 
said that your expulsion represents the end of the episode, is 
he right? 
  [Yasin] Well, I'm happy about this, when the minister says 
so, because this will stop any further deterioration of 
relations between Sudan and Great Britain and everybody knows, 
you know, the relationship is an old one and is a strong one. 
We don't want the relationship to be affected by diplomats 
being expelled here and there. It is a heritage and legacy of 
long relationship, so I'm really happy that the gist of the 
minister's speech will curb any further deterioration of 
relations between my country and the United Kingdom. 
  [Snow] On the other hand, you must be unhappy that it needs 
the expulsion of yourself and your British counterpart in the 
first place. 
  [Yasin] Well I'm really sad for being expelled from the 
United Kingdom because of the retaliation to what has been done 
by my government, but it is known in international practice in a 
situation like this, but I thought the British Government would 
have thought otherwise by substituting Peter Streams with 
somebody else. 
  [Snow] Let's get to the nub of this, because Peter Streams 
is 
accused of basically having hammered the human rights issue, 
which very many people feel very strongly about. Not just 
Britain but many other Western nations in particular, have 
voiced their concerns, and surely that, at the end of it, has 
made him an unpopular ambassador with you? 
  [Yasin] Well, in fact he was stressing human rights issues, 
but he was very much exaggerating on issues which were only 
based on heresay. You know, he doesn't have direct evidence to 
condemn my government. He was just a good and observant 
listener of people from the opposition and he was making 
prejudgments in cases which could not be proved. 
  [Snow] Well, he was hardly a lone voice. The Amnesty 
International has a list of cases of grave concern in Sudan and 
of course the civil war itself is thrown up the most awful 
realities of human rights abuse. 
  [Yasin] Well, I must tell you maybe some people are 
exceeding 
the polls here or there but it was under absolute control of my 
government, and my government has opened the doors and all the 
avenues for any person from outside to see for himself, and the 
archbishop has been given the opportunity to see for himself the 
tolerance and freedom for everybody to worship whatever religion 
he chooses. The situation in Sudan is, we are not hiding 
anything. 
  [Snow] Is there now a sense of regret that the Islamic 
fundamentalism practices that the government indulged in up 
until the last year or two have perhaps gone too far? 
  [Yasin] Well, I can't see any sort of fundamentalist 
practices that would be reproached or blamed in Sudan; it is 
just an allegation. Sudan is living in a very civilized 
situation now. We are far better than any other country in the 
continent of Africa or even the Middle East. If you can name 
any country better than the Sudan now, I will admit to what you 
have said. 
  [Snow] Ambassador, on that note, thank you very much. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57898 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_i_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Balladur Condemns `Doublespeak' of Bosnia Factions </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501121794 Paris France-3 Television Network in French 
2130 GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> LD0501121794 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris France-3 Television Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Prime Minister Edouard Balladur by </F>
correspondent Ockrent -- live] 
  [Excerpt] [Passage omitted] [Balladur] [Passage indistinct] 
UN service to [word indistinct] maintain peace in Bosnia. 
Unfortunately, this is no longer what the UN mission is about, 
but to keep the civilian populations from suffering too much, 
and to facilitate humanitarian aid. What one can see is that 
there is doublespeak in a way, and that the warring factions, 
whether Serbs, Croats, or even Muslims, all three behave the 
same way. They talk about peace and agreements when they are in 
Geneva, and when they are in Bosnia -- and I do not know whether 
they are the same ones, because I do not really know how they 
are organized -- they jeopardize the transport of humanitarian 
aid and the safety of UN soldiers. 
  I believe that the time has come to put the following 
question to them: What is happening, and when do you say what 
you really believe -- when you are in Geneva, where you discuss 
with the UN and EU representatives, or when you are on the 
ground, where you jeopardize the safety of UN soldiers, 
including the French soldiers who are the most numerous and who 
defend civilians? 
  [Ockrent] Could this question be put formally at the next 
NATO summit, which is due to take place in Brussels next Monday 
and Tuesday [10-11 January]? 
  [Balladur] As far as I know, it is not on the agenda, but I 
would be surprised if the question was not raised. [passage 
omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57899 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_j_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ITALY &amp; VATICAN CITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Segni Urges Ciampi To Clarify Position </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401150494 Milan IL GIORNALE in Italian 3 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> BR0401150494 </F>
<F P=104>  Milan IL GIORNALE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Italian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with National Rebirth Pact leader Mario Segni, by </F>
Federico Guiglia; place and date not given: "`Ciampi Must Say 
Whether He Supports Democratic Party of the Left'"] 
  [Text] Rome -- On the eve of the presentation of his 
"Pact," Mariotto Segni issued a challenge to [Prime Minister] 
Ciampi and [Democratic Party of the Left (PDS) Secretary] 
Occhetto: "The prime minister must stop acting as the PDS' 
candidate to the premiership," Segni said in this interview with 
IL GIORNALE. "Occhetto? We will never form an alliance with 
him, neither before nor after the coming elections." 
  [Guiglia] According to a recent opinion poll, businessmen 
have more confidence in the "Pact" than in Occhetto's 
progressive alignment. Do you consider that a confirmation or a 
surprise? 
  [Segni] I consider it extraordinary that a mere month after 
its establishment almost one-third of the businessmen 
interviewed name the Pact as their favorite electoral grouping. 
But it does not surprise me: The much vaunted and presumed 
support from industrialists for the PDS is absolute nonsense, 
fabricated by a few journalists and promptly publicized by 
Occhetto's party. In any case, you do not need opinion polls to 
see that the whole of Italy's industrial sector identifies by a 
large majority with the liberal-democratic alignment. 
  [Guiglia] But industrialists would prefer Ciampi to Segni as 
prime minister. How do you explain that? 
  [Segni] Ciampi deserves confidence, and this is obviously a 
possible result when an opinion survey is carried out in the 
financial and business environment -- that is, the very 
environment from which the former governor of the Bank of Italy 
himself came. However, leaving surveys and forecasts aside, the 
time has come to make things clear. For several weeks Ciampi 
has been presented as the ideal candidate of the PDS and the 
Democratic Alliance for the premiership. Hitherto the prime 
minister has said nothing about this suggestion, thus giving the 
impression that he might accept it and effectively playing into 
Occhetto's hands. But a prime minister that is the result of a 
majority different from that envisaged by Occhetto and that has 
a duty to remain impartial cannot remain silent. Before the 12 
January parliamentary debate Ciampi has a duty to clarify 
whether he considers himself the candidate of the front headed 
by the PDS. And whether he considers his own political position 
compatible with that of the left-wing alliance. His silence on 
this point is no longer acceptable: It would be tantamount to 
believing that Ciampi has become Occhetto's "shadow candidate." 
A reply from the prime minister is crucial to the imminent 
parliamentary debate and the subsequent election campaign. 
  [Guiglia] Actually Ciampi has already said that he does not 
want to stand as a candidate. Why is it so important that he 
repeat it? 
  [Segni] Just a moment: Ciampi stressed that he does not want 
to stand as a parliamentary candidate, but he did not say that 
he does not want to be put forward as prime minister by one or 
another of the fronts. I would add that this clarification is 
essential for one simple reason: A possible "yes" to the PDS 
would bring about an unacceptable situation, because a prime 
minister brought in by a particular majority would become the 
candidate of the opposite font. I do not believe that Ciampi 
accepts this possibility. But he must say so. 
  [Guiglia] One clarification deserves another: Who will 
guarantee that your "Pact" will remain an alternative to the PDS 
not only before the elections, but afterwards too? 
  [Segni] I guarantee it, and we all guarantee it 
unequivocally 
in the very manifesto of the Pact, which was created as an 
alternative to the PDS and not in order to help Occhetto or with 
a view to governing with him. If we are victorious, we will 
govern. Otherwise we will engage in opposition and plan for a 
victory in the next elections. The Pact is the only national 
force that represents an alternative to the PDS. 
  [Guiglia] Why is it that the PDS can ally with Communist 
Renaissance but the "Center" cannot do the same with the MSI 
[Italian Social Movement], which is in any case evolving into 
the National Alliance? 
  [Segni] Because we are responsible, and the PDS is not. The 
first-past-the-post electoral law is not enough to make profound 
political and ideological differences disappear by magic. It is 
up to Occhetto to explain why his alliance with Communist 
Renaissance is supposedly modern and progressive and in what way 
he and [Communist Renaissance Chairman] Cossutta differ from the 
old PCI [Italian Communist Party]. I urge the friends of the 
Democratic Alliance to remember the inalienable principle -- no 
agreements with Communist Renaissance. Will they at least have 
the courage to break away? I hope that they will realize that 
the only reformist and liberal-democratic reality is that of the 
Pact. 
  [Guiglia] But even the Pact is not immune from 
contradictions. You are in favor of national unity, but in 
Friuli you have "opened up" to the League. The League's Maroni 
has said that "an alliance is possible" with Segni. Is this a 
turnabout? 
  [Segni] No, it is no turnabout. Perhaps some representatives 
of the Northern League are beginning to realize that their most 
extreme political stances are untenable. I hope that this will 
be understood first and foremost by the voters. 
  [Guiglia] [Christian Democratic Party (DC) Secretary] 
Martinazzoli, Segni, [MSI Secretary] Fini, and [Northern League 
leader] Bossi say: Berlusconi can talk about politics, but it 
is better for him not to engage in politics personally. Are you 
afraid that "Rooting for Italy" could win over copious support 
from your moderate voters? 
  [Segni] Frankly, no, I do not fear any problems of 
"competition," so to speak. I think that he can do a great deal 
for the liberal-democratic front -- but only if he keeps out of 
the arena. However, if he decides to become personally 
involved, he will ultimately increase the fragmentation. 
  [Guiglia] Now that you are no longer a Christian Democrat, 
tell me honestly: Do you have the feeling of founding, as 
Martinazzoli is doing, a "People's Party" at the very time when 
the electoral law is prompting Catholics to divide between the 
progressive and moderate fronts? 
  [Segni] I have always maintained that the presence of 
organized Catholics is essential. This presence will largely be 
oriented, almost automatically, toward the liberal-democratic 
area. The People's Party makes full sense within the broader 
alliance of the Pact. 
  [Guiglia] Can President Scalfaro stay on after the elections 
or would it be better to replace the last figurehead of the 
First Republic? 
  [Segni] According to the Constitution, the chief of state 
remains in office for seven years. I am in favor of full 
observance of our Constitution. 
  [Guiglia] You have criticized Ciampi's latest economic 
package. Do you really think that the economic policy pursued by 
the prime minister could some day coincide with that advocated 
by Occhetto? 
  [Segni] As governor of the Bank of Italy, Ciampi did a great 
service to the national economy -- apart, perhaps, from his 
desperate defense of the exchange rate in autumn 1992, which 
cost us a huge amount of currency. His international prestige 
has facilitated the recovery of Italy's credibility. But there 
are several points to be made about economic policy. First, we 
must not forget that the government that had the courage to 
reverse the trend toward the explosion of the public deficit was 
Amato's, which made sharp cuts, thus risking unpopularity. 
Ciampi could, and should, have continued along this path, 
reducing public spending. Has he done so? Frankly, not enough. 
The Finance Bill was presented to us in this light. But here 
we have another package worth 7 trillion lire and the 
announcement of another financial package after the elections, 
despite the reduction of interest rates. Clearly the promised 
reduction of expenditure has not happened, as confirmed by the 
interventions to salvage RAI [Italian State Broadcasting 
Corporation] and the administrative bodies of the government 
holding agencies. It is difficult to know to what extent this 
was the result of objective difficulties or of a decision in 
favor of a soft Finance Bill that could win Occhetto's approval. 
The Pact's philosophy is the opposite of this: The constraint 
on reducing public spending is that taxes must not increase by a 
single lira. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57900 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_k_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> PORTUGAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Barroso Wants Stronger Ties With U.S., Mozambique </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0401140494 Lisbon Radio Renascenca in Portuguese to Europe 
1130 GMT 4 Jan 93 </F>

<F P=103> LD0401140494 </F>
<F P=104>  Lisbon Radio Renascenca </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Portuguese </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Angola was one of the topics broached by Foreign 
Minister Durao Barroso during an appraisal of Portuguese foreign 
policy in 1993 and its outlook for 1994. The foreign minister 
expressed an intention to strengthen cooperation with Mozambique 
and to review Portugal's relations with the United States. 
Sofia Vieira reports: 
  [Vieira] According to the minister, the main foreign policy 
objectives for 1994 are to strengthen diplomatic relations with 
the United States of America and to strengthen cooperation with 
Mozambique. During his appraisal of Portugal's role in the 
international scene in 1993, Durao Barroso hinted that Lisbon 
had enjoyed diplomatic success. The foreign minister recalled 
Portugal's work in the European Union, with strong positions in 
the Uruguay Round, namely regarding the textile sector and in 
the debate concerning the reform of the Twelve's institutions 
and in securing further structural funds for Portugal until 1999. 
  Durao Barroso also spoke of East Timor and Angola. Last year 
every effort was made to conduct successfully the difficult 
negotiations underway. For this year the minister promised that 
Portugal will be even more committed to these issues, always 
based on the main guidelines governing Portuguese foreign policy. 
  [Begin Barroso recording] A deepening of our expertise in 
certain specific areas, of which the Portuguese-speaking 
countries are a good example; strengthening this position before 
our Community partners and others; the importance of the 
transatlantic relationship, bearing in mind the opportunities 
for cooperation opened to us in the context of the post-cold-war 
era; a greater and better use of the mechanisms to which we can 
resort on a multilateral basis, in areas such as promoting 
respect for human rights; the promotion abroad of Portuguese 
culture and language, and through that the country's image which 
we project beyond our borders. [end recording] 
  [Vieira] In today's address, Durao Barroso also informed the 
heads of missions and top-ranking Foreign Ministry officials of 
the choice of Ambassador Antonio Monteiro for the post of 
foreign policy director general. This is one of the posts which 
emerges as a result of the restructuring of the Foreign 
Ministry. The name of Antonio Monteiro, Portugal's former 
representative in the Angolan peace process, still has to be 
approved by the president of the republic. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57901 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_n_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Finland </F>
<H3> <TI>   * Humanitarian Aid Package for Bosnia Approved </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94P20188A Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT in Finnish 23 Dec 93 p 9 </F>
<F P=103> 94P20188A </F>
<F P=104>  Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Finnish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Finnish News Service report: "Forty Million Markkas in </F>
Humanitarian Aid From Finland to Bosnia"] 
  [Text] Finland has granted 40 million markkas in 
humanitarian assistance to Bosnia-Herzegovina. The aid will be 
handled through the Foreign Ministry's Development Aid Section. 
  "Planning for distribution of the aid will start in January. 
The aid will partly consist of goods, partly personnel, and 
partly as direct support," said Humanitarian Aid Section Chief 
Ritva Jolkkonen. 
  Needs for the aid will be discussed with international 
relief 
agencies. This year aid has gone through the UNHCR (United 
Nations Office of the High Commissioner for Refugees), the 
International Red Cross, and the World Health Organization (WHO). 
<H5>  Partly Goods, Partly Money </H5>
  Part of the aid will go as goods, part as money, since at 
its 
destination money is needed for purchasing fuel, etc. The aid 
sent through WHO will be in the form of medical equipment and 
such items as artificial limbs. Finnish experts can also be sent 
to Bosnia-Herzegovina with the aid money. "The intention is to 
act now in anticipation of winter needs," Jolkkonen stated. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57902 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_q_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TURKEY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Cetin Warns Against PKK Incidents in Europe </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  TA0401181094 Ankara TRT Television Network in Turkish 1700 
GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> TA0401181094 </F>
<F P=104>  Ankara TRT Television Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Turkish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Announcer-read report over video] </F>
  [Text] Foreign Minister Hikmet Cetin has said that the 
incidents in Belgium show us the proportions that such incidents 
might attain in the event the separatist terror organization is 
not banned in the other European countries as well. 
  Cetin was replying to an off agenda speech delivered by Baki 
Durmaz, True Path Party deputy from Afyon, at the Turkish Grand 
National Assembly that met under Yasin Hatipoglu today. He said: 
  [Begin Cetin recording] While our workers employed in Europe 
are deprived of the right of free movement, certain countries 
grant the right of free circulation to terror organizations. 
This stand, of course, has begun to disrupt the public order in 
the countries concerned. Some 200 militants arriving from 
Germany caused the recent incidents in Brussels. Following 
these incidents, the Foreign Ministry has taken all the 
necessary steps, be they at headquarters or in Brussels, and has 
shown the necessary reaction and interest. In a bid to contain 
the incidents, all the personnel at our embassy and our 
consulate general as well as all the religious personnel and 
teachers in the region have tried to soften and ease the 
situation. Certain Belgian press organs or officials are trying 
to give the impression that the incidents occurred between 
ethnic groups. The issue is not a Turkish-Kurdish clash. The 
issue is not a clash among our citizens. It is an incident that 
occurred between a terror organization and our citizens. [end 
recording] 
  Referring to the phone conversation he held with the Belgian 
foreign minister yesterday, Cetin recalled that he told the 
minister that if measures are not taken the incidents might 
spread to other European cities as well. He added that the 
issue will be brought up again at the NATO member countries 
meeting to be held on Sunday [9 January]. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57903 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003_p_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GREECE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Pangalos: Bosnia `Top Priority' of EU Presidency </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0401140994 Athens Elliniki Radhiofonia Radio Network in 
Greek 1230 GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> NC0401140994 </F>
<F P=104>  Athens Elliniki Radhiofonia Radio Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Greek </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Theodhoros Pangalos, alternate foreign minister in 
charge of European affairs, told the French paper QUEST-FRANCE 
that the settlement of the Bosnian crisis is a top priority for 
Greece in its capacity as president of the European Union [EU]. 
Mr. Pangalos said that we must resolve this problem before the 
spring or else the belligerent sides will embark on new war 
operations. He also noted: The military commanders are now 
prevented by the unfavorable weather conditions; we must exploit 
this fact and put an end to the war. 
  In his interview, the Greek minister points out that we are 
dedicated to the idea of inter-Balkan cooperation in the 
resolving of clashes. Mr. Pangalos added: However, the 
presidency would not do what Greece would like to do. He 
stressed: The presidency is not the departure point for Greek 
foreign policy, we will not make this mistake. 
  Mr. Pangalos also made it clear that the Greek Government 
will not use the presidency to upset the recognition of the 
republic of Skopje by most of the European countries. He said: 
This is not a EU problem. Mr. Pangalos pointed out that the 
hasty recognition of the former Yugoslav republics brought on 
the bloodshed in the Balkans. He stressed: If we had not 
recognized Bosnia, the massacre, or at least part of it, would 
have been avoided. 
  In conclusion, Theodhoros Pangalos stressed that we must 
avoid confrontations could develo into armed clashes. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57904 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_h_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kinkel To Meet Silajdzic, Owen, Stoltenberg </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0601100294 Berlin DDP/ADN in German 0933 GMT 6 Jan 93 </F>
<F P=103> LD0601100294 </F>
<F P=104>  Berlin DDP/ADN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Bonn (DDP/ADN) -- German Foreign Minister Klaus 
Kinkel will meet Bosnian Prime Minister Haris Silajdzic in Bonn 
later today. The German Foreign Ministry said in Bonn that 
after the meeting, Kinkel will hold talks with Lord Owen and 
Thorvald Stoltenberg, the two cochairmen of the Geneva 
conference on Yugoslavia. The meetings will focus on efforts 
aimed at ending the conflict in Bosnia-Herzegovina. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57905 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_h_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Turkes' Group To Attack Kurdish `Mafia' in Europe </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0501211394 Istanbul AYDINLIK in Turkish 30 Dec 93 p 11 </F>
<F P=103> NC0501211394 </F>
<F P=104>  Istanbul AYDINLIK </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Turkish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Mehmet Salih Ceviker] </F>
  [Text] Frankfurt -- There are indications that the Idealist 
[Turkish right-wing organization affiliated with the Grey Wolves 
of Alparslan Turkes] mafia in Germany is getting ready to attack 
the Kurdish mafia. 
  A source that once was a member of MHP's [National Movement 
Party] European organization said that the attacks will be 
"directed against prominent Kurds in the narcotics business." 
The attacks are being organized from Germany. 
  There are indications that Kurdish businessmen who have 
considerable control over the narcotics business in Frankfurt 
are the primary targets. It was also reported that operations 
are also planned against the Kurdish businessmen and PKK 
[Kurdish Workers Party] leaders in other cities. 
  It is being said that MHP leader Alparslan Turkes has moved 
to activate the Turkish Federation, which is MHP's side 
organization in Europe. It is being said that Turkes has issued 
the following instruction: "We started the operation in Turkey. 
Now, it is time to act in Europe. We will definitely go into 
action." 
  The Turkish Federation has been rapidly losing ground in 
recent years. The grass roots of the Turkish Federation have 
been to a great extent taken over and organized by other extreme 
right-wing organizations. There are indications that "dergahs" 
[courts] organized abroad by a team operating under Muhsin 
Yazicioglu, leader of Grand Unity Party, have gathered most MHP 
members around them. 
<H5>  Turkes Was in Frankfurt on 25 December </H5>
  It is being reported that Turkes held a number of meetings 
during his visit 25-26 December visit to Germany. It is being 
said that Turkes was introduced to people to be used in the 
operations, and that he even said the following to these people: 
"The Turkish people need you and your experience. Trust in the 
Federation and make your preparations." 
  There are indications that after many years, the Turkish 
Federation has started to gather "fanatic and arms-carrying" 
militants. It is being reported that these people are 
constantly subjected to the propaganda that "the Kurds are 
collecting protection money from the Turks, that is, from people 
close to us. How long could we remain spectators to this?" and 
that they have been given certain names as their targets. It 
was learned that they have particularly targeted a certain 
Huseyin and a certain Erdal in Frankfurt, the Kurdish mafia 
godfathers. 
  In the meantime, efforts are under way to "improve 
relations" 
between MIT [Turkish National Intelligence Organization] and the 
Turkish Federation for this operation. It is being reported 
that Turkes, who established excellent relations with MIT in 
Turkey, particularly recently, is trying to forge a 
rapprochement between MIT and his diaspora organization, which 
had been cool towards MIT because some of its members were 
tortured during the 12 September coup. 
<H5>  The Aim Is To Establish a Monopoly in Narcotics </H5>
  It is being said that MHP ordered its grass roots to attack 
Kurds in Europe in order to take revenge on the PKK members for 
preventing the Turkish Federation from organizing a cultural 
night in Vienna a few months ago and for beating up the MHP 
members in public. In this way, it is aimed at reviving the 
activities of the Turkish Federation and replenishing its funds. 
  A source closely watching the narcotics mafia made the 
following assessment: "The problem has to do totally with money. 
The aim is to eradicate the Kurdish mafia which has taken over 
the narcotics market, and thus revive the Idealist mafia. 
Frankfurt has been chosen as the center for this operation. It 
is mainly the Kurdish mafia that controls the narcotics business 
in Frankfurt and hence the Kurdish mafia is getting most of the 
protection money. The MHP members are very uneasy with this 
situation. They are angry that protection money is collected 
from their own people. They want to rechannel the financial 
resources to their own organization. This is because the 
Turkish Federation has no income of its own." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57906 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_h_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kinkel Discusses Ban on Kurdish Terrorist Group </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0501195094 Istanbul MILLIYET in Turkish 3 Jan 94 p 15 </F>
<F P=103> NC0501195094 </F>
<F P=104>  Istanbul MILLIYET </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Turkish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> ["Text" of exclusive interview with German Foreign Minister </F>
Klaus Kinkel by MILLIYET correspondent Regaip Minareci in Bonn; 
date not given] 
  [Text] Bonn--[Minareci] Germany was the first country to 
describe the Kurdish Workers Party [PKK] as a terrorist 
organization and ban its activities. Meanwhile, it has 
encouraged several countries in Europe to close down the Kurdish 
organizations in them. A widespread view behind the political 
scenes in Turkey is that Germany expects Turkey to reciprocate. 
  [Kinkel] No, expecting something in return from Turkey is 
out 
of the question. I have always wanted to have the PKK 
activities banned. I am glad that that has been done now. The 
legal requirements for and the possible outcome of banning 
associations in Germany, which is governed on the basis of a 
liberal constitution, have to be debated in detail. That is 
essential. The significant wave of agitation throughout Germany 
on 4 November should have convinced everyone that remaining 
inactive against the militant Kurdish groups, which wanted to 
achieve their objective through violence, was no longer 
possible. They posed a threat to Germany's security and public 
order. They also posed a threat to peaceful coexistence in 
Germany. We cannot allow the internal disputes in Turkey to be 
transferred to our country. Nor do we wish to allow that to 
happen. We respect the rights of the Turkish citizens in 
Germany. However, we must not be expected to adopt an 
understanding approach on acts of violence. 
  [Minareci] The CSCE countries have agreed to ban terrorist 
activities in Europe. Turkey has tried during the past eight 
years to explain to the West that the PKK is a terrorist 
organization. However, terrorist activities have only been 
banned very recently. Can you explain the reason for that state 
of affairs? 
  [Kinkel] The CSCE countries condemned terrorism in the 
statement that was made at the end of the Helsinki summit in 
1992. They stressed that they were prepared to closely cooperate 
on the matter. The German Government fully supported that 
political undertaking. However, I reject the view that the 
German officials remained completely inactive before the PKK 
activities were banned. The police, judicial organs, and other 
official establishments always took action against illegal 
activities. They brought those who broke the law to account. 
It is common knowledge that several courts in Germany have been 
hearing penal cases against the PKK members for many years, 
regardless of the problem of insufficient evidence against them. 
Several defendants have been sentenced to relatively serious 
prison terms. 
  However, banning associations is a different matter. The ban 
on associations creates natural and legal problems. No one in 
Germany and Turkey would have gained from a rushed decision, the 
legality of which would be questioned by the people. 
  [Minareci] How does Germany plan to prevent the PKK from 
violating the ban and establishing new organizations under 
different names? Can you comment on how the PKK will behave in 
Germany in the future? What are the measures the German 
Government plans to put into effect against possible PKK attacks 
in the future? 
  [Kinkel] The Federal Internal Affairs Minister's decision 
not 
only bans the PKK and the 34 organizations affiliated with it 
but also prohibits any move to establish new organizations to 
replace them. Naturally, the police and the judicial organs 
will see to it that the ban is imposed within the framework of 
the laws. They will bring criminal charges against anyone who 
violates Germany's laws. 
  [Minareci] While the European Union [EU] members have moved 
to cooperate against the PKK, Greece has openly supported that 
terrorist organization. Will Germany hold talks with Greece on 
that matter? 
  [Kinkel] The PKK problem has not affected all the EU members 
as much as it has affected Germany. However, all the EU 
countries agree on the need to condemn terrorism and wage a 
determined struggle against it. In view of that, Germany is 
acting with all the other EU members in a coordinated way. We 
hope to establish closer cooperation on the matter. 
  [Minareci] In addition to the PKK, other terrorist groups 
and 
individuals have used Germany as their headquarters, such as 
Dev-Yol [Revolutionary Path Organization] and Cemalettin Kaplan 
[Islamic fundamentalist leader]. Will Germany take measures 
against them as well or will they find an opportunity to 
strengthen their ranks? 
  [Kinkel] The ban on associations is not the only effective 
measure that can be taken in the struggle against terrorist 
activities. Germany is a lawful state which can use various 
means to wage a struggle against anyone who resorts to acts of 
violence and disrupts law and order and peace. The Dev-Sol 
[Revolutionary Left Organization] was banned in Germany in 1983. 
The PKK has been banned recently. The pertinent federal state 
has taken measures against Cemalettin Kaplan within the 
framework of the law on foreigners. I suggest that matters 
concerning the two countries should not be viewed from the point 
of view of the adoption of forceful measures. Political 
arguments and debates have gained importance in our time, more 
so than before. They must be based on the friendship between 
Turkey and Germany, the concept of human and citizenship rights 
within the framework of the European and Atlantic organizations, 
and the concept of freedom and democracy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57907 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_h_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kinkel Notes Plans To Ease Arms Export Controls </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501210194 Munich ARD Television Network in German 1900 
GMT 5 Jan 93 </F>

<F P=103> LD0501210194 </F>
<F P=104>  Munich ARD Television Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] New details have been revealed today of Bonn's 
efforts to change the guidelines on German arms exports. 
According to these details, the government, too, is seeking to 
make arms exports easier. According to information obtained by 
our Bonn office, talks on this have been conducted between the 
Defense, Economics, and Foreign Ministries. Yesterday the 
Christian Democratic Union/Christian Social Union [CDU/CSU] 
parliamentary group spoke in favor of easing the export 
provisions. The Social Democratic Party announced its 
resistance to this. Gerd H. Pelletier reports. 
  [Pelletier] One day after the move forward by CDU deputies 
toward relaxing the arms export provisions, today it was 
revealed that the ministries concerned -- defense, economics, 
and foreign -- have been dealing with the European harmonization 
of the tricky issue for weeks already. The confidential file 
has lain at the Federal Chancellery since before the Christmas 
period. It says that a ruling on dual-use exports is urgent. 
For example, we have the case of the Libyan toxic gas factory 
in Rabta, which the German company Imhausen Chemie claimed was a 
fertilizer plant. When the deal was uncovered, company head 
Hippenstiel was sentenced and regulations on granting export 
permits were tightened drastically. All-European guidelines are 
being called for in this area. But Ruehe's Defense Ministry 
also wants to make it easier for the arms industry to export. 
  Kinkel's Foreign Ministry, however, would prefer to adhere 
to 
the Arms Export Control Act of 1982. For example, if the 
British partners require the future Eurofighter to be 
desertworthy, the German manufacturing partners will know that 
it was to be sold outside the NATO area. Must our arms export 
restrictions be relaxed for that reason? 
  [Begin Kinkel recording] For some time we have been 
considering in the responsible ministries -- in cooperation 
between the Foreign Ministry and the Defense Ministry -- how we 
can deal with this sticky issue. We mustn't rush at it. We 
will look at the CDU/CSU proposals, which have now been 
submitted, in addition to our own ideas, and then decide in good 
time. [end recording] 
  [Pelletier] The arms industry does not want to wait that 
long. European reality: The company Eurocopter is a DASA 
enterprise with French majority ownership. The German partners 
cannot and do not want to know where the French parent company, 
Aerospatiale, is selling the combat helicopters. Whatever 
happens, it is thought less likely that the European partners 
will give in to the cautious German arms export restrictions in 
the short or long term. It is more likely that the compromise 
will lie in the gradual relaxing of these German provisions. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57908 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_h_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   CDU/CSU Faults Strict Controls </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0501141194 Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG in German 5/6 Jan 
94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> AU0501141194 </F>
<F P=104>  Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by "deu": "Union Bundestag Group Wants To Facilitate </F>
Arms Exports"] 
  [Text] Bonn -- The dispute dividing government and 
opposition on the subject of arms export controls is 
intensifying. Pressured by the arms industry, the coalition 
Bundestag groups and the Economics Ministry are trying to relax 
the German guidelines for arms export, which are stricter than 
those of most other countries. One of the reasons for this is 
job security. Karl Lamers, foreign policy spokesman of the 
Christian Democratic Union/Christian Social Union [CDU/CSU] 
Bundestag group, told a newspaper that the German arms export 
guidelines put German companies at a disadvantage: "Thousands of 
jobs and high-tech know-how that are of enormous importance for 
the civilian industry threaten to be lost." 
  Lamers demands a uniform European Union [EU] policy on arms 
exports. This is also mentioned as an objective in the section 
on joint foreign and security policy of the Maastricht Treaty. 
Lamers said that, due to the resistance of other European 
states, however, the high German standards cannot be maintained 
in Brussels. 
  Bonn's attempts to facilitate arms exports through Brussels 
meet with strong resistance from the Social Democratic Party of 
Germany [SPD]. SPD Bundestag group manager Peter Struck said 
the constitution demands that the Bundestag be consulted by the 
Federal Government first. The constitutional amendment passed 
when the Maastricht Treaty was ratified says: "The Federal 
Government, before agreeing to an introduction of new laws by 
the EU, gives the Bundestag the opportunity to comment. The 
Federal Government bases its negotiations on these comments." 
  Heidemarie Wieczorek-Zeul, deputy SPD chairwoman and 
European 
affairs expert, accused the government of negotiating a 
softening up of arms export guidelines in the European Council 
of Ministers, "behind the Bundestag's back, ignoring the 
constitution, and excluding the public." The government is "by 
no means entitled to do this." 
  The Economics Ministry denies negotiating uniform export 
guidelines for traditional armament products within the EU. 
These negotiations only refer to dual-use products. This means 
products that can be used for both civilian and military 
purposes, such as machinery, special steels, and pesticides. 
Reinhard Goehner, government coordinator for aerospace and 
space technology, has repeatedly said that it will not be 
possible to maintain the strict German export regulations. 
Negotiations on dual-use products have reached the final stage. 
  The German guidelines for traditional arms and dual-use 
products were tightened after the second Gulf war in early 1991. 
UN inspectors had discovered that a large share of Iraqi 
dictator Saddam Husayn's arms supply came from German companies. 
Since then, the German arms industry constantly complained about 
disadvantages compared to other countries, especially France and 
Great Britain. 
  Arms producers from these countries have blamed the Germans 
for being unreliable, the German arms industry said. Over the 
past four years, 280,000 jobs were lost in the armament 
industry. Yet, according to the Stockholm-based SIPRI 
Institute, with a 3.1 billion-mark turnover, Germany was still 
the world's third largest arms exporter in 1992. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57909 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_h_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Daily Views SPD New Economic Policy Course </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0501140794 Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT in German 5 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> AU0501140794 </F>
<F P=104>  Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Hans Joerg Sottorf: "Renewal Process in the </F>
SPD"] 
  [Text] In the 1970's, the Christian Democratic Union [CDU] 
developed from a highly economically oriented party to a real 
people's party on the basis of the "New Social Problem," which 
was discovered and expounded by Heiner Geissler and was 
reflected in the Mannheim programmatic statement of 1975. This 
is one of the reasons the party was very successful in the 
1980's. The Social Democratic Party of Germany [SPD] is 
currently undergoing a process in the other direction that has 
remained largely unnoticed. For decades it was considered the 
classical social welfare party, and in opinion polls citizens 
made it clear that they considered the SPD responsible in this 
area. Now the strategists around Rudolf Scharping, the new 
party chairman, have realized that they must open the party to a 
"New Economic Problem" if the social democrats want to win and 
retain a majority over the long term. The SPD is finally going 
to be given a new economic profile, as has been demanded for a 
long time. 
  Scharping, who is setting up an election campaign team and 
is 
looking for expert advisers in many policy areas, attaches 
special importance to economic policy advice. Even though the 
SPD moved away from its state economy ideology and adopted the 
market economy concept at its Godesberg party congress in 1959, 
it never succeeded in proving its competence in the economic 
policy field. In November, three large opinion research 
institutes found out for the first time that voters think the 
SPD is better able to solve economic problems than the Christian 
Democratic Union/Christian Social Union [CSU]. 
<H5>  Eight Economics Ministers in the Federal Laender </H5>
  Members of the SPD Executive Board admit that in the contest 
of the parties, every party profits from failures of the other 
one. In the economic area, the CDU/CSU has so far failed to 
submit a convincing concept to cope with acute problems, which 
is why the citizens are now staking their hopes on the SPD. The 
party is aware that it must provide a substantive basis for this 
confidence and present economic experts to put it into practice. 
At the Wiesbaden party congress, the delegates agreed that 
nothing can be distributed before it has been produced. This is 
a decisively new course for the SPD's future economic policy, as 
the party executive board stresses. 
  Scharping now intends to forge the iron as long as it is 
hot. 
Comparable to the CDU during its time in opposition in the 
1970's, a renewal has meanwhile also set in within the SPD 
through the federal laender. The Social Democrats supply the 
economics ministers in eight of the 16 federal laender -- more 
than ever before. Dieter Spoeri from Baden-Wuerttemberg is 
considered the most important asset in this respect; he has the 
best chance of becoming economics minister in Rudolf Scharping's 
shadow cabinet. Spoeri was in Bonn for many years, and gathered 
experience in the SPD Bundestag group in the economic and 
financial policy area; he is also standing his ground in a grand 
coalition with the CDU in Stuttgart. This could, in fact, 
qualify him for a top position in Bonn this fall. 
  But even apart from active politics, a renewal movement is 
manifesting itself within the SPD. In circles organized by the 
Friedrich Ebert Foundation and elsewhere, leading SPD 
politicians meet with scientists, industrial leaders, and 
business managers who chat with Rudolf Scharping more and more 
often. "The culture of holding talks on important current 
political affairs is only now beginning to develop within the 
SPD," says a member of the election program commission. Such 
talking circles existed when Bjoern Engholm was chancellor 
candidate, but they were never more than informal circles. The 
idea now is not only to exchange views but also mobilize them 
for practical party work, no matter whether economic, financial, 
social welfare, foreign, or any other policy areas are concerned. 
  Former SPD Federal Manager Peter Glotz, who is now a 
professor at Munich University, is an important link to the 
scientific world. In the "Kochel Circle," young university 
teachers who are at least close to the SPD are meeting in 
January to give thought provoking impulses in talks with 
practical party politicians. 

<H5>    In Search of Qualified Candidates </H5>
  The party leadership considers it one of the most important 
problems to overcome the still existing skepticism about modern 
technologies; accepting and guaranteeing them for Germany's 
economic base is of outstanding importance. In this respect, 
the Transrapid magnetic train and genetic engineering are 
mentioned as examples. "In this context, we will not always 
pursue the same course as the trade unions," say the program 
planners. 
  The search for qualified candidates for Scharping's election 
campaign team includes practicians like Spoeri from the laender 
and theoreticians from the scientific area. It is true that the 
SPD chairman in 1993 installed a commission to draft the 
election campaign program, but this commission will not be 
identical to the shadow cabinet. Doubts have even been 
expressed of whether Saarland Minister President Oskar 
Lafontaine, who is responsible in the commission for economic 
and financial policy, will be a member of the shadow team. New 
names will emerge, including persons that currently appear as 
prominent advisers in talks, to clearly open up the SPD to 
business and industry, the middle class, and the scientific 
world. 
  Scharping's circle of advisers also includes active 
politicians from the past -- people like Helmut Schmidt, Karl 
Schiller, or Manfred Schueler -- to whose advice the new party 
chief attaches equally great importance and who have promised 
help. Chancellor candidate-designate Scharping is also 
inconspicuously practicing his appearance in the international 
arena. Shortly before the EC summit in Brussels in December, 
the SPD chief met with the chairmen of other European social 
democratic parties to discuss problems of economic growth. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57910 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_i_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Paris Advocates NATO, U.S. Intervention in Bosnia </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0601104694 Paris LIBERATION in French 6 Jan 93 p 16 </F>
<F P=103> BR0601104694 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LIBERATION </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Dominique Garraud report: "Paris Wants NATO Intervention in </F>
Bosnia"] 
  [Text] Violent fights were going on yesterday evening in 
the Grbavica district in downtown Sarajevo, which is under the 
control of the Bosnian Serbs. According to an information 
released yesterday by OUEST-FRANCE, a French UNPROFOR [UN 
Protection Forces] soldier shot a Serbian sniper on 25 December 
who was terrorizing people in Sarajevo. "It was the first time 
it happened," commented Colonel Traqui, the commander of the 
French detachment in Sarajevo. "In the past, we fired shots 
even though the targets had neither been located, nor 
identified. (...) After multiple acts of provocation, we thus 
showed our exasperation." 
  It is in this context that the French Government will take 
advantage of the upcoming NATO summit on Monday [10 January] to 
try to compel the Atlantic Alliance -- and most of all the 
United States -- to commit itself more actively in the settling 
of the crisis in former Yugoslavia. The feeling of irritation 
expressed by the military heads of UNPROFOR -- which was shown 
by the anticipated departure from Sarajevo of Belgian General 
Francis Briquemont -- has been largely supported in France by 
the political leaders. 
  Foreign Minister Alain Juppe expressed the hope on Tuesday 
that the NATO summit would provide a "new initiative." 
Governmental circles indicate that the stake will be to have 
the United States stop "beating about the bush" and show a "real 
will to act." In this context, Defense Minister Leotard would 
like "the United States to intervene and help us so that this 
war does not extend to the whole of Southern Europe." 
  In concrete terms, French officials think an initiative that 
would bring all the belligerents to a real negotiation implies 
an active participation of the United States in reinforcing 
UNPROFOR, at all levels -- either diplomatic or political. The 
26,000 UN troops stationed in former Yugoslavia, and chiefly the 
12,000 who are in Bosnia, are incapable to fight against the 
probable attacks by the warring sides next spring. The security 
zones, such as Tuzla and Srebenica, are about to be blocked by 
the Serbs who deny access to them whenever they want to. 
  It is becoming more and more obvious that a total withdrawal 
of the UNPROFOR will be envisaged if the UN ground forces are 
not considerably reinforced (which implies a U.S. participation) 
with a possible shift to air raids and renewed diplomatic 
pressures on the belligerents. The French officials consider 
this solution as being "the worst" of all and do not want to be 
the only ones to take the responsibility. With the first 
contingent (6,000 troops) of Blue Helmets on the spot, France 
has done much in trying to solve this crisis which it also 
considers as a test for the future of the stability in Europe. 
  Signs from London and Ottawa seem to indicate that France is 
about the only country to believe that a withdrawal is not 
unavoidable. In the worst case, the French Government -- which 
is not too hopeful that the American "wait-and-see" attitude 
will turn into a "will to act" -- will have to realize that NATO 
is helpless; in the meantime new negotiations on former 
Yugoslavia will start in Geneva in a few days. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57911 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_i_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Editorial on International Withdrawal from Bosnia </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0601113394 Paris LE MONDE in French 6 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> BR0601113394 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE MONDE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed editorial: "Discouragement"] </F>
  [Text] It is not yet headlong flight, but the signs 
pointing to a withdrawal of the international community from the 
Yugoslav conflict are growing clearer. The early recall -- at 
his request -- of General Francis Briquemont, head of the "Blue 
Helmets" in Bosnia-Herzegovina, is one of the clearest signs of 
a state of mind which is rapidly spreading: Discouragement at 
the glaring failure of any international initiative. Shortly 
before the announcement of the Belgian general's departure, Jean 
Cot, his immediate superior, had given in to a display of revolt 
against the "humiliations" his men constantly have to endure. 
  The UN Protection Forces [UNPROFOR], the "armed wing" of an 
international community that has never been dazzling in its 
coherence in the two years and six months the war in the former 
Yugoslavia has lasted, has been tossed about by the 
contradictory stances and false threats for which it suffers the 
terrible consequences on the ground. People like General Cot or 
General Briquemont can, with some legitimacy, wonder what they 
are doing in the Yugoslav mess when they are deprived of the 
means of ensuring respect for any Security Council resolution 
and when all their requests for reinforcements are rejected. 
  The disquiet felt among the "Blue Helmets" can only 
increase, 
given the many admissions of failure by diplomats and the 
statements referring more and more specifically to a forthcoming 
withdrawal of the UNPROFOR if no progress is made in the 
negotiations over the next two months -- as European mediator 
David Owen has just stressed. And although the French political 
officials have demonstrated splendid ambiguity on this subject, 
the Canadians have been very clear in announcing that they 
"would reexamine" their presence in Bosnia in April. 
  It is difficult to see how the western countries will 
succeed 
in extricating themselves from the deadlock in which they have 
been caught. The alternative now facing them has no encouraging 
aspect when every prospect of peace is receding: Either they 
withdraw the "Blue Helmets" and henceforth take no interest in 
the conflict and its victims, or they decide to provide 
themselves with the means of a real intervention and run the 
risk of a daunting ensnarement. 
  In both cases, moreover, Europe is likely to pay very dearly 
for the political impotence it has shown since June 1991: by 
extending the conflict in a region that has always been 
explosive. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57912 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_i_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Mitterand Approves Bank of France Independence </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0501164694 Paris AFP in English 1617 GMT 5 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> AU0501164694 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris AFP </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Paris, Jan 5 (AFP) -- French President Francois 
Mitterrand gave his approval for independence for the Bank of 
France on Wednesday [5 January], four days after the date 
initially planned and after having ensured a key role for one of 
his followers, Michel Sapin. 
  Mitterrand signed a law creating a Monetary Policy Council 
as 
part of measures, required under the Maastricht Treaty for 
European monetary union, giving the central bank independent 
responsibility for the money supply, key interest rates, lending 
arrangements and bank reserve requirements. 
  But the government is to be responsible for the overall 
exchange rate framework and the franc's exchange rate. 
  Economics Minister Edmond Alphandery said Wednesday 
afternoon 
that the Bank of France's independence would "at least equal 
that of the Bundesbank," thanks to the powers granted to the new 
council. 
  He said the law changing the central bank's status "is of 
such nature as to create a stable environment, the best possible 
one for carrying out monetary policy." 
  The council is composed of the governor, two vice governors, 
and six members named on Wednesday. 
  One of those appointed was Michel Sapin, 41, who was finance 
minister in the outgoing socialist government headed by the late 
Pierre Beregovoy. 
  Sapin had held to Beregovoy's "franc fort" (strong franc, 
with a pun on Frankfurt, Bundesbank headquarters) policy 
throughout massive speculative runs against the franc in 1992, 
and in 1993 during the dying months of the socialists' years in 
government under their socialist president. 
  Officials at the presidential Elysee Palace said that 
Mitterrand had told conservative RPR [Rally for the Republic] 
Prime Minister Edouard Balladur that he would not sign the list 
of members if Sapin were not appointed, for reasons of balance 
and pluralism. He wanted a politician among the nine council 
members. 
  The Prime Minister's Office agreed to this Tuesday evening, 
the Elysee officials said. 
  Sapin announced that he was resigning as a member of the 
executive committee of the Socialist Party with the full 
agreement of party leader Michel Rocard. He said he remained a 
party "member and a militant." 
  The governor of the bank, Jean Claude Trichet, was appointed 
in September. The government renewed the mandates of the first 
deputy governor, Denis Ferman, and of the second deputy, Herve 
Hannoun, on Wednesday. 
  Trades unions and agriculture are not represented on the 
Monetary Policy Committee. 
  Reliable sources said the president of the big FNSEA 
[National Federation of Unions of Farm Operators] farmers' 
union, Luc Guyau, had opposed appointment of the president of 
the Brittany Ferries company, Alexis Gourvennec, and unconfirmed 
reports said his name was withdrawn at the last moment to be 
replaced by that of Denise Flouzat, 65, a university economics 
professor. 
  In 1991 she was appointed president of an association, 
"Demain la France" (Tomorrow France), which was created by 
Charles Pasqua and Philippe Seguin -- two leading conservative 
politicians who opposed the Maastricht Treaty. 
  Hannoun is seen as the second socialist on the committee 
with 
Sapin. He had been the head of Beregovoy's private office. 
  Another of those appointed was Michel Albert, aged 64, who 
was named president of the state-owned AGF insurance company for 
the third time in 1992. He is a convinced European and an 
admirer of the German model of capitalism. 
  He helped draft the manifesto of the Radical Party in 1969, 
has worked for the European Investment Bank, and was 
Commissioner for the Plan from 1975 until 1981, when he was 
appointed to the AGF. 
  Observers said that his departure from the company would 
enable Balladur to replace him with someone to his liking to 
handle company privatisation. 
  Another appointee was economics journalist and broadcaster 
Jean Boissonnat, 64, a co-founder of EXPANSION business 
magazine. Albert and Boissonnat, who are seen as Christian 
Democrats, have written a book called "Crise, Krach, Boom". 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57913 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_i_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Economy Minister Comments </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0501125494 Paris LIBERATION in French 5 Jan 94 pp 10-11 </F>
<F P=103> BR0501125494 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LIBERATION </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Economy Minister Edmond Alphandery by </F>
Laurent Mauduit and Pascal Riche; place and date not given] 
  [Text] Edmond Alphandery has been campaigning for the 
independence of the Bank of France for many years. As economy 
minister, it is he who has guided the reform. He explained its 
main outlines. 
  [LIBERATION] Why give the Bank of France its independence so 
quickly? 
  [Alphandery] At first, there was a desire to improve the 
monetary environment of the French economy: French interest 
rates had hitherto incorporated a major risk premium because the 
medium-term monetary strategy was not sufficiently readable. 
However, one of the ways of reducing this risk premium -- 
costly for the economy, because it affects the interest rate 
level -- is to guarantee the independence of the issuing 
institution in the conduct of monetary policy so as to increase 
the currency's credibility. Moreover, it is common knowledge 
that the Beregovoy government considered this at the beginning 
of 1993. 
  [LIBERATION] The promised independence of the Bank of France 
is not the only factor that has contributed to the reduction of 
this risk premium.... 
  [Alphandery] No, but it has contributed to it. On 29 March, 
on the eve of the parliamentary election, when we announced the 
plan, the difference between French and German three-month 
interest rates was 2.81 percent to France's detriment. It is 
now only 0.38 percent. In the same period of time, the risk 
premium has virtually disappeared for 10-year rates. 
  [LIBERATION] It must also be said that the controversies 
within the majority on monetary policy have disappeared. 
  [Alphandery] It is true that we now enjoy a broad consensus. 
  [LIBERATION] Surely the reduction in rates is not the only 
justification for the independence of the Bank of France? 
  [Alphandery] Naturally not. Several fundamental reasons 
justify this reform. The first that comes to mind is the 
implementation of the Treaty on European Union. However, the 
idea for the independence of the Bank of France is an older one, 
at least for the UDF [Union for French Democracy] and the RPR 
[Rally for the Republic]. It comes from the unhappy memory of 
the 1981 recovery: Then, the budget deficit was financed by 
increasing the money supply. At the time, the independence of 
the Bank of France could have played the role of safeguard. 
That is why prominent figures like Balladur, Barre, Giscard 
d'Estaing, and even Pasqua very quickly defended this reform in 
turn. 
  [LIBERATION] And yet there was no need for France to move so 
quickly... 
  [Alphandery] Perhaps not. But in addition to the reasons 
already given, there is another, deeper reason: The eighties 
were characterized throughout the world, including the formerly 
socialist countries, by a speeding up of the decentralization of 
decisionmaking. People realized that this is the best method of 
managing modern economies. This is the meaning of the policies 
pursued almost everywhere: privatizations, return to market 
mechanisms, or even the independence of issuing institutions. 
By this legislation, France has adopted a modern approach. 
  [LIBERATION] The modern approach to which you refer 
nonetheless raises several essential political questions. What 
happens to the pilot? The independence of monetary policy -- 
like privatization -- reduces the economy minister's powers. 
What purpose will your successor serve? 
  [Alphandery] This question of the pilot is not limited to 
France. We are not taking an untrodden path. We are not 
implementing a reform which has no reference point in the world: 
Where is the pilot in the United States, in Germany, in 
Switzerland? Nobody asks that. The real question is the 
distribution of powers between a central bank and the minister 
in charge of the economy. Hitherto in France there was a close 
association between the governor of the Bank of France and the 
minister for the administration of monetary policy. But the 
ultimate responsibility for that policy rested with the 
government. Today, the ultimate responsibility for the 
decisions to cut or increase interest rates will rest with the 
Monetary Policy Council. But the bridges to the minister will 
not be cut: Consultation and discussion will obviously be 
maintained as is the case in the United States or in Germany. 
And, moreover, dialogue means democracy. 
  [LIBERATION] Democracy can also mean conflict. A situation 
of antagonism can be imagined. 
  [Alphandery] There may be differences of opinion and, in 
that 
case, each will shoulder the responsibilities stipulated by the 
law. 
  You know, the Monetary Policy Council will not live in 
secret 
in rue de La Vrilliere: Independence does not mean 
irresponsibility. There will be regular hearings at which the 
governor will address the Parliamentary Finance Commissions, 
there will be public reports, and press comment. The Bank of 
France will be forced to take public positions on subjects which 
go beyond monetary policy proper. It already does so, read for 
instance the annual reports addressed to the president of the 
republic. Monetary policy and economic policy cannot be 
conducted in isolation. 
  [LIBERATION] The central bank will also have to have a 
dialogue with the other European central banks within the 
European Monetary Institute [EMI] which has just been 
established in Frankfurt. Do you think that between now and the 
creation of the single European currency, a concerted monetary 
policy is possible within this institute? 
  [Alphandery] Consultation among the central banks existed 
already within the Council of Governors. The EMI, which 
replaces it, will go further, because it must think about what 
form the future Central European Bank will take. The EMI must 
prepare the third and final phase of the union process and 
answer some fundamental questions: How to pursue a monetary 
policy at European level, how to harmonize interventions on the 
money markets among the various European central banks? 
  [LIBERATION] But do you think it is conceivable that under 
EMI auspices concerted monetary policy decisions will be made: a 
cut in rates, for instance? 
  [Alphandery] It is not expected at all, because the central 
banks are independent until the start of the third phase. The 
EMI must not replace the central banks. Consultation has never 
meant joint decision. 
  [LIBERATION] What philosophy governed the choice of members 
of the Monetary Policy Council? 
  [Alphandery] We tried to form a credible council at national 
and international level: The people chosen had to have real 
influence. The other concern was to guarantee that the various 
council members had pursued different careers. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57914 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_j_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ITALY &amp; VATICAN CITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Segni Addresses Taxation Issue, Condemns PDS </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0501133394 Rome LA REPUBBLICA in Italian 5 Jan 94 pp 1, 8 </F>
<F P=103> BR0501133394 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome LA REPUBBLICA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Italian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Letter to LA REPUBBLICA editor from National Rebirth Pact </F>
leader Mario Segni: "`I Want an Election with Cards on the 
Table'"] 
  [Text] Dear Mr. Scalfari, 
  I am very pleased to reply to your questions. The statements 
I have made recently are not the result of any extemporizing or 
turnabouts, but the continuation of proposals or initiatives 
pursued consistently over the past months. It would be very 
helpful to be able to explain this once again. 
  Let us begin with my request for a clarification from Mr. 
Ciampi. Immediately after the approval of the electoral law, I 
maintained that the institutional reform was still very much 
incomplete, because we needed a system that would grant citizens 
the opportunity to choose not only a majority but also the 
individuals that are to lead the government, similarly to what 
happens in the case of mayors. This is why I proposed the 
direct election of the prime minister, and I still maintain that 
this -- or another reform that will in any case grant voters the 
power to choose the individuals who will lead the government -- 
should be one of the most important things to be achieved in the 
next legislative term. 
  The situation has not permitted the approval of such a 
reform. Therefore, many people have put forward the idea that 
the reform should be implemented politically right now, that is, 
that it would be useful and desirable for each alignment to 
specify not only its program but also the individual that it 
will put forward as candidate to the premiership. I agree with 
this idea, which I consider consistent with the thinking behind 
the referendums. I believe it would contribute considerable 
clarity and innovation to the coming election campaign. 
  I believe it is well liked by the citizens, who welcomed the 
major innovation of the direct election of mayors. This is why 
I agreed to be put forward as the candidate for prime minister 
by the liberal-democratic and reformist alignment that is 
forming around the Pact. Everyone may form whatever opinion 
they like of this. I consider it an act of openness. I want 
those who vote for the Pact to know not only what we will do but 
also who will govern them. I want -- at last, after an 
ambiguous system that has lasted for a long time -- the next 
elections to be conducted with cards on the table. 
  It was precisely because we made this decision that we are 
entitled to demand that the others place their cards on the 
table, too. This is why from the very first day I demanded that 
the other groupings name their own candidates. Of course there 
is no legal obligation. But I am sure that there is an 
obligation from the viewpoint of clarity. If any alliance is 
unable to do this, it should state so openly, admit its 
inability to do so, or its decision not to put forward its own 
candidate. This is legitimate. But it is also legitimate that 
the voters be informed of this and be able to form their own 
judgment. 
  Occhetto's left-wing coalition seems to have a problem in 
this regard. It knows that any decision would cause splits or 
encounter unpopularity. This is why it cunningly cites several 
names, often including Mr. Ciampi's. In this way it is trying 
to benefit from the prestige enjoyed by the prime minister, 
without paying the price that this option would entail. 
  This conduct on Mr. Occhetto's part must be openly 
condemned, 
and we will do so consistently. But precisely because what is 
at issue is the clarity of the elections at such a delicate 
time, it is necessary to demand that Mr. Ciampi too contribute 
to this clarity. Mr. Ciampi cannot be unaware that it is not 
enough to state that he is not standing as a candidate for the 
lower house or the Senate, in order to rule out his standing as 
someone's candidate to the premiership. He cannot be unaware 
that again yesterday, after his remarks, [Democratic Alliance 
members] Barbera and Ayala cited him as the progressive front's 
candidate. He cannot be unaware that, if an election were to 
take place in such a situation, many Italians would believe that 
he is the left's candidate, or one of its candidates, to the 
premiership. Of course, if such an option were to be taken 
openly, we would combat it politically, but it would be 
perfectly legitimate. What is necessary it that matters be 
clear. And it is precisely because of the esteem in which I hold 
Mr. Ciampi that I urge him not to permit such a misunderstanding 
to exist. 
  Let us move on to the second part, that is, to my opposition 
to the tax decree. Allow me to go back over what I have been 
saying for some months. Back in October, at the People's Reform 
group conference in Naples, we raised the issue of taxation as 
the crucial problem in Italy's life, and stressed three things: 
that fiscal pressure had reached a level that was intolerable 
to the public and dangerous to the production system (your 
newspaper reported yesterday that it has reached 43.7 percent, 
the highest level in Europe); that the tax authorities' 
inefficiency posed serious problems of equitability; and that 
the complexity of the tax system has created a dangerous 
attitude of rebellion among the citizens. 
  The proposals explained by Augusto Fantozzi were anything 
but demagogic. We did not (and do not) in any way propose an 
immediate reduction of the tax burden, in the knowledge that 
this is something that a country with a public debt like ours 
cannot afford. We proposed instead a curb on tax pressure, with 
an immediate commitment to fight the financial reform battle on 
the expenditure front. We also proposed a number of measures 
which, by rapidly enhancing the efficiency of the financial 
administration, would permit a reduction of tax evasion and 
therefore a reduction of tax levels. 
  Only within such an outlook, and with incisive action to cut 
public spending, did we put forward the proposal -- drawn up by 
Baldassarri and taken up again yesterday by Tremonti -- of a 
constitutional limit on tax revenue. We did not wait for 
Berlusconi to introduce these ideas. But I do not see what is 
demagogic about focusing the political debate on an issue such 
as taxation, which is now crucial to our nation's life, and 
about putting forward not the destructive proposals of tax 
revolt but ideas that could make it possible not only to balance 
our accounts again but also to establish new relations of trust 
between state and citizens. And it is certainly no South 
American-style method, which is the charge that Occhetto has 
leveled at me: If anything, that charge would apply to a lax 
spending policy. 
  These objectives are held partly by the government, too, 
which promises for next year a 1.7-percent reduction in tax 
pressure (which shows how undemagogic our ideas are). But the 
deeds seem to us to conflict with the stated aims. This, 
because the objective of reducing taxes seems to lack 
credibility at a time when taxes are being increased and at a 
time when there seems to be a prospect (not envisaged by the 
Finance Bill but not denied by the government) of the need for 
another and more substantial tax package immediately after the 
elections, thus providing grounds for the anxieties that the 
promised 28 trillion lire worth of cuts will be partly 
nullified. This, especially since on the public employment 
front a number of measures -- such as the doubling of 
administrative staff at local health centers and the transfer to 
various ministries of management personnel from the dissolved 
Agensud [Agency for financing projects in the South] at much 
higher pay levels than other categories -- operate in the 
opposite direction. 
  Of course the battle to cut spending is a complex one, much 
more difficult than the gradual increase of the tax burden that 
has been pursued hitherto. I will confine myself for the 
present to recalling what I said the other day when I criticized 
the tax decree -- that is, that to aim to cut the planned 
inflation rate to 2.5 percent in 1994 and to base the 
negotiation of public employment contracts on that is a means of 
achieving a reduction of the deficit without raising tax 
pressure. If the government keeps the planed inflation rate 
higher, it risks failure. 
  One final reply to your postscript. It should be 
unnecessary, because in recent days I have constantly repeated 
that my only concern is to build the Pact. You ask me about any 
accords with Fini. I have always ruled them out, whether before 
or after the elections. I fear that Occhetto is about to give 
the opposite reply with regard to Communist Renaissance. I 
hope, however (and I hope also that I am not among the poor 
innocents to whom you refer) that our friends in the Democratic 
Alliance will stand firm by their commitment not to ally with 
Communist Renaissance. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57915 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_j_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ITALY &amp; VATICAN CITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Minister Dismisses Berlusconi Tax Proposals </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0501135294 Rome LA REPUBBLICA in Italian 5 Jan 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> BR0501135294 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome LA REPUBBLICA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Italian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Budget Minister Luigi Spaventa by Gennaro </F>
Schettino in Rome; date not given: "Dear Silvio, Please Do Not 
Cheat..."] 
  [Text] Rome -- "Anyone advocating drastic tax reductions 
does not know what he is talking about. Certain proposals cut no 
ice with me, they leave me absolutely cold. Those putting them 
forward should also be explaining where they are planning to get 
the money to finance such a nonsensical operation." Luigi 
Spaventa, one of our top economists, who is temporarily lending 
the Ciampi government a hand in the capacity of budget minister, 
displayed his habitual sense of fair play. He wanted to avoid 
direct polemics with [Fininvest President] Silvio Berlusconi or 
with any of the others who, over the past few days, have been 
riding the idea of drastically reducing the tax burden on 
citizens. However, he was unable to conceal his annoyance at 
such facile demagoguery. As a good economist, he is used to 
reasoning with figures and tables. He placed one of the latter 
under our nose. It contained comparisons between several 
different nations. The minister remarked: "A tax burden 
equivalent to 47 percent of the GDP is mentioned. I do not know 
where these figures come from. In fact, we are around 40 
percent, a little below the EEC average. There will be no room 
to maneuver," he added, "until we bring the public debt in line 
with our GDP. The tax burden could only be reduced now through 
unsustainable and unthinkable cuts in the benefits provided by 
the government for families." 
  [Schettino] Minister, some proposals may perhaps have a very 
demagogic flavor, but the tax burden has reached intolerable 
levels in our country. Should the government not be more 
courageous and reduce the taxes paid by citizens? 
  [Spaventa] I believe any and every taxpayer would like to 
see 
his tax bill reduced. There is a big gap, however, between what 
is desirable and what is actually feasible. It is misleading to 
make people believe that the tax burden can be eased without 
saying how this would be offset. Those advocating a reduction 
of the tax burden to 35 percent must clearly tell citizens that 
this would require cutting expenditure by 6.7 percentage points. 
Cuts would all have to center on child benefit since we have 
already scraped the bottom of the barrel in the other sectors. 
Expenditure on interest can be reduced only if we continue to 
have a credible position on the financial markets, and this 
implies interest rate cuts. Coercive measures to reduce public 
expenditure are out of the question. 
  [Schettino] If a reduction is not possible, then at least a 
tax burden ceiling could be set by amending the Constitution... 
  [Spaventa] Considering how Article 81 of the Constitution 
(according to which government expenditure must always be 
covered -- LA REPUBBLICA editor's note) has been implemented, I 
am very skeptical about ceilings being decided on paper. I have 
more faith in the thrust provided by movements, and such a 
thrust makes any further increase of the tax burden impossible 
at present. 
  [Schettino] In the meantime, however, every month employees 
are forced to pay well over half their salaries in taxes and 
social security contributions. Is this not too much, in your 
view? Is it really unthinkable to grant a tax reduction? 
  [Spaventa] A reduction of direct taxation is certainly 
appropriate. Taxation rates are too high in our country. We 
must be clear, however, that any such reduction would have to be 
funded through new taxes, possibly in the form of indirect 
taxation, or through cuts in expenditure. 
  [Schettino] Nevertheless, in a period of recession such as 
the present one, should tax payers not be getting a heavier pay 
packet so as to stimulate consumer demand, and thus revive the 
economy? 
  [Spaventa] Unless we close the gap between the public debt 
and the GDP, fiscal policy cannot be used to sustain the 
economic cycle. This gap between the mountain of accumulated 
debts that we are carrying on our backs, and the country's 
wealth, must be set at a sustainable level for the economy. If 
we attempted to follow an expansion policy at present, this 
would only have negative effects, and we would have to foot a 
very high bill in terms of interest rates. I would like to 
point out, however, that despite these binding limitations, the 
government gave back over 1.1 trillion lire [L] under the 
heading "fiscal drag." It reduced the tax burden for people 
buying their first home by L1 trillion. In addition, despite 
the fact that the income from certain sources, such as IVA 
[value-added tax] and social contributions, fell short of 
estimates by close to L3 trillion by the end of 1993, the 
government decided not to decree new taxes. 
  [Schettino] What about the L6.8-trillion maneuver? What 
about the increases in IVA and the price of gasoline -- are 
these not new taxes? 
  [Spaventa] These taxes were announced a long time ago, and 
they form an integral part of economic policy for 1994. They do 
not represent an unforseen increase. I would like to remind 
those who now appear shocked and suprised at the measures 
decided by the cabinet on 29 December, that already in mid-July 
the programing document and Finance Bill were referring to the 
need for a tax package at the end of the year. Subsequently, in 
September, this statement of intent was transformed into one of 
the articles in the provisions attached to the 1994 Finance 
Bill. The article in question, including a specific budgetary 
allocation, was duly approved by parliament. To say now that we 
have suddenly introduced an umpteenth tax increase is to deny 
the facts. 
  [Schettino] Indeed, the end of the year maneuver had already 
been announced. However, some consternation was caused by the 
realization that one of its key elements was in fact an 
umpteenth increase in the price of gasoline. 
  [Spaventa] We had to choose between a higher IVA increase or 
raising the price of gasoline. I thought it would be more 
appropriate to act on gasoline since it has only a very slight 
inflationist impact on the economy, given the drop in oil prices. 
  [Schettino] One last question: Will a further, mid-year 
package, including further cuts in expenditure, really be 
necessary? 
  [Spaventa] Anyone speaking of a further package would do so 
in a purely personal capacity. We are still in January and it 
is too early to say what will happen. I can only say now that, 
as regards certain obligatory expenditure items, such as wages 
and pensions, no interventions are possible in the course of the 
year. But let us not start crossing the bridge before we get 
there. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57916 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_l_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SPAIN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Solana Says Tunisia Visit `Very Useful' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0401194194 Madrid RNE International in Spanish 1400 GMT 4 
Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> LD0401194194 </F>
<F P=104>  Madrid RNE International </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Spanish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Today, Tuesday [4 January], Spanish Foreign Minister 
Javier Solana returned to Madrid following his official visit to 
Tunisia. Solana described the visit as very useful from all 
points of view because it permitted progress to be made in the 
various fields of cooperation. Before concluding his visit, 
Javier Solana was received today by Tunisian President Zine El 
Abidine Ben Ali, with whom he discussed matters such as 
bilateral relations, the situaton in the Maghreb countries, and 
the common desire to proceed toward formulas which would permit 
greater security in the Mediterranean. 
  The Spanish foreign minister said that another component of 
this visit to Tunisia was related to the peace process in the 
Middle East, for which reason he had a meeting with Palestinian 
leader Yasir 'Arafat. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57917 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_l_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SPAIN </F>
<H3> <TI>   PSOE `Impetus' Disappoints Parties </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0501165294 Madrid YA in Spanish 28 Dec 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> PM0501165294 </F>
<F P=104>  Madrid YA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Spanish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Julio Riquelme report: "`Impetus' Turns Against PSOE"] </F>
  [Text] Madrid -- Disappointment and skepticism are the two 
words that could define the state of mind created in the 
People's Party, the United Left, and Convergence and Union [CiU] 
by the successive meetings held with the PSOE [Spanish Socialist 
Workers Party] in order to guide the "democratic impetus." 
  According to members of the three above-mentioned parties 
participating directly in the meetings with the Socialists, the 
results are proving so slight that, on the one hand, they show 
the weakness and uncertainties of the team headed by Carlos 
Solchaga. On the other hand, they are creating serious doubts 
about whether the PSOE wishes to go beyond creating a "smoke 
screen" with which to maintain the image of a fluid dialogue 
with the opposition while making changing and confused 
proposals, depending on the interlocutor and the matter which is 
specifically being negotiated with each. 
<H5>  "We Could Quit Tomorrow" </H5>
  "We could quit tomorrow," a member of the CiU delegation 
told 
YA. "Progress is very slow: The PSOE has no real desire for us 
to cooperate in the legislature, but rather to surmount 
obstacles on an ad hoc basis in order to avoid a rift that could 
mean their starting to lose votes in the Congress [of 
Deputies]," the same source stated. 
  In the opinion of the CiU, the "democratic impetus" has 
become a cosmetic operation for the PSOE. Leaders of the 
Catalan coalition are indignant about the Socialists 
backtracking on the reform of the Senate. "They told us at one 
of our meetings that they would convince the People's Party, so 
that there would be no problems in accepting our amendments 
aimed at the comprehensive use of Catalan in the Senate, and 
then we find that they are telling the People's Party just the 
opposite: that they will try to convince us." 
  According to the same sources, "this switch has now occurred 
in other matters. Since [CiU leader] Pujol and [Basque 
Nationalist Party Chairman] Arzalluz said `no' to Gonzalez over 
joining a coalition government, and since the prime minister met 
with [People's Party Chairman] Aznar and promised him we know 
not what, the Socialists have turned toward the People's Party." 
"They seem," they added, "to have had enough with putting 
through the budgets, but the legislative term is very long, and 
if they continue to do so much double-dealing, we could break up 
the game." 
  The suspicions aroused in the CiU by the PSOE agreement with 
the People's Party on Senate reform are equaled within the 
People's Party, where it is believed that CiU is taking "its 
degree of egoism" to unacceptable lengths. Only yesterday, Jose 
Maria Aznar asserted in Salamanca that Gonzalez failed in 
accepting the nationalist demands in order to ensure that it 
would stay in power rather than meeting the country's own needs. 
  According to parliamentary party sources in the upper 
chamber, the People's Party has made the Senate reform "a matter 
of honor." "We will not even accept the PSOE's abstaining in the 
vote on CiU's amendment on the use of the official languages." 
"The agreement," they continued, "is to approve in full the 
text on which we have agreed. If they deviate from that, they 
can consider the `impetus' finished." Curiously enough, these 
sources agree with CiU in describing as a "smoke screen" the 
Socialists' real aim in the "democratic impetus" meetings, 
which, in Aznar's own opinion, "are showing that Gonzalez does 
not know how to govern in a minority." 
<H5>  United Left Pessimistic </H5>
  Only yesterday, the PSOE and the United Left tackled another 
meeting on the "impetus," which leaders of the coalition led by 
Anguita said they were setting about with little optimism. The 
disquiet caused by the suspension of the bilateral meeting 
scheduled for the first few days in December -- the suspension 
that was ordered by Felipe Gonzalez after he received a letter 
from Julio Anguita that was highly critical of his conduct -- 
persists in the United Left. 
  According to Francisco Frutos, the United Left cherishes no 
hope that the PSOE will be prepared to make the change the 
coalition demands in the economic and labor spheres, and so the 
"democratic impetus" cannot go very far. Other United Left 
leaders have told YA that "the choice of the government and the 
PSOE is very clear -- to rely on the conservative nationalist 
parties; we cannot sit at that table." 
  People's Party, CiU, and United Left sources stated that the 
mutual suspicion and distrust of the PSOE could end the 
"impetus" soon. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57918 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_a_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> AUSTRIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zhirinovskiy Fails To Pay for Medical Treatment </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0501135294 Vienna KURIER in German 5 Jan 94 p 15 </F>
<F P=103> AU0501135294 </F>
<F P=104>  Vienna KURIER </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed report: "The Russian's Debts"] </F>
  [Text] Wherever Vladimir Zhirinovskiy, the right-wing 
winner of the Russian elections, appears, he is bound to leave 
everybody confused. During his stay in Austria, the Russian 
went to Graz to have his skin and eyes examined at the local 
hospital. After the treatment he casually disappeared -- without 
paying -- it has now been reported. (Initially the doctors kept 
quiet -- out of politeness toward their "prominent" guest?) Now 
the director of the hospital wants to send a bill for the amount 
outstanding to Moscow. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57919 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_a_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> AUSTRIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Vranitzky Expects Over 40 Percent in Elections </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0501160294 Vienna NEWS in German 5 Jan 94 p 13 </F>
<F P=103> AU0501160294 </F>
<F P=104>  Vienna NEWS </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Chancellor Franz Vranitzky by Peter Pelinka </F>
and Tessa Prager; place and date not given: "Forty Percent and 
More"] 
  [Text] [NEWS] At the end of 1993, as a result of the 
letter-bomb series, there was a roundtable of party leaders. Do 
you fear a further polarization for the super election year of 
1994? 
  [Vranitzky] The roundtable has not contributed to improving 
the political culture. Proof of that is the publication of the 
so-called verbatim records and the fact that the meander of 
Haider's policy have been continued: First, he wants to become 
chancellor in 1998 -- which, by the way, shows that he assume he 
will nott be able to oust me earlier. Now he has suggested 
abolishing the chancellorship completely. Then, he once again 
announced what is going to happen when he is chancellor. One 
should not have too much hope for such meetings. I believe that 
the 1994 election campaign will be very active, perhaps with 
little caution regarding the choice of words. I will not 
participate in this, unless I become the target of a specific 
attack. 
  [NEWS] During the talk, did Haider apologize for calling you 
a "fascist in a pin-stripe suit"? 
  [Vranitzky] No, he just showed a seemingly obliging body 
language before he left the room. 
  [NEWS] Did you think there were too many reports about the 
letter bomb series? 
  [Vranitzky] Not generally. However, I must warn against the 
impression that right-wing extremism is rampaging in Austria. 
The problem is not the great number of right-wing extremists, 
but a certain trend toward making things seem harmless. One 
should call a spade a spade and say how things are, not more and 
not less. 
  [NEWS] In addition to the younger extremists, there are 
people like the Carinthian host [Edwin Neuwirth] of Russian 
ultranationalist Zhirinovskiy, who says that he does not know 
anything about gas chambers. 
  [Vranitzky] Like many others, I did not learn anything about 
the time after 1918 in our history lessons in secondary school. 
At the graduation ceremony, I asked my very open-minded history 
professor why not. And there he told me about incredible 
problems with other teachers and parents who were politically 
affected one way or other during the 1920's, the 1930's, and the 
1940's. Thus, he did not tell us anything.... I count on the 
young people and I count on this being recognized as a challenge 
to society. 
  [NEWS] Obviously, many young people nowadays use Nazi 
slogans when they want to shock others. 
  [Vranitzky] I think that one of the reasons for the lack of 
support for and orientation of these young people is the fact 
that relatively few immaterial values are being conveyed in 
families. Society is living off values that were established in 
the past and is not developing any new ones. Social policy has 
been materially oriented for too long. It is okay that school 
attendance is free, that the pensions are secure, and that the 
second year of maternity leave is financed. But one must not 
believe that one can reach sociopolitical goals with this alone. 
There is a bit more: caring, showing concern. I do not mean 
this sentimentally; I say this on the basis of the very tough 
reality, which I hear at Vienna's Meisel market, for instance: 
You only care for the foreigners -- you do not care for us. 
  [NEWS] In the summer, you defended social benefits. Now you 
are accused of cutting back social benefits. 
  [Vranitzky] The social system must once again prove how 
plausible it is. If even recipients of certain social benefits 
get the idea that one could improve something, one should not 
close one's ears to that. If such a good institution as the 
free school textbooks is criticized by parents, teachers, and 
people who are not involved all in the same way, it would be 
useful for one school to make its textbook system more 
economical and be permitted to use the saved money in a 
meaningful way. This does not call into question the instrument 
itself but improves it and gives rise to incentives for other 
things. 
  [NEWS] You are committing yourself to a new edition of the 
coalition, and [Vice Chancellor Erhard] Busek has criticized you 
for that. 
  [Vranitzky] In previous election conflicts, the Austrian 
People's Party has already suffered from the incohesiveness of 
such statements. Furthermore, I have not yet committed myself 
at all. I have said: It will be an important test for the 
government to pursue its policy, despite the turbulent election 
year. However, in the election campaign itself, we do not want 
to give rise to the impression that we are another piggyback 
party. One talks about coalitions only after the election 
results are available. 
  [NEWS] Everything points toward a "duel" between you and 
Haider. The issues will be the topic of leadership and also -- 
promoted by Haider -- the conflict of generations. What are 
your strategic plans for that? 
  [Vranitzky] Adjusting to the fact that he says something 
different on each topic every week. 
  [NEWS] How high do you set the crossbar for the elections? 
  [Vranitzky] At 40 percent and more. 
  [NEWS] When do you expect the EC referendum to be held? 
  [Vranitzky] Preconditions exist for the negotiations to be 
concluded by March. If this is the case, the European 
Parliament can ratify the results and the referendum can be held 
before summer. The earlier there is clarity the better. 
  [NEWS] One of the decisions in 1994 refers to ORF, the 
Austrian Radio and Television Corporation. Has Metelko, 
chairman of the ORF Board of Governors, discussed the early 
tender for the post of director general? 
  [Vranitzky] I knew about it. In particular, in view of the 
Strasbourg ruling [that the ORF monopoly cannot be maintained], 
it is my desire that the public institution proves its worth 
through quality and is also supported by the acceptance of the 
consumers. This also means that financial matters must be put in 
order. 
  [NEWS] The Social Democratic Party of Austria [SPOe] often 
seems to be held up only by you. Why do you give up your 
influence on the provincial organizations? 
  [Vranitzky] Because anything else would not be good. It is 
better for the party to act on the basis of the regional 
circumstances -- in coordination and cooperation with us, no 
question about that. 
  [NEWS] Do you see any successors for you in the SPOe? 
  [Vranitzky] Several, but I hope you will not expect me to 
give any names. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57920 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_a_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> AUSTRIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Coalition Talks on Alternative Service Fail </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0501111294 Vienna DIE PRESSE in German 5 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> AU0501111294 </F>
<F P=104>  Vienna DIE PRESSE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed report: "Talks on Alternative National </F>
Service Have Failed; Serious Conflict Burdens Coalition"] 
  [Text] Vienna -- No compromise is in sight in the ongoing 
quarrel among the coalition about the length of alternative 
national service. Quite the contrary, talks might have failed 
finally. 
  According to corresponding reports by both government 
parties, the negotiations on a new law on alternative national 
service, which lasted for months, have now failed. In fact, 
politicians declined to confirm this officially yesterday, but 
in hastily arranged news conferences and in numerous statements 
that were issued, both sides blamed each other for the failure. 
Thus, Defense Minister Werner Fasslabend (Austrian People's 
Party) announced that he has the impression that the Socialist 
Party of Austria [SPOe] was determined to prevent a successful 
conclusion. He no longer expects an agreement. 
  SPOe manager Cap stressed in an interview with DIE PRESSE 
yesterday: "The truth is that the Austrian People's Party 
[OeVP] has always wanted the commission [that decides whether 
the reasons cited by young men in favor of alternative national 
service are plausible]. For me Fasslabend signaled that there 
will be no more talks." 
  Shortly before the end of the year, agreement seemed within 
reach after renewed secret contacts between Chancellor Franz 
Vranitzky and Vice Chancellor Erhard Busek: They suggested 11 
months of alternative national service this year and delaying 
the decision as to whether and when it should be extended to 12 
months. 
  When difficulties occurred again in the negotiations between 
Fasslabend and Interior Minister Franz Loeschnak (SPOe), the 
OeVP finally lost its patience. 
  The result is that the old law went into effect at the 
beginning of the year. Alternative civilian service lasts eight 
months, but reasons must again be given before a commission. 
However, currently no personnel and no infrastructure are 
available for such a commission. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57921 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_a_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> AUSTRIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Unemployment Expected To Reach 9 Percent in Jan </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0501140594 Vienna DER STANDARD in German 5 Dec 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> AU0501140594 </F>
<F P=104>  Vienna DER STANDARD </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed report: "Unemployment Will Reach Its Highest </F>
Level in 30 Years in January"] 
  [Text] Vienna -- The Austrian unemployment rate rose from 
7.1 percent in November to 8.2 percent in December. It may even 
reach 9 percent in January. This is the highest unemployment 
rate since January 1959. The all-time low of 0.8 percent was 
registered in August 1974. 
  The decisive factor was the extraordinarily high seasonal 
unemployment in the construction industry. A similar 
development was also observed last year, but unemployment was .5 
percent lower at the time. Experts believe that the 
unemployment rate is currently higher than in January 1993, when 
8.4 percent was registered. 
  Erhard Fuerst, head of the Industrialists' Association 
Economic Department, dashed hopes that an upward economic trend 
might substantively improve the situation in the labor market. 
Austria needs an economic growth of at least 2.5 percent to 
prevent another rise in the unemployment rate. The forecasts, 
however, predict 1.5 percent for 1994. 
  According to a method of calculation applied in other 
industrialized countries, the unemployment rate in Austria 
stands at 4.3 percent. This method bases its calculations on 
the whole working population plus the unemployed, not just on 
employed persons. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57922 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_b_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> BENELUX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Turkish Embassy Reportedly Involved in Clashes </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0501144594 Brussels LE SOIR in French 5 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> BR0501144594 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels LE SOIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Alain Guillaumme and Alain Lallemand: "Clashes </F>
in Brussels: Agitators Come From Everywhere -- French-Speaking 
Community Subsidized Grey Wolves"] 
  [Text] Foreign Minister Willy Claes and Interior Minister 
Louis Tobback met Monday [3 January] and Tuesday with 
representatives of the Turkish and Kurdish communities, and calm 
returned to the hot spots in the capital. Late Wednesday 
morning, the Kurds -- who met yesterday with the European 
commissioner responsible for external relations -- are due to 
hold talks with members of the European Parliament, then give a 
news conference. Afterward, without having held a 
demonstration, they are scheduled to leave Belgian territory. 
Some already left yesterday, though. 
  Louis Tobback was satisfied with this outcome: "I listened 
to the explanations and demands of the Kurdish representatives 
here in Brussels. These questions fall under the scope of the 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs. I personally am responsible for 
public order. I am happy we have found some common ground, and 
I have no reason to fear that the agreements we reached will not 
be respected." 
  Otherwise, however, the interior minister stuck to his 
previous statements. From his point of view, according to the 
information gathered by the Gendarmerie and the National 
Security Service, there are serious reasons to believe that the 
events in Brussels are not spontaneous. The presence of several 
agitators, including the Turkish nationalist movement called 
Grey Wolves, had been established. Nonetheless, Louis Tobback 
says the information at his disposal calls for discretion, but 
he is prepared to pass it on to Parliament. 
  According to our sources, the Gendarmerie and National 
Security Service think they noticed "personnel" with close links 
to the Turkish Embassy (or its consulates) at the riot sites. 
These persons supposedly "guided" the crowds, sometimes pushing 
them onto the streets, sometimes persuading them to return home. 
On the Kurdish side, as Louis Tobback confirmed, the police 
also noticed a strong presence of members of extreme left-wing 
Belgian groups. 
  Furthermore, it would seem that in 1993, and to an even 
greater extent in 1992, the famous Grey Wolves actually received 
subsidies from both the cultural administration and the 
administration of social affairs of the French-speaking 
Community! This fact was confirmed Tuesday by the cabinets of 
Minister Robert Collignon and Minister Magda De Galan, who at 
the time were in charge of granting the subsidy in question. 
The reaction of a dumbfounded Louis Tobback was as follows: 
"Surely it is not true? In the French-speaking community? 
Ah!" Then, in a humorous tone, he said: "Because the national 
government would not do such a thing." 
  Admittedly, the subsidy awarded in 1993 was virtually 
symbolic: 90,000 Belgian francs [BFr], transferred to the 
Turkish Cultural Association, a nonprofit association located in 
Rue Josaphat. This association represents the orthodox wing of 
the Grey Wolves, which has always remained faithful to Colonel 
Alparslan Turkes. However, the subsidy the year before was at 
least double this amount. 
  This BFr90,000 subsidy in 1993 was the subject of veritable 
reports -- all the more so since it was called into question 
when the French-speaking community learned, in the course of an 
inspection, that the promised work had not been carried out 
properly. As a result, the association had to complete work on 
a grammar school, as well as work involving training and 
integration. The De Galan cabinet confirmed that the 
integration appeared not to have taken place as it should have 
according to the concern of the association. So why was it not 
simply withdrawn? Because the inspectors were supposedly 
uncertain that the association was a front for the Grey Wolves 
-- even though this is a fact of which the members of the 
association make no secret. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57923 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_b_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> BENELUX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Dailies Comment on Briquemont Resignation, UN Role </TI></H3>
<H4>   `Inconsistencies' Seen in Policy </H4>
<F P=102> BR0501131794 Antwerp GAZET VAN ANTWERPEN in Dutch 5 Jan 94 p 
2 </F>

<F P=103> BR0501131794 </F>
<F P=104>  Antwerp GAZET VAN ANTWERPEN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Dutch </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Commentary by Leo Custers: "The Generals and the </F>
Politicians"] 
  [Text] It is almost irrelevant whether or not General 
Francis Briquemont's resignation as UNPROFOR II [UN Protection 
Force] commander in Bosnia-Herzegovina is due to the "high 
stress level," as Defense Minister Delcroix put it, or to his 
plain criticism of the United Nations and the European Union 
[EU]. The fact remains that Gen. Briquemont is the third 
high-level military officer to have bluntly criticized the EU 
and UN ambiguity. French Gen. Philippe Morillon, his 
predecessor, was not mild in his criticism either, and thanks to 
his actions, which at some points ran counter to UN and EU 
directives, he became a hero to French public opinion. 
  Gen. Briquemont addressed his criticism to UN and EU 
diplomats, who vote one resolution after another but neglect to 
provide the means for their implementation. Deciding that the 
Muslim enclaves threatened by the Serbs should become "safe 
areas" is one thing; making sure that the necessary people and 
equipment are provided to effectively create "safe areas" is 
another. One more duty, providing emergency aid to the ailing 
population, has been made impossible by the lack of troops and 
supplies. Not to speak of the harassment from all parties to 
which the UN troops are not allowed to respond. Gen. Briquemont 
said with contempt that he no longer read the UN resolutions 
because they were useless. 
  French Gen. Jean Cot, commander of the UNPROFOR troops in 
the 
former Yugoslavia, was also very harsh. He attacked the 
diplomats sitting "in their Geneva palaces," while his troops 
had to do the actual fighting. Gen. Cot said he would no longer 
agree to allow his Blue Helmets to be helpless targets and 
hostages to the arbitrarily operating Serbian, Croatian, or 
Muslim militias in Bosnia. 
  Briquemont and Cot hold all warring parties in 
Bosnia-Herzegovina responsible for the harassment and 
humiliation, although the Serbs have been mentioned with more 
emphasis. 
  Grumbling generals are not uncommon. Generals at the 
frontline always complain about the gap between the words and 
the actions of politicians. As regards ex-Yugoslavia, however, 
dissatisfaction is very easy to understand. The inconsistencies 
between the decisions made by politicians and diplomats and the 
means available on the spot are obvious and have made many UN 
soldiers desperate. In France and Great Britain, suggestions 
have already been made to recall the Blue Helmets. EU mediator 
Lord Owen also stated that a withdrawal of UN troops might be 
considered if no substantial progress in the peace talks is made 
over the coming two months. 
  It was also suggested that, if the warring factions do not 
observe the UN resolutions more rigorously, "other means" should 
be sought. This may mean that the West is prepared to use 
stronger military means to implement the resolutions, or else -- 
and is not unthinkable either -- decide to withdraw all blue 
helmets from that hornet's nest. 
  For Belgian UN troops in Baranja, this would be the best 
thing to do. According to UN resolutions, UN troops were 
supposed to disarm the militias, make sure that the Croatian 
population was able to return home, and return the area under 
Serbian occupation to the authority of the Croatian state. As 
the situation is now, the Blue Helmets are indeed contributing 
to a consolidation of positions, although these favor the Serbs. 
In reality, UN troops are of no use in implementing UN 
resolutions, but they are an accessory in keeping an illegally 
occupying power in place. This cannot be the goal of a 
peacemaking operation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57924 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_b_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> BENELUX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Dailies Comment on Briquemont Resignation, UN Role </TI></H3>
<H4>   Real Mandate `Blurred' </H4>
<F P=102> BR0501152394 Brussels LE SOIR in French 5 Jan 94 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> BR0501152394 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels LE SOIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Commentary by Colette Braeckman: "The Honor of the Men on </F>
the Ground"] 
  [Text] A hot-tempered General Briquemont assures us that he 
no longer even reads the UN resolutions concerning the former 
Yugoslavia. Meanwhile, Gen. Cot says that if his pride can be 
set aside, then there will come a time when it is a matter of 
honor. Indeed, there is a feeling of lost honor among the men 
who, on the ground, are finding that they are impotent to 
correctly fulfil the mandate entrusted to them by the United 
Nations. 
  And yet, what mandate are we concerned with precisely? 
Creating safe areas? They are violated every day. Ensuring 
that the embargo imposed on Serbia is respected? European 
countries, and major ones at that, are suspected of bypassing it 
regularly. Protecting a Bosnian population under fire from 
snipers, or ensuring the provision of humanitarian aid? Every 
day, drivers of UN trucks -- some of them Belgians -- are 
confronted with fresh pitfalls and new obstacles which force 
them to negotiate and parley with people whom they would rather 
have wanted to prevent from causing harm. 
  The military assure us that they lack the means to carry out 
their mission. There is a shortage of personnel: At least 
50,000 men would be needed to guarantee the safe areas. There 
is a lack of training: How to handle endless arguments with 
village chiefs, whether in Bosnia or Somalia, is not yet taught 
at military academies. UN Secretary General Butrus Butrus-Ghali 
had an easy time replying to his critics back in 1992 when, in 
his "Agenda for Peace," he advocated creation of "peace 
enforcement units" which would be made available by relevant 
governments. Alas! Ever since he has had to make do with an 
administrative staff which only has an entirely relative 
authority over the contingents "loaned" to the United Nations. 
  In Somalia, it is from Rome -- not New York -- that the 
Italian soldiers take their orders; the Swedish troops in 
Yugoslavia follow the directives issued by Stockholm, while U.S. 
troops refuse to obey officers of other nationalities. 
Furthermore, the United Nations is faced with rising costs of 
peace missions: In Somalia, UNOSOM [UN Operation in Somalia] is 
reproached for having cost $1.5 billion. In Angola, on the other 
hand, where the UN commitment during the elections was 
inadequate, an interventionary force is now required: Upon his 
return from Luanda, [former Belgian Prime Minister] Martens 
estimated that 10,000 men would be needed -- but who should be 
sent? Who will pay the bill? If the United Nations, or more 
specifically the five permanent members of the Security Council, 
grumble about supporting a new intervention in Angola, Burundi, 
or even Zaire, then it will be precisely because Bosnia and 
Somalia have poured boiling water over any goodwill that there 
might have been. 
  The United Nations, which is expected to do great things but 
is often accused of performing very badly, is only an instrument 
of the policy -- or lack of policy -- of the international 
community. The real mandate of intervention -- imposing or 
maintaining peace, transporting humanitarian aid, disarming 
warring factions, protecting civil populations -- whether in 
Somalia or Bosnia -- is as blurred as the political will of the 
member states. Moreover, at the end of the day, the armed 
forces who are taking the risks and the humanitarian personnel 
who are making sacrifices have the uncomfortable feeling of 
being the screen destined to mask the incapability of leading 
politicians to zero in on the real problems and decide on 
genuine solutions. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57925 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_b_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> BENELUX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Martens Reports on Angola Visit, Calls For UN Troops </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0601125794 Antwerp DE FINANCIEEL-EKONOMISCHE TIJD in Dutch 
5 Jan 94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> BR0601125794 </F>
<F P=104>  Antwerp DE FINANCIEEL-EKONOMISCHE TIJD </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Dutch </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article signed FvdB: "Martens Says 10,000 UN Soldiers </F>
Needed for Peace in Angola"] 
  [Excerpt] Brussels (TIJD) -- Without the arrival of 10,000 
UN soldiers, there is no chance whatsoever of a durable peace 
agreement between UNITA [National Union for Total Independence 
of Angola] rebels and the Angolan MPLA [Popular Liberation 
Movement of Angola] Government, Wilfried Martens, EPP [European 
People's Party] chairman said. Martens was speaking after a 
visit to Angola, which is torn by a bloody civil war. New peace 
talks start today, but observers are pessimistic about their 
outcome. 
  Martens met various NGO's [nongovernmental organizations] in 
Angola, both in the capital Luanda and elsewhere. He stayed in 
Malenge, a town with 200,000 inhabitants and 120,000 refugees. 
Malenge is in the hands of government troops and surrounded by 
UNITA rebels. The town depends entirely on air links with 
Luanda for its supplies. Every day, eight Hercules aircraft 
bring food and medicine. The EPP chairman said this was not 
sufficient. 
  The women who leave Malenge in search of manioc risk walking 
on one of the many land mines. "I have seen innumerable victims 
walking round on crutches," Martens said. "After Afghanistan, 
Angola is the country with the most mines." 
  "UN officials say the conflict, which has already lasted 14 
months, was the worst one in 1993," Martens said. At least 
100,000 people died last year. The mortality rate in Angola is 
higher than in other armed conflicts in the world. The Angolan 
Government claims that the international community is ignoring 
the war. 
  "Since the civil war flared up again after the Cold War and 
the withdrawal of the Cubans and Soviets, it is a power struggle 
for control of the country," Martens said. Angola's soil is 
rich in diamonds and oil. Seventy percent of the land is 
eminently suitable for agriculture. Fishing is also an 
important source of income. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57926 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_b_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> BENELUX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Police Discover Arms Cache in Brussels Garage </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0501160494 Brussels LA LIBRE BELGIQUE in French 5 Jan 94 p 
1 </F>

<F P=103> BR0501160494 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels LA LIBRE BELGIQUE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report signed J.F.D.: "Arms Arsenal Found in Brussels"] </F>
  [Text] A weapons arsenal, including various rocket 
launchers, grenades, rifles, and explosives was discovered on 
Monday [3 January] by the BSR [Special Investigation Brigade] in 
a Brussels garage. The seizure was the result of a long 
investigation of acquaintances of Murat Kaplan, a major Belgian 
criminal who is now behind bars and, as is well-known, had 
escaped from Saint-Gilles Prison on 3 May 1993. He fled with 
the help of two accomplices: Patrick Haemers, who was recaptured 
first, and Basri Bajrami, who is still at large. Murat Kaplan 
was recaptured in Zellik on 15 May. 
  The discovery of this arsenal, which was only made possible 
by the close surveillance kept on Kaplan's girlfiend, clearly 
shows that the 31-year-old Kaplan, who is of Albanian origin, 
heads a well-organized gang. Did his "friends" hope to use the 
arms in support of Kaplan's umpteenth escape from prison? 
Kaplan is nicknamed the "prince of escapes?" 
  Kaplan is no longer the gentleman burglar, which he had been 
for some time. He is one of Belgium's most notorious criminals. 
The arms discovered supposedly were used during an attack on 
the Laeken police station, a reprisal for the the arrest of 
Philippe Lacroix. At the time of the attack, Kaplan had not 
been captured. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57927 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_b_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> BENELUX </F>
<F P=101> Netherlands </F>
<H3> <TI>   Lubbers Supports U.S. Position on NATO Expansion </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501175994 Hilversum Radio Netherlands in English 1730 GMT 
5 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> LD0501175994 </F>
<F P=104>  Hilversum Radio Netherlands </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Excerpt] Dutch Prime Minister Ruud Lubbers has expressed 
his full support of the American plan to gradually expand NATO 
by eventually allowing East European countries to join. Mr. 
Lubbers was speaking after a meeting with U.S. President Bill 
Clinton. He and several cabinet members are currently in 
Washington on an official two-day visit. 
  The prime minister's meeting with President Clinton, which 
was described as relaxed and friendly, mainly concentrated on 
NATO's expansion. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57928 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_e_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> UNITED KINGDOM </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hume Urges IRA `Moral Courage' in Peace Move </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0501125094 London THE DAILY TELEGRAPH in English 5 Jan 94 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> PM0501125094 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE DAILY TELEGRAPH </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Richard Savill: "Hume Challenges IRA To Make </F>
`Great Act of Moral Courage'"] 
  [Text] Belfast -- Pressure on Sinn Fein and the IRA to 
halt violence and to accept the Anglo-Irish peace declaration 
intensified last night after Mr John Hume, leader of the 
nationalist Social Democratic and Labour Party, said the reasons 
that Republicans gave for continuing the armed struggle no 
longer existed. 
  In his longest and most detailed statement on the Downing 
Street initiative, Mr Hume said the Republican movement was 
facing a challenge which amounted to "one of the greatest acts 
of moral courage this century." 
  Mr Hume urged the two governments to clarify parts of the 
declaration for Sinn Fein. He said: "If all that has to be done 
is to clarify certain parts of a certain document I would hope 
that both governments would do everything in their power to make 
clarification." 
  Both governments have said they would not meet Sinn Fein's 
demands for clarification until it renounces violence. 
  His comments appeared to be an attempt to keep alive the 
peace process in the face of the growing impatience of Unionists 
and the Government at Sinn Fein's continued failure to respond 
to the declaration and renounce violence. 
  In a five-page statement, Mr Hume, whose joint initiative 
with Mr Gerry Adams, Sinn Fein president, has played an 
important part in the peace process, said the document addressed 
the reasons for armed struggle given by the IRA. These were 
that the British were in Ireland defending their own interests 
by force -- economic and strategic interests -- and that they 
were preventing Irish people from exercising self-determination. 
  The Government had pledged it had "no selfish economic or 
strategic interest in Northern Ireland," and the Downing Street 
declaration also accepted the principle that Irish people have 
the right to decide their own future by agreement. 
  Mr Hume said the challenge facing all sides was that they 
should come to the negotiating table armed only with their 
convictions. 
  The republican movement was facing "one of the greatest acts 
of moral courage of this century. But it is moral courage that 
gives real leadership and that creates truly historic 
opportunity." 
  His deputy, Mr Seamus Mallon, accused republican leaders of 
putting out "contradictory" statements in response to the 
declaration. Mr Mallon added: "I have to believe that this is 
deliberate and that, in effect, there is an approach being taken 
by them (Sinn Fein) that is trying to confuse those who want to 
get the movement to peace accelerated." 
  Mr Adams and his deputy, Mr Martin McGuinness, have 
reiterated support for republican principles but have stopped 
short of outright rejection of the declaration. They appear to 
be trying to reassure hardline republicans that there will be no 
"sell-out" while indicating they see merit in the peace process. 
  As Sinn Fein continued to delay its formal response to the 
declaration and maintained it would "not be coerced into a hasty 
decision," Unionists warned the Government that there should be 
no "stretching or development" of the document. Mr James 
Molyneaux, Ulster Unionist party leader, said at Lisburn, Co 
Antrim, last night that the IRA's "not unexpected refusal to 
accept" the declaration "clears the way for a really effective 
antiterrorist campaign." 
  Mr Molyneaux added: "While Irish governments usually have 
little stomach for such decisive action, this time they have a 
moral duty to deny sanctuary to terrorists." 
  Mr Molyneaux said that Mr Hume was mistaken in his comments 
because the IRA had already rejected the declaration. "He 
seemed to say it would require great moral courage on the part 
of republicans to stop murdering people," Mr Molyneaux told the 
BBC. "I don't think it should require courage to do that. It 
is common Christian action." 
  An Ulster Volunteer Force parcel bomb was sent to the Sinn 
Fein offices in Dublin and another to AN PHOBLACHT, the 
republican newspaper. A bomb disposal officer lost part of his 
thumb and another was slightly hurt when a device exploded while 
being examined. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57929 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_e_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> UNITED KINGDOM </F>
<H3> <TI>   Arms Exporters Encouraged by Rifkind's Gulf Visit </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501183694 London PRESS ASSOCIATION in English 1225 GMT 5 
Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> LD0501183694 </F>
<F P=104>  London PRESS ASSOCIATION </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [By Charles Miller, PRESS ASSOCIATION defence correspondent] </F>
  [Text] Arms exporters' hopes of huge orders from the Gulf 
receive a major boost this week with a five-day visit to the 
region by Defence Secretary Malcolm Rifkind. 
  His trip to Saudi Arabia, Oman, Bahrain and Kuwait comes 
just 
weeks after Defence Procurement Minister Jonathan Aitken visited 
the region to promote defence equipment. 
  Brian Newman, defence analyst at London stockbrokers 
Henderson Crossthwaite said: "The Middle East remains the 
market with the highest spend and best prospects for British 
industry. It is encouraging that the current government is 
giving exporters so much support." 
  Britain has already clinched massive contracts in the 
region, 
spearheaded by the 20 billion pounds sterlin Al Yamamah deal 
with Saudi Arabia. And industry is chasing numerous lucrative 
new contracts, including Hawk aircraft, Challenger tanks and 
minehunters for Saudi Arabia, Piranha armoured personnel 
carriers, AS90 howitzers and Super Lynx helicopters for Kuwait, 
and more Super Lynxes for Oman. Saudi Arabia is also 
considering leasing the Royal Navy's 1 billion pounds sterling 
fleet of four new Upholder submarines. 
  Mr. Rifkind, who left today, said: "This will be my first 
visit to the Middle East for more than a year, and my first ever 
visit to Oman. 
  "The UK is fully committed to supporting security and 
stability in the Gulf region and I hope my visit over the next 
few days will be seen as further evidence of that resolve." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57930 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_p_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GREECE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Prime Minister, EU's Delors Give News Conference </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0501135594 Athens ET-1 Television Network in Greek 1130 
GMT 5 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> NC0501135594 </F>
<F P=104>  Athens ET-1 Television Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Greek </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [News conference by Greek Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou </F>
and Jacques Delors, president of the European Union Commission, 
at Zappion Palace in Athens--live; Delors speaks in French 
followed by Greek translation] 
  [Text] [Papandreou] We apologize for the delay but we had 
very little time. Our meeting with the EU [European Union] 
Commission was very productive. Following the discussions we 
had, we will finalize our program, which will be submitted in 
April of this year. I believe that it is a common assessment 
that Europe today is at a critical crossroads. The broader 
international and European milieu are characterized by 
instability, uncertainty, strong political developments, and 
bloody conflicts. The European economy is going through an 
extended crisis and recession. It is the worst crisis since 
World War II. Unemployment has reached unacceptable, explosive 
levels with an obvious danger of instability in our social 
structure and our democratic norms. 
  In general terms, this is the framework in which the Greek 
presidency is called upon to act during this third presidency, 
which our country now assumes. There is a need for more 
democratic and effective bonds, less bureaucracy, and greater 
decentralization of the decision-making process. There is a 
need to give the European Union the appropriate means to allow 
it to respond to its internal problems and face the big 
international challenges. There is a need to enforce our 
cohesiveness and coherence by respecting the national identities 
and particularities and the differences of opinion where they 
exist. 
  The European Union is a group of countries where each member 
has its own contribution to make to the European construction 
process. We need to bring the European Union closer to its 
citizens and maintain the model and tradition of the European 
society and be in a position to respond to the justified 
expectations of our citizens regarding the right to work and 
have satisfactory compensation. 
  The Greek presidency will also seek to use the existing 
framework and the capabilities offered. At the level of our 
internal development, our primary goal is to contribute to the 
efforts to deal with the recession and unemployment and to 
attempts to strengthen employment. We will base our efforts on 
the initiatives that have been undertaken thus far in this 
direction; the development initiatives adopted in Edinburgh and 
Copenhagen; the results of last European Council, which was very 
important; on the plan to fight unemployment we have adopted; as 
well as on the EU Commission's White Paper, especially after its 
unanimous acceptance by the 12 EU governments. We place 
particular importance on the ideas contained in the White Paper 
which, in our opinion, gradually overturn the philosophy of pure 
liberalism that prevailed in recent years. These ideas helped 
in the formation of a new development model where the local 
initiative, corporation, state, representative organizations and 
the European Union are called to play an important and 
supplementary role. 
  In foreign relations, we are called upon to complete the 
negotiations for the accession of Austria, Norway, Finland and 
Sweden by 1 March 1994. It is a very ambitious goal; and if 
needed, the negotiations will be speeded up and special summit 
meetings will be organized with the four prospective members. 
  In our presidency, we are also interested in the expansion 
of 
the European Union to the south. Therefore, we will pursue 
pre-accession talks with Cyprus and Malta. We are also 
interested in upgrading relations with the other Mediterranean 
countries. We will continue the joint action which began during 
the Belgian presidency. Yugoslavia occupies the highest 
priority. The Middle East issue also demands constructive 
support by the European Union. It has already been decided to 
hold an international conference in Rodhos during the spring of 
1994 for businessmen to identify development projects in the 
Middle East. We will also use the possibilities of preventive 
diplomacy by contributing to the preparatory conference that 
will take place in Paris in the spring in the CSCE framework. 
  Finally, the Greek presidency will continue the 
transatlantic 
dialogue beginning with the meeting of 11 January between the 
president of the European Council, the presidency of the 
European Union commission and the U.S. President. It should be 
noted that preelection campaign period for the European 
Parliament will begin a few months after the assumption of the 
EU presidency. This calls for the systematic implementation, 
and in some cases acceleration of our program, given the 
importance we all place on these elections. There could be a 
need to help the European Parliament in preparing for these 
elections. 
  Furthermore, allow me to say, outside the text, that the 
meeting between President Delors, the EU Commission members and 
the Greek Government was particularly important and satisfying, 
it was indeed productive. I believe that we have identical 
views on almost all issues, all points. Our goals are common 
and we hope to achieve them. Thank you. 
  [Delors] Ladies and Gentlemen, I will not use up the time 
for the questions. I just want to thank the prime minister and 
his government for their welcome and renew once again the 
message of friendship to the Greek people which I mentioned 
yesterday and say that the Greek people are a full member of the 
European family. 
  I think that this morning we have done a very good job. The 
European Union of course has a lot of problems, it has a lot of 
members, many partners; and we should set order and priorities. 
The White Paper should be followed as a framework for action in 
order to help the European economy with unemployment and other 
issues, including the European political, economic and monetary 
union; the common foreign policy and other issues; the issue of 
Yugoslavia; the issue of security in Europe and the 
Mediterranean; the Middle East issue; and finally the thoughts 
and ideas about a Greater Europe. 
  The Greek presidency has also added its desire to see 
European construction advancing, and I think that this term is 
beginning with a lot of confidence. During the summit meeting 
in Corfu we will discuss the various issues I mentioned in the 
framework of European action at the community level, but also at 
a national level. Thank you very much. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57931 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_p_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GREECE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Papandreou Views Talks; EC Visitors Depart </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0501191094 Athens Elliniki Radhiofonia Radio Network in 
Greek 1800 GMT 5 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> NC0501191094 </F>
<F P=104>  Athens Elliniki Radhiofonia Radio Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Greek </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Excerpts] Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou has described 
his cooperation with European Commission President Jacques 
Delors as productive, useful, and effective, adding that their 
views coincide. 
  The members of the Greek Government and the European 
Commission conferred today on the goals of the Greek Presidency 
and coordinating efforts to integrate the European Union. 
  Papandreou and Theodhoros Pangalos, who is presiding over 
the 
Foreign Ministers Council, referred to the priorities of the 
Greek Presidency, stressing that the prevailing issues are 
unemployment, implementing the Maastricht Treaty, expanding the 
European Union, and addressing the Balkan crisis. [passage 
omitted] 
  The European Commission's president and members left Athens 
this afternoon. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57932 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_p_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GREECE </F>
<H3> <TI>   _o_ Media Notes: ND Internal Dissent Viewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94P20170A </F>
<F P=103> 94P20170A </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
Article   Type:CSO 

  [Editorial Report] An article by Takis Mikhas in the 14 
December Athens left-of-center daily ELEVTHEROTIPIA discusses 
the two factions taking shape within the New Democracy (ND) 
party in opposition to new party leader Miltiadhis Evert. 
According to Mikhas, the factions have been nicknamed the 
"weasels" and the "porcupines." Among the "weasels" are 
included party officials who disagree with Evert's allegedly 
"soft" opposition to the Panhellenic Socialist Movement (PASOK) 
government. This group is not homogeneous, and encompasses 
extreme rightists such as ND deputy Kammenos, followers of 
former Minister of Defense Ioannis Varvitsiotis such as ND 
deputy Fani Palli-Petralia, and even a number of deputies who 
usually follow Evert's lead such as deputies Karatzaferis and 
Mikhaloliakos. The "weasel" faction's only common thread is 
hardline partisanship, defined by Mikhas as "protection of our 
own [ND] people." 
  The "porcupine" faction, which includes ND luminary Andreas 
Andrianopoulos, is more dissatisfied with what it perceives to 
be a lack of goals and principles in Evert's policy. This 
faction criticizes the spirit of the new party leadership and 
the "language" it uses, which it views as "passe" and "boring." 
According to Mikhas, "porcupines" are above all concerned that 
Evert is leading the party to ideological marginalization. 
  In the 14 December ELEVTHEROTIPIA, Yiannis Politis contends 
that ND opposition to Evert stems primarily from ideological 
differences. The free-market "liberal" faction headed by 
Andrianopoulos and former Minister of Finance Stefanos Manos 
openly disapproves of Evert's "popular capitalism" in which 
public companies remain in the hands of the state and his 
acceptance of "natural monopolies." A number of ND deputies 
also dissent from Evert's practice of "consensual politics" and 
would prefer a tougher stance against the government. Politis 
reports that one of these deputies, former Minister of Interior 
Yiannis Kefaloyiannis, never misses an opportunity to criticize 
Evert. An important source of intraparty discontent is Evert's 
refusal to discuss the reasons for the ND's defeat in the last 
parliamentary elections, Politis writes. The strongest internal 
attack against Evert, however, was the accusation leveled by 
former Minister of Foreign Affairs Mikhalis Papakonstandinou 
that the ND leader had failed to promote Greek interests on the 
Skopje/Macedonia issue during his first European appearance in 
Brussels. Evert's reaction to the accusation was swift, Politis 
reports. Papakonstandinou was stripped of all party functions 
and prerogatives. The move is seen as an attempt to squelch 
intraparty opposition and to abort the rise of contesting 
factions within the ND. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57933 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_p_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GREECE </F>
<H3> <TI>   _o_ Media Notes: Developments on Left Viewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94P20170B </F>
<F P=103> 94P20170B </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
Article   Type:CSO 

  [Editorial Report] 
<H6>  KKE Seeking Alliances </H6>
  The 20 December ELEVTHEROTIPIA reports that Communist Party 
(KKE) honorary chairman Kharilaos Florakis has declared that his 
party will seek alliances for the next municipal elections and 
will attempt to gain representation in the European Parliament 
in the June 1994 Euroelections. Florakis did not specify which 
political groups will be approached by the KKE, but stressed the 
need for any alliance to reach "agreement on a minimum program." 
<H5>  New Coalition Chairman </H5>
  N. Konstandopoulos was elected the new chairman of the 
Coalition of the Left for Progress at a 19 December meeting, an 
article in the 20 December ELEVTHEROTIPIA reports. This marks 
the first time the Coalition leader was elected by a party 
congress rather than by the central political committee. 
According to the report, Konstandopulos, who was born in 1942, 
was a member of the Democratic Defense organization during the 
junta period and was arrested by the junta in 1969. He was 
released in 1973. Konstandopulos was a member of PASOK 
[Panhellenic Socialist Movement] until 1973, when he was 
expelled because of his disagreement with PASOK policies. He 
ran in the June 1989 election as a Coalition candidate and 
served as minister of interior in the Tzannetaki multiparty 
government. He has been a Coalition at-large deputy since April 
1990. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57934 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_p_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GREECE </F>
<H3> <TI>   _o_ Greece: Military Command Changes </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94P20170C </F>
<F P=103> 94P20170C </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
Article   Type:CSO 

  [Editorial Report] An editorial in the 18 December 
ELEVTHEROTIPIA regrets the fact that each change of government 
is "inevitably" followed by a change in the Armed Forces' 
leadership that entails the return of retired officers to active 
duty and, conversely, the mass resignations of high-ranking 
officers from active duty. This was done by the previous New 
Democracy (ND) government and is being repeated by the new 
Panhellenic Socialist Movement (PASOK) government, the editorial 
maintains. According to the editorial, such moves destabilize 
the Armed Forces and waste highly trained manpower. The 
editorial quotes honorary National Defense General Staff 
(Geetha) chairman Gen Ioannis Verivakis as recommending that, as 
in other European countries, the leadership of the Greek Armed 
Forces should be appointed for at least a two-year period 
preceded by special training. Verivakis is also quoted as 
saying that we must cease thinking that a Papadhopoulos [junta 
leader] is lurking behind every officer's uniform." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57935 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_o_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> CYPRUS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Denktas Criticized Kliridhis on Defense Agreement </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  TA0501150394 Nicosia Bayrak Radio in Turkish 1130 GMT 5 Jan 
94 </F>

<F P=103> TA0501150394 </F>
<F P=104>  Nicosia Bayrak Radio </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Turkish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] President Rauf Denktas has concluded his contacts 
with representatives of the UN Security Council permanent member 
countries in Cyprus. 
  This morning, he separately received Chinese Ambassador Chen 
Zhenyou and French Ambassador Gerald Pavret de la Rochefordiere. 
He explained the Turkish position regarding the disarming of 
Cyprus. 
  In a statement after the meeting, Denktas said: The fact 
that Kliridhis announced that the agreement to sign a defense 
agreement with Greece was made in Greece, and the fact that he 
then offered the disarmament, tells the Turkish Cypriot side a 
lot of things; we must be very careful. 
  Denktas recalled that a former Greek Cypriot interior 
minister recently said there is a need to hoard some 20,000 to 
30,000 weapons. This means, Denktas said, that when the time 
comes, the EOKA [National Organization of Cypriot Fighters] 
movement will resume. Kliridhis' disarmament offer while this 
danger exists, reminds us of when Makarios returned the obsolete 
weapons to the British authorities in 1959, and then a year 
later, set up secret armies. People who went though those times 
must study the present proposals more carefully. The defense of 
the Turkish Cypriot side is bizonality, and its borders are 
being protected by Turkish troops today. 
  Denktas went on to say: We expect a change of mind and a 
change of heart from the the Greek Cypriot side. The Greek 
Cypriot government must stop the provocations of Greek Cypriot 
youths against Turkish Cypriots. If it cannot, then this must 
be done by the United Nations. 
  Denktas said he explained all these views to the Security 
Council officials who listened carefully and took notes. 
  Replying to a question, Denktas said that the Cyprus 
question 
is a national cause for Turkey and concerns the future of the 
Turkish Cypriots. Turkey has never used the Turkish Cypriots as 
a tool of compromise until now and will not do so in the future. 
Turkey is helping the Turkish Cypriots to ensure that a sound 
and equitable agreement is signed, in line with its own 
interests and those of the Turkish Cypriots. I am convinced 
that Turkey will continue to help us, Denktas said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57936 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_o_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> CYPRUS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Minister Welcomes Remarks by EC's Delors </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0501183194 Nicosia Cyprus Broadcasting Corporation Radio 
Network in Greek 1700 GMT 5 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> NC0501183194 </F>
<F P=104>  Nicosia Cyprus Broadcasting Corporation Radio 
Network </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Greek </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Foreign Minister Alekos Mikhailidhis described the 
statement by [EC Commissioner] Jacques Delors as encouraging and 
positive for Cyprus regarding both the Cyprus issue and the 
application for Cyprus' accession to the European Union. In a 
statement to CyBC [the Cyprus Brodcasting Corporation], 
Mikhailidhis said he hoped Delors would also actively support 
his positions, especially now, when Cyprus will seek to insure a 
date for opening negotiations on its accession to the Community. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57937 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_o_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> CYPRUS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Slovak Delegation Begins Official Visit </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0601092894 Nicosia Cyprus Broadcasting Corporation Radio 
Network in Greek 0835 GMT 6 Jan 93 </F>

<F P=103> NC0601092894 </F>
<F P=104>  Nicosia Cyprus Broadcasting Corporation Radio 
Network </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Greek </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] A large delegation from the Republic of Slovakia 
began a two-day official visit to Cyprus today. The delegation 
is headed by Foreign Minister Josef Moravcik. Economics 
Minister Jan Ducky is also a member of the Slovak delegation. 
This is the first visit by a high-ranking Slovak delegation to 
Cyprus since Czechoslovakia was dissolved a year ago. The visit 
is aimed at strengthening bilateral relations between Cyprus and 
Slovakia. The Cypriot side also wants to brief the visiting 
delegation on the latest developments in the Cyprus issue. 
Furthermore, both Cyprus and Slovakia are interested in 
developing close cooperation in the fields of trade and 
cooperation through European international organizations. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57938 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_q_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TURKEY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Demirel Cited on Foreign Issues, Election, PKK </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0501220494 Istanbul AYDINLIK in Turkish 29 Dec 93 p 11 </F>
<F P=103> NC0501220494 </F>
<F P=104>  Istanbul AYDINLIK </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Turkish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with President Suleyman Demirel by Hasan Yalcin </F>
in Ankara; date not given] 
  [Text] [Yalcin] Did Turkey's defense concept change? Did 
the concept of a threat change following changes in Russia? 
  [Demirel] No. Of course Turkey assessed the possibility of a 
threat following changes in the Soviet Union. Since Soviet 
Russia no longer exists, it was concluded that while the threat 
from the former Soviet Union has vanished, it has been 
supplanted by uncertainties. Turkey did not make this 
assessment alone; it consulted its allies. 
  But, the assessment of a threat is Turkey's own evaluation. 
The assessment made with others was simply consultation to 
enable us to make a correct assessment. 
  Changes took place in Russia. And, while Russia is no longer 
a threat to the world, there is uncertainty. Where will things 
end because of this uncertainty? Uncertainty is as serious as a 
threat. The case of Zhirinovskiy has shocked the world. There 
are aspects about it that have not been covered in our press. 
What will happen now? The world has not figured out where 
Zhirinovskiy and his policies will end. How will this popular 
movement and Zhirinovskiy's views affect the Russian Government? 
No one knows. But our defense system is flexible. It could 
readjust at any time. Of course, a new assessment of a threat 
will be made eventually. I believe the General Staff will brief 
us on this issue in the first week of January. 
  [Yalcin] Assuming Turkey can engage in political activity 
over a wider area when there are two superpowers, will the new 
situation benefit Turkey? Can Turkey act more freely if 
Zhirinovskiy makes further claims against the West? 
  [Demirel] It doesn't much look that way. Zhirinovskiy's 
views, first, are targeted against Turkey and Central Asia. Let 
us put it this way: Zhirinovskiy is the mouthpiece of a group 
of people who are uncomfortable with the dissolution of the 
Soviet Union, although how his utterances could be put into 
practice is something different. These are people who want to 
revive the empire, although not in its excessive communist form, 
which can't be done. Already, there are nearly 30 million 
Russians outside Russia. Russia openly expressed its interest 
in these people in the near abroad. The Russians make up 38 
percent of Kazakhstan. They constitute 20 percent in 
Kyrgyzstan. Efforts to recreate the Russian empire have 
considerably unsettled officials in these republics. They 
already had such fears. 
<H5>  Change in Essence of Relations With Iran </H5>
  [Yalcin] Looking at the Middle East, are we seeing a change 
in the essence of the relations among Turkey, Iran, and Syria or 
is this a simple improvement in ordinary relations? There have 
been reports of late that joint operations could be undertaken 
in Iran and Iraq and that signs in this direction are being 
observed. Was this a qualitative jump? 
  [Demirel] There is some information to the effect that the 
PKK [Workers Party of Kurdistan] has settled in Iran. These 
were rumors for a while and Iran rejected them. Later, the 
situation was explained to Iran. Incidents that might have 
happened over there would have concerned them. Upon that, a 
major rapprochement took place. I held a long conversation with 
Hashemi-Rafsanjani in Tehran last year. I also held a long 
conversation with him when he visited Istanbul for the ECO 
[Economic Cooperation Organization] meeting. Our foreign 
minister went to Iran and their's came here. All these things 
are good, but there is also an agreement that goes back to 1932. 
If they [the PKK] are there, let us launch an operation against 
them. We have reached the point of joint operation. 
  [Yalcin] Is this, that is, the joint operation, something 
for 
the coming months? 
  [Demirel] But an improvement is obvious. [as published] 
  [Yalcin] What about the last three visits? 
  [Demirel] These were scheduled visits. Their foreign 
minister could come at any time. First Vice President Habibi 
had to pay a return visit for my visit, but it was then 
postponed following the assassination of Ugur Mumcu. It was 
said that the Iranians were behind it, which upset them. 
<H5>  Multilateral Diplomacy Between U.S. and Europe </H5>
  [Yalcin] Where does Turkey stand with the United States and 
Europe? Does it regard them as one single entity or follow a 
policy that recognizes differences between them? 
  [Demirel] Turkey has been pursuing a multilateral policy 
since 1965. This policy has not changed even with the change of 
governments. This is not a policy with ties to any one place. 
It is tied to Turkey's obligations. It is free where it has no 
obligations. But, it does not use this freedom to the detriment 
of what it sees as friendly countries. This is because we have 
had good relations with both Europe and the United States. 
  [Yalcin] Also with the Soviet Union? 
  [Demirel] Yes, we also had good relations with Russia and 
have good relations with the present Russia, and we do not want 
these relations to suffer. We signed a friendship and 
cooperation agreement with Russia. Last year, Yeltsin told me 
that "this is a very important development." This is not mere 
friendship but also a cooperation agreement. These are 
important for Russia. What we are saying is this: If the United 
States, Russia, and Turkey forged good cooperation, they would 
form the backbone of world peace. 
  [Yalcin] Do you see a threat in Zhirinovskiy against 
Yeltsin? 
That is, are the two very different? 
  [Demirel] Yeltsin made no mention or allusion to 
Zhirinovskiy's views. 
  [Yalcin] Or to the CFE [Conventional Armed Forces in Europe] 
agreement. 
  [Demirel] That is something else. 
  [Yalcin] Is Yeltsin not also expansionist towards Central 
Asia as evinced by his stance on Armenian-Azeri problem? 
  [Demirel] At present they do not have the strength for it. 
If a reasonable person gets involved in a number of imprudent 
ventures then he will further exhaust himself. I think Yeltsin 
and people around him are wise enough to make the proper choice. 
  [Yalcin] But, you do not say the same thing about 
Zhirinovskiy. 
  [Demirel] No. I am not saying that Zhirinovskiy is 
brainless, but from our and world's viewpoint he is an 
adventurist. 
<H5>  PKK Issue Has Been Given Serious Consideration Since 1989 </H5>
  [Yalcin] I will ask a question concerning the PKK. For the 
last ten years there have been promises to the effect that this 
problem would be eradicated. You too expressed similar views. 
Has there been a tragic turn to the events now? What is the 
difference between the new assertion and the previous ones? 
And, while making this assertion, what material conditions do 
you have in mind? 
  [Demirel] There is no difference. The PKK is a state problem 
for Turkey. No matter what country you are talking about, if 
armed people of its own nationality or from another country take 
to the mountains and start killing five-month old babies, women, 
and girls, and martyrs its soldiers guarding the borders, it has 
only one choice: to neutralize them. How could they be 
neutralized? There is only one, and not two ways, of doing it. 
That is, Turkey has a Constitution whose Articles 120 and 122 
define this subject and state what to do if such a war erupts. 
What is required by these articles will be done. 
  [Yalcin] I know your approach. My question is what factors 
shaped the state's present conviction that it will eradicate 
this problem after ten years? 
  [Demirel] There is this talk about ten years, but the 
incidents were not considered serious or grave at the beginning. 
  [Yalcin] Is this problem being given serious consideration 
for the first time now? 
  [Demirel] Not for the first time. After a while its 
importance was realized. It was after 1989. 
  [Yalcin] But, is this realization at a new stage, that is, 
will a different type of struggle be waged? 
  [Demirel] No matter which government comes to power it has 
to 
show the same determination that the 49th government headed by 
me and the present 50th government have shown. Any other 
government cannot be the government of this state. 
  [Yalcin] New forces and measures are being introduced. Are 
these the foundation of this determination? 
  [Demirel] These are security measures. There is no political 
aspect to it. 
<H3>  "No One Can Run in the Name of the PKK, for the State Knows 
Everything" </H3>
  [Yalcin] You made a statement on local elections. Could you 
clarify it? You said that the PKK candidates will be prevented 
from running. What is the legal way to prevent it? That is, 
how are you going to do that? 
  [Demirel] Could a PKK candidate run in an election? 
  [Yalcin] How are you going to weed out such people since 
their being PKK is not written on them? 
  [Demirel] What I want to say is this: If a PKK member runs 
in these elections and wins it would be tantamount to a 
plebiscite. The PKK is a criminal organization, a terrorist 
group. Could a state, while struggling against the criminal and 
terrorist group, also allow its members to run in the elections? 
When the time comes, measures against it will be thought out. 
  [Yalcin] Is there a legal measure before the start of the 
elections? 
  [Demirel] No, there is no legal way to sift out such people 
before the elections. But if a candidate says "I am a PKK 
member," or is engaged in such propaganda, then the state will 
take care of it. Could a state ever allow members of a crime 
syndicate to run in elections? Could the state forces, which 
pursue the bandits in the mountains, allow the members of that 
bandit group to come down to the cities and run in elections? 
  [Yalcin] There might be legal measures if the state knows 
these people. 
  [Demirel] It knows, it knows. The state knows everything. 
Of course there is also the following case: The elections 
cannot be presented as a plebiscite if a candidate has not 
entered the elections in the name of the PKK and has not openly 
declared himself affiliated to it but later announces that he is 
a PKK member. 
  [Yalcin] Simply because he has not stated this at the 
beginning? 
  [Demirel] This is not possible by merely stating that 
elections were tantamount to a plebiscite. 
<H5>  "Postponement of Elections Will Create Panic" </H5>
  [Yalcin] It is being said that there is an ongoing huge 
refugee problem and that the number of electors has fallen in 
the region. Figures are being issued, and it is even being said 
that "this trend is being encouraged a bit [by the state]." Did 
you hear about this? 
  [Demirel] Yes, we now know how many people have moved out of 
their places. Nearly 678 villages and hamlets have been 
partially or completely vacated. But then there are more than 
4,000 villages and hamlets there. The partially and completely 
vacated villages and hamlets amount to 15 percent. Most of the 
people from these villages have come to Diyarbakir, Batman and 
such places. They came to cities. They went to Sirnak and 
Cizre. That is, this will not alter the election balances in the 
region. 
  [Yalcin] That is, does there exist a normal electoral 
quantity? 
  [Demirel] Even if not normal, it is not at the level of 
altering the balances. 
  [Yalcin] You consider elections possible under the present 
conditions. But there are also those who say that we should not 
hold elections under these conditions and instead start thinking 
of constitutional measures. 
  [Demirel] Postponing elections only in that region would 
show 
a weakness in the Turkish state. 
  [Yalcin] Could a general postponement be considered? 
  [Demirel] No, because these elections are set for every five 
years. 
  [Yalcin] What about a constitutional amendment? 
  [Demirel] What reason should we give for a constitutional 
amendment? 
  [Yalcin] Let us first ensure peace, as the present situation 
does not look pretty. 
  [Demirel] It [the postponement of elections] would create 
panic in the world and in Turkey. That is, it would be exactly 
what the terrorists want. 
<H5>  Hizbullah and Unsolved Murders </H5>
  [Yalcin] When we were still publishing the magazine 2000 
IKIBIN'E DOGRU, I asked you. I hen conveyed to you fresh 
reports, and at the time you told me that such organizations are 
illegal and that you are opposed to such things. You are now 
the head of state and an influential organization is active over 
there. I am talking about Hizbullah, which is based in the east 
and southeast. What can you say on this issue? 
  [Demirel] The state is closely watching this organization. 
The state cannot make concessions to illegal activities. There 
cannot be a state where some enjoy the right to commit lawless 
acts and some are charged with criminal offenses if they act 
lawlessly. We are watching them very closely. 
  [Yalcin] You might have heard, but it is being said that the 
state is making use of Hizbullah to balance out the PKK. 
  [Demirel] Such a claim is wrong. 
  [Yalcin] But there have been many complaints in this 
direction in Batman. 
  [Demirel] There is no such case. 
  [Yalcin] There are hundreds of unsolved murders in Batman. 
  [Demirel] Unfortunately, all these are interconnected. I am 
following the case of unsolved crimes very closely. 
  [Yalcin] Are satisfied with the things that are being done 
to 
solve these problems? You are at the helm of the state and yet 
such things are taking place in the country you run. 
  [Demirel] It would be very wrong if I were to say that I am 
not concerned about what is happening in Turkey. I am very 
concerned. But since the state has no other alternative than its 
present course of action, then it should do what it is already 
doing but do it better and get results. I am telling you openly 
that in my former capacity as prime minister and in my present 
capacity as the head of the National Security Council I told all 
the state organs that the unsolved crimes should be solved. 
Otherwise, there will be an inclination to blame them on the 
state. I am following this problem very closely. It is being 
tackled in a positive manner. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57939 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_h_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> GERMANY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Spokesman Rejects Swift NATO Expansion to East </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501170494 Berlin DDP/ADN in German 1516 GMT 5 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> LD0501170494 </F>
<F P=104>  Berlin DDP/ADN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Bonn (DDP/ADN) -- In the run-up to the NATO summit 
due to take place in Brussels next week, the Federal Government 
has once again rejected calls by Central and East European 
states for speedy NATO membership. Government spokesman Dieter 
Vogel told reporters today in Bonn that the term "expansion" of 
NATO is "at present clearly not quite the best choice." Bonn 
supports the concept of a "partnership for peace," namely, close 
cooperation with those states beyond the rules of the European 
Cooperation Council [as received]. 
  The modalities of this cooperation in the security field "up 
to and including joint peace missions, joint training, and joint 
exercises" will be discussed in Brussels. The Federal 
Government is committed to "intensifying" cooperation with the 
partners of the NATO Cooperation Council "in a further-reaching 
partnership for peace." It is not yet possible to name specific 
schedules, criteria, and candidates for this "process." Vogel 
expressed understanding for the concern of the Warsaw leadership 
that Poland cannot be admitted to NATO swiftly. However, the 
situation is "less dramatic" than Polish President Lech Walesa 
is stating. 
  At the NATO summit to be held in Brussels this Monday and 
Tuesday [10-11 January], the Federal Government will be 
represented by Foreign Minister Klaus Kinkel (Free Democratic 
Party) in addition to Chancellor Helmut Kohl (Christian 
Democratic Union). Vogel is not yet able to say whether Kohl 
will meet U.S. President Bill Clinton for talks at the margins 
of the summit. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57940 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004cc_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTER-EUROPEAN AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   * European Social Democrats Present Unemployment Report </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94EN0182A Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER in Swedish 8 Dec 93 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 94EN0182A </F>
<F P=104>  Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Swedish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Guest commentary by former Finance Minister Allan Larsson, </F>
chairman of European Social Democratic working group on 
unemployment: "Strengthen European Cooperation; Opportunity To 
Combat Unemployment in Europe Is Greater Than Believed"] 
  [Text] The growing unemployment in Europe is due primarily 
to a structural problem of the labor market, very low demand, 
and a lack of cooperation in taking advantage of the potential 
inherent in an integrated European economy. Political measures 
are called for that can stimulate economic activity and promote 
investment in the economy, which is in reality independent of 
the rest of the world. This is the opinion of Allan Larsson, who 
headed a joint working group for the European Social Democratic 
Party on combating unemployment. He presents the group's 
conclusions. 
  Is it possible to garner broad support for a new economic 
policy that unites West Europe in the struggle against mass 
unemployment? Or are we so divided that there can be no hope for 
gathering the necessary forces? 
  There are at least some positive signs. In early 1993, 
Jacques Delors and the Danish Government under Paul Nyrup 
Rasmussen, which at that time held the chairmanship of the EC, 
placed the battle against unemployment high on the European 
agenda. The summit meeting in Copenhagen in June was a small but 
important step forward. Work on Delors' white paper has focused 
political attention this fall on Europe's greatest 
misfortune--the fact that more than 20 million people are out of 
work, half of them for more than a year. 
  But the public debate gives the impression that there is a 
deep split. On one hand, there are those who cherish the 
laissez-faire mentality that led Europe into this crisis of mass 
unemployment. They simply offer more of the same, a fine tuning 
of the neoliberal policy with deregulation, reduced government 
responsibility, and increased insecurity. On the other hand, 
there is a growing number of people--ordinary citizens who are 
deeply concerned, perceptive economists, conscientious 
politicians--who regard the present situation as so serious that 
they want to see a thorough analysis and rethinking of the 
policy that led to this record level unemployment. They want a 
total new direction, not just fine tuning of the present policy. 
  In order to promote the need for new ideas, new directions, 
and innovative measures, Willy Claes in Belgium, Felipe Gonzalez 
in Spain, Franz Vranitzky in Austria, Wim Kok in the 
Netherlands, Ingvar Carlsson and all of the other party leaders 
of the European Social Democratic Party (PES) initiated a 
comprehensive program--The European Employment Initiative. Under 
my leadership during the fall, the study group worked with 
leading economists in Europe, with Delors and his colleagues on 
the EC Commission, and with experts in diverse national organs. 
In connection with this work, I visited 15 countries in West 
Europe in order to gain some insight into various national 
situations and to obtain advice on designing a new policy on 
full employment. 
  We have now handed over the report, entitled "Put Europe 
Back 
to Work," to the chairman of the PES [Social Welfare Committee], 
Belgian Foreign Affairs Minister Willy Claes, who is also 
chairman of the EC Council of Ministers, and to all of the other 
party leaders. The report will provide the basis for their 
discussions and resolution at a meeting in Brussels tomorrow 
(Thursday), the day before the European summit meeting. 
  We concentrated upon Europe's two major economic threats: 
mass unemployment and the growing deficit in public finances. 
These two problems are closely related and must be approached 
through a common economic policy. 
  We posed five questions in the quest for answers concerning 
the high and growing unemployment: Is unemployment due to trade 
and overwhelming international competition? To new technology 
that replaces jobs? To an imbalance between savings and 
investment, that is to say, a lack of demand? Or is it 
sluggishness in the labor market that prevents Europe from 
increasing its rate of growth sufficiently to push down 
unemployment? Or is it due to an antagonism between the 
integrated European economy that we have created and the fact 
that every country continues to conduct its own national policy? 
  We have come to the conclusion that answers can be found in 
all five areas, but mostly in the last three mentioned: 
structural problems in the labor market, faltering demand, and 
the lack of a coordinated policy to take advantage of the 
integrated European economic potential. 
  I will present a few facts that will open new perspectives 
on 
what can and should be done. 
  The European countries, the EC and EFTA [European Free Trade 
Association] nations, are economically so closely interwoven 
that we now have in practice a single integrated European 
economy. This integrated economy is surprisingly independent of 
the rest of the world. No less than 93 percent of all investment 
and all consumption stems from production in West Europe. Only 7 
percent is derived from imports from other parts of the world. 
This tells us that there is much more scope than is generally 
imagined for a concerted action that promotes growth and creates 
new jobs. This tells us also that there is a greater need for 
free trade than is generally believed. 
  Our integrated European economy is currently suffering from 
weak demand on the one hand and structural problems in the labor 
market on the other. There is a gap between investment and 
financial savings in the private sector on the order of 6 
percent of GNP, a lag in demand representing 8 to 9 million jobs. 
  The surplus of financial savings, which in reality is an 
expression for a deficit in real savings, or investment, has a 
flip side, namely a deficit in public finances that currently 
amounts to 6 to 7 percent of GNP. 
  The weakness in economic activity in the private sector is 
the source of the deficit in the public sector. When jobs 
disappear and unemployment rises, public finances are undermined 
from two directions: Expenditures grow and revenues weaken. The 
underlying structural deficit mirrors a second structural 
problem: long-term unemployment and cuts in social services. 
  We concluded from this and other factors that a program of 
action is needed that in magnitude and duration diverges 
radically from all that has been tried and discussed before. 
Such a new economic policy for full employment must have two 
pillars: investment in business and investment in education and 
skills. 
  Above all, Europe needs more businessmen, more businesses, 
and greater investment in the private sector. Political measures 
designed to stimulate economic activity play a decisive role in 
creating confidence in the future and interest in investment. We 
wish to generate as many confidence-creating measures as 
possible through monetary policy. We suggest that ECOFIN [EC 
Council of Economic and Finance Ministers], that is, the EC's 
economic and finance ministers, as well as EMI [European 
Monetary Institute], the new monetary institute, mount a 
concerted action to bring down interest rates in Europe. Low 
interest rates make productive investments more profitable and 
promote a balance between savings and investment, a key 
objective of monetary policy. 
  A new economic policy--based upon investment in business, 
research and development, infrastructure, housing, and urban 
renewal--is necessary but not sufficient. It is just as 
necessary to deal with the structural problems in the labor 
market, the lack of correspondence between the demand for 
training and job skills on the one hand and the range and 
quality of education on the other. Europe has a labor market 
that is out of phase due to the fact that demand for labor 
changes quickly as a result of new technology and international 
competition, while change is slow in the educational system, 
which is not organized for the new job market. 
  Thus we propose joint initiatives aimed at forcefully 
increasing investment in training and job skills. We would like 
to increase quality and capacity by an additional 5 million 
places in education, job training, retraining, and skill level 
development. An investment such as this will impact 
approximately 2.5 percent of the work force and will have very 
positive, long-term effects on growth and immediate effects on 
the battle against unemployment. 
  A new economic policy for full employment--with the object 
of 
first and foremost creating jobs in the private sector--is the 
most important measure for revitalizing healthy public finances. 
Cutting unemployment in half will go far in helping to balance 
Europe's national budgets. 
  Our program "Put Europe Back to Work" is based upon the 
simple but fundamental insight that work is a greater 
contribution to economic and social progress than unemployment 
is. It is also based upon the insight that Europe has an 
enormous potential for growth through the mobilization of 
people's desire and ability to work and create new resources. It 
is high time for joint action, for a collective policy that 
builds not on the limitations of national economies, but on the 
great possibilities that an integrated European economy offers. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57941 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_j_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ITALY &amp; VATICAN CITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   DC's Bianco Confirms Confidence in Ciampi </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401120994 Rome L'UNITA in Italian 4 Jan 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> BR0401120994 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome L'UNITA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Italian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Gerardo Bianco, Christian Democratic Party </F>
floor leader in the Chamber of Deputies, by unidentified 
correspondent in Rome; date not given: "Bianco: `We Need a Few 
More Weeks'"] 
  [Text] Rome -- [L'UNITA] Deputy Bianco, what will the DC 
[Christian Democratic Party] delegation tell the prime minister 
this morning? 
  [Bianco] First of all, we will confirm our confidence in 
him. We simply need to stress that our group is the one that has 
been most consistent in supporting his government and his 
policies, up to and including the approval of the Finance Bill, 
even if it meant we had to make unpopular decisions. 
  [L'UNITA] Yes, but are there not many DC signatories to the 
no-confidence motion as well? 
  [Bianco] Many colleagues have already clarified the reason 
they signed. They were afraid that parliament would be 
dissolved without them being consulted, and we would not have 
accepted that. Others, like [Democratic Party of the Left 
Secretary] Occhetto, felt such consultation to be superfluous, 
whereas for us it is not superfluous at all. Many of the 
signatures on the motion can be explained by the conviction that 
it was the only tool likely to bring about a parliamentary 
debate. Besides, even [Radical leader] Pannella today confirmed 
his confidence in Ciampi. 
  [L'UNITA] But Pannella also wants a second Ciampi 
government. 
  [Bianco] Nobody can stop him asking for another government; 
the important thing is that we confirm our confidence. Pannella 
also raises some serious questions, such as the possiblity, for 
example, that Ciampi's ministers might take sides with one or 
the other of the alliances taking the field in the forthcoming 
elecion campaign. 
  [L'UNITA] Are there any conditions attached to your 
confirmation of confidence? 
  [Bianco] We want the parliamentary debate to confirm 
confidence in Ciampi and the legislative term to continue for a 
few weeks more, although ideally we are in favor of the general 
election being held in June, at the same time as the European 
elections. 
  [L'UNITA] Why? 
  [Bianco] In these few weeks -- and I am talking about three 
or four, until 10 February -- we could address the modification 
to Article 138 of the Constitution, the right of Italians abroad 
to vote, the Court of Accounts, the modification to the 
preventive custody law, and the law on public contracts. Many 
of these laws have already reached the legislative stage in 
their respective parliamentary committees. And in any case the 
tax decree and the decree on RAI [Italian State Broadcasting 
Corporation] must be approved by a parliament in the fullness of 
its powers. 
  [L'UNITA] So, in your view, the Ciampi government did not 
finish its job with the election laws and the Finance Bill. Are 
you asking for a renegotiation of the program? 
  [Bianco] The fact that the government passed two decrees at 
the end of the year means that it sees them as essential for 
this legislative term. 
  [L'UNITA] What if Ciampi were not to play ball? 
  [Bianco] I think that is unlikely, because Ciampi has always 
been very respectful toward the will of parliament. We hope to 
gain the agreement of all the groups. We are not going to cling 
stubbornly to our position; we are prepared to discuss things 
with others. We are asking for agreement to be reached over the 
dissolution of parliament and for the essential things to get 
done in the meantime. That is the position we are putting 
forward. 
  [L'UNITA] Is it a position you need to adopt in order to 
quell internal dissent? 
  [Bianco] We have faith in our colleagues' sense of 
discipline. I have summoned a meeting of the DC group in the 
lower house for 11 January, and that is when I will ask for 
confidence in Ciampi to be confirmed. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57942 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_e_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> UNITED KINGDOM </F>
<H3> <TI>   Daily Would Welcome East Europe in NATO </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0601130694 London THE DAILY TELEGRAPH in English 6 Jan 94 
p 16 </F>

<F P=103> LD0601130694 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE DAILY TELEGRAPH </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Editorial: "NATO Looks East"] </F>
  [Text] For the first time since the Cold War began, the 
American administration appears to accord greater priority to 
its relationship with Russia than with the nations of West and 
East Europe. This approach is embodied by President Clinton's 
proposals for the future of the Atlantic Alliance, which he will 
present to the NATO summit in Brussels next week. For fear of 
agitating nationalist elements in Russia--and thus jeopardising 
President Yeltsin's reform programme--the former Warsaw Pact 
countries are to be denied any immediate prospect of the 
security guarantees they covet. Instead of clear criteria for 
eventual membership of NATO, they are to be offered the far 
vaguer "Partnerships for Peace." This consolation prize will be 
available to all former Warsaw Pact countries, irrespective of 
their ultimate suitability for membership. 
  There are excellent reasons for rejecting the notion of 
granting every East European state immediate admission to NATO. 
One of the foremost lessons of modern history is the folly of 
offering security guarantees which the guarantors lack both the 
means and the will to implement. But, as the East European 
nations emerge from the shadow of their communist past and 
democratic societies evolve, they deserve every encouragement to 
believe that the West will welcome them into the fold. 
  We have always urged that the European Community should 
adopt 
a more positive policy towards trade with the east. Yet 
Washington's current policy, however well-intentioned, threatens 
to undo many of the gains of the democratic revolutions of 1989. 
Not only is it unwise to predicate the security of such 
countries as Hungary upon events in Russia, where democratic 
development is far less certain; it even seems unlikely to 
succeed in its own flawed terms. To "defeat" Mr Vladimir 
Zhirinovskiy by stealing some of his clothes--as the New Year 
message from the Kremlin seemed to imply--is no basis for the 
future stability of the continent. 
  Moreover, to concede Russia droit de regard in East Europe 
will strengthen, rather than weaken, irredentist elements. 
Partly because of a consistent "Russia first" policy towards 
the region, hardline forces of the military-industrial complex 
are now stronger than at any time since the collapse of the 
Soviet Union. Yet the precedent of German re-unification within 
NATO suggests that a determined American policy to extend the 
zone of stability eastwards is not merely reconcilable with 
Western interests; it would also enable democrats in Moscow to 
tell the neo-communists and Slavophiles that Western policy 
offers no choice but continued reform, or renewed confrontation. 
The present American approach simply offers Mr Yeltsin an easy 
way out vis-a-vis the parliament. They know that Mr Clinton will 
support them, come what may. 
  None of this is to suggest that Russia should be 
quarantined; even the Polish foreign minister has asserted that 
a democratic Russia is the best guarantee for European 
stability. But the question is how best to bring this about. 
We have persistently argued that the example of prosperous and 
free neighbouring states would do as much as anything to steer 
Russia's development in a positive direction. The nations of 
East Europe are far likelier to maintain this course if a 
realistic prospect is opened up of eventual full partnership 
with the West. NATO remains the only viable structure for 
assuring their security. For, important as the European 
Community is in economic terms, it is still--in the words of the 
Belgian foreign minister during the Gulf war--a political dwarf 
and a military worm. Mr Clinton's performance on his first 
visit, as president, to Europe will be as vital as those of his 
predecessors in the Cold War epoch. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57943 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_q_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TURKEY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ciller's Talks With Clinton Previewed; PKK Developments </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  NC0601090694 Istanbul HURRIYET in Turkish 3 Jan 94 p 19 </F>
<F P=103> NC0601090694 </F>
<F P=104>  Istanbul HURRIYET </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Turkish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Column by Ertugrul Ozkok: "The Days That Will Decide the </F>
PKK's Fate"] 
  [Excerpt] Internal Affairs Minister Nahit Mentese will 
leave for Syria in the next few days. Police Director General 
Mehmet Agar was supposed to visit that country two weeks ago. 
However, it was decided that Mentese should visit Damascus 
instead. The visit will be important for Turkey and Syria 
because relations between the two countries have reached a 
crucial point. Turkey and Syria previously promised to help 
each other on security matters. It is now time to implement 
what has been promised. 
<H5>  PKK Leader Ocalan's Press Conference </H5>
  Turkey recently received unconfirmed reports from Syria that 
indicate that Workers Party of Kurdistan [PKK] leader Abdullah 
Ocalan is under some kind of custody. Meanwhile, it is common 
knowledge that Kemal Burkay, secretary general of the Kurdistan 
Socialist Party, who is in northern Iraq, has not been able to 
secure a visa from Damascus to visit Syria. A more interesting 
report is that Damascus has prevented Semdin Sakik, one of PKK's 
most important militants in Turkey, from holding talks with 
Abdullah Ocalan in Syria. 
  All this indicates that Ocalan's freedom has been restricted 
and that the state of affairs has placed the PKK in a difficult 
position. Two weeks ago, it was announced that Abdullah Ocalan 
would hold a press conference, but he has not done so in the 
last two weeks. 
  Ocalan will not find it easy to hold a press conference 
because Turkish intelligence units are watching his activities 
closely. He will find it difficult to maintain his security 
when he leaves his hideout. In view of that, he can only hold a 
press conference under Syria's protection. 
  Reports were received some time ago that Ocalan planned to 
hold a press conference in northern Iraq, but northern Iraq is 
not a safe place for him. This is a fact. For Ocalan, only 
Patriotic Union of Kurdistan leader Jalal Talabani is a friendly 
force in northern Iraq. It is common knowledge that Democratic 
Party of Kurdistan leader Mas'ud Barzani and his supporters are 
not friendly with Ocalan. In view of that, it would be 
difficult for Ocalan to cross into northern Iraq to hold a press 
conference. 
<H5>  The Ciller-Clinton-al-Asad Triangle </H5>
  Nahit Mentese's visit to Damascus will take place at a 
critical time. Turkey wants to be informed about Ocalan's 
situation. 
  Prime Minister Tansu Ciller said last week that her 
government may resume the shuttle diplomacy between Turkey and 
Syria. This indicates that special envoys may be dispatched to 
Damascus. 
  Meanwhile, a statement by the prime minister and the 
officials around her has generated attention. They said that 
"the Ocalan problem will definitely be resolved." What has made 
them feel so confident that the Ocalan problem will be resolved? 
Regardless of how the matter is viewed, it is a fact that 
certain developments are taking place behind the scenes. 
  The Ciller government has an important diplomatic program. 
If all goes well, Nahit Mentese is expected to visit Damascus 
this week. He will return with firsthand information. 
Meanwhile, Ciller will leave for Brussels to attend the NATO 
summit on 9 January. She will hold talks with President Clinton 
in Brussels. It should be recalled that U.S. Secretary of State 
Warren Christopher held talks with President al-Asad in Damascus 
some time ago. Ciller will discuss the situation of the PKK and 
Abdullah Ocalan in light of the information Warren Christopher 
and Nahit Mentese received in Syria. 
<H5>  Al-Asad's Letter of Intent </H5>
  President Clinton will hold talks with President al-Asad a 
few days later. Their meeting is probably the first high-level 
contact al-Asad has had with the United States since he came to 
power. In other words, President al-Asad's meeting with 
President Clinton can be viewed as his letter of intent to the 
Western world. 
  Prime Minister Ciller is trying to convince President 
Clinton 
to discuss the PKK problem with al-Asad. She will most probably 
succeed in doing so. This meeting will be the most important 
thus far in terms of the future of the PKK and Abdullah Ocalan. 
  In short, the talks that will start in Damascus and continue 
in Brussels and Geneva may lead to developments that will mark 
the end of the PKK. Meanwhile, the tripartite talks between 
Turkey, Germany, and Britain must also be taken into 
consideration. Obviously, Germany and Britain will be involved 
in the developments. Consequently, the struggle against the PKK 
will be strengthened. 
  It must be agreed that the efforts to isolate the PKK that 
Ciller made during her visits to Germany and the United States 
are yielding very effective results. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57944 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_i_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Nationality Law Enforced </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0301141894 Paris LE MONDE in French 1 Jan 94 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> BR0301141894 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE MONDE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Philippe Bernard: "French Nationality -- A New </F>
User's Guide"] 
  [Text] The implementing decree of the 22 July law reforming 
the law governing French nationality was published in the 
JOURNAL OFFICIEL on Friday 31 December. It stipulates the 
conditions under which the desire to become French will have to 
be expressed in the future by some children of immigrants. 
Another decree lays down the principle of the county courts and 
district courts specializing in the issue of nationality. 
Despite government promises, no national information campaign on 
this sensitive subject has been planned. 
  How can somebody become French? Starting from 1 January 
1994, the question will acquire a new angle for the tens of 
thousands of young people born in France of foreign parents. 
The start of the new year will also see the entry into force of 
the entire reform of the nationality laws adopted in June 1993 
after bitter debates. One part of this text has been in force 
since last July. The decree, which has just been published 
following an opinion by the Council of State, was signed by the 
prime minister and the five other ministers concerned: the 
ministers of justice, of the interior, of social affairs, 
defense, and overseas territories and departments [DOM-TOM]. It 
provides for specific new channels of access to French 
nationality for the children of immigrants, which are decisive 
for their integration. 
  What follows is the new user's guide to gaining French 
nationality, as laid down by the new decree. 
<H5>  Four Places to Express One's Desire To Be French </H5>
  Young people born in France of two foreign parents born 
abroad must henceforth show their desire to acquire French 
nationality. This requirement only affects persons who will be 
18 years old after 1 January 1994. 
  The new procedure applies between 16 and 21 years of age. 
However, it is highly recommended to set things in motion 
between the ages of 16 and 18, the period during which no 
obstacle can be placed in the path of a young offender, whereas 
after the age of 18 certain criminal convictions will prevent 
the future acquisition of nationality. The procedure in 
question is carried out simply and without any authorization 
being required from the parents. 
  The decree empowers four authorities to receive the 
expression of the desire to gain French nationality: civil 
servants in all city halls (regardless of the place of residence 
of the interested party); prefectorial departments (prefectures 
and sub-prefectures); county judges; and the commanders of 
gendarmerie brigades. The expression of this desire may be made 
freely in writing, but pre-printed application forms will be 
distributed in the relevant places and in schools. Educational 
establishments, as well as police stations, may not process 
applications themselves. 
  In the event, the four types of institution designated by 
the 
decree act merely as mailboxes. Whatever the circumstances, 
they are bound to receive the young persons involved and give 
them a dated official document attesting to their application. 
The institutions must then pass on the document to the county 
judge within three days. In the event of a rejection, summary 
proceedings may be launched for faulty processing. 
  Although four authorities are competent to receive 
expressions of the desire for French nationality, only one may 
rule on the matter: the specialized county court judge (of whom 
there are between two and four per department). This individual 
does not have to rule on the appropriateness of the request, but 
must merely verify that the conditions laid down by the law have 
all been met. To this end, the judge involved asks the 
applicants to provide the following official documents: their 
birth certificate as proof of their birth in France; a 
certificate of nonpunishment or of penalties incurred [issued by 
the Ministry of Justice] (only for majors), and proof of their 
habitual residence in France during the five years preceding the 
request. 
  The latter proof may be provided in writing in any form: 
school certificates, receipts for rent or electricity payments, 
for example. The submission of these documents will be 
officially acknowledged by the county court judge, who will then 
have six months in which to submit his decision. Should the 
judge fail to respond within this period, then the registration 
of the nationality is considered to have been accepted. Once 
the desire for French nationality has been recorded, the young 
person in question may immediately obtain a certificate of 
nationality and have an identity card issued. 
  In the event of a negative decision on the part of the 
judge, the interested party may summon the attorney general 
before the district court to have their French status 
recognized. The same party may also launch a hierarchical 
appeal against the judge's ruling before the minister of 
justice. The decree states, exceptionally, that any minor aged 
16 may institute these proceedings without receiving any 
authorization from their parents. 
<H5>  Limited Dual Nationality for Algerians </H5>
  The new law abolishes the benefit of dual nationality for 
the 
children of persons born in former French colonies. By virtue 
of this principle, which continued to apply until 31 December 
1993, any child born in France of parents who were born in 
former French territories (excluding Algeria) were born French. 
  The principle still applies if the parents were born in 
Algeria before that country gained its independence. However, a 
contested government amendment has introduced the requirement of 
five years of regular residence in France by the parents as at 
the time of the birth of their child. This provision -- which 
breaks politically with the theory according to which Algeria 
was a French department just like any other prior to 1962 -- 
will be the source of extreme administrative complications. In 
effect, it will come down to requiring all the parents concerned 
to provide documentary proof of five years of regular residence 
in France. 
  The danger is that proof of this kind, though relatively 
simple to provide at the time the child is born, could be 
virtually impossible to verify when most of the parents 
concerned are actually led to consider the question of the 
nationality of their children at the age of adolescence, if not 
when they come of age. Who will be able to prove, 18 years on, 
that they previously resided in France on a regular basis? For 
this reason, parents will be well advised to initiate 
proceedings at the birth [of their child], demanding a 
certificate of nationality from the county court judge. 
<H5>  Information in Schools and High Schools </H5>
  The extremely late publication of the decree has meant that 
hardly any serious information could be circulated as yet. Some 
rather unclear pamphlets have been distributed to the [relevant] 
administrations, but nobody seems to know for sure whether they 
have reached the people for whom they were intended. 
  Whereas the law was adopted six months ago, the decree 
providing for an information mechanism is still not ready. When 
it is, it will assign educational establishments, state national 
insurance offices, welfare centers, and territorial authorities 
a "duty to provide information." It would also have to provide 
for the designation, in each school and high school of a 
"correspondent on matters of nationality" who will serve as 
middlemen between pupils of foreign origin and the 
administrations concerned. The decree will also provide for the 
modification of programs of civic education to include in them 
some notions on the acquisition of French nationality. Finally, 
a legal reference text should be distributed to the 
administrations, associations, and media. 
  However, the "major national information campaign" promised 
to members of parliament by Pierre Mehaignerie and Simone Veil 
will doubtless never take place. The fear is that, in the 
absence of information, young people will not take the steps 
required to gain French nationality, or will allow the deadline 
imposed by the law to pass. Radio broadcasts and televised 
advertisements should attenuate this risk. So far no financing 
has been freed up. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57945 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_i_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Report Calls For Nuclear Test Resumption </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94ES0194B Paris LE FIGARO in French 17 Dec 93 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> 94ES0194B </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE FIGARO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Patrice Henry Desaubliaux: "The Necessary </F>
Resumption of Nuclear Testing"] 
  [Text] The report of Paris RPR [Rally for the 
Republic] Deputy Rene Galy-Dejean estimates that 10 or so tests 
will be essential to perfect the PALEN simulation program. 
  "Irrefragable." At the end of a six-week in-depth 
investigation, the fact-finding mission arranged last 28 October 
by the Defense Committee of the National Assembly reached this 
conclusion: The "unrefutable, something that cannot be 
challenged" (that is the definition according to the Petit 
Robert dictionary) conclusion is that "France must be able to 
conduct nuclear testing." This "requirement" is called for 
"whether from the standpoint of weapon performance, safety, and 
reliability, the sign of deterrence, or, in any event, from that 
of perfecting a simulation system." 
  Written by Rene Galy-Dejean (RPR, Paris) and unequivocally 
approved by the members of the fact-finding mission--Jacques 
Baumel (RPR), Jean Michel Boucheron (PS [Socialist Party]), 
Daniel Colin (UDF [Union for French Democracy]), Pierre Favre 
(UDF), and Pierre Lellouche (RPR)--the 60-page report opens, for 
the first time at the parliamentary level and therefore 
publicly, the scientific and technical dossier of nuclear 
armament. It is its first characteristic. It shows that, without 
revealing national defense secrets, it is possible to extend the 
debate on such an essential issue, affecting the independence 
and security of France, to others than groups of experts. 
  Without useless polemic--and that is its second major 
characteristic--this report has, nonetheless, political scope. 
It must be read according to the two "goals of the French 
defense policy," recalled on 6 October by the communique 
published simultaneously by the office of the president and that 
of the prime minister: One of the goals is "to participate in 
the arms limitation effort within the international community"; 
the other is "to have always available a believable and adequate 
deterrence force to protect its vital interests, which is 
currently the case and which must remain the case tomorrow." 
<H5>  New Methods of Calculations </H5>
  This second goal assumes the "maintenance and development of 
France's technological capability," the implementation of 
"safeguarding measures making it possible to arrange at any 
moment a new testing campaign," and finally the acquisition of 
"techniques of simulation which, alone, can guarantee the 
continuity of our deterrence once testing has been definitely 
stopped." 
  It is in that context that the Galy-Dejean report concluded 
that nuclear testing is "essential." How many tests? Some 20, 
according to the experts, of which 10 or so could be assigned to 
the PALEN program (which means, let us recall, "aid program for 
the limitation of nuclear testing"). Within what delays? The 
report has sought to be particularly careful on this issue: "If 
perfecting the PALEN program were the sole purpose of the 
testing, it is not at all sure that a quick resumption of the 
firing tests would be necessary. On the other hand, it is 
conceivable that the majority of the tests related to this 
program will be truly useful after 1995." 
  It so happens that the perfecting of the PALEN program, not 
before the year 2000, is not a minor matter. It demands new 
methods of calculations, that is to say, "computers, at least 50 
times more powerful and rapid than the current ones, which do 
not yet exist on the marketplace, not even in the United 
States." The Atomic Energy Commission (CEA) should be able to 
acquire some in 1997. It demands also radiographic methods that 
will not be "put into service before 1998" and lasers (for a 
minimum cost of 5 billion francs) "delivering an energy of two 
megajoules," whereas the CEA's largest laser delivers only 20 
kilojoules. 
  It remains that the PALEN has its own limitations ("It will 
never be possible to simulate nuclear tests.") and, above all, 
that tests have objectives other than the perfecting of this 
program. It is necessary, among other things, to develop the 
TN-100 intended for the future M-5's. Whereas any new 
product--car, electrical appliances, machine-tool, etc.--is 
always tested before its final utilization, "is it possible to 
believe that a nuclear weapon would be the only thing that could 
be completed without being tested? In this case, how could its 
reliability be believed, as much from the standpoint of its 
military effectiveness as of its safety and security?" In this 
context, the American experience of a moratorium precedent, 
between 1958 and 1961, is rich in lessons. Today still, "no one 
knows how to foresee the aging of nuclear matters at the end of 
20 years." 
  In his report, Galy-Dejean took great care to mention the 
international context of the French problematics: The 
technological advance of the United States which, alone, knows 
how to carry out experiments that cannot be detected and the 
strategic objective of which is clearly to dig irretrievably the 
ditch between itself and the other nuclear powers; the will of 
China to acquire high-level nuclear armament; Japan's 
technological competence which, some day, could stop excluding 
the nuclear option; and the diplomatic agenda that features the 
renewal of the Non-Proliferation Treaty in 1995 and the signing 
(in 1996?) of a treaty prohibiting nuclear testing. 
  Resuming nuclear testing is, therefore, the inner conviction 
of the fact-finding mission. This does not prevent some of its 
members from adding their own commentaries to express subtleties 
or reservations. Thus, Jean-Michel Boucheron, a Socialist, 
retains only these sections of the report that would not 
displease the president of the Republic. Thus, Jacques Baumel 
and Pierre Lellouche would have liked to see "clearly" indicated 
"the absolute necessity of resuming the tests between now and 
1995." Beyond these opinions, as revealed by the chairman of the 
Defense Committee Jacques Boyon (RPR, Ain), there remains the 
confirmation of a real consensus around nuclear deterrence. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57946 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_i_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Poll Shows Pasqua's Popularity on Rise </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94ES0192A Paris LE FIGARO MAGAZINE in French 4 Dec 93 pp 
40-41 </F>

<F P=103> 94ES0192A </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE FIGARO MAGAZINE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Charles Rebois: "Pasqua's Rise in the Polls"] </F>
  [Excerpts] Although jobs remain the French people's top 
priority, public safety is also one of their major concerns. 
They said as much--in spectacular fashion--on the FIGARO 
MAGAZINE-SOFRES [French Opinion Polling Company] barometer in 
December by their vote on the performance of Interior Minister 
Charles Pasqua, who gained 15 points, with 59 percent wishing to 
see him play a major role in the future compared to 44 percent 
the previous month. 
  The raid carried out on the premises of the FIS [Islamic 
Salvation Front]; the expulsion of the Turkish imam of Nantua; 
the police operation against the Kurds of the PKK [Workers' 
Party of Kurdistan]; and Pasqua's statement (made over TF-1 
[French Television-Channel 1] on 21 November during the "Seven 
on Seven" program) to the effect that "France will no longer 
allow, on its soil, activities likely to harm its interests," 
constituted a veritable "Pasqua festival" and fulfilled the 
wishes of the very large segment of the public that voted 
massively for the right last March. The French people are also 
praising this cabinet minister for having acquired the 
constitutional means for ending the abuse of the right to asylum. 
  At the political level, Charles Pasqua is seeing his 
influence grow. As one of the trio who heads the honors list of 
the leading figures of the right, he is closing fast behind 
Edouard Balladur and is within one point of Simone Veil. His 
actions contradict those--both within the majority and on the 
left--who criticize the government's policy on grounds that it 
is not bold enough. These actions also tend over time to 
marginalize the National Front by taking away one of its 
principal electoral arguments. 
  The intensity of the pro-public safety sentiment is also 
confirmed by Pierre Mehaignerie's six-point rise in the poll. 
The French people approve of the keeper of the seals [justice 
minister], who dared to brave the hostility of the legal 
profession by introducing a bill that prescribes life 
imprisonment for rapists who murder their child victims. 
  Most of the leading figures of the right are not lagging 
behind. The prime minister continues to rise in the poll, 
scoring a gain of five points: 65 percent of those polled have 
confidence in him, compared to 31 percent who do not. This score 
places him out of range of the criticism of an evanescent left. 
As for the impatience of certain individuals in his majority 
coalition, it is echoed less in public opinion than in political 
circles. 
  The conditions of the new cohabitation have changed 
radically 
from what they were in 1986. Whereas the rating for the prime 
minister has remained at the highest level, that of the head of 
state is dropping. Francois Mitterrand has lost 10 points: only 
38 percent now have confidence in him, compared to the 59 
percent who do not. This decline is all the more unexpected in 
that it has taken place since his participation in the "Hour of 
Truth." 
  Political analyses often set Edouard Balladur over against 
Jacques Chirac. They are viewed as potential rivals for the 
presidency. The prime minister's popularity has nonetheless not 
overshadowed that of the RPR [Rally for the Republic] president, 
who achieved a gain of six points. 
  This almost general improvement in the ratings of the 
leaders 
of the majority indicates that the left has not regained the 
French people's confidence. Michel Rocard, the left's principal 
leader was severely penalized with a loss of five points in the 
poll. His presidential ambitions appear to be in jeopardy. His 
famous big bang [preceding two words in English]--which was to 
signal the start of the Socialist renewal--appears to have been 
just one more illusion. 
  As for the approval ratings for the political parties, that 
of the Socialist Party remained very negative, whereas that of 
the RPR gained 5 percent and the UDF [Union for French 
Democracy] 4 percent. 
  This barometer shows the price the left is having to pay for 
persisting in a culture of political parties that ignores the 
French people's need for public safety. 
<H5>  Mitterrand: 38 Percent Approval Rating </H5>
  Do you have complete confidence, relative confidence, 
relative nonconfidence, or no confidence at all that Francois 
Mitterrand can solve France's current problems? 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 1. Mitterand: 38 Percent Have Confidence in Him                        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(all figures are percentages)                                                | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |November 1993            |December 1993            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Complete confidence      |6                        |6                        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Relative confidence      |34                       |32                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Subtotals                |40                       |38                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Relative nonconfidence   |30                       |31                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No confidence at all     |27                       |28                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Subtotals                |57                       |59                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No opinion               |3                        |3                        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Grand total              |100                      |100                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


<H5>  Balladur: 65 Percent Approval Rating </H5>
  [Text] Do you have complete confidence, relative 
confidence, 
relative nonconfidence, or no confidence at all that Edouard 
Balladur can solve France's current problems? 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 2. Balladur: 65 Percent Have Confidence in Him                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(all figures are percentages)                                                | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |November 1993            |December 1993            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Complete confidence      |13                       |15                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Relative confidence      |47                       |50                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Subtotals                |60                       |65                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Relative nonconfidence   |22                       |18                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No confidence at all     |15                       |13                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Subtotals                |37                       |31                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No opinion               |3                        |4                        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Grand total              |100                      |100                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


<H5>  Techniques Used by SOFRES </H5>
  1. Poll conducted by LE FIGARO MAGAZINE. 
  2. Date conducted: 23-25 November 1993. 
  3. National sample of 1,000 persons, representative of the 
entire population 18 years and over, interviewed in person at 
their respective residences by the network of SOFRES 
interviewers. 
  4. Method of classification (sex, age, profession of head of 
household PCS [employer, manager, employee]); grouping by region 
and by category of populated area. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57947 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> United Kingdom </F>
<H3> <TI>   IRA Faces `Financial Hardship' If Violence Continues </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM3012164093 London THE INDEPENDENT in English 30 Dec 93 p 
2--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM3012164093 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE INDEPENDENT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Donald Macintyre and Chris Blackhurst: "IRA Faces </F>
Cash Crisis If It Rejects Declaration"] 
  [Text] The Provisional IRA faces financial hardship if it 
decides to reject the Anglo-Irish declaration and continue its 
campaign of violence. 
  Informed British government sources insist that the IRA is 
finding it more and more difficult to bring in the estimated 5 
million pounds a year it needs to finance the level of terrorist 
activity it has sustained for more than two decades. 
  The increase in security threatened on both sides of the 
border if the IRA refuses to renounce violence is certain to 
include an even more intensive effort to stem the flow of funds 
from racketeering and smuggling, and the profits of drinking and 
gambling clubs. 
  Some senior Tories in close touch with security issues argue 
that a comparative lack of funds for terrorist activities is a 
key factor behind the republicans' willingness to consider a 
peaceful settlement. 
  But even allowing for propagandist efforts to magnify the 
current pressures on paramilitaries, normally reliable sources 
are adamant that close liaison between the Royal Ulster 
Constabulary [RUC] and the four-year-old Terrorist Finance Unit 
at the Northern Ireland Office is scoring increasing success in 
cutting off funds from both loyalist and republican 
paramilitaries. 
  A senior Northern Ireland Office official described at a 
recent private international conference on economic crime how 
the RUC had been having "resounding success" in "drastically 
curtailing" the flow of funds from registered social clubs -- 
one key source of terrorist cash -- by forcing them for the 
first time to produce accurate accounts. 
  He told the conference: "There is nothing complicated about 
the financial scams. From the dozens of clubs believed to be 
controlled or exploited by terrorists, part of each day's bar 
takings was put to one side and collected by a terrorist finance 
controller. The remainder of the bar takings was entered in the 
club's financial records." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57948 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> United Kingdom </F>
<H3> <TI>   Firm Allegedly Helped FRG Arms Producer Evade Bans </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM3012143293 London THE INDEPENDENT in English 29 Dec 93 p 
1--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM3012143293 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE INDEPENDENT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Tim Kelsey and Martin Himmelheber in Rottweil: </F>
"Trial Told Britain Beat Arms Embargoes"] 
  [Text] British officials helped the export of arms to 
banned countries in the mid-1980`s on a far greater scale than 
has been revealed to the Scott inquiry, with its remit 
restricted to arms to Iraq, according to evidence being given in 
a German court case. 
  The East German security services and the Contra rebels in 
Nicaragua were said to be among recipients of arms routed 
through Britain, in defiance of international agreements. 
Officials with the Royal Ordnance, then the state-run arms 
company, provided falsified documents, it has been claimed. 
  The allegations, made during the prosecution of the managing 
director of the leading German machine-gun-maker, Heckler &amp; 
Koch, suggest a patter of repeated disregard for international 
arms embargoes by the British Government's arms manufacturer. 
  Royal Ordnance -- which was privatised and sold to British 
Aerospace in 1987 -- is being accused of helping Heckler &amp; 
Koch 
to evade restrictions on exporting its compact machine-guns and 
rifles, which are favoured by special forces all over the world, 
including the British Special Air Service. 
  The prosecution alleges that the British company did that by 
pretending to import the weapons into Britain as the "end-user" 
and then exporting them to their real destinations, many of 
which were affected by German, and in some cases, international 
embargoes. Sources close to the prosecution have told the 
INDEPENDENT that they have evidence of 50 examples over 10 years. 
  The case is focusing on a shipment of 1,100 Heckler &amp; 
Koch 
machine-guns, some of which were seized in Italy in 1987 on 
their way to the United Arab Emirates, a destination banned 
under German law. 
  Their true destination, however, was thought to be Iraq, 
according to the Italian police, who made the original arrests 
in 1987. The ship, which had sailed from Liverpool, was sailing 
under the flag of Qatar and the police noted 17 officers of the 
Iraqi Navy among the 23 sailors. 
  The court has been told that the guns were allegedly 
assembled from German parts at the Royal Ordnance small arms 
division's factory in Enfield, north London. Royal Ordnance 
added the firing pins to the finished weapons and procured false 
documents showing they were destined for use in Britain. The 
prosecution has claimed that Royal Ordnance's role was to "build 
a smokescreen." 
  Walter Lamp, the managing director of Heckler &amp; Koch, 
based 
in Oberndorf, in Baden-Wuerttemberg, is pleading not guilty to 
breaching German law on weapons exports, arguing that he was not 
personally responsible for export licensing. If convicted, he 
could face up to 10 years in prison. 
  Apart from shipments to the Middle East, German customs 
officials have alleged at the trial that Royal Ordnance was 
involved as a "middleman" helping Heckler &amp; Koch to export 
guns 
to East Germany. At least 300 Heckler &amp; Koch weapons have 
been 
found since reunification in the possession of the former 
communist security forces and police. Parts allegedly went from 
Oberndorf to England, where the guns were assembled and then 
shipped to Rostock. 
  The prosecution has issued a statement stating that Heckler 
&amp; 
Koch weapons were also found in Nicaragua in the possession of 
the Contra guerrillas in 1986. The statement alleges that the 
weapons went via Royal Ordnance. 
  The case, which has been adjourned for Christmas, has 
attracted extensive media attention in Germany. 
  Sources close to the German prosecution are not clear to 
what 
extent the British Government knew of the company's alleged 
activities with Heckler &amp; Koch before its 1987 privatisation 
and 
sale to British Aerospace. In 1991, Royal Ordnance bought 
Heckler &amp; Koch. 
  British Aerospace told the INDEPENDENT: "The alleged events 
took place before Royal Ordnance purchased Heckler &amp; Koch. It 
is an individual that is on trial, not the company, and it is 
inappropriate for British Aerospace to comment any further." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57949 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> United Kingdom </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Smokescreen' Role Noted </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0401151894 London THE INDEPENDENT in English 4 Jan 94 p 
3--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM0401151894 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE INDEPENDENT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Tim Kelsey in London and Martin Himmelheber in </F>
Rottweil: "Documents `Link UK Company to Illegal Arms Deal'"] 
  [Text] Documents which allegedly show that Royal Ordnance 
helped a German arms manufacturer to evade sanctions were 
presented to a German court yesterday. 
  It has been, claimed that Britain's largest arms 
manufacturer 
-- while a state-run concern -- was involved in a plot in the 
1980's to supply banned countries with arms. 
  THE INDPENDENT published news of the court case last week 
and 
also separately reported that guns made by the same German 
manufacturer, Heckler &amp; Koch, had been exported to Serbia 
after 
the imposition of the United Nations embargo on the former 
Yugoslavia in 1991; Heckler &amp; Koch was then wholly owned by 
Royal Ordnance. The company has denied shipping weapons 
directly to Serbia but has conceded that a number of "hunting 
rifles" were exported. Royal Ordnance said it would never 
breach British law but could be held responsible if weapons were 
sold on to third parties. 
  The presence in Serbia of Heckler &amp; Koch weapons is not 
a 
matter under consideration by the court in Rottweil, 
Baden-Wuerttemberg. This case focuses on allegations that a 
managing director of the company, Walter Lamp, breached German 
arms exporting laws for nearly 10 years prior to 1987, with the 
help of Royal Ordnance. In 1987, Royal Ordnance was sold to 
British Aerospace and in 1991 the company bought Heckler &amp; 
Koch. 
  The prosecution in the trial, which reconvened yesterday, 
claims that arms from Heckler &amp; Koch were exported via Royal 
Ordnance, which allegedly provided false papers and some 
components, to a variety of illegal destinations including East 
Germany and Nicaragua. Mr Lamp denies he was responsible for 
licensing exports. 
  The prosecution is concentrating on a shipment of 
machine-guns exported via Britain officially destined for the 
United Arab Emirates. The ship carrying the guns, which set 
sail from Liverpool, was seized en route by Italian police in 
1987 who discovered Iraqi naval officers on board and believed 
that Iraq was its real destination. It was illegal at this time 
for German firms to export weapons to the UAE, but not for UK 
firms. 
  The judge, Siegfried Haage, yesterday allowed around a 
hundred documents on to the court record which are said to show 
that Royal Ordnance was involved as a "smokescreen" for illegal 
Heckler &amp; Koch exports. They include bills, export papers and 
pro forma invoices. 
  The defence then asked Judge Haage to terminate the trial on 
the grounds that following the reports in THE INDEPENDENT, which 
have caused uproar in the German media, Mr Lamp could not be 
assured of a fair trial. 
  "There is no chance for a fair trial unless the accusations 
regarding arms exports to Serbia are cleared," Siegfried Kauder, 
for the defence, said. "The German press does not want to 
poison the climate but they do if they take THE INDEPENDENT 
stories and reprint them." He denied that Heckler &amp; Koch had 
exported weapons to Serbia. 
  Judge Haage is to consider whether to end the trial. The 
case continues next week. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57950 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> United Kingdom </F>
<H3> <TI>   Business Daily Assesses Role of EMI </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM3012151093 London FINANCIAL TIMES in English 29 Dec 93 p 
11--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM3012151093 </F>
<F P=104>  London FINANCIAL TIMES </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Editorial: "Europe's New Monetary Forum"] </F>
  [Text] At a season associated with the arrival of wise men, 
the establishment of a new institution to supervise European 
monetary arrangements might be heralded as a sign of hope. The 
European Monetary Institute [EMI] is being formally set up on 
January 1 as part of the European Union's so-called second stage 
of progress towards economic and monetary union. By 
concentrating on a few necessary tasks, firmly defined by 
governments and central banks, the EMI can improve the prospects 
for successful monetary integration. 
  Conceived as an embryonic European central bank, the 
institute will have to lower its sights from the ideas that 
inspired its creation. An important priority will be to improve 
co-ordination within the present European Monetary System [EMS], 
which is a long way from carrying out its original and still 
badly needed function of providing a stable exchange rate 
environment for European business. 
  In view of the EMS disturbances since autumn 1992, along 
with 
other setbacks to the Maastricht timetable for a single 
currency, the gestation period for the new monetary body has 
been highly problematic. Because of delays in deciding to place 
the institute in Germany, the EMI will not even be able to move 
to a permanent home in Frankfurt before the summer. 
  In 1988-89, when plans for setting up the institute were 
first laid, the European Commission, backed by the French and 
Italian governments, wanted it to carry out some fully-fledged 
central banking operations. This idea has been watered down, 
above all because of opposition from the German Bundesbank. 
Monetary decisionmaking will remain the preserve of the EMI's 
12 member central banks. French-backed proposals for the EMI to 
help manage currency reserves look unlikely to get off the 
ground. 
<H5>  Harmonisation Drive </H5>
  The task of Mr Alexandre Lamfalussy, the EMI's designated 
president, will thus be to assemble a staff of statisticians and 
economists, rather than to wield power. 
  This does not mean that the EMI will not have a job to do. 
First, it will have to accomplish detailed technical work to 
prepare for the harmonisation of monetary statistics and money 
market instruments that forms an essential precondition for EMU 
[Economic Monetary Union]. If the harmonisation drive leads to 
an increase in efficiency of different countries' monetary 
systems, then the benefits would extend beyond making EMU more 
viable. 
  Second, the EMI can provide a forum for general debate on 
European monetary matters. Mr Lamfalussy sees the need to 
uphold the consensus on the desirability of EMU, but he also has 
the experience and independence to speak plainly about the 
hurdles that lie in its path. He will be helped in his task of 
nurturing public understanding of Europe's unhealthily secretive 
central banking system, if the EMI is required to publish 
detailed minutes of its monthly meeting of central bank 
governors. 
<H5>  Vital Arbiter </H5>
  Third, in a less high-profile role, the EMI president can 
function as an arbiter, providing advice and assistance to 
member countries. The misunderstandings and mismanagement 
evident during the monetary system flare-ups in September 1992 
and July-August 1993 could have been lessened had an 
intermediary been on hand to adjudicate between countries 
pursuing different monetary priorities, or even to ensure that 
rival positions were clearly communicated and understood. 
  After the upsets of the past 17 months, it seems still more 
likely than before that EMU, if it takes place at all, will be 
reached first by a relatively small group of countries willing 
to combine a lasting political commitment to EMU with a 
readiness to gear their monetary policies to Germany's. If 
monetary convergence stops short of EMU, the task of managing 
that process will require expertise and sensitivity of the 
highest order. 
  Creating a new institute will not, by itself, solve Europe's 
monetary problems. But if it can successfully combine the roles 
of trouble-shooter and think-tank, the EMI will have a good 
chance of bringing Europe closer to objectives that individual 
central banks are incapable of fulfilling. It is a welcome 
addition to the institutional landscape of the European Union. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57951 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Defense Ministry Reinforces Somalia Contingent </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD3112144593 Hamburg DPA in German 0020 GMT 31 Dec 93--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD3112144593 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Hamburg (DPA) -- Following the first shots at two 
Bundeswehr soldiers in Mogadishu on Wednesday [29 December], the 
German Defense Ministry fears further deliberate attacks on the 
German contingent in Somalia. For this reason, 33 soldiers have 
been sent to Belet Uen to guard the German camp and the convoys, 
it is reported in the Friday edition of BILD-ZEITUNG, citing an 
internal situation report by the Defense Ministry. 
  "Isolated criminal acts and bandit activities" against the 
UN 
troops in Somalia have risen in the last few days, the newspaper 
quotes the report as saying. There are ever more deliberate 
provocations of members of the UN troop contingent. According 
to BILD-ZEITUNG, attacks on the German camp were also 
increasing. In the last two weeks alone there have been at 
least five instances of Somalis trying to enter the German camp 
and get onto the airfield. The Bundeswehr guards fired warning 
shots on several occasions. 
  [Hamburg DPA in German at 0931 GMT on 31 December reports: 
"A 
spokesman for the Defense Ministry has rejected the BILD-ZEITUNG 
report that the 33 additional soldiers were sent to Belet Uen 
only because of the recent shooting at Bundeswehr soldiers in 
Mogadishu. Within the framework of the exchange of German 
soldiers in Somalia, 33 additional soldiers were sent as early 
as 20 December to increase safety levels and to reinforce the 
contingent for its withdrawal, the Defense Ministry spokesman 
told DPA in Hamburg on Friday."] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57952 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Government Rejects Zhirinovskiy's Insults, Threats </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD3012190593 Hamburg DPA in German 1718 GMT 30 Dec 93--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD3012190593 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Excerpts] Bonn [no date as received] (DPA) -- Refusing an 
entry visa to the Russian right-wing extremist Vladimir 
Zhirinovskiy led to an unexpected aggravation today. The 
Federal Government has officially refused to tolerate insults 
and threats Zhirinovskiy made yesterday when he was informed in 
Sofia that his visa application had been turned down. The 
Foreign Ministry confirmed reports from witnesses of 
Zhirinovskiy's behavior in Sofia. 
  Foreign Ministry spokesman Martin Erdmann, however, could 
not 
confirm a report from Sofia which reached DPA. It alludes to 
personal murder threats by Zhirinovskiy against German diplomats 
who explained the refusal. [passage omitted] 
  A consular official from the [Sofia] embassy had informed 
Zhirinovskiy about the refusal to grant the visa at the Sofia 
airport. Zhirinovskiy, as the ministry has now confirmed, then 
made derogatory statements about the Federal Republic, made 
threats about future German-Russian relations, and "personally 
insulted" the German diplomat. The Foreign Ministry said this 
was "strongly rejected. These statements were a further reason, 
in addition to his previous statements, to disqualify 
Zhirinovskiy as an interlocutor." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57953 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Dispels `Willingness' To Meet Zhirinovskiy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0401105894 Hamburg DPA in German 0948 GMT 4 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> AU0401105894 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Excerpt] Bonn (DPA) -- The Foreign Ministry in Bonn has 
today moved to dispel the impression that Foreign Minister Klaus 
Kinkel would be willing to meet the right-wing extremist Russian 
Liberal Democrat Vladimir Zhirinovskiy. Regarding reports about 
comments made by Kinkel in interviews over the weekend, Foreign 
Ministry spokesman Martin Erdmann said the minister had only 
said he would not shy away from a political dialogue with 
Zhirinovskiy and his party. Given the election success of the 
right-wing extremist in Russia, this dialogue could not be 
avoided in the long-term. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57954 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Polish Foreign Minister Wants `Clear' NATO Signal </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0401105694 Warsaw PAP in English 2026 GMT 3 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> AU0401105694 </F>
<F P=104>  Warsaw PAP </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Bonn, Dec. 3 -- Poland expects the NATO summit to be 
held 10-11 January to give a clear signal that East European 
countries can become members of NATO, Polish Foreign Minister 
Andrzej Olechowski told a press conference in Bonn after a 
meeting with his German counterpart Klaus Kinkel. 
  The two-hour meeting of the two ministers covered the issues 
of European security and the situation in Russia. 
  Olechowski stressed at the conference that Poland was aware 
that the former Warsaw Pact members could not join NATO quickly. 
The U.S.-sponsored Partnership for Peace programme to be 
accepted at the NATO summit should clearly define the conditions 
and timetable for the entry. 
  Kinkel told the press conference that NATO is open for new 
members in principle but immediate membership was not possible. 
Instead he proposed a close cooperation with NATO, including 
joint manoeuvres, participation in peace missions and 
consultations in case of threat to one of the countries' 
security. He ruled out, however, any formal guarantees of 
security. 
  Kinkel stressed that Russia has no right of veto as far as 
the broadening of NATO is concerned. 
  The Polish foreign minister said that Poland needed a 
feeling 
of being a part of the West. "We know we will not join NATO 
tomorrow. We are satisfied with Minister Kinkel's statement that 
Germany will defend our interests at the NATO summit." 
  The two also discussed the issue of border crossings. 
Olechowski stressed that he has a strong resolution to do 
something in this field as long as he is the foreign minister. 
Kinkel shared the opinion that the present situation at 
Polish-German border crossings should not be continued as it 
complicates trade relations between the countries and contacts 
between the two nations. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57955 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Text' of Kohl's New Year Address </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD3012151593 Hamburg DPA in German 1025 GMT 30 Dec 93--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD3012151593 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Quotation marks as received] </F>
  [Text] Bonn (DPA) -- The Chancellor's New Year television 
address reads as follows: 
  "My warmest greetings go out to you this evening, dear 
fellow 
citizens and our foreign fellow citizens. 
  The year 1993 was a difficult one. We felt the full effects 
of the worldwide economic recession. Many jobs were lost. No 
one should remain indifferent when fellow citizens lose their 
jobs. I am also thinking in particular here of the 
psychological distress of those concerned and of their families. 
Many feel that they are no longer needed. That is not the 
case. We are all dependent on one another. It is our joint 
responsibility to secure existing jobs and create new ones. 
  Reports show our economy improved again toward the end of 
this year. Things are also gradually getting better in our most 
important partner countries in Europe and in America. The 
important thing now is to decisively exploit these favorable 
prospects to improve employment in Germany. We must preserve 
jobs throughout Germany and create new jobs. That is and 
remains my most important aim, and this aim is achievable if we 
all work together -- employers and employees, trade unions and 
employers' associations, the state and the parties. 
  However, overcoming the recession is insufficient in itself. 
With a view to the future, we must also simultaneously 
strengthen Germany as a business and investment location. The 
German economy has not worsened, but we all have to adapt to the 
fact that our competitors in the world have in the meantime 
improved and are more numerous than before. We have already 
made a number of important and also some unpopular decisions in 
1993 to secure our future. Reductions in personal assets were 
unavoidable in this process; demands often had to be restrained. 
Only in this way can we permanently preserve the basis of our 
social security. 
  We have again made good progress on the path toward internal 
German unity. Growth was really strong in the states of former 
East Germany. Many people's personal situation has improved. 
Unfortunately, existing jobs are still being lost, but 
increasingly we are succeeding in replacing them with new 
competitive jobs. 
  Particularly in difficult times it is important to stand 
together. I know how much good will, how much public spirit, 
and how much willingness to help there is in Germany. Every day 
millions of people simply carry out their duties -- at work, at 
home with their families, and as voluntary workers at social 
establishments. I would like to thank them all most, most 
warmly. 
  Hard work and public spirit are the basis for our country's 
wealth. Having confidence in oneself, being there for others, 
raising children, sharing with others -- these are the real 
sources of happiness. In this understanding of ourselves we 
will also complete the unity of our fatherland. Walls of 
indifference have to be removed in this process. This task can 
be carried out every single day. This is also true of the 
relationship between old and young. Elderly people deserve 
respect and affection. They have the right to recognition for 
their life achievements. We are now harvesting what they sowed. 
Therefore, it goes without saying for me that pensions cannot 
be touched and that pensions in the former East Germany must be 
brought up to the Western standard without delay. 
  The youth is our future. In 1993 we again succeeded through 
common effort in providing enough places for education and 
training. We can all be happy about this success, and I thank 
all those who contributed. I am proud of our young generation. 
They are open-minded and cosmopolitan. They want to learn in 
order to achieve something later. They are prepared to take on 
responsibility in the economy, society, and the state. 
  We are influenced by the developments and events in our 
neighborhood more than most other people in Europe. For 48 
years we, the Germans, have been fortunate enough to be able to 
live in peace. Hardly any generation before us was granted 
this. Peace and stability are not available for free. They 
must be secured again and again. Therefore, we must press ahead 
with European unification and continue to develop our alliance 
with the United States. European unification and friendship with 
the United States will guarantee us peace and freedom in the 
future as well. 
  We are all worried by the wars and bloody conflicts in the 
east of our continent, particularly in the former Yugoslavia. 
Only in a strong European Union can we effectively help to 
solve these problems. The Maastricht Treaty gives us new 
opportunities to do this. 
  Europe is a fundamental basis for growth, employment, and 
economic stability. Not least, this benefits the Germans. 
Every third job here depends on exports, particularly exports 
to our neighboring European countries. 
  Dear fellow citizens, we will also face difficult tasks in 
1994. 
  The discussion about the correct path for our country is 
good, and it is necessary. Despite all our differences we 
should, however, be fair in our dealings with one another, show 
respect and understanding for one another, and have patience 
with each other. The fight against hostility to foreigners and 
extremism must unite us all. Right- and left-wing extremism are 
a disgrace to our country! 
  Despite all our troubles we should gratefully acknowledge 
that we have it better than most of the peoples in Europe and 
other continents. However, securing our future requires us to 
tighten our belts further. I know more and more people are 
realizing this is necessary. The tasks we have ahead of us can 
be solved. What we need are courage, realism, energy, and 
confidence. 
  I wish you all a good new year. May God protect our German 
fatherland." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57956 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   RAF Group Claims Responsibility for Politician's Death </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD3012171493 Hamburg DPA in German 1522 GMT 30 Dec 93--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD3012171493 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Karlsruhe (DPA) -- A group called "27 June Movement 
-- Georg von Rauch Commando" has claimed responsibility for the 
fatal car accident of Hesse CDU [Christian Democratic Union] 
politician Bernhard Saelzer on 18 December. The federal 
prosecutor's office announced today in Karlsruhe, in response to 
an inquiry, that it has started investigations into persons 
unknown suspected of setting up a terrorist organization and 
supporting the terrorist Red Army Faction (RAF). 
  In a letter claiming responsibility, which was made 
available 
to WIESBADENER TAGBLATT, it said: "It was no accident, even 
though it looked like one. We manipulated his Mercedes 300 SE 
in such a way that it was impossible to tell what caused 
Saelzer's accident despite the most thorough of examinations." 
  On 27 June this year, the operation aimed at finding the RAF 
members Wolfgang Grams and Birgit Hogefeld took place in Bad 
Kleinen. Georg von Rauch was shot in December 1971 in West 
Berlin during the search for members of the Baader-Meinhof 
group, the predecessor of the RAF. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57957 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Former Official Questions Letter </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD3012180193 Hamburg DPA in German 1714 GMT 30 Dec 93--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD3012180193 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Cologne [no date as received] (DPA) -- Heribert 
Hellenbroich, former president of the Office for the Protection 
of the Constitution [Bundesverfassungsschutz], views the letter 
claiming responsibility [for the death of Christian Democratic 
Union politician Bernhard Saelzer] as "a bad joke perpetrated by 
amateurs." He told the Friday [31 December] edition of the 
Cologne daily EXPRESS that the writers had made three decisive 
mistakes that had unmasked them: "First, the letter is very 
different from the confused linguistic style of the Red Army 
Faction [RAF]. Second, real terrorists would never claim to 
have tampered with the victim's car. They act professionally and 
do not talk about it. And third, they look for symbolic figures 
for their attacks. Mr. Saelzer was neither well known nor 
powerful enough to be a target for terrorists." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57958 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Alleged Solingen Arsonists Charged With Murder </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU3012121493 Hamburg DPA in German 1557 GMT 29 Dec 93--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> AU3012121493 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Hamburg (DPA) -- According to WESTDEUTSCHE 
ALLGEMEINE ZEITUNG (WAZ, Essen), the Federal Prosecutor's Office 
has brought charges against the alleged attackers of Solingen. 
[On 26th May 1993 two Turkish women and three children died when 
their house was set on fire.] They would be tried for five 
counts of murder and 14 counts of attempted murder. The young 
men are suspected of having set fire to a house occupied by 
Turks accepting that the inhabitants might die as a consequence. 
  According to WAZ, the Federal Prosecutor's Office will hold 
the trial at Duesseldorf Higher Regional Court. Recently there 
had been doubts about whether the four detained suspects were 
guilty. However, following further checks, the Federal Court of 
Justice had upheld the detention order. 
  A spokesman for the Federal Prosecutor's Office would not 
confirm or deny the information. "No comment" was the reply to 
an enquiry in Karlsruhe. Generally officials would comment only 
after the suspects had been informed of the charges. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57959 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ruehe Says Bundeswehr Faces Year of Great Challenges </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD3012120293 Hamburg DPA in German 0951 GMT 30 Dec 93--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD3012120293 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Bonn (DPA) -- According to Defense Minister Volker 
Ruehe (Christian Democratic Union) the Bundeswehr faces a "great 
organizational and human challenge" in the coming year. In his 
Order of the Day at the end of the year, which was published 
today, Ruehe refers to the forthcoming internal restructuring, 
the closure of 66 command posts, and the transfer of numerous 
units to new locations. 
  In view of the difficult budgetary situation, it will also 
be 
necessary in 1994 to set clear priorities and to confine 
activities to the "core abilities" of the armed forces which 
derive from "security policy requirements," the minister said. 
At the same time, he appealed to those responsible to make 
particular efforts for conscripts, despite tight resources: 
"Even though the money is tight, the training of our young 
soldiers must take a prominent position in our common efforts 
for a healthy Bundeswehr." 
  In his Order of the Day, Ruehe referred in particular to the 
foreign missions of German servicemen. In the UN operations in 
Kampuchea, Somalia, Iraq, and the Adriatic as well as the aid 
flights to Bosnia, the Bundeswehr is fulfilling "daily the duty 
of Germany: People in need can count on our support." The armed 
forces are achieving "great things, at home and abroad" and they 
can be "justly proud" of this. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57960 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Number of Ethnic German Resettlers Drops in 1993 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0201110294 Hamburg DPA in German 0954 GMT 2 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> LD0201110294 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Bonn (DPA) -- The number of resettlers entering 
Germany dropped considerably last year. Horst Waffenschmidt, 
the commissioner for resettlers' affairs at the Interior 
Ministry, said today in Bonn that in 1993 only 218,888 
resettlers came to Germany. In 1992, the figure was 230,565. 
Compared with last year, the number of applicants for admission 
dropped by over 161,000. 
  While the number of applications received from Poland and 
Romania continues to decline considerably, Waffenschmidt said, 
applications from the former Soviet Union were around 37 percent 
lower than last year. The state secretary pointed out that a 
large number of people granted admission documents have not 
emigrated to Germany. A growing number of Russian ethnic 
Germans from Kazakhstan and other CIS republics emigrated to 
Russia in 1993. 
  This year, too, the main objectives of Bonn policy are to 
create a secure living and future prospects for Germans in 
Central, East, and southeastern Europe by helping to develop 
settlement areas and granting admission, and to integrate late 
resettlers into Germany, Waffenschmidt said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57961 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> France </F>
<H3> <TI>   Lamassoure on European Enlargement, Schengen </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0301123894 Paris LE POINT in French 31 Dec 93 pp 
24-25--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0301123894 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE POINT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with European Minister Alain Lamassoure by Alain </F>
Dauvergne; place and date not given: "Europe Falls Victim to 
Information Technology"] 
  [Text] 1994: Europe will once again be at the center of 
political life. Due to the European elections in June. And to 
a further enlargement, which implicates its future. Alain 
Lamassoure, European affairs minister, explains. 
  [Dauvergne] In seeking to conclude at any price the 
accession 
negotiations for Austria, Finland, Norway, and Sweden by March, 
is there not a danger of sacrificing the fundamentals in order 
to meet the deadlines ? 
  [Lamassoure] The logic is rather similar to that of the GATT 
talks: A date has been set which is a political objective. I 
do not consider that we are being unrealistic: We have two 
months left in order to settle matters with four countries, 
whereas in the case of the GATT we overcame very difficult 
problems between 16 countries in just one month. This time 
France has three objectives: - A good agreement by the date set 
-- and we will not make a problem of the maintenance of national 
traditions such as the consumption of sucking tobacco (snus) in 
Sweden; - The retention of what the Community has already 
acquired: We will be particularly firm on foreign and security 
policy (PESC). Notably with respect to three countries which 
have neutral status. They have just given a commitment to make 
the necessary changes -- which involves legislative or even 
constitutional changes; - Finally, we want to solve the 
bilateral problems which remain with some of them by that date. 
  [Dauvergne] For example? 
  [Lamassoure] We have a problem with Austria over Grundig 
[manufacture of audiovisual equipment]: This company closed its 
factory in Cretzwald, in Moselle, to transfer its activities to 
Austria, thanks to Austrian state aid. We have asked for the 
refund of 70 percent of this aid. Vienna has refused. Last 
week we therefore reintroduced customs duty on products 
manufactured in Austria by Grundig. Another dispute -- on a 
larger scale this time -- is between France and Finland in the 
sawlogs and paper sectors. Due to the 35 percent devaluation of 
the Finnish markka (between 1991 and the end of 1992), we 
recorded a strong increase in wood imports in 1992 (followed by 
a further increase of 6 percent in 1993). We are now suddenly 
faced with a situation of one sawmill closing every day in 
France. These are small firms, but all the same. In the paper 
sector, we have seen prices collapse and some large French 
companies are on the verge of bankruptcy. We have decided to 
closely monitor imports from Finland. At the same time, experts 
from both countries are going to get together to work out an 
acceptable solution. 
  [Dauvergne] Is this a precondition for the accession 
agreement? 
  [Lamassoure] That is not what I am saying. But we do want 
any bilateral problems to be settled so that negotiations, and 
then ratifications, can be completed under the very best 
conditions. 
  [Dauvergne] After several delays, the Schengen accords -- 
which will finally permit the free movement of citizens between 
nine European countries -- are set to enter into force on 1 
February. You announced it. Is this deadline going to be met? 
  [Lamassoure] It is not certain. We have overcome all the 
problems relating to external border controls and the fight 
against drug trafficking. The political and legal problems have 
therefore been solved. But a technical problem remains: the 
functioning of the data processing system (charged to Sema, 
Siemens and Bull). We have appointed two experts -- one French 
and one German -- who will be submitting their final report in 
early January. We need to find out what is at the origin of 
these difficulties -- which are affecting certain software 
programs -- and what can be done to correct them as soon as 
possible. Later, we must look at the circumstances surrounding 
the conclusion of the contract and the selection of this group. 
But in the meantime it is unlikely that the deadline of 1 
February will be respected. 
  [Dauvergne] Would it not save time -- these technical 
hitches 
have been creating problems for months now -- if we simplified 
the system which was initially planned ? 
  [Lamassoure] The system as planned -- a central computer 
file 
linked to national files -- is no doubt too complicated. But, 
unfortunately, that is the system laid down in the Schengen 
Treaty. A different system would mean changing the treaty and 
therefore starting the process of ratification all over again. 
You can imagine how long that would take! 
  [Dauvergne] You defend the principle of a single list of 
candidates representing the majority coalition at the European 
elections. But there is a huge gap between your view of Europe 
and that held by Philippe Seguin. 
  [Lamassoure] We are in the process of setting down in black 
and white the proposals of all concerned. The UDF [Union for 
French Democracy] has in fact already published a document and 
the RPR [Rally for the Republic] is working on one. 
Subsequently, the leaders of both parties will see if they can 
arrive at a common platform, as they did at the time of the last 
European elections in 1989 and the last legislative elections 
where a chapter of our program was devoted to Europe. 
  [Dauvergne] But the government's European project is not 
very 
clear for the moment.... 
  [Lamassoure] The government's policy has consisted of 
adopting -- on each subject -- the most European position. This 
is true of the GATT -- and God knows how many people advised us 
to adopt different positions. And it is true for foreign and 
security policy: It is France and the present government which 
is defending the role of the WEU [Western European Union] in 
relation to the Atlantic Alliance, and which wants to see the 
European defense identity recognized at the NATO summit on 10 
January in Brussels. As to the reform of the institutions of the 
European Union, that is not a matter for the present government 
as it is planned for 1996. We simply ask that the next 
enlargement which is set for 1995 should not be allowed to 
compromise the proper functioning of the Community. We 
therefore want the number of votes required to obtain a blocking 
minority at the Council of Ministers to be increased from 23 -- 
the present figure in the Community of Twelve -- to 27 when we 
become the Community of Sixteen. This is a very important point 
on which the British, for the moment, disagree. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57962 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy &amp; Vatican City </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ciampi Confers With Party Leaders on Elections </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401154494 Rome ANSAMAIL Database in English 1414 GMT 4 
Jan 93--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0401154494 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome ANSAMAIL Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Ciampi Consults With Parties"] </F>
  [Text] Rome, 4 Jan (ANSA) -- Prime Minister Carlo Azeglio 
Ciampi on Tuesday [4 January] received the support of 
traditional governing party leaders, who in separate meetings 
with the premier appeared willing to let him stay at his post 
until June. 
  Ciampi this morning began a series of consultations in view 
of the January 12 debate on no-confidence motions in the Senate 
and Lower House. He met with delegations from the Christian 
Democrat, Socialist, Social Democrat, and Liberal parties, all 
of which said they did not have any strong objections to holding 
general elections at the same time as European Parliament 
elections, already scheduled for June. 
  Ciampi also met Marco Pannella, the Federalist Party leader 
who submitted the no-confidence motions. 
  Speaking to reporters after the meeting, Pannella reiterated 
his claim that Ciampi should resign immediately and that a 
second "political government," again led by Ciampi, should be 
formed and allowed to govern "with full powers" until early 
elections are held. 
  But Christian Democrat Party leader Mino Martinazzoli at a 
press conference after meeting Ciampi said there was no need "to 
rush to elections" and did not rule out the possibility of 
linking general elections with those for the European parliament. 
  Socialist Party Secretary Ottaviano Del Turco said he will 
ask those party members who signed the no-confidence motions to 
withdraw their signatures, adding that Ciampi can count on the 
full support of the Socialists in parliament. Del Turco, too, 
said that joining general and European Parliament elections 
would be "good fortune for the country." 
  The Social Democrats said more or less the same things as 
the 
Socialists, adding that holding only one round of elections 
would save the state about one trillion lire (588 million 
dollars). 
  Even Liberal Party Senate whip Luigi Compagna, who yesterday 
had denounced Ciampi for allegedly siding with the Left 
Democrats, today conceded that Ciampi was "not at all 
off-balance in favor of Achille Occhetto," the Left Democrat 
chief, and was instead "very concerned about maintaining his 
government's institutional standing." 
  The Liberal Party Lower House whip, Savino Melillo, 
commented 
that the idea of putting together two elections in June "does 
not seem inappropriate." 
  Most politicians officially agree that the cabinet led by 
Ciampi, a former central bank governor who does not belong to 
any party, and parliament have both fulfilled their main duties 
(approving an austerity budget and getting new election laws in 
place) and should now step aside. But the no-confidence motions 
were in fact signed by those members of traditional parties that 
have governed Italy for decades, that have been hit hardest by 
corruption scandals and that stand to lose the most if elections 
are held immediately. 
  The no-confidence motions are therefore seen by opponents as 
a last-ditch attempt to delay general elections and give the 
old-style politicians the opportunity to save their careers. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57963 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy &amp; Vatican City </F>
<H3> <TI>   DC Pledges Support for Ciampi </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401133794 Rome ANSAMAIL Database in English 1201 GMT 4 
Jan 93--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0401133794 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome ANSAMAIL Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Ciampi Consults With Parties on </F>
Government's Future"] 
  [Text] Rome, 4 Jan (ANSA) -- Premier Carlo Azeglio Ciampi 
today opened a round of consultations with political parties 
which are viewed as being crucial for the future of his 
government, and the date for early elections, in view of the 
debate on the no-confidence motion presented in Parliament. 
  Ciampi, who has no official political affiliation, opened 
the 
consultations meeting a delegation from the Christian Democrat 
Party, headed by party secretary Mino Martinazzoli and including 
Parliament whips Gerardo Bianco and Gabriele De Rosa. 
  The premier then met with the Socialist delegation, led by 
secretary Ottavio Del Turco, who reiterated his party's support 
for Ciampi, and then the delegation from the Liberal Party, from 
which secretary Raffaelle Costa bowed out given that he is a 
member of the government, responsible for transportation. 
  Ciampi is slated to meet later in the day with the Social 
Democrats, European Federalists, the Democratic Party of the 
Left (PDS), Northern League and the Republicans. 
  Consultations will continue tomorrow with meetings with the 
Greens, Communists, the neo-fascist MSI [Italian Social 
Movement], Network, SVP [South Tirol People's Party] and the UV 
[Valdostan Union]. 
  The Christian Democrats held a press conference after 
meeting 
with Ciampi and stressed the need not to rush into early 
political elections. Martinazzoli ruled out the hypothesis of 
linking general political elections with those for the European 
parliament, to be held in June. He said it was necessary to 
"hold early elections in the spring" and then stressed the 
importance of first passing several key bills before parliament. 
  Whether or not Ciampi's government can count on a majority 
in 
parliament will be verified in the parliament during the debate, 
Martinazzoli added, and said the Christian Democrats would not 
be alone in backing Ciampi. 
  Among the key bills which Martinazzoli felt should be passed 
before early elections were those dealing with the right to vote 
for Italians abroad, the [Justice Minister] Conso bill on 
preventive custody and two bills linked with the government's 
economic and finance policy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57964 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy &amp; Vatican City </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bossi Denounces Attempts To Delay Election </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401145994 Milan CORRIERE DELLA SERA in Italian 4 Jan 94 p 
2--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0401145994 </F>
<F P=104>  Milan CORRIERE DELLA SERA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Italian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Northern League Secretary Umberto Bossi by </F>
Gianluigi Da Rold in Ponte di Legno; date not given: "Bossi: 
O.K. Silvio, But We had Already Advanced Those Proposals Years 
Ago" -- first paragraph is CORRIERE DELLA SERA introduction] 
  [Text] Ponte di Legno -- "[Fininvest President] 
Berlusconi's proposals? Very interesting, but he is saying 
things we have already been saying for ages." The Senator 
[Northern League Secretary Umberto Bossi] is in a good mood. To 
begin 1994 -- the year which he has always forecast as "the year 
of the Samurai" -- on the right track, Umberto Bossi even 
ventured to ski down one of Mount Adamello's slopes. He is not 
[skiing champion] Alberto Tomba, but he was recognized, 
approached, stopped, and acclaimed by other fellow skiers. "I 
could hardly stand on my skis any longer," he said happily, back 
in his Ponte di Legno home. He then resumed the subject of 
Silvio Berlusconi and the center alliance -- the so-called 
liberal-democratic common house. 
  [Da Rold] The Knight [Berlusconi nickname] is very active in 
this period, is he not? 
  [Bossi] Clearly, he wants to take the initiative. However, 
sooner or later he must make a few things clear. I believe 
Berlusconi will not take any votes away from us. Of course, we 
can talk...about anything. The only thing that must be clear is 
that it would not be a good idea for anyone to attempt to 
construct some sort of device to steal votes from the League. 
In that case, the only thing that would perhaps be achieved 
would be to allow the Left to win. 
  [Da Rold] If I may just say so, Bossi, we have been hearing 
talk about a center alliance for almost a month now, but so far 
all we have witnessed is a sort of senseless charade, and the 
fact is you are all running out of time. 
  [Bossi] Of course, we must work things out in a rather short 
timescale, a couple of weeks, once the government has resigned. 
However, let me add immediately that, for the time being, there 
is still no "liberal-democratic common house." But this does 
not mean that an agreement has to be reached before the 
elections. It could be reached afterwards. Let us first see 
what each one of us can achieve. 
  [Da Rold] But there was talk of having common candidates.... 
  [Bossi] We can offer a few constituencies in the ricefields 
or in some suburb or other.... But let us not joke too much, if 
you please! 
  [Da Rold] Do you mean, then, that the League is not prepared 
to give anything away? 
  [Bossi] We have built a major electoral force over the past 
few years, we are the shock troops. We have done this to fight 
for the North's freedom. What do you think? That anticommunism 
-- a coalition based on opposition to the communists -- is 
enough to build a common identity? Of course not! There is the 
problem of profound constitutional reform, of a thorough reform 
of the state. We cannot elude this problem. Tax reform and 
fighting for deregulation are not enough. 
  [Da Rold] In short, you do not want any awkward allies in 
the 
North. 
  [Bossi] In the North, to begin with, there is the League. 
The League was born from the people and is fighting for the 
people. Others have televison networks and newspapers, we have 
the votes. We will always join forces against the Left's 
centralism, we have nothing to share with Stalin's offspring. 
This is not the key issue. What is at stake here is the 
North's liberty, which is being curtailed by a more complex, 
more complicated form of centralism. This is what we have to be 
clear about. If there are any representative forces in the 
South, which manage to win votes down there, we are interested 
in them. That way we would succeed in carrying out the federal 
revolution. 
  [Da Rold] Otherwise? 
  [Bossi] We fight politically. I always try to compromise -- 
to use this term. But beware of playing games with the North's 
freedom, of intefering with its liberation, because swift 
retribution may follow. 
  [Da Rold] In the meantime, it looks as if you are having 
problems with the election date. When do you think the 
elections will take place? 
  [Bossi] I have noticed that nobody is talking of a precise 
date anymore. Exactly what we predicted is happening. I have 
always been convinced of this. There is somebody out there, 
belonging to a gang of rogues and crooks, who is trying to delay 
the inevitable. 
  [Da Rold] So you have no hesitation regarding the 
no-confidence vote on Ciampi? 
  [Bossi] What hesitation? He should resign and disband the 
whole works. We must hold elections. Every postponement of the 
elections is aimed against us. 
  [Da Rold] Are you not concerned, however, in terms of your 
image, about one fact? Tomorrow you will have to testify in the 
Cusani trial in relation to the well-known Patelli "mishap." 
[reference to former League functionary charged with receiving 
illegal funding] 
  [Bossi] If these guys think they have weakened us by framing 
us, they are mistaken. People have understood very well what is 
going on. They have understood the hypocrisy of a law which 
puts bribes and voluntary contributions on a par. And they have 
understood many other things too.... 
  [Da Rold] Are you not annoyed, however, at being among the 
guests invited to the opening of the judicial year in Milan? 
  [Bossi] I cannot afford to get angry. I have more important 
things to do.... The tires on my car are worn out, and here it 
is still snowing. I have had to wait years to finally be in the 
company of my three children. I would like to do some skiing, 
and I also have to think about the wedding with Manuela. If 
they are happy, so be it. I would like to recall only one 
thing: It was the League's strength that enabled the clean 
hands inquiry to be undertaken. Perhaps they would like to 
close it now. 
  [Da Rold] Tomorrow you will be in court, before [Operation 
Clean Hands Judge] Di Pietro. 
  [Bossi] I hope [former Montedison manager] Sama will also be 
there to explain a few things. Besides, there is something I 
would like to say about this Cusani: Was he or was he not one 
of Craxi's men? It would be interesting to find out. Also, I 
would like to speak with Cusani's lawyer, who managed to bring 
the League into the picture through a question which, I believe, 
did not exactly help the defense. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57965 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy &amp; Vatican City </F>
<H3> <TI>   Occhetto Calls For Elections </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0501104694 Rome ANSAMAIL Database in English 2039 GMT 4 
Jan 93--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0501104694 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome ANSAMAIL Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Ciampi Consults With Parties"] </F>
  [Text] Rome, 4 Jan (ANSA) -- Premier Ciampi concluded his 
first day of meetings with parliamentary groups this evening and 
continues his consultations Wednesday morning [5 January] at 
0900, conferring with the Greens, Refoundation Communists, the 
MSI [Italian Social Movement] Neofascists, the Rete (Network), 
the SVP [South Tirol People's Party], and the Union Valdotaine. 
  Today he met with delegates for the Socialists (PSI), the 
Christian Democrats (DC), the Liberals (PLI), the Social 
Democrats (PSDI), the European Federalists, the Democratic Party 
of the Left (PDS), the Northern League and the Republicans 
(PRI). The forces which have upheld the government so far (the 
DC, PSI, the PSDI and the PLI) have not ruled out the 
possibility of Ciampi continuing with full powers until general 
elections are held, possibly in conjunction with European 
elections in June. 
  The PDS, however, considers the political life of this 
government over and insists that the parliament must be renewed 
as quickly as possible. 
  PDS secretary Achille Occhetto told reporters at the end of 
his meeting with Ciampi that "in our view, starting with January 
12, any time is good for the president of the republic to 
dissolve the two houses." The essential thing is to hold 
elections so as to give life to a new parliament from which a 
new government can emerge, Occhetto said. 
  Flanked by PDS caucus leaders Massimo D'Alemo and Giuseppe 
Chiarante, Occhetto told the press that during the approval of 
the financial bill, the government had effectively carried out 
the function for which it was created, that is, as institutional 
guarantor, and also absolved this task with the approval of an 
electoral reform which reflects the spirit of the referendum, he 
said. 
  For the PDS, it is wrong to open a debate on the government 
when the impelling job ahead must be that of enabling the 
citizenry as quicky as possible to choose a new parliament 
elected under the new rules. 
  League floorleader Roberto Maroni also urged speedy 
elections, no later than 10 April, and the sooner the better. 
  The League did not preclude the Ciampi Administration 
staying 
on until the vote as long as it did not prove to be an 
"electoral executive" remote-controlled by any particular clutch 
of political forces but rather, but instead served to 
technically manage certain economic problems. The League will 
decide its stance on the no-confidence motion after hearing 
Ciampi's address to the parliament. 
  For the Republicans the filing of no-confidence motions was 
unacceptable because the government had adequately handled the 
tasks before it. The PRI takes the view that the no confidence 
ploy was devised as a way to prolong the life of the legislature 
when the approval of the new electoral law urges the renewing of 
parliament as soon as possible. 
  In fact, the focus of today's meetings was chiefly on the 
date for the coming general elections and the nature of the 
government handling the period leading up to the vote. Almost 
all the groups voiced appreciation for the job done by Ciampi. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57966 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy &amp; Vatican City </F>
<H3> <TI>   More on PDS Stance </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94ES0210A Turin LA STAMPA in Italian 31 Dec 93 p 2--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> 94ES0210A </F>
<F P=104>  Turin LA STAMPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Italian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Fabio Martini: "Suddenly, Occhetto Dumps Ciampi"] </F>
  [Text] The PDS [Democratic Party of the Left] leader 
is also urging the government to resign, after Bossi had 
previously done so. "It no longer has a majority," he says. 
Scalfaro says, however: "Part of our journey has already been 
completed." 
  Rome--In the final hours of 1993, Carlo Azeglio Ciampi has 
suddenly found himself all alone. Now Occhetto has also urged 
the government to resign, after Bossi had previously done so. 
"In view of the no-confidence motion introduced by Pannella," 
the PDS leader says, in an interview he gave to L'UNITA, "it 
would be entirely correct for Ciampi to take note of the fact 
that he no longer has a majority, and to bring to the attention 
of the head of state the inferences derived from that fact." It 
is, therefore, no surprise that the two wings of the government 
majority are coming unhitched and that in the space of 48 hours 
Carlo Azeglio Ciampi passed from the laurels of his year-end 
press conference to face the unexpected prospect of having to 
resign and accordingly face the election campaign under the 
leadership of a greatly weakened executive branch rather than 
one with full powers, as he had so profoundly desired. 
  The first to detach himself was Bossi who, after Pannella's 
no-confidence motion was introduced, changed his position three 
times in four days. He initially favored the motion but 
subsequently opposed it (fearing that it would delay the date of 
the election), and then two days ago he again changed course. 
"We shall vote for the no-confidence motion," Maroni--the 
deputies' chairman--announced, "because in view of the measures 
concerning RAI [Italian Radio and Television Broadcasting 
Corporation] and IRI [Institute for Industrial Reconstruction], 
the government should be terminated as soon as possible!" Other 
than the reasons given publicly, the Lega is backing off in 
order not to become involved in the year-end "blow" decided on 
by Ciampi, who is thereby resuming his opposition role again. 
Having seen which way the wind is blowing, Occhetto also cut 
himself loose and in his interview sent a message--if one reads 
between the lines--to whoever needed to receive it. "We voted 
for the budget bill," he said, "because of the need for 
stability, but there is another requirement for stability that 
needs to be satisfied: that of selecting the two houses of 
Parliament as quickly as possible." As if to say: Dear Scalfaro, 
dear Ciampi, we have done our part; now let's hurry up and hold 
the elections. 
  In this way, as the days pass, the political reasoning 
behind 
the no-confidence motion introduced by Marco Pannella--which was 
destined to sow contradictions and uneasiness in all 
camps--becomes ever clearer, especially for the PDS, which in 
anticipation of the 12 January parliamentary debate has seen a 
curious scenario take shape on the horizon. Since Bossi opted 
out two days ago, many deputies of the DC [Christian Democratic 
Party] and the PSI [Italian Socialist Party] have already let it 
be known that they will vote against the government. There was 
accordingly the possibility that the debate on the Pannella 
motion could conclude with a Ciampi propped up by the PDS and 
half of the DC, with the rest of Parliament taking shots at him. 
The motion has proved to be a big headache, and it is of no use 
for Occhetto to say that "it might be withdrawn." In view of the 
abundant fruit yielded by his "provocation," Pannella will do 
everything except withdraw his motion, and nothing will remain 
for Occhetto to do but dismiss Ciampi who, after he has resigned 
at the conclusion of the debate, would then have to go to the 
head of state, wherepon--the PDS leader says--"Scalfaro would 
have to go ahead and dissolve Parliament." 
  This evening, in his year-end message, Scalfaro will 
announce 
that the elections will be speeded up, but without setting a 
date. Meanwhile, the head of state broadcast a message yesterday 
to Italians living abroad in which--among other things--he 
"apologized" for the fact that they will be unable to vote in 
the coming elections, and concluded on a hopeful note. "So many 
people," he said, "have helped to make it possible for us to be 
in better shape at the end of this difficult year! Indeed, part 
of our journey has already been completed." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57967 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy &amp; Vatican City </F>
<H3> <TI>   Pannella Calls For Reshuffle </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0301142594 Milan CORRIERE DELLA SERA in Italian 3 Jan 94 p 
2--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0301142594 </F>
<F P=104>  Milan CORRIERE DELLA SERA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Italian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Stefano Folli: "Pannella: Dear Ministers, Time </F>
for a Reshuffle"] 
  [Text] Rome -- The curtain is about to fall on the sad 
scenario of the First Republic. But before the company is 
disbanded, one final major show is about to be staged. It 
should not be missed, because it offers a plot with some 
potential for spectacular developments. For instance, the 
possibility of a group of ministers tendering their resignation 
in order to prompt a reshuffle. The title could be "Will Our 
Hero Persuade Ciampi To Ride Again?" The "hero" is Marco 
Pannella, the lone occupant of parliament around the end of the 
old year and the start of the new. Pannella is the architect of 
a political strategy verging on the brilliant, whose aim is as 
follows: to prevent the Ciampi Government from sliding toward 
the elections on the magic carpet of ambiguous neutrality, as a 
"disinterested" government aloof from the political struggle. 
Pannella argues (as does Segni now), that this would in practice 
provide support for the postelection plans of Occhetto, who -- 
surprise, surprise! -- has precisely Ciampi in mind as leader of 
a second, infinite transition period -- to provide reassurance 
for the markets, industry, and our European partners. 
  Hence his obstructive move. Ciampi, Pannella argues, must 
not be merely an anemic, albeit efficient, government clerk. He 
is involved in the political crossfire against his will, and the 
rationale of the first-past-the-post system will exacerbate this 
conflict to the maximum. So Ciampi must constitute the 
expression of a coalition supporting him as the precondition for 
a political alignment that in the future may be either 
victorious or defeated, but that must in any case prepare for 
the electoral battle. 
  The next step in his argument concerns the need to make 
"visible" what we could call this liberal-democratic coalition, 
which partly coincides with the old majority -- the DC 
[Christian Democratic Party], the PSI [Italian Socialist Party], 
and the nondenominationalists -- but which now includes the 
Pannella group and above all Mario Segni. According to 
Pannella, if the latter wants to remain consistent, he must not 
underestimate the possibility of a second Ciampi Government 
wrested from the PDS and presented on behalf of the moderate 
camp. 
  But a no-confidence motion is not enough in order to achieve 
a second Ciampi Government. At least, it is clear enough that 
the legislature's days are numbered, especially if the prime 
minister begins the debate 12 January but resigns before the 
final vote. Scalfaro would sign the dissolution decrees with a 
view to an election on 27 March or later, as the Senate speaker 
suggested, on 10 April. Ciampi would stay on to take care of 
routine business. The political objective proposed by Pannella 
(a natural coalition) would not be achieved. So here is his 
idea: Why do interested ministers -- and especially those 
concerned about the future of the moderate center -- not resign 
now, of their own free will? By so doing, they would avoid 
facilitating the government's downhill slide toward the PDS and 
would turn the process of the dissolution of parliament into a 
significant political transition instead of a sterile 
institutional ritual. This, because Scalfaro would be 
duty-bound to replace the outgoing ministers and his choice 
would not be without specific political repercussions. The 
elections would take place all the same, but the 
liberal-democratic front would feel a little fresh blood flowing 
through its veins. The Italian people would make their choice 
on the basis of a proposal (and alliance) for government, 
"instead of the old classifications of left, right, and center," 
whereby Berlusconi, Segni, Martinazzoli, and Bossi would be 
preparing for a Pyrrhic victory, with a weak left commanding 30 
percent, and three minority groups commanding 20 percent. 
  Pannella confined himself to making the suggestion, asking 
whether there are any ministers "unwilling to accept the 
undemocratic and unpolitical degradation of their role." It is 
up to them to reply. It is up to people like Andreatta, 
Barucci, Jervolino, and Costa -- the most "political" members of 
a highly technocratic government, and perhaps those most 
interested in the reconstruction of a moderate coalition. We 
shall see imminently whether the reshuffle takes place. 
  For the present it must be acknowledged that an uphill climb 
lies ahead. First, it is necessary to see whether the DC -- 
that is, Martinazzoli -- is willing to follow Pannella. Second, 
it is necessary to establish what Mario Segni's position is 
(according to the plan, he would fill the post of deputy prime 
minister, with Pannella himself as foreign minister): On the 
one hand, by attacking Ciampi over the year's end economic 
package, he seems more interested in electoral competition with 
the League than with establishing himself at the Chigi Palace 
[government seat]. But yesterday evening he helped Pannella 
considerably when he told IL GIORNALE that "before the 
confidence debate the prime minister has an obligation to make 
it clear whether he considers himself the candidate of the front 
led by the PDS." Then there is the proposal made by Liberal 
Secretary Costa, in an interview -- yes to a reshuffle, but only 
if it guarantees new "substance" to the government program and 
therefore sets the elections back by a few months, to June. 
Pannella rejects this argument: Nothing bugs him more than 
being described as the leader of the "postponement party." 
  "Moreover," PDS constitutionalist Augusto Barbera commented, 
"if there is to be a reshuffle, it can only be a merely 
technical one. In our present situation political choices would 
create too many problems. If that happened, who can say whether 
we should move to the right or left in order to strengthen 
Ciampi?" 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57968 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94029" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy &amp; Vatican City </F>
<H3> <TI>   Berlusconi Advocates Tax Ceiling To Counter Left </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0301114894 Milan IL CORRIERE DELLA SERA in Italian 3 Jan p 
2--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0301114894 </F>
<F P=104>  Milan IL CORRIERE DELLA SERA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Italian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Paola Di Caro: "Berlusconi: Fewer Taxes to Beat </F>
Occhetto"] 
  [Text] Milan -- Is it, then, really true? Will the Knight 
[Fininvest President Berlusconi nickname] announce his entry 
into politics on 10 January, and do so live on the RAI [Italian 
State Broadcasting Corporation] to boot? Many are convinced 
that he will in fact take part in a great "One-Against-All" [TV 
talk show], i.e. the Fininvest president against his critics, 
answering the why's, how's, and when's concerning the launching 
of his political battleship. For his part, Silvio Berlusconi 
said from his Arcore headquarters villa: "We are having 
discussions." Whereas Nicolo Querci, his loyal right-hand man, 
explained that "if anything, it would be on 11 January, not on 
the 10th; we are currently engaged in talks with Carlo Freccero, 
who is an old friend of Berlusconi's." The Fininvest boss made 
it clear that "the possibility that the announcement of my 
entering into politics will take place on that occasion, 
assuming there is one, can be ruled out." 
  Why? Because the remaining doubts, which now center more on 
the timing than on substance, stem from "four good reasons." 
  "To begin with," he explained, "I still have some hope left 
that the democratic forces will find a way of coming together. 
In the second place, however, it must be also taken into 
account that voters require new reference points, which are 
still lacking, and which I believe must be represented: 40 
percent of Italians say they do not know whom to vote for." If 
these are the premises, the two other points appear to provide 
the conclusion: "To this," he said, "we must add the timescales 
required to discuss the no-confidence motion, and those for 
setting the election date." Only then, in short, will 
Berlusconi solve the puzzle. 
  In the meantime, other bilateral meetings were being 
announced, among which "a short visit to Rome," as they said in 
sybilline fashion at Arcore. The Knight, however, does not stop 
even for a minute: "I would get bored...," he winked, and then 
went on to make a public proposal, which he defined as "a 
reflection on the government's latest measures," but also "an 
element of amalgamation around which a potentially victorious 
electoral coalition could unite." The proposal involved setting 
a "taxation ceiling." 
  This is, in fact, one of the 40 platform points which "we 
are 
actively working on." The taxation issue, however, is a 
particularly sensitive, and particularly important, one. 
Berlusconi's proposal -- namely setting by law a ceiling on the 
income that the government can absorb through taxation -- is 
very similar to that originally put forward by [National Rebirth 
Pact leader Mario] Segni and supported by the League. 
  Berlusconi said: "You cannot reconstruct public finances by 
increasing income without controlling expenditure. As a result 
of the budget Italians will have 67 trillion lire [L] less to 
spend on consumer goods or invest in savings, while the public 
sector will have an extra L67 trillion at its disposal. This 
resource transfer will not improve the situation of public 
finances and will cause our production system further 
difficulties." Was that a criticism aimed at Ciampi? "This is 
not a critism aimed at Ciampi, who had to act in an emergency 
situation," Berlusconi explained. "But, at this stage of the 
game, we must break with this system which has been implemented 
for far too many years by governments that, in the attempt to 
restore public finances to a healthy state, have increased 
public income," thus leading to "an overtaxed country." This is 
why, according to the Knight, "we must abandon the old system 
and introduce a taxation ceiling, set by law." 
  Berlusconi was very much aware that this project was shared 
by potential allies: "Certainly, and I welcome this. The more 
points we have in common, the greater the chances of building a 
strong grouping." The latter, of course, will be opposed to 
[Democratic Party of the Left Secretary] Occhetto, because -- 
Berlusconi maintained -- "the Left has always refused to 
acknowledge that taxation was excessive, advocating instead new 
and ever increasing taxes and duties." This is therefore "where 
the major difference lies with the Left electoral coalition." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57969 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94030" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy &amp; Vatican City </F>
<H3> <TI>   Martinazzoli, Casini, Berlusconi Cited on DC's Future </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR3012105993 Rome ANSAMAIL Database in English 2252 GMT 29 
Dec 93--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR3012105993 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome ANSAMAIL Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Christian Democrats Head Toward </F>
Re-Baptism; Berlusconi Meets Martinazzoli"] 
  [Text] Rome, 29 Dec (ANSA) -- Christian Democrat Party 
Secretary Mino Martinazzoli and his aides continued talks here 
today in view of changing the party's name to the People's Party 
in January as Martinazzoli met TV tycoon Silvio Berlusconi for 
the third time and came under heavy fire from members of his own 
party for foot-dragging in moving to create a moderately 
conservative political grouping. 
  The new party's convention has been set for January 18. The 
regional coordinators named by Martinazzoli as the backbone for 
the re-baptised formation will organise regional liaison 
committees, which will then appoint candidates to run in the 
coming general elections. 
  According to a cartel of incumbent Christian Democrat MPs, 
however, Martinazzoli has chosen the coordinators badly and is 
moving wrongly in seeking to create a conservative force to 
offset the progressive one emerging on the Left. 
  In one move, the "neo-centrists" as they have dubbed 
themselves, sent Martinazzoli a registered letter demanding the 
urgent convening of a session of the Christian Democrat National 
Council, saying that they were not planning to leave the party 
for the time being. 
  But they also ventilated the possibility that they could 
break ranks and vote against the Ciampi government in the 
confidence now scheduled on January 12. [as received] 
  "The confidence debate will be a test case," said one of the 
group, Pier Ferdinando Casini, alleging institutional bias in 
favour of the Left Democrats, the major opposition party. "The 
fact is that the government is cross-eyed. Despite its majority, 
it looks leftward. I can't exclude any hypothesis, not even a 
vote against the government." 
  According to the "neo-centrists," Martinazzoli and his 
planned People's Party should be seeking to form a "grouping" 
with ex-Christian Democrat Mario Segni, the Northern League and 
Berlusconi, who has recently thrown his weight as entrepreneur 
and media mogul behind attempts to stop a left-leaning victory 
at the polls. 
  Casini welcomed this afternoon's over 2-hour meeting between 
Berlusconi and Martinazzoli at the latter's villa at Arcore near 
Milan. No details were available on the meeting, though 
Berlusconi invited the press in and, after making sure 
Martinazzoli had made no statement on leaving, described it as 
"very cordial, let's say the discourse continues." 
  Berlusconi also commented that the conservative parties have 
so far failed to emerge from the mentality created by 
proportional representatives into the sort of alliances needed 
to create a winning bloc in the coming elections by simple 
majority. 
  Asked how he assesses the objections raised by some of 
Martinazzoli's aides to an alliance with himself or the Northern 
League's Umberto Bossi, he said: "It's the death sentence for 
their party, in other words, a ploy that is openly advantageous 
to the Left Democrats." 
  The "neo-centrists," who will be releasing a policy document 
tomorrow, say cooperation with Berlusconi and the League is 
possible. But, for the time being, unless a "serious revision" 
is seen, they draw the line at a "tactical" alliance for the 
elections with the conservative hardliners of the Italian Social 
Movement, the post-war heir to Benito Mussolini's Fascist Party. 
  But, in an editorial to be published Thursday morning by IL 
POPOLO, the Christian Democrat mouthpiece, Martinazzoli said he 
sees a platform including the League or the Social Movement as 
its reference-points would be "an exercise verging on a short 
circuit." 
  He also said that, once the Christian Democrat Party had 
been 
freed of the "dross" accumulated during decades in power, it 
would still be able to reflect the need for a balance between 
"the values of liberty and the aspirations for justice" that are 
needed to govern an "orderly democratic progress." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57970 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94031" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy &amp; Vatican City </F>
<H3> <TI>   Friuli's League-Led Regional Government Collapses </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR3012100393 Rome ANSAMAIL Database in English 1758 GMT 29 
Dec 93--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR3012100393 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome ANSAMAIL Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "League-Led Regional Government Voted </F>
Down"] 
  [Text] Trieste, 29 Dec (ANSA) -- Friuli Giulia Venezia's 
regional government, Italy's first to be led by the Northern 
League, was voted out of power here today only six months after 
the elections that led to its formation in June. 
  The government's draft budget was rejected, then a 
no-confidence vote garnered 34 ayes and 25 noes, giving a 
fortnight for the formation of a new executive. The ouster was 
the first-ever by the regional assembly of the regional 
government. 
  The vote represents a new set-back for the previously 
all-conquering Northern League, which swept much of the board in 
Northern Italy in local elections held in June, but then failed 
to build on its breakthrough in voting in a group of major and 
less important cities early this month. 
  The majority that downed Friuli Venezia Giulia's government 
consisted of Left and Christian Democrats, Socialists, the 
Communists, the Friuli Autonomy League, the Greens, and a couple 
of independents. Opposition to the no-confidence motion came 
from the League, the Republicans and the Liberals, who formed 
the governing alliance, plus the neo-Fascist Italian Social 
Movement and the Slate for Trieste. 
  The political parties have been negotiating for the 
formation 
of a new majority for several days. One idea is a Christian 
Democrat-League alliance, which is being urged by the 
neo-Fascists and the Slate for Trieste, and another a Left 
Democrat-led coalition including the Communists, the Greens and 
the Friuli Autonomy League with support from Christian Democrats 
and Socialists. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57971 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94032" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy &amp; Vatican City </F>
<H3> <TI>   Finance Minister on Supplementary Budget Measures </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR3012105493 Rome ANSAMAIL Database in English 2151 GMT 29 
Dec 93--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR3012105493 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome ANSAMAIL Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Cabinet Approves 6.78 Trillion </F>
Supplementary Budget"] 
  [Text] Rome, 29 Dec (ANSA) -- The cabinet this evening 
approved a supplementary budget expected to bring in 6.78 
trillion lire next year by a series of measures including hikes 
on Value-Added Tax, spirits and petrol and two new state 
lotteries: a " scratch-and-win" game, and a new version of the 
soccer pools in which punters have to guess the highest-scoring 
matches. 
  The package contains no increase in the price of cigarettes, 
although Finance Minister Franco Gallo said certain fixed taxes 
including that on tobacco "might be reviewed before the end of 
April." 
  According to ministerial estimates, the measures will bring 
in 6 trillion lire in 1995 and 6.29 trillion the year after. The 
package will only boost inflation by 0.2 percent next year, 
ministers said. 
  In wider moves attached to the mini-budget, the cabinet 
exempted Treasury bond transactions from bourse taxes and 
approved a capital gains package -- in the form of a bill -- 
including incentives to give firms greater access to risk 
capital. It also authorised the Treasury's deposits and loans 
department to issue bonds that may be underwritten by its 
joint-stock subsidiaries -- a move seen as aimed at helping the 
IRI [Institute for Industrial reconstruction] engineering 
conglomerate get its runaway debt under control. 
  The mini-budget adds 50 lire onto the price of lead-free 
petrol and 70 lire onto that of normal petrol, taking them up to 
1,550 lire per litre and 1,655 lire per litre respectively: 
widening the eco-friendly difference between the two from 85 to 
105 lire per litre. 
  VAT [value-added tax] rises from 4 to 9 percent for the sale 
of restructured buildings and the granting of licenses to 
cooperatives; from 12 to 13 percent for clothing, footwear, 
fabrics, wines and certain foodstuffs; and from 9 to 13 percent 
-- from 1995 -- for telephone services. But it falls from 19 to 
13 percent for deluxe hotel charges. 
  The price of a large bottle of spirits will rise by about 
250 
lire, bringing Italy's VAT on liquor into line with European 
Union standards. 
  Ministers said VAT revenue would rise by 2.51 trillion lire 
next year, 90 billion in 1995, and 100 billion the year after 
that. The lapse between VAT registration and payment was 
shortened by 15 days. 
  The package retains through 1994 last summer's extraordinary 
levy on powerful cars and motorcycles. It also targeted second 
homes in the country -- many of which have escaped heavy 
taxation by calling themselves farms -- by requiring all 
so-called rural buildings which are not in fact farmhouses to be 
registered at land offices in the nearest town. 
  But it abolishes a 500-lire levy on credit card transactions 
and replaces cheque and receipt levies with a surcharge on bank 
statements, so as to favour the use of current accounts for most 
payments. 
  The capital gains bill, linked to the mini-budget but 
requiring separate parlimanetary approval, widens the tax base 
of financial activities, reintroduces taxation of profits via 
anonymous detractions on overall results, offers an optional 
system of lump-sum detractions from dividends, and offers a 
range of tax breaks for investors in private companies. 
  Enlarging on the capital gains package, Gallo explained that 
the government "intends to reclaim also capital gains on bourse 
earnings: but the tax must be applied on the net result and 
levied in an anonymous form." 
  He said the Finance Ministry is in favour of cutting capital 
gains tax rates to just three, between 10 and 25 percent. 
  "We are obviously thinking of cutting the levy on bank 
deposits from 30 to 25 percent. But I think the detraction on 
state bonds should stay at 12.5 percent," he said. 
  There would also be the option of the "straight coupon 
payment" on dividends, he said. 
  Amid a range of separate measures aimed at making it more 
difficult to dodge VAT and other direct tax payments, the 
cabinet cut from 2/3rds to 1/10th the proportion of taxes on 
entertainers' publicity costs that can be paid in a lump sum 
rather than a percentage of overall earnings. 
  It also lowered from 15 to 10 percent the floor above which 
shareholdings in limited companies are subject to a separate 25 
percent levy rather than a percentage payment. 
  Gallo also said that, despite the tight limits set by the 
budget, the government had also tried to produce a fiscal policy 
that was not an "end unto itself," but rather represented a 
step towards "simplification by bringing order to legislative 
chaos and setting the administrative machine in motion again." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57972 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94033" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy &amp; Vatican City </F>
<H3> <TI>   1994 Deficit Pegged at Almost 142 Trillion Lire </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR3012125393 Rome ANSAMAIL Database in English 1216 GMT 30 
Dec 93--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR3012125393 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome ANSAMAIL Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Forecast Deficit at 142 Trillion"] </F>
  [Text] Rome, 30 Dec (ANSA) -- The 1994 Budget and Finance 
Bill, approved by parliament last week and published Thursday 
[30 December] in the Official Gazette, nails the deficit for 
next year at 141.97 trillion lire (83.51 billion dollars). 
  The state will not be allowed to obtain more than 294.7 
trillion lire (173.3 billion dollars) through the financial 
markets, according to the bill. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57973 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94034" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy &amp; Vatican City </F>
<H3> <TI>   Annual Inflation Rate Lowest Since 1969 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR3012125293 Rome ANSAMAIL Database in English 1039 GMT 30 
Dec 93--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR3012125293 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome ANSAMAIL Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Inflation Confirmed at 4 Percent"] </F>
  [Text] Rome, 30 Dec (ANSA) -- Inflation fell to an annual 
rate of 4 percent in December, ending the year at the lowest 
level since 1969, the national statistics bureau, ISTAT, 
confirmed Thursday [29 December]. 
  ISTAT said preliminary figures taken in eight sample cities 
earlier this month and confirmed today showed consumer prices 
remained stock-still in December, bringing inflation to a 
24-year low. 
  Below is a table showing monthly inflation rates from 1987 
to 
the present: 


Month         1987     1988     1989     1990     1991     1992     1993 

January       4.5      5.0      5.7      6.4      6.5      6.1      4.3 

February      4.2      4.9      6.3      6.2      6.7      5.4      4.5 

March         4.2      4.9      6.4      6.1      6.6      5.6      4.2 

April         4.2      5.0      6.7      5.8      6.7      5.6      4.2 

May           4.2      4.9      6.8      5.7      6.8      5.7      4.0 

June          4.1      4.9      7.0      5.6      6.9      5.5      4.1 

July          4.4      4.9      7.0      5.7      6.7      5.5      4.4 

August        4.5      5.0      6.7      6.3      6.3      5.3      4.4 

September     5.0      4.8      6.6      6.3      6.2      5.2      4.2 

October       5.3      4.7      6.8      6.2      6.1      5.0      4.3 

November      5.2      5.3      6.4      6.5      6.2      4.9      4.2 

December      5.1      5.5      6.5      6.4      6.0      4.8      4.0. 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57974 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94035" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Spain </F>
<H3> <TI>   PP Outdoes PSOE in Demoscopia Voter Preference Poll </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94ES0198A Madrid EL PAIS in Spanish 19 Dec 93 pp 18-19--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> 94ES0198A </F>
<F P=104>  Madrid EL PAIS </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Spanish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "The Socialists at Their Lowest Point </F>
Since 1982"] 
  [Text] The PSOE [Spanish Socialist Workers Party] is at its 
lowest ebb right now. Never before have the findings of opinion 
polls been so negative for the ruling party. According to the 
data in this "Winter Barometer," for the first time since it 
came to power in 1982 the PSOE is not the number one choice of 
Spanish voters, as the PP [People's Party] is almost two points 
ahead of it. The economic crisis, moreover, has severely torn 
the social fabric: One of every two respondents says that 
someone with whom he associates daily is unemployed or looking 
for a first job. These are the main findings of the poll that 
Demoscopia conducted for EL PAIS. 
  Sixty-two percent of Spaniards describe our country's 
political situation as "poor or very poor"; this is a record 
number, quadrupling, for example, the December 1988 figure. The 
disillusionment with the first few months of the new government, 
which the "Autumn Barometer" had already detected, has mounted 
over the past three months. Thus, for the first time since 1982 
the PSOE is not the party that respondents mentioned most often 
when asked for whom they would vote if elections were held now. 
Direct voter preference are now more favorable to the PP (22.6 
percent versus 20.8 percent for the PSOE); this has no precedent 
over the past decade. We are not, to be sure, in an election 
campaign, and as a consequence these numbers are a reflection 
more of the prevailing state of opinion in society at large than 
of clear-cut voter leanings. But this in no way diminishes the 
poll's significance as an assessment of the political climate in 
Spain. There has been a clear decline in spontaneous voter 
identification with the ruling party. In just three months 
(October-December) it has seen its explicit support drop by 
one-fourth, from 28.3 percent in October to 20.8 percent today. 
Significantly, 23 percent of Spaniards under the age of 25 say 
that if elections were held today, they would vote for the PP, 
while only 13 percent say they would vote for the PSOE. In 
contrast, the opposite is the case among the oldest age group 
(those over 65), 33 percent of whom say that they would vote for 
the PSOE, while 20 percent would choose the PP. 
  United Left (IU) has also posted an appreciable decline in 
explicit voter preference, from 9.9 percent in October to 7.4 
percent now. CiU [Convergence and Union], for its part, has 
dropped from 3.7 percent in October to 2.9 percent today. 
  It bears emphasizing, in any event, that there has been a 
noteworthy increase in the percentage of people who decline to 
answer the question or say they would not vote. They now account 
for 37.1 percent, compared to 28.5 percent in October and 22.2 
percent in July (this matches the actual voter absenteeism at 
the 6 June elections). The electorate has thus once again lost 
its enthusiasm, but this pullback cannot be seen in all parties 
alike. The explicit voter preference for the PSOE has undergone 
the most obvious decline. 
  The evaluation of the current government's performance so 
far 
has worsened from just 4.4 (on a scale of 1 to 10) in October to 
3.9 today. The drop in the government's overall marks is due 
mainly to the more critical attitude among Socialist voters, who 
gave it a 5.5 now as opposed to a 6.2 in October. The mark that 
the government gets for dealing with the economic crisis and 
unemployment is even worse: 3.5 on the average. 
  The assessment of the main political leaders reflects this 
overall climate of opinion. Felipe Gonzalez, the prime minister 
and leader of the ruling party, got his lowest grade ever: 4.6. 
Jose Maria Aznar is up three-tenths of a percent from October to 
an average mark of 4.1, eight-tenths below his all-time high of 
4.9 in December 1989. 
  Just 7 percent of the respondents want the current Socialist 
government to remain unchanged under present economic and social 
conditions in Spain. A massive 80 percent, in contrast, want 
changes in the Executive Branch; 27 percent lean towards the 
status quo in the current cabinet but with a new economic 
policy; 35 percent recommend various prescriptions for coalition 
governments, and 18 percent call for new elections. In any 
event, the current erosion of support for the PSOE does not seem 
to be offset by a clearly perceived alternative, as just 20 
percent feel that a People's Party government would do a better 
job. 


Voter Preference in Hypothetical General Elections (percentage of sample) 

Party             December       July 1993   October       Actual Vote in 
                  1993                       1993          6 June 1993 
                                                           General 
                                                           Elections 
                                                           (percent of 
                                                           electorate) 

PSOE              20.8           33.1        28.3          29.38 

PP                22.6           22.6        21.4          26.90 

IU                7.4            8.6         9.9           7.39 

CiU               2.9            4.1         3.7           3.82 

Basque            1.4            1.3         1.1           0.95 
Nationalist 
Party 

Canary Islands    0.5            0.5         0.5           0.68 
Coalition 

Herri Batasuna    0.9            0.6         0.5           0.67 

Republican Left   0.7            0.9         0.7           0.62 
of Catalonia 

Aragonese         0.3            0.4         0.5           0.47 
Regionalist 
Party 

Eusko             0.3            0.3         0.1           0.42 
Alkartasuna 

Valencian Union   0.3            --          0.2           0.36 


Others            2.1            3.6         2.9           4.49 

Blank/null        2.7            1.8         1.7           1.02 

Not sure/no       37.1           22.2        28.5          22.33 
answer 

Total             100.0          100.0       100.0         100.0 




Voter Preference by Age Group 

Party             18-24           25-44           45-54           65+ 

PSOE              13              21              19              33 

PP                23              24              23              20 

IU                12              11              4               2 

Others            14              6               11              7 

Blank             6               4               1               2 

Not sure/no       33              35              42              36 
answer 




On a scale of 1-10, how would you rate the overall performance of the 
current government headed by Felipe Gonzalez? 

Average in       Overall         PSOE voters    PP voters      IU voters 

December 1993    3.9             5.5            2.5            3.4 

October 1993     4.4             6.2            2.6            3.7 




On a scale of 1-10, how would you rate the current government's efforts to 
overcome the economic crisis and create jobs? 

Average in       Overall         PSOE voters    PP voters      IU voters 

December 1993    3.5             4.9            2.3            2.7 




Specifically, would you say that the government...? 

Has a clear-cut plan to tackle the crisis 

Yes                          No                      Not sure/no answer 

22                           66                      12 

Is competent to develop real answers to the crisis 

Yes                          No                      Not sure/no answer 

35                           48                      17 

Is trying its best to 
hammer out a social pact 
with labor and management 

Yes                          No                      Not sure/no answer 

24                           59                      17 




Under current economic and social conditions in Spain, which of the following 
options do you find best as a solution to the crisis? 

Option               Total         PSOE voters    PP voters      IU voters 

Keep current         27            40             13             28 
government, but 
with a new 
economic policy 

Call new general     18            8              33             19 
elections 

Form a broad         17            10             20             11 
coalition 
government with 
all major 
vote-getting 
parties 

PSOE-PP coalition    9             7              22             2 
government 

PSOE-IU coalition    9             9              3              35 
government 

Keep current         7             16             1              0 
Socialist 
government, 
unchanged 

Not sure/no answer   13            10             3              4 





Ratings of National Leaders 

Name        Percent    October    December    March    July    October    December 
            Giving a   92         92          93       93      93         93 
            Grade 

Felipe      95         4.9        4.8         4.8      5.6     4.7        4.6 
Gonzalez 

Julio       87         3.9        3.8         4.1      4.6     4.0        3.9 
Anguita 

Jose A.     68         3.7        3.5         3.6      3.7     3.4        3.5 
Ardanza 

Jordi       81         3.8        3.5         3.6      3.6     3.2        3.3 
Pujol 

Alfonso     89         2.7        2.3         2.6      2.6     2.8        2.8 
Guerra 

Jose        91         3.9        3.8         3.9      4.4     3.8        4.1 
Maria 
Aznar 

Narcis      81         --         --          3.8      3.9     3.4        3.3 
Serra 

Carlos      82         --         --          --       2.7     2.6        2.6 
Solchaga 




In general, would you say that the political situation in Spain is...? 

Answer     July    October    December    March    July    October    December 
           1992    1992       1992        1993     1993    1993       1993 

Very       21      13         11          12       20      14         9 
good or 
good 

So-so      23      25         26          25       26      25         23 

Bad or     48      54         56          57       47      57         61 
very bad 


Not        10      8          6           6        7       4          7 
sure/no 
answer 

Total      100     100        100         100      100     100        100 


<H3>  In Almost Every Other Family Someone Is Unemployed or 
Looking for Work </H3>
  Three of every four Spaniards (75 percent) feel that our 
country's current economic situation is bad or very bad. This is 
the highest percentage ever, surpassing the previous record of 
72 percent posted last fall. 
  Yet the pessimism about the economy seems to be bottoming 
out, as the percentage of people saying that their household's 
own economic situation is worsening is mostly unchanged. There 
has even been a slight increase in the number of people who 
think that the overall economic situation will improve, and 
pessimism about future joblessness has leveled out. 
  In any event, the major impact of the economic crisis on 
Spain's social fabric in recent years can scarcely be 
underestimated. We cannot forget that according to the findings 
of the poll, one out of every two households (47 percent) has a 
member who is unemployed or looking for a first job. 
  In Andalusia the percentage rises to 61. 
  Some 72 percent of the respondents also say that they have 
close friends or relatives not living with them who are out of 
work or looking for a first job. Job insecurity has reached 
striking levels, as one quarter of the respondents say that they 
are very afraid that they or a member of their family who lives 
with them could lose their present job in the months to come. 
  An additional 35 percent say they are "somewhat afraid" in 
this regard. Only 36 percent of Spaniards, in contrast, feel 
safe about their jobs in the immediate future. Eighty percent 
also think that the people around them who are unemployed or 
looking for their first job have little or no chance of finding 
work in the short run. 
  Some 42 percent of the respondents say that they have had to 
change their buying habits for financial reasons: 35 percent of 
the upper or upper-middle class, 47 percent of the middle class, 
and 41 percent of the lower-middle or lower class. 
  Seven out of every 10 Spaniards feel that 1993 has been a 
bad 
year, but those who think that 1994 will be better are somewhat 
more numerous than those who think it will be worse (36 to 24 
percent). Moreover, one out of every two Spaniards says that he 
is preparing to meet the new year with confidence, while a third 
say they are fearful. 
  These percentages, which clearly reflect more pessimism than 
six or seven years ago (back then, 70 percent of Spaniards said 
they were confident about the new year), are slightly more 
encouraging than a year ago. Spaniards still regard the economic 
situation as very serious but seem to be seeing some light at 
the end of the tunnel. 
  As for reform of the job market, an overwhelming majority of 
Spaniards consider it necessary, but an equally clear-cut 
majority feel that the reform the government is trying to 
implement has been poorly explained to the public and poorly 
negotiated with the unions. 
  The so-called allocation of work (fewer hours on the job, 
with the resulting cut in pay, to boost the employment level) is 
viewed positively by 46 percent of the Spaniards and negatively 
by 43 percent. In other words, opinion is sharply divided on 
this issue in our country, in clear contrast to public sentiment 
in other countries of the European Union (for example, as EL 
PAIS reported on 14 December 1993, 71 percent of the Danes favor 
allocation of work). 


In general, how would you describe the economic situation in Spain? 

Answer      Dec    Dec    Dec    Dec    Jun    Dec    Apr    Jul    Oct    Dec    Mar    Jul    Oct    Dec 
(in         76     87     88     89     91     91     92     92     92     92     93     93     93     93 
percent) 

Very good   27     12     17     25     29     17     20     19     11     8      10     10     7      4 
or good 

So-so       40     53     50     51     49     51     34     28     22     21     20     21     20     20 

Bad or      27     32     28     20     20     28     43     50     66     70     69     68     72     75 
very bad 

Not         6      3      5      4      2      4      3      3      1      1      1      1      1      1 
sure/no 
answer 

1976 data from the Center for Sociological Research 




More specifically, do you think that your household's economic situation has improved, worsened, or 
stayed the same in recent months? 

Answer      Dec    Dec    Dec    Jun    Dec    Apr    Jul    Oct    Dec    Mar    Jul    Oct    Dec 
(in         87     88     89     91     91     92     92     92     92     93     93     93     93 
percent) 

Improved    16     19     20     18     19     14     17     11     8      8      8      5      5 

Stayed      57     63     64     66     58     57     50     52     50     52     58     56     55 
the same 

Worsened    25     16     13     15     22     28     32     36     42     40     33     38     39 

Not         1      2      3      1      1      1      1      1      0      0      1      1      1 
sure/no 
answer 




In your home, in other words, among the people with whom you share a 
household, is there anyone who is currently unemployed or looking for a 
first job? 

Answer       Total      Madrid      Catalonia      Andalusia      Rest 

Yes          47         45          42             61             45 

No           52         55          58             39             54 

Not          1          --          --             --             1 
sure/no 
answer 




------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Among your other relatives or closest friends, is there anyone who is curren-| 
|tly unemployed or looking for a first job?                                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Answer                                |Percent                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yes                                   |72                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No                                    |28                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 




------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|How fearful are you that you or a member of your family who now has a job ma-| 
|y lose it in the coming months?                                              | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Answer                                |Percent                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Not at all or hardly fearful          |36                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Somewhat fearful                      |35                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Very fearful                          |25                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Not sure/no answer                    |4                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 




------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|What do you think the chances are that the people you know who are now unemp-| 
|loyed or looking for a first job will find work in the coming months?        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Answer                                |Percent                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Poor                                  |66                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|None                                  |16                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Good                                  |8                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Very good                             |2                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Not sure/no answer                    |8                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 




------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|One possible way of alleviating the unemployment problem would be to "alloca-| 
|te work," i.e., work fewer hours and cutt wages. What do you personally thin-| 
|k of this idea?                                                              | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Answer                                |Percent                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Good                                  |35                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Poor                                  |30                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Very poor                             |13                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Very good                             |11                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Not sure/no answer                    |11                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 




In recent months have you had to change your buying habits (no longer buying 
or doing certain things) for financial reasons? 

Answer       Overall      Upper/upper-middle      Middle      Lower 
                          class                   class       middle/lower 
                                                              class 

Yes          42           35                      47          41 

No           57           65                      52          58 

Not          0            0                       1           1 
sure/no 
answer 


<H5>  Technical Data </H5>
  Poll conducted by Demoscopia S.A. among a sample of 1,200 
persons of both sexes over age 18. 
  The sample is representative of the population residing on 
the mainland and on the Balearic and Canary Islands. 
  It has a level of significance of 95.5 percent and a margin 
of error of plus or minus 2.9 percent for the overall data. 
  The field work was done from 10 to 14 December in interviews 
at home, with the final selection of respondents by the 
random-walk system. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57975 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94036" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Sweden </F>
<H3> <TI>   Other Parties `Tired' of New Democracy's Vacillations </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94EN0180A Stockholm VECKANS AFFARER in Swedish 8 Dec 93 pp 
22-24--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> 94EN0180A </F>
<F P=104>  Stockholm VECKANS AFFARER </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Swedish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Malin Siwe: "No Signs of Thought-Out Strategy"] </F>
  [Text] With a certain amount of fatigue, reporters are once 
again gathering around Ian Wachtmeister in the corridors of the 
Riksdag. How did the talks with Under Secretary Peter Egardt go, 
with the Finance Committee, with Lars Tobisson? What will happen 
to the gasoline tax, child care subsidy, unemployment insurance, 
and direct write-offs? 
  No information on Wednesday, and the krona makes a jump. But 
the currency traders deny any New Democratic impact on the 
exchange rate. Perhaps they have tired of their premature joys 
and disappointments. Perhaps they have drawn conclusions from 
the way it has ended up so far. After putting up a lot of fuss 
New Democracy [NYD] supports the government's policy, satisfied 
with victories such as lower value-added tax [VAT] for tourists 
and higher tax for incomes over 16,560 kronor a month. 
  New Democracy itself regards the reduced VAT on hotels, 
restaurants, and public transportation last summer as its 
greatest direct victory in the Riksdag. 
  "We succeeded, by acting very educational, in making the 
others understand how large and important the tourist industry 
is, that a German who stays four nights in Sweden gives us as 
much new money as an exported Volvo," says party secretary 
Marianne Ostlund, who also stresses the founding of Next Stop 
Sweden. 
  The cut in the VAT is also pointed out in New Democracy's 
own 
summary of the second year in the Riksdag. It was not mentioned, 
however, that the party pushed for elimination of the basic 
deduction for state income tax in 1994 and 1995. 
  On the other hand, the Conservatives are quick to point out 
that effort. That New Democracy has arranged for a tax increase 
for half of Sweden's full-time employees is an argument that 
could entice renegade Conservative voters back home to the fold. 
  When New Democracy made its comet-like career in the 
political sky, the Conservatives primarily assumed the role of 
observer. The Liberal Party and the Social Democrats were those 
who went to battle against what they categorized as opposition 
to refugees and populism. Now, apart from the refugee issue in 
which Bengt Westerberg and Ingvar Carlsson are setting the tone, 
it is the Conservatives who complain the loudest. 
  Prime Minister Carl Bildt was not kind in his comments after 
the carnival Wednesday last March, when New Democracy voted 
against abolishing partial pensions for the second time, 
although the proposal was a copy of New Democracy's own, and, 
further, sent back the guidelines for the economic policy to be 
reworked. 
  Before the vote of confidence for the Bildt government the 
following week, Education Minister Per Unckel, Lars Tobisson, 
and party secretary Gunnar Hokmark took New Democracy to task 
for unreliability and lack of consistency. Now it is time again. 
Hokmark calls Ian Wachtmeister the "knight of the unions" in a 
press announcement. 
  "New Democracy acts counterproductively all the time. They 
say that they want to reduce the power of the unions but oppose 
the proposal for general unemployment insurance, which in 
practice means cementing the power of the unions. 
  "If they had been reliable, so that we could have made 
crisis 
agreements with them, the small businessmen's tax situation 
would have improved sooner, as well as the labor legislation. 
Which is what they say they want. With its behavior New 
Democracy has come to legitimize agreements across the 
boundaries, and those are damaging," Hokmark reasons. 
  His colleague in New Democracy, Marianne Ostlund, scoffs at 
the Conservative attacks. "Since the election we have lost 40 
percent of our voters and gotten 40 percent new ones. The new 
ones are coming from the Conservatives; we are a threat to them. 
  "Moreover, the other parties choose to avoid us, not the 
opposite. They do not want to see us housebroken. Like when we 
and the Social Democrats on the Housing Committee had agreed on 
an ROT [construction materials for Repair, Renovation and 
Addition] package, the Social Democratic leadership said no for 
that reason." 
  But the Conservatives and New Democracy do not disagree on 
everything. The Conservatives, who before the election hoped to 
use New Democracy as support for more radical change in the 
public sector, regards New Democracy as a centrist party. Ian 
Wachtmeister does, too; he often calls New Democracy an extreme 
center party. 
  This is the reason for the perplexing lack of consistency by 
New Democracy. On the one hand, on the SAF [Swedish Employers' 
Federation] and small-businessman side, the party wants to 
reduce compensation and subsidies levels considerably. On the 
other hand, the popular leftist side, it is wrong to take money 
from ordinary people when they have a hard time anyway. 
  The first time this duality became evident was in December 
1991. The government proposed freezing child subsidies, and New 
Democracy threatened to vote with the Social Democrats for 
raising them by 85 kronor a month at a total cost of 2 billion. 
This, although the party had already said that it was willing to 
reduce government spending on family policy and later specified 
it at minus 22 billion kronor. 
  The Finnish contagion was the primary reason, but New 
Democracy's threat to oppose contributed to the outflow of 
currency, which caused the head of the National Bank, Bengt 
Dennis--since then Wachtmeister's favorite object of hate--to 
"shoot" the marginal interest rate to 17.5 percent. Wachtmeister 
bowed to the interest pressure at that time. And later. 
  This Janus face was clearly shown last spring as well, on 
the 
issue of lower unemployment compensation. New Democracy's own 
line is that the compensation should be 70 percent of the wage. 
But when the government proposed cutting back from 90 to 80 
percent, New Democracy imposed new conditions on voting with the 
government: The VAT must be lowered. Interest rates rose, the 
krona dropped, and New Democracy gave way once again. But with 
the promise of later negotiations, which gave us lower VAT for 
tourists and elimination of the basic state deduction. 
  Naturally, the government is satisfied with the fact that 
New 
Democracy is working according to the proverb about empty 
barrels. But the capriciousness is nerve-racking; here you have 
a party that talks about deregulation and competition, and then 
it gets involved in the Telecommunications Agency's rate 
increases and is prepared to halt the incorporation of the Post 
Office for raising the postage by 70 ore, yes, even by a 30-ore 
increase after the Post Office's newly invented discount stamps. 
Most nerve-racking of all, however, is the way the party acts 
outside the walls of the Riksdag building. 
  It is a glorious July evening in Almedalen in Visby. A 
couple 
of thousand suntanned vacationers. Ice cream, beer, candy, hot 
dogs. 
  "Come on, come on. You are coming along? Here come we who 
hate all authority," there booms from the loudspeakers. Ian 
Wachtmeister is singing along. And Bert Karlsson. But most 
sparkling of all is Vivianne Franzen's singing. Her passion is 
contagious. The audience claps in unison. She has it under 
control. 
  "Soon it will only be a question of time before our 
schoolchildren must turn to Mecca when praying." 
  "The mathematics are simple. In 60 years the Swedes will be 
a 
minority in Sweden. Unless we do something," chairman Ian 
Wachtmeister fills in. 
  The audience in Almedalen does not protest. But for the 
politicians of the other parties these statements become another 
two heavy stones in the mental wall which prevents agreement on 
issues other than refugee policy. On refugee issues no one makes 
agreements with New Democracy. But the party's indirect effect 
is obvious. 
  For example, the government wants to limit the opportunity 
for reconsidering asylum cases. The Social Democrats want to 
send asylum-seekers home while their appeals of expulsion 
decisions are being processed. Kosovo Albanians and Bosnians 
must have visas. 
  "When extremists get a foothold the point of compromise is 
shifted to others in their direction," is the summing up of 
Ingvar Svensson, a Christian Democratic Coalition Riksdag 
member, who believes that New Democracy has also affected the 
foreign aid policy, where 1.5 billion of the annual 
appropriation disappeared in the crisis package. 
  But what happens next? When other parties under the pressure 
of the Yugoslav tragedy and New Democracy's agitation have 
placed limits on the asylum opportunities, how should 
Wachtmeister then proceed in a matter on which the party has 
leaned so heavily? 
  And how should the party act during the spring Riksdag in 
order to maintain its antiestablishment image, without for that 
reason appearing irresponsible? 
  It would be natural to limit the Riksdag squabbles to two 
issues. Making the child care subsidy conditional on a taxable 
child support compensation, or cutting back on the parental 
insurance and fighting for ROT incentives, for example. In the 
election movement this could be supplemented by lower VAT on 
services that provide jobs and make small businessmen happy. And 
refugee policy of course. 
  "I don't know. We are not that strategic, we do not maximize 
our votes in such clever ways as others. I think there will be 
more issues--right now there are about eight--since our Riksdag 
members are involved to such a degree that they cannot be 
stopped," says party secretary Ostlund, who himself would like 
to become a member of the Riksdag and anticipates considerable 
turnover in his own group, since it has to live up to the thesis 
that long-term representation is bad. 
  Great uncertainty reigns in all parties as to how New 
Democracy will act when the election approaches. For the Social 
Democrats it does not matter as long as New Democracy does not 
submit totally Social Democratic-adapted proposals, which it 
could be embarrassing to oppose. The ideal for the Social 
Democrats is for New Democracy to have to leave the Riksdag with 
3.9 percent. 
  That figure is nightmarish for the nonsocialist parties. 
Best 
of all, of course, they would like for New Democracy to break up 
chaotically during the spring and be punished with some 
ridiculous percentage point in the election, while the voters 
vote for the government to stay. But the next best thing is to 
continue to govern with the support of New Democracy. In spite 
of all. 
<H5>  New Democracy's Contributions in the Riksdag </H5>

  -  Obligatory price labeling in stores remains. 
  -  The venture 
capital companies Atle and Bure. 
  -  The Telecommunications Agency 
was prevented from raising rates for private persons in 
1992. 
  -  The National Tourist Council replaced the Board for 
Swedish Image which gives the branch company Next Stop Sweden 
100 million kronor. The government wanted to scrap it 
altogether. 
  -  Partial pensions remain. 
  -  The retirement age was not 
raised to 66 years. 
  -  The Research Council Board remains. 
  -  The 
cutback in legal aid was prevented. 
  -  Stockholm's Teachers' 
College will be moved to Sodertalje. "All of Greater Stockholm 
cheered," writes New Democracy in its summary of Year One in the 
Riksdag. In Year Two, it is assumed, the Sodertalje residents 
cried, since New Democracy made a 180-degree turnaround and 
saved the school for Stockholm. 
  -  The free radio became freer. 
More frequencies. 
  -  VAT on hotels, restaurants, and public 
transportation lowered from 21 to 12 percent. 
  -  No basic deduction 
for state income tax in 1994 and 1995. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57976 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_n_94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Finland </F>
<H3> <TI>   * Chief Editor on Outlook for Nordic Welfare State </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94EN0181A Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT in Finnish 28 Nov 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94EN0181A </F>
<F P=104>  Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Finnish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Commentary by Janne Virkkunen, chief editor of HELSINGIN </F>
SANOMAT: "Who Would Rescue the Welfare State?"] 
  [Text] The Nordic people's home, or modern welfare state, 
was the most brilliant invention of its time. Hardly anywhere 
else has a society fared better. Developed in the Nordic 
countries, the people's home, modeled after the Swedish system, 
has guaranteed a low unemployment rate combined with an at least 
reasonably equitable distribution of income; the society has 
taken care of its underprivileged and those who have been passed 
over to the extent national and local governments feel they can 
afford it. 
  Steady economic growth has also allowed for and even made 
acceptable a high tax rate once it could be shown that the 
social security network would last. The society has taken care 
of people from the cradle to the grave and provided them with 
the opportunity for an education along the way. 
  There is no need to more especially exaggerate the security 
afforded by a Nordic welfare society. It is not the best system 
in Europe in every respect, but, measured by nearly any 
yardstick whatsoever, one of the quartet composed of Sweden, 
Norway, Denmark, and Finland is found in the front rank. 
  The typical Nordic society model has come to the end of the 
road along with--sorry to say--economic growth coming to a 
sudden stop, high taxes, and indebtedness, although in Finnish 
or Swedish discussion of the matter they are unwilling--at least 
as yet--to admit to this side of the situation. It seems to be 
impossible for politicians to, if not understand, at least 
recognize the effect of the growth of the debt, which is 
comparable to a cancer. 
  As such, the numbers speak a harsh language. Finland's 
national debt has grown by over 90 billion markkas this year, 
which is about half of its expenditures, according to the 
national budget: When the state spends 2 markkas, one of them is 
to pay off the debt. Everyone realizes that we cannot go on like 
this endlessly. 
  The whole dismal nature of the matter is revealed when we 
look at the future: The increase in the national debt is 
accelerating so rapidly that the present debt will double in 
three years and reach the gross national product level by 1996 
at the latest. The welfare state is being swamped like a small 
boat caught in a breaker under the constantly expanding burden 
of debt. In the face of this storm, the government's commitment 
to a 70-percent debt level is not worth much. 
  The automatic process of the increase in the debt is leading 
to a situation in which the public sector may drift into a 
catastrophic cash crisis. Tax revenue can no longer be increased 
as much as it could before by raising taxes. Because the road of 
taxes and borrowing is beginning to be blocked, we are left with 
reorganization. 
  During the recession, the private sector has reorganized its 
activities with a strong hand. A total of nearly 300,000 jobs, 
or 17 percent of all jobs, has been lost in just under three 
years. During the same period, the public sector has lost a 
little over 60,000 jobs, which is just under 9 percent of all 
jobs. 
  Increasing unemployment was not an end in itself, but the 
private sector has been forced to reorganize its activities 
since cash receipts have dried up. "Unowned money," on the other 
hand, has allowed the public sector to go on with a different 
kind of life. 
  The increase in unemployment to 20 percent is something that 
neither can nor should in any form be accepted, much less 
submitted to. However, the other side of the coin is the cost of 
labor. The forces of any system whatsoever run dry if labor is 
priced at an unreasonably high level. When the wage-earner's 
take-home pay is about 7,000 markkas a month, including employee 
taxes and social contributions, the employer's burden is as much 
as almost three times that figure. 
  Under the circumstances and in a competitive world, one has 
to be especially resourceful to get by and survive. It is a 
tough job to prevent the growth of mass unemployment and, at the 
same time, respond to the cheap labor of East Europe and Asia 
with high technology and production based on it. 
  There are too many good qualities in the Nordic society 
model 
for its decay to be accepted. The best and only way to save the 
sound core of the world of the past is for the political parties 
to extensively commit themselves to giving up their benefits and 
improve their organizational structures so that public 
indebtedness can be gotten under control and the whole society 
does not need to change into a relief state. This kind of 
courage will yet be rewarded, although the reward is not yet in 
sight. 
  If our society does not take care of its public-sector 
problem, our creditors will. This is why it would be better for 
us to stare a bit less at the brilliant export figures and the 
stock market as it whistles its way upward and spend a bit more 
time looking at the debt curves on the charts. Under the 
conditions of the recession, we can and must live with a budget 
deficit, and the deficit may even grow, but there must be a 
clear and credible limit to the rate at which we contract debts. 
  So that in the future we do not have to, to copy the 
comparison with the Bosnian situation offered by Olli Kivinen on 
Thursday, answer the question: Where were you when the 
foundations of Finland's welfare state were destroyed? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57977 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_n_94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Sweden </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bildt Comments on Russian Withdrawal from Baltics </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501175394 Stockholm Radio Sweden in Swedish 1545 GMT 5 
Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> LD0501175394 </F>
<F P=104>  Stockholm Radio Sweden </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Swedish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] The Latvian Government has now decided to accept the 
Russian proposal that the Russian soldiers in Latvia withdraw at 
the latest by the end of August this year. Today, Prime 
Minister Bildt was informed about the situation in the 
negotiations by the Latvian deputy foreign Minister. There is 
now hope that the last Russian soldier will have left the Baltic 
countries by 31 August, says Carl Bildt, who has talks with both 
the Russian and U.S. Governments about the situation in the 
Baltic countries prior to the summit in Moscow next week. 
  [Begin recording] [Bildt] I assess that it is fairly likely, 
it is possible to reach such an agreement. Then there are 
certain remaining problems which will take slightly longer to 
solve. One such big problem is the major strategic radar 
station at Skrunda in Latvia. Another problem can be those 
plants connected to the former Soviet warship base in Paldiski 
in Estonia, where it might take a longer time to dismantle the 
nuclear reactors -- there are training reactors for nuclear 
submarine crews there -- and it is not certain that they can 
manage that by 31 August. 
  [Reporter Boerje Remdahl] Have these talks a connection with 
President Clinton's upcoming visit to Moscow? 
  [Bildt] Yes, they have. 
  [Remdahl] In what sense? 
  [Bildt] In the sense that the Americans are also interested 
in an agreement being reached. And the fact that President 
Clinton comes on an official visit to Moscow to meet President 
Yeltsin means that there is an opportunity to take up high-level 
discussions in a different way than what is normally possible. 
We have had closer cooperation with the Americans on these 
questions since I was in United States and met President Clinton 
in the White House a few months ago. 
  [Remdahl] But is the situation in the talks now such that 
Clinton's visit to Moscow can be carried through without the 
Baltic question being an irritation? 
  [Bildt] It is clear that it would be much better if the 
problem had been solved beforehand, but despite this the visit 
in Moscow serves as a possibility to clarify the Baltic 
questions also in the agenda of U.S.-Russian relations, and I 
know that President Clinton was personally interested in this 
and that is significant. [end recording] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57978 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_i_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Juppe Says NATO Needs `New Initiative' on Bosnia </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0401124394 Paris AFP in English 1226 GMT 4 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> AU0401124394 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris AFP </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Paris, Jan 4 (AFP) -- The NATO summit in Brussels 
next week should consider a "new initiative" to revive the peace 
process in the former Yugoslavia, French Foreign Minister Alain 
Juppe said here Tuesday [4 January]. 
  Juppe, presenting his New Year wishes to the press, said 
North Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO) leaders at their 
summit meeting next Monday and Tuesday should "reflect on a new 
initiative, either to guarantee implementation of the peace 
plan, or force the parties to give up their warlike plans and 
find an accord." 
  Bosnia's warring Moslems, Serbs and Croats are to meet in 
two 
weeks in Geneva to resume peace talks. 
  Juppe also stressed the need to maintain pressure on the 
Bosnian parties and for the United Nations to find an "urgent 
response" on the role and means of the UN Protection Force 
(UNPROFOR) in Bosnia. 
  On Monday, French General Jean Cot, commander in chief of 
the 
30,000-strong UNPROFOR in ex-Yugoslavia, complained of the 
"humiliations" suffered by the UN troops and said the force was 
ready for an "offensive intervention" in Bosnia. 
  "I understand the feeling of revolt and anger" of UNPROFOR 
officials, Juppe said. "We cannot allow ourselves to be 
discouraged." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57979 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_i_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Minister Criticizes Zhirinovskiy, Rules Out Visit </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0301113294 Paris LE QUOTIDIEN DE PARIS in French 3 Jan 93 
p 14 </F>

<F P=103> BR0301113294 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE QUOTIDIEN DE PARIS </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Russia: Zhirinovskiy Persona Non </F>
Grata in France"] 
  [Text] European Minister Alain Lamassoure said yesterday 
that France "cannot tolerate" the statements made by Russian 
ultranationalist leader Vladimir Zhirinovskiy, indicating that 
he could not, in this context, enter French territory, contrary 
to his expectations. According to the minister, "the statements 
made on Bulgaria, the Romanian people, the Baltic states, 
Finland, Turkey, and other countries are unaccceptable." 
Zhirinovskiy warned Germany -- which denied him an entry visa 
-- that he would launch a "Third World War" if he ever came to 
power in Moscow, according to the weekly WELT AM SONNTAG. 
Zhirinovskiy announced that he would send "300,000 Russian 
troops" to Germany if he became head of government. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57980 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu002_i_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> FRANCE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Plot Against Ministry Official Discovered </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94ES0194A Paris LE MONDE in French 16 Dec 93 p 18 </F>
<F P=103> 94ES0194A </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE MONDE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Erich Inciyan: "An Act of Violence Is Said to </F>
Have Been Planned Against Pasqua's Antiracism Adviser"] 
  [Text] The founder of l'Oeuvre francaise [French 
Work], Pierre Sidos, and three members of this small 
anti-Semitic group were kept in police custody, not to exceed 48 
hours, on Tuesday, 14 December. They were arrested in the course 
of an investigation about a planned act of violence against 
Patrick Gaubert, the minister of interior's mission chief for 
the fight against racism, anti-Semitism, and xenophobia. Sidos 
was released on Wednesday morning. 
  The three anti-Semitic activists of Oeuvre francaise had 
very 
carefully planned their action against Patrick Gaubert. Since 
November, in order to watch Pasqua's mission chief for the fight 
against racism, anti-Semitism, and xenophobia, they had set up a 
larger number of hideouts and stepped up their tailing and 
observing of him. Was this trio planning an assault, a campaign 
of intimidation, a kidnaping, or a crime? In any case, the 
reality of the personal threats hanging over Gaubert has been 
proved by what has been seized by the Sixth Division 
investigators of the Criminal Police Department in charge of 
"the repression of attempts against state security and of 
subversive activities." 
  Detailed plans of his Parisian apartment and of his 
secondary 
home in Deauville, as well as a collection of photos of the 
premises, were thus discovered during Thierry Verasani's house 
search; he is one of the three activists of Oeuvre francaise. 
The mission chief's weekly schedule and movements, precisely 
detailed hour by hour, were also found in the course of the 
searches. An automatic pistol, an antiriot rifle, and a laser 
sighting device making shooting a target in the dead of night 
possible were also uncovered at Thierry Verasani's home. At 
Alain Leclerq's home, the investigators laid their hands on a 
FAMAS rifle, a military weapon. Finally, high-caliber ammunition 
was found at the home of Patrick Nouhaud, the last member of the 
trio. Some 10 weapons in all--including a high caliber 
Winchester, a Colt 45, pistols and guns, and hunting 
rifles--were seized. 
<H5>  Information from the General Intelligence Service </H5>
  This police operation took place on Tuesday, 14 December, 
when, late in the evening of the previous day, the 14th Section 
of the Paris Prosecution Department, known as the antiterrorist 
section, instructed Parisian Examining Magistrate Marie Paule 
Moracchini to open a preliminary investigation for "conspiracy 
and infraction of the law against weapons." Implicated by one of 
the members of the trio, Pierre Sidos, founder of Oeuvre 
francaise, was also summoned and placed in police custody before 
being released Wednesday morning. The other three activists of 
Oeuvre francaise were still in police custody on Wednesday 
morning. 
  A few weeks earlier, the Central Directorate of the General 
Intelligence Service had provided the information that Oeuvre 
francaise was planning something against Gaubert. Following the 
attacks against Jacques Roseau, the spokesman for Recours, and 
Jean Claude Madrenas, the mayor of Bages (Pyrenees-Orientales), 
the threat was taken seriously, the more so as, over the past 
few months, Pasqua's adviser had been regularly targeted by an 
extreme right press insisting heavy-handedly on his Jewish 
origins. A 45-year old oral surgeon and a member of the 
Executive Committee of the International League Against Racism 
and Anti-Semitism (LICRA), Gaubert had already been an adviser 
of Minister of Interior Pasqua during the first cohabitation, 
and he later followed him as mission chief when he became 
chairman of the RPR [Rally for the Republic] Senate group. This 
loyal supporter of Pasqua is now vigorously coordinating the 
activities of the "departmental units against racism" 
implemented under the authority of the minister of the interior. 
<H5>  "Fight Like Our Forefathers" </H5>
  In an article published in September in INFORMATION JUIVE, 
Gaubert had explained his action by noting that "no extreme 
right organization (...) is or will be protected from a just 
repression." He had announced an extended action against "these 
organizations that advocate a racist ideology," and he had 
specified his intent to "bring about the disappearance of 
bookstores, newspapers, and all sources of communications 
legally praising xenophobic speeches." The daily newspaper 
PRESENT, close in beliefs to the National Front, replied to 
these comments on 9 October: "If fear must change location, it 
is because it has not yet done so. For the time being, it is 
therefore Gaubert who is afraid." JEUNE NATION, the official 
publication of Oeuvre francaise, which once again began 
publication in November 1993 after a 30-year interruption, went 
further by advising Gaubert to write a book which "he could 
entitle--it is imperative--Mein Kampf." The Oeuvre 
francaise newspaper indicated further that JEUNE NATION's 
"combat" could use "a pen, a broom, and paste for our posters 
while waiting for Destiny to give us the opportunity to fight 
like our forefathers...." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57981 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004aa_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 January 19943 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bosnian Talks in Vienna End Without Results </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0501175494 Vienna Oesterreich Eins Radio Network in German 
1700 GMT 5 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> AU0501175494 </F>
<F P=104>  Vienna Oesterreich Eins Radio Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Elisa Wasch] </F>
  [Text] The result of the negotiations in Vienna is 
practically zero. Muslims and Croats definitively agreed only 
on another meeting. The presidents of Croatia and Bosnia, 
Tudjman and Izetbegovic, will meet in Bonn on Saturday [8 
January] to agree on further details for a cease-fire in central 
Bosnia. Currently, the Muslims are engaged in a successful 
offensive against the Croats there. 
  However, cease-fires are not a way out of the crisis, 
European Union negotiator Lord Owen says: 
  [Begin Owen recording, in English with superimposed German 
translation] We have never argued for cease-fires. We have 
always said that there must be a political solution, and I have 
not changed my opinion about that. Only after a political 
agreement has been achieved can there be a ceasefire. [end 
recording] 
  However, the political agreement is not yet there. The 
Croats still do not want to discuss access to the Adriatic Sea 
for the Muslims in the Croatian town of Neum. Only the Croatian 
town of Ploce is being discussed as the location of a Muslim 
free port. 
  There is no agreement on future borders, either. Only 
meetings between various Muslim and Croatian committees have 
been agreed, which are supposed to discuss details of an 
exchange of prisoners and of humanitarian aid. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57982 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004aa_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 January 19943 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Delegations Issue Joint Statement </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501160294 Zagreb Radio Croatia Network in Serbo-Croatian 
1400 GMT 5 Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> LD0501160294 </F>
<F P=104>  Zagreb Radio Croatia Network </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Serbo-Croatian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] A joint statement was issued and a meeting between 
President Tudjman and President Izetbegovic was announced in 
Vienna at the talks between Croatian and Bosnia-Herzegovina 
delegations, headed by Croatian Foreign Minister Mate Granic and 
Bosnian Prime Minister Haris Silajdzic. Jozo Curic reports from 
Vienna. 
  [Curic] Minister Granic and Prime Minister Silajdzic are 
holding talks with co-chairmen Owen and Stoltenberg. At around 
1300 [1200 GMT] the two delegations ended this round of talks 
which was held in preparation for the Geneva conference 
scheduled for 18 January. Both sides accepted a peaceful 
political resolution of the crisis. The talks were constructive 
despite a difficult situation on the ground. Both sides 
acknowledged the situation and the danger of a wider escalation 
of the conflict. Croatia firmly insists on Neum and is against 
[granting the Muslims] access to the sea near Prevlaka [on 
Croatian-Montenegrin border], which the co-chairmen proposed. 
  A joint statement was coordinated and issued. Both sides 
confirmed that an urgent cease-fire, a permanent cessation of 
hostilities, and a permanent normalization of relations between 
the Croat and Bosniak [Muslim] peoples in Bosnia-Herzegovina, 
including territorial, political, humanitarian and other aspects 
of a permanent resolution, were in the long-term and strategic 
interest of both peoples and the two states. In light of this, 
it was agreed that Croatian President Franjo Tudjman and 
President of the Bosnia-Herzegovina Alija Izetbegovic should 
meet in Bonn on Saturday 8 January 1994. Special attention at 
the talks was devoted to the need to fully and consistently 
respect previous cease-fire agreements, particularly because of 
the situation in central Bosnia. The two sides confirmed that 
in preparing for the summit, efforts would be made to prepare a 
comprehensive plan for implementing the cease-fire along the 
entire front line and ending all combat operations, in order to 
create conditions for a permanent cessation of hostilities, the 
protection of the population and the implementation of 
confidence-building measures, the joint statement says. 
  Both sides confirmed that the disputes on territorial 
demarcation should be resolved only by peaceful, political means 
without the use of force and in accordance with the Sarajevo 
declaration dated 12 November 1993. As far as humanitarian 
issues are concerned, it was agreed that a commission for 
humanitarian issues should meet on Friday 7 January, to reach an 
agreement on free movement of humanitarian convoys, including 
discussion on establishing new routes as well as securing the 
evacuation of the wounded and providing permanent supplies for 
hospitals. It was agreed to provide all necessary guarantees 
and documents for free passage of a field hospital for the 
eastern [Muslim-held] port of Mostar by Thursday 6 January. It 
was also agreed that the commission for exchange of prisoners 
should meet on Tuesday 11 January. A meeting of the Mostar 
commission should be held on Friday 7 January in the 
headquarters of UNPROFOR's Spanish battalion in Medjugorje, to 
prepare a program of the revitalization of Mostar and the return 
of citizens of Mostar to their city, in keeping with agreements 
reached at the last round of negotiations in Brussels. The 
agreement on the establishment of a free port zone in Ploce was 
confirmed. 
  We should also mention that for the first time proposals 
were 
put forward for the bilateral demarcation of the two republics 
[Herceg-Bosna and Bosnia]. The proposals are different but they 
represent a basis for more concrete talks. The Muslims have 
demanded sovereignty near Neum and the Croats have firmly 
rejected this. There are areas about which the two sides could 
negotiate bilaterally, without the third side. A meeting with 
the co-chairmen, Owen and Stoltenberg, is in progress. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57983 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004aa_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 January 19943 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tudjman, Silajdzic To Meet 8 Jan </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  AU0501152194 Paris AFP in English 1500 GMT 5 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> AU0501152194 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris AFP </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [By Wolfgang Schweitzer] </F>
  [Text] Vienna, Jan 5 (AFP) -- Croatian and Bosnian 
Presidents Franjo Tudjman and Alija Izetbegovic are to hold a 
summit in Bonn on Saturday [8 January], it was announced here 
Wednesday as officials met to secure a cease-fire in central 
Bosnia-Herzegovina. 
  The talks came amid growing pressure on Tudjman as U.S. 
Ambassador to the United Nations Madeleine Albright warned 
Croatia that it might face possible international sanctions if 
it did not stop meddling in the Bosnian conflict. 
  Croatian Foreign Minister Mate Granic denied assertions by 
EC 
mediator Lord Owen due to be broadcast on British television 
later Wednesday that regular Croatian troops were stationed in 
Bosnia-Herzegovina, but he acknowledged the presence of 
"volunteers" there. 
  The talks here were expected to focus on a cease-fire 
between 
Croat and the mainly Moslem government forces in central Bosnia, 
internal borders, and access to the sea for the Bosnian 
Government side. 
  Granic said after Wednesday's meeting with Bosnian Prime 
Minister Haris Silajdzic and international mediators Owen and 
Thorvald Stoltenberg that a "small but real step forward" had 
been made. 
  A definitive ceasefire between Bosnian Army forces and 
Croatian HVO [Croatian Defense Council] militia would be 
discussed in Bonn, Granic said, adding: "It is important for us 
that the Moslem side stop its offensive in central Bosnia." 
  Silajdzic said he was "encouraged" by a Croatian pledge 
supporting Bosnian proposals to allow residents of Mostar, the 
capital of Herzegovina where Croats are besieging the Moslem 
eastern half of the city, to return home. 
  In a joint statement the delegations said that prior to the 
Bonn summit the two sides would make "a major effort to prepare 
a plan for a cease-fire on all front lines, to halt all military 
operations, and to create conditions for a lasting halt to 
hostilities, the protection of populations and strengthening of 
confidence measures." 
  They said that areas of dispute over territorial boundaries 
"must be resolved solely by peaceful political means." 
  Owen and Stoltenberg are to attend the Bonn meeting after a 
visit to Belgrade for talks with Serbian President Slobodan 
Milosevic. 
  Owen warned against putting too much stress on the 
cease-fire, saying that "real problems" should be discussed 
including Mostar and the Adriatic port of Neun, which the 
Moslems want to give them access to the sea. 
  Albright, arriving in Zagreb at the start of a European 
tour, 
said the issue of Croatian troops in Bosnia "comes up frequently 
and...is a great concern and might in fact lead to sanctions if 
there is not some change in that behaviour." 
  She said Washington had specifically warned Zagreb on the 
subject. 
  "The conflict in this region has no justification. 
Aggression cannot be justified. War crimes cannot be 
justified. Blockage of humanitarian aid shipments cannot be 
justified. It is time to stop the excuses and start making work 
on many of the unfulfilled promises," she said. 
  Owen, in an interview with Channel Four television, 
commented: "We all know there is...a very substantial element of 
the Croatian Army in Bosnia-Herzegovina," and said the 
international community should address the issue "more strongly." 
  Granic however denied Owen's assertions in an interview with 
BBC radio. He said that though there were Croatian volunteers 
engaged in the conflict, Zagreb had no intention of intervening 
militarily. 
  In Zagreb, the Croatian Catholic Church announced that 
primate Cardinal Franjo Kuharic left Wednesday for Sarajevo at 
the head of a group of several bishops who are to attend the 
ordination of the new auxiliary bishop for Sarajevo, Petar Sudar. 
  The UN Protection Force had guaranteed transportation for 
the 
bishops from Sarajevo airport to the archbishop's office in the 
Bosnian capital. 
  A significant number of Croats in Bosnia-Herzegovina are 
aligned with the mainly Moslem Government side. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57984 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> International Affairs </F>
<H3> <TI>   UN Security Council Forced To Consider Nuclear Ban </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0401153494 London THE INDEPENDENT in English 4 Jan 94 p 
8--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM0401153494 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE INDEPENDENT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Christopher Bellamy: "Big Five Nuclear Powers </F>
Braced for Move To Ban Bomb"] 
  [Text] International law may soon transform the attitudes 
to nuclear weapons of the five declared nuclear powers -- the 
five permanent members of the UN Security Council. That is why 
some of them are strenuously opposing moves to obtain legal 
advice on the issue. 
  Three of those members, the United States, Britain and 
France, are extremely sensitive about the legality of nuclear 
weapons. Britain and France, in particular, owe their 
precarious position as permanent members to their past status as 
great powers and to their possession of nuclear arms. 
  A request by the UN General Assembly to the International 
Court of Justice (ICJ) -- the "World Court" -- to advise if the 
threat or use of nuclear weapons is in any circumstances 
permitted under international law, Resolution L25, has been 
dropped. But another, asking if use of nuclear weapons would be 
a breach of international law, including the constitution of the 
World Health Organisation (WHO), is still being considered. 
  Although only confined to the health and environmental 
aspects, the question is causing deep unease. The U.S. State 
Department has reportedly set aside $800,000 to challenge the 
submission of the question to the ICJ. From 17 to 26 January, 
the executive board of the WHO meets to discuss its agenda for 
the 1994 World Health Assembly session in May. The U.S. State 
Department is working "flat-out" on a counter-resolution, saying 
the question lies outside the WHO's competence. 
  Although a straightforward challenge to the legality of 
nuclear arms has therefore failed, an indirect one, via their 
longterm health and environmental effects, could succeed. 
Chemical and biological weapons are already banned by 
international conventions. The declared nuclear powers have a 
vested interest in banning these weapons, which are easier for 
less-developed countries to make, while preserving a 
near-monopoly on nuclear weapons (Israel excepted), even though 
nuclear weapons are, potentially, more destructive. Making them 
illegal could have profound implications: it would give the 
nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty (NPT), up for renewal in 1995, 
a legal basis -- which it lacks at the moment. 
  Existing conventions ban weapons which release poisonous 
gases, affect neutral states, cause widespread, severe and 
long-term environmental damage. The prevalent view is that in 
some circumstances it is acceptable to blast, burn or slice 
people to death, while it is never acceptable to poison them, 
irradiate them or infect them with deadly microbes. 
  But nuclear weapons do have some characteristics that have 
led to chemical and biological weapons being outlawed -- 
long-term and indiscriminate effects. Such effects are the 
target of a fundamental challenge to the privileged and 
increasingly anomalous position of nuclear weapons. 
  Suggestions that big nuclear weapons could be made illegal 
while small ones should be allowed have run up against the 
awkward fact that in big weapons the effects of blast and heat 
predominate, whereas below about 10 kilotons radiation effects 
predominate. So small nuclear weapons are less acceptable to 
conventional military morality than big ones. 
  The British government's attitude to resolutions on the 
legality of nuclear weapons has been robust. Asked about the 
fate of L25, the Minister of State at the Foreign Office, David 
Heathcoat-Amory, said on 24 November: "The resolution was, in 
the end, not put to a vote. We believe anyway that the use of 
nuclear weapons would have to be judged as lawful or not in the 
light of the particular circumstances in which they were used 
and that therefore it would be wrong to burden the International 
Court of Justice with this hypothetical question." 
  Robert Green, a former Navy commander and nuclear bomber 
pilot turned antinuclear campaigner, has become involved in the 
World Court Project, as it is known. He believes it is far from 
a hypothetical question; such a technicality -- an ICJ opinion 
that nuclear weapons would violate the WHO constitution -- could 
completely upset the nuclear status quo and bring about a 
disarmament race which Britain could lead. If it seized on this 
opportunity to renounce its nuclear weapons -- the first state 
to do so -- it would gain great international prestige, making a 
virtue out of a new necessity. 
  An ICJ opinion is not mandatory, but it could cause 
enormous problems for anyone in charge of nuclear weapons. The 
Manual of Military Law says: "If a person...receives an order to 
do some act that is manifestly illegal, he is bound under a 
legal duty to refuse to carry out that order." Firing a Trident 
missile would be, unquestionably, illegal. 
  Mr Green believes an ICJ opinion could act as a catalyst, 
either isolating Britain further from changing world opinion or, 
if used cleverly, be open to exploitation. If the World Court 
were to deliver an oninion on the illegality of nuclear weapons 
before the NPT comes up for renewal in 1995, it could have a 
profound effect on disarmament. 
  Its opinion could reflect, and stimulate, a change in the 
mindset of governments. The time might be right. It is 
increasingly difficult for Britain to maintain with any 
sincerity that its deterrent is "independent," When the last of 
the WE-177 free-fall bombs becomes unusable, around 2006, it 
will be hard to see how Britain could use any nuclear weapon 
except as an arm of the U.S. 
  There is increasing concern about the disposal of nuclear 
material, and a comprehensive test-ban treaty is also on the 
cards. The technology of modelling the likely performance of 
nuclear warheads has, according to defence sources, been 
developed to the stage where it is no longer necessary to test 
warheads to keep arsenals in working condition. But it would 
presumably be impossible to develop new nuclear weapons without 
some testing. Britain, having relied on U.S. facilities in the 
Nevada desert, has more of a problem than other nuclear powers. 
  Britain and France are nervous about their permanent 
membership of the Security Council. If nuclear weapons are to be 
the sole qualification, then why not admit Israel? If economic 
and political muscle are the qualification, then Germany and 
Japan have strong cases. 
  Or perhaps participation in UN peace-keeping operations 
around the world should carry weight -- an area where Britain 
and France can claim to have done a certain amount. Whatever the 
future holds, clinging to nuclear weapons as an entry-ticket to 
permanent Security Council membership is looking increasingly 
difficult. 
  Should the World Court rule that nuclear weapons are 
illegal, 
many people who until recently supported the retention of 
nuclear weaponry might favour dismantling Britain's nuclear 
arsenal. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57985 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_n_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Finland </F>
<H3> <TI>   * Communist Chief: Quit EU Accession Talks </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94EN0181C Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT in Finnish 30 Nov 93 p 6 </F>
<F P=103> 94EN0181C </F>
<F P=104>  Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Finnish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "SKP(Y)'s Hakanen: We Must Start To </F>
Look for Alternatives to the EU"] 
  [Text] STT--Yrjo Hakanen, chairman of the SKP(Y) [Finnish 
Communist Party (Unity)], wants to end the negotiations on 
membership in the European Union [EU]. At a meeting of his 
party's Central Committee in Helsinki on Saturday [27 November], 
Hakanen said the general validity of collective bargaining 
agreements and the labor union movement's rights to enter into 
international agreements have not been recognized in the 
membership negotiations. There has been too little mention of 
the funding of social security and public services. 
  In Hakanen's opinion, a radical shift to the right and the 
West has occurred in Finland's foreign and security policies. 
Whereas an independent neutrality policy used to be emphasized, 
now submission to the EU foreign and security policies is the 
point of departure. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57986 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_n_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Finland </F>
<H3> <TI>   * Two Polls Show Drop in Support for EU </TI></H3>
<H4>   * Gallup: Less Than 40 Percent Would Join </H4>
<F P=102> 94EN0175A Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT in Finnish 1 Dec 93 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> 94EN0175A </F>
<F P=104>  Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Finnish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Arto Astikainen: "HS (HELSINGIN SANOMAT) Gallup </F>
Poll: Support for EU Membership Drops Below 40 Percent; 
Commission's Position on Agriculture Goals Is Probably Reflected 
in Opinions"] 
  [Text] The number of voting-age Finns who support 
membership in the European Union (EU) has dropped from over 40 
percent to 36 percent within a few months' time and the 
percentage of those who oppose EU membership has for the first 
time risen to more than that of those who support it, over 40 
percent. 
  Thus Finns' opinions on EU membership are taking the same 
direction as those of the Swedes and Norwegians. Opponents are, 
however, more clearly leading in those neighbor countries than 
in Finland. 
  Commissioned by HELSINGIN SANOMAT, the Finnish Gallup 
Company 
polled Finns over a period of a year and a half for their views 
on membership. The same question we are asking was used 
throughout that period: Should Finland join the European 
Community (EC) as a full member or stay out of it? The 
designation EC was also still used during a poll conducted in 
November. In early November the Community became the EU. 
  The most recent poll was conducted between 15 and 26 
November. A total of 951 persons were interviewed. They were 
selected with a divided sampling to represent the voting age 
population outside of Aland. 
<H5>  Scales Tipped </H5>
  First, preliminary guesses as to the EU Commission's 
position 
on Finland's goals for agriculture appeared in the media while 
the interviews were being conducted, and at the end of that 
period Brussels made public the Commission's views on the 
matter. The Commission's opinion was viewed as unfavorable for 
Finland in the press. 
  We may assume that the public debate on agriculture most 
clearly influenced the fact that the number of opponents of 
membership has risen to become greater than the number of 
supporters, and the situation that prevailed up to now has been 
reversed. 
  Absolutely final conclusions on the November poll cannot be 
drawn yet. The difference between the number of supporters and 
opponents is only 5 percentage points and the statistical margin 
for error for the results of both polls is about plus or minus 3 
percentage points. Therefore, in reality there may also be just 
as many supporters as opponents. 
<H5>  Many Still Uncertain </H5>
  The trend during the year and a half polling period was, 
nevertheless, fairly clear-cut: The number of supporters of 
membership was declining. The number of opponents was not 
increasing as clearly, but there are more opponents now than 
ever before. As the fall wore on, many people became uncertain 
of where they stood on the issue: In November, one out of every 
four could not say how he felt about it. 
  Men are still a bit more eager to join the EU than women. 
Young people support membership more than adults do: While half 
of those under 25 feel Finland should join the EU, only 25 
percent of those who have reached pension age do. 
  Support for membership was strongest among Conservative 
voters, university educated people, and residents of the capital 
district. The same kind of situation existed in November, too. 
Enthusiasm for the EU has indeed declined in southern Finland. 
  In November, 65 percent of all farmers opposed EU 
membership; 
11 percent of the farmers declared themselves to be supporters. 
There were clearly more opponents among workers than supporters. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57987 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_n_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Finland </F>
<H3> <TI>   * Two Polls Show Drop in Support for EU </TI></H3>
<H4>   * Government's Pro-EU Campaign Faulted </H4>
<F P=102> 94EN0175B Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT in Finnish 2 Dec 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94EN0175B </F>
<F P=104>  Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Finnish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Editorial: "Alarming Trend"] </F>
  [Text] According to the latest HS [HELSINGIN 
SANOMAT]-Gallup poll, in November the number of us opposing EU 
[European Union] membership was for the first time greater than 
the number of supporters of membership. The gap is not yet 
significant, but the development trend is alarming from the 
standpoint of prospects for membership. The percentage of 
respondents uncertain of where they stand on the issue was 
noticeably large throughout this period, nearly a fourth of them. 
  Opposition to EU membership in Sweden and especially in 
Norway is still considerably stronger than here among us. This 
is why the change might have been anticipated. While it is 
premature to speak of a lasting change on the basis of a single 
poll, public opinion seems to be seriously confused with regard 
to the wisdom of EU membership. The number of opponents has not 
very significantly increased during the past year, but many 
supporters have at least become doubters. The EC Commission's 
harsh stance on agriculture certainly led to an increase in the 
percentage of both doubters and opponents. 
  It is hard to say how much the different Aho government 
ministers' wavering or contradictory positions on membership or 
the superficiality of the debate have influenced the development 
of public opinion. Opposition to it has grown in Sweden, even 
though the government as well as the opposition single-mindedly 
support the membership negotiations. In Sweden the reason for 
the increase in opposition to the EU has been sought in the fact 
that [in the negotiations] they have gotten too bogged down in 
various problematic details and can therefore no longer see the 
forest for the trees. 
  Citizens' confusion at this point in the negotiations is 
understandable. If their confusion is prolonged, more of them 
than before may switch to opposition to membership. The 
government must convince citizens that it knows what it wants 
and do everything it can in the nation's interests in the 
negotiations. This does not mean inflexible intransigence. 
Hopefully, it will suffice for the end result of the 
negotiations to be "reasonable," that is, as favorable as it is 
possible to achieve. There has been much too little discussion 
on alternatives to EU memberships. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57988 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_n_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Finland </F>
<H3> <TI>   * Two Polls Show Drop in Support for EU </TI></H3>
<H4>   * Farmers' Group Denounces Statement </H4>
<F P=102> 94EN0175C Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT in Finnish 3 Dec 93 p B 
19 </F>

<F P=103> 94EN0175C </F>
<F P=104>  Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Finnish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Pellervo Alanen: "EU (European Union) Statement </F>
on Agriculture Condemned at MTK Meeting; Proposal to Executive 
Council To Withdraw From Negotiations"] 
  [Text] The MTK's [Agricultural Producers Association] 
highest decisionmaking body, the executive council, feels that 
the EU's guidelines for the negotiations entered into with 
Finland on agriculture are to be rejected and that they are 
humiliating. In the council's opinion, membership cannot be 
implemented on that basis. At this point, however, the MTK does 
not want to break off the negotiations, but it is taking a more 
critical view of them than before. 
  The MTK's seven southernmost district organizations in 
Finland's so-called grain belt had submitted a statement at the 
executive council meeting, in which they expressed their 
annoyance with the fact that the MTK had in many ways played a 
cooperative role in the negotiations with the EU. In it they 
asked the council to consider the organization's withdrawal from 
the membership negotiations. 
  They were not given a chance to vote on the proposal. MTK 
acting chairman Toivo T. Pohjala (Conservative) saved the 
organization from an embarrassing situation due to the prestige 
he enjoys among grain farmers. He took a position on the 
statement before it was discussed as an agenda item. 
<H5>  Haavisto Has No Rival Candidate </H5>
  If the MTK had withdrawn from the EU membership 
negotiations, 
it would have been impossible for Heikki Haavisto (Center Party) 
to be the foreign minister, who heads the negotiations with the 
EU on agriculture, and MTK chairman at one and the same time. 
  The MTK chairman elections are to be held today. By Thursday 
[2 December] it had already become clear that there was no 
candidate to run against Haavisto. It is said that Haavisto runs 
the MTK in such a sovereign manner that, according to some of 
the council members, a vacuum has been created about him. 
  According to the plans that have been made, Pohjala is to 
take over from Haavisto as chairman of the MTK after the end of 
the year. 
  Foreign Ministry trade councillor Esa Harmala (Center Party) 
explained the situation with the negotiations to the council. He 
maintained that the Commission's statement is in part so 
confusingly written that he did not understand every point on 
even his fifth reading of it. 
<H5>  Only Annoyance With and Council Members for EU Negotiations </H5>
  According to Harmala, they will enter into discussions on 
points open to interpretation with the Commission on Friday. 
  Harmala had interpreted the statement as meaning that 
producer prices will not have to be lowered to EU price levels 
immediately, but that farmers might be paid price supplements. 
On the other hand, as he sees it, it is perfectly clear that the 
Commission wants to lower consumer prices to EU levels 
immediately. 
  Harmala said that the system will be costly for the Finnish 
Government. 
  Farmer Harri Finnila of Pohjanmaa said that the EU 
negotiations have produced nothing but annoyance and new council 
members. Harmala stated that he, at least, would take a cut in 
salary when he becomes a council member following his duties as 
special advisor to the prime minister. 
  Antti Franssila, who is leaving his duties as third MTK 
chairman, kicked up more of a row than usual for him and 
insisted that, instead of negotiations, Harmala dictate 
Finland's demands to the EU since the EU is already bound by the 
Rome Treaty to protect member countries' food production. 
  Attention was focused at the meeting on the fact that rural 
communities' economy would collapse if Finland were to join the 
EU on the terms proposed by the Commission. 
  Several council members deplored the fact that many of the 
nation's special-interest groups have taken up a position behind 
the Commission's statement and against the farmers. MTK leaders 
have been obliged to negotiate with the labor union movement, 
among other groups, so that we Finns would form a united front 
behind Finland's agriculture goals. 
  According to an opinion poll presented at the meeting, fully 
92 percent of all farmers oppose EU membership on the terms set 
forth in the Commission's statement. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57989 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_n_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Finland </F>
<H3> <TI>   * Two Polls Show Drop in Support for EU </TI></H3>
<H4>   * Membership Referendum Questions Aired </H4>
<F P=102> 94EN0175D Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT in Finnish 6 Dec 93 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 94EN0175D </F>
<F P=104>  Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Finnish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Unto Hamalainen: "Three Choices in Referendum on </F>
EU in the Offing; Ballot Also Offers Option of Abstaining"] 
  [Text] Finns will have three choices in the national 
referendum on membership in the European Union (EU) to be held 
next year. 
  There will be two choices on the ballot for Finland's 
membership in the EU: either yes or no. In 
addition, they plan to include a provision on the ballot in 
which it will be stated that the voter may abstain if neither of 
the two choices is acceptable to him. 
  The committee that is studying the referendum has decided to 
support an abstention option on the ballot since the law 
governing the organization of a referendum enjoins [the state] 
to protect the voter's right not to support any of the choices 
offered. 
  The committee appointed by Justice Minister Hannele Pokka 
(Center Party) did not venture an opinion as to when the 
referendum would be organized. Headed by office chief Lauri 
Tarasti, the committee is just now putting the finishing touches 
to its proposal for organizing the referendum and intends to 
submit it in early January. 
  Another special law will be enacted for the organization of 
the advisory referendum. When the law is to be enacted will 
depend on how far advanced the EU negotiations are. The law will 
be enacted at the point when the negotiations are brought to a 
conclusion. 
<H5>  Whole Country Is Election District </H5>
  The Tarasti Committee has also looked into the organization 
of EU parliamentary elections in Finland. Last week the 
committee listened to party representatives on the organization 
of elections. The committee will submit its proposal in April. 
  If Finland becomes a member country of the EU, 16 
representatives to the European Parliament will be elected from 
Finland. 
  According to the plans, all of Finland will constitute a 
single election district in European Parliament elections. 
  A proposal was discussed in the committee, according to 
which 
the country would be divided into several election districts as 
for Eduskunta elections. This plan was abandoned since it would 
have meant that Finland's seats in the European Parliament would 
be concentrated among the three biggest parties. 
<H3>  No Long 
Ballots </H3>
  The committee members think that it is in Finland's interest 
to have many parties represented in its parliamentary 
delegations. The European Parliament operates through the 
parties' parliamentary delegations. 
  When a country is a single election district, it is up to 
the 
parties to take care of local representation, that is, to see to 
it that representatives to the European Parliament are elected 
from all over Finland. 
  In some parties they are planning on a so-called long ballot 
system. In a long ballot system the members of the parties would 
vote in the primaries for regular parliamentary election 
candidates in order of precedence. Those who did best in the 
primaries would be chosen from the head of the ballot for the 
European Parliament. 
  The committee does not recommend a long ballot system. They 
consider it to be poorly suited to the Finnish system. 
<H5>  Finland Will Not Be Participating in Next European Elections </H5>
  They are striving for local representation by dividing the 
whole country into election districts, but they are not yet sure 
that the model will work. 
  The next European Parliament elections are to be held next 
spring. Finland will not yet be able to participate in them. 
<H5>  Eduskunta Picks First Representatives </H5>
  If Finland becomes a member of the EU, the Finnish Eduskunta 
will have to nominate its first representatives to the European 
Parliament. We will not be able to participate in regular 
elections until the next round at the end of the decade. 
  The Tarasti Committee has considered a so-called dual 
mandate, or whether a member of the European Parliament can also 
be a member of his national parliament. In the committee's 
opinion, the duties of a member of the Eduskunta and a member of 
the European Parliament cannot be performed simultaneously. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57990 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_n_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Finland </F>
<H3> <TI>   * Two Polls Show Drop in Support for EU </TI></H3>
<H4>   * Blank Ballot Seen Problem </H4>
<F P=102> 94EN0175E Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT in Finnish 8 Dec 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94EN0175E </F>
<F P=104>  Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Finnish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Editorial: "Referendum Choices"] </F>
  [Text] When the negotiations on membership in the European 
Union (EU) are concluded, Finland will have two choices: to say 
either yes or no to membership. There are no intermediate 
choices. Like the other countries, we have been promised that a 
referendum on the matter will be organized here too. If voters 
were also offered an "I can't say" choice, perhaps neither of 
the principal choices would receive a majority vote and the 
outcome could be interpreted in any way one likes. 
  The law governing the procedure for a referendum that is at 
present in effect constitutes a problem. It requires that the 
voter be given the opportunity to state that "he does not 
support any of the choices offered." The committee that has been 
studying the referendum is coming to the conclusion that voters 
must be afforded the opportunity to abstain. But then the chief 
question to arise is how abstentions are to be taken into 
account. 
  An abstention means that the voter either does not take a 
stand on the question or leaves it in the hands of the 
decisionmakers. The abstentions may add up to a very large 
number if they are given equal weight as a third choice. 
According to the government, a referendum will only be organized 
if the outcome of the negotiations is to be approved. The 
decisionmakers can interpret the abstentions the way they want 
to, that is, in favor of membership in the EU. Counting them 
this way, EU membership could be approved, even if there are 
fewer yes votes than no votes. That does not seem right. 
  On the other hand, it would be unfair to assume that there 
are more yes votes than no votes and abstentions combined. Then 
an abstention would in practice be the same as a no vote. If 
abstentions are given the same weight as yes and no votes, the 
whole referendum may go all wrong. Let us remember what we 
intend to determine: Are Finns saying yes or no to EU membership? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57991 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_n_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Finland </F>
<H3> <TI>   * Two Polls Show Drop in Support for EU </TI></H3>
<H4>   * Ahtisaari on EU Farm Statement </H4>
<F P=102> 94EN0175F Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT in Finnish 9 Dec 93 p 9 </F>
<F P=103> 94EN0175F </F>
<F P=104>  Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Finnish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Ahtisaari: Result of EU Referendum </F>
Will Be Binding"] 
  [Text] SDP [Social Democratic Party] presidential candidate 
Martti Ahtisaari considers the advisory referendum to be held on 
Finland's membership in the EU (European Union) to be binding on 
decisionmakers. "As I see it, the result of the referendum will 
be binding on decisionmakers. As for me, I would exert my 
influence as president to see to it that this is the case," he 
said in Kajaani on Wednesday [8 December]. 
  Ahtisaari quickly tried to find a comprehensive explanation 
couched in plain language of the disadvantages staying out of 
the EU would create for us Finns. 
  Ahtisaari thinks that the EU Commission's preliminary 
positions on agriculture have given rise to an emotion-charged 
debate and that [politicians] have also begun to play the 
presidential game exploiting the agriculture issue. 
  "They have tried to paint a picture for citizens intimating 
that the Commission's positions constitute the final result of 
the negotiations. I fear that on this basis they have begun to 
play the presidential game exploiting the agriculture issue 
despite the fact that the real negotiations have hardly even 
begun." 
  In Ahtisaari's opinion, Finland's membership in the EU would 
be a logical continuation of the policy of opening itself up 
that Finland has been pursuing since the wars. He said that 
there is good reason for Finland to join the EC, but that we, of 
course, require an acceptable outcome to the membership 
negotiations. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57992 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_n_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Finland </F>
<H3> <TI>   * Two Polls Show Drop in Support for EU </TI></H3>
<H4>   * Eurobarometer Poll Confirms Drop </H4>
<F P=102> 94EN0175G Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT in Finnish 10 Dec 93 p 9 </F>
<F P=103> 94EN0175G </F>
<F P=104>  Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Finnish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Arto Astikainen: "Eurobarometer Shows Drop in </F>
Support Too: 38 Percent Would Vote for EU Membership"] 
  [Text] According to the latest Eurobarometer, fewer 
citizens than before support Finland's membership in the 
European Union (EU). If a national referendum on EU membership 
were to be organized now, 38 percent of all Finns would vote for 
membership and 41 percent against membership. Last April the 
configuration was the other way round: Forty-three percent would 
have voted for and 40 percent against it. 
  The same polling institute conducted the interviews for the 
Eurobarometer and the HS [HELSINGIN SANOMAT]-Gallup poll, and 
the number of persons interviewed was almost the same, but the 
questions differed from one another. The gap between supporters 
and opponents is so small in both polls that in reality their 
number may be the same, about 40 percent. On the basis of all 
the polls, however, the change in support for membership in the 
EU is unmistakable: Within a year and a half support for it has 
dropped by 20 percentage points. 
  Eurobarometer polls have been conducted in Finland since the 
spring of 1992. 
  The Economic Commission, the Economic Information Office, 
and 
the Foreign Ministry pay for Finland's Eurobarometer. The same 
poll is conducted with the same questions twice a year in the EU 
member countries, commissioned by the European Commission. 
  The November interviews were conducted between 11 and 26 
November in Finland. The number of people interviewed was 995. 
The sampling represents the population of Finland 15 years of 
age or older. The designation European Community (EC) was still 
used for the European Union in the questions. 
  When the different countries' polls are compared, it becomes 
evident that the way Finns feel about European integration and 
more extensive cooperation with the EU is similar to the way the 
English and the Danes feel: on average more critical and more 
negative. 
  They have not yet had time to summarize the results in 
Sweden 
and Norway. On the basis of an opinion poll published in 
Stockholm on Thursday, Swedes clearly feel more negative than 
Finns about their country's membership in the EU. Twenty-six 
percent now support it in Sweden and nearly 45 percent oppose it. 


Should Finland Join the EC?(in percentages) 

           May    June    October    February    June    September    October    November 
           92     92      92         93          93      93           93         93 

Should     61     50      46         40          48      42           41         36 
we join 
as a 
full 
member? 

Should     27     31      39         38          37      36           38         41 
we stay 
out of 
the EC? 

Cannot     12     18      16         21          15      23           21         23 
say 

Question: "Finland applied for full membership in the European Community (EC) in March 
1992. Negotiations with the EC on membership were set in motion at the beginning of this 
February. The government has decided to submit the outcome of the negotiations to a 
national referendum. What is your opinion of this as matters now stand? Should Finland 
join the EC as a full member or should Finland stay out of the EC?" 




Views on EC Membership(in percentages) 

                      For               Cannot Say          Against 

November 1993         38                20                  41 

April 1993            43                17                  40 

November 1992*        43                21                  37 

June 1992*            54                21                  25 

Question: "If a national referendum on Finland's joining the European 
Community (EC) were to be organized now in our country, would you vote for or 
against membership?" 

* The 1992 results are responses to the question: "Do you support or do you 
oppose Finland's becoming a member of the EC in the near future?" 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57993 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_n_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Finland </F>
<H3> <TI>   * Poll Shows Increased Support for Nonalignment </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94EN0181D Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT in Finnish 3 Dec 93 p 10 </F>
<F P=103> 94EN0181D </F>
<F P=104>  Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Finnish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Pekka Hakala: "Appeal of Western Defense </F>
Alliance Has Diminished; Over a Fourth of Finns Would Lay 
Emphasis on Defense Funding"] 
  [Text] Basing our national defense on the support of the 
Western powers seems to have somewhat lost its appeal over the 
past year. Support for nonalignment has correspondingly 
increased a bit. 
  Less than a third of all Finns, 29 percent, think that 
allying ourselves with the Western powers in time of war is the 
best national defense alternative. The figure produced by the 
latest opinion poll is 6 percentage points fewer than the one 
obtained in a similar poll a year ago. 
  Support for nonalignment has correspondingly increased 
slightly. The number of Finns who support an increase in 
appropriations for defense has also clearly increased: 27 
percent want to increase appropriations for the Army. Just last 
spring, only 14 percent of the respondents were in favor of 
raising them. 
  Finns now view increasing appropriations for it with as much 
enthusiasm as they did during the peak of the economic boom in 
the final years of the past decade. 
  The National Defense Information Planning Board commissioned 
the Finnish Gallup Company to conduct the opinion poll in the 
latter half of October. Participating in the poll were 1,053 
Finns over age 15, who were interviewed in person. A similar 
poll is conducted twice a year. 
  Planning Board chief secretary Pertti Alanen thinks that the 
drop in support for alliance with the West is statistically "of 
slight significance." On the other hand, support for full 
alliance with the Western defense system, with bases located and 
Western troops stationed in Finland, has increased during the 
past year. The 2-percentage-point difference may, of course, be 
just a statistical error. 
  How Finns react to cooperation with Russia in time of war 
was 
not polled before. But now, 2 percent of them feel it is the 
best solution, while 49 percent think it is the worst model. 
  Thirty-one percent of the poll respondents would interfere 
with Aland's demilitarized status. This was the first time the 
issue was raised and the respondents were residents of mainland 
Finland; Aland residents were not included in the poll sampling. 
  It was argued that there was a need for changing the 
situation by, among other things, eliminating exemptions--that 
is, a desire to get Aland residents into the Army and the 
necessity of defending Aland. 
  Thirty-six percent of the respondents felt that a change in 
Aland's status is necessary, and 32 percent thought it would be 
needlessly difficult to define that position. The men, in 
particular, wanted changes. Nearly half of the women under age 
35 would leave Aland in peace. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Best Soltion for Defense(distribution of opinions in percentages)            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |1992                     |1993                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No military alliances    |36                       |39                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Cooperation with the Wes-|35                       |29                       | 
|t in time of war         |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Joining a Western milita-|9                        |11                       | 
|ry alliance, troops and  |                         |                         | 
|bases in Finland         |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Cooperation with Russia  |--                       |2                        | 
|in time of war           |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Defense alliance with Sw-|11                       |11                       | 
|eden                     |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Something else or cannot |9                        |8                        | 
|say                      |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57994 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004_n_94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Jan 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NORDIC COUNTRIES </F>
<F P=101> Finland </F>
<H3> <TI>   * Poll: Continued Strong Support for Peacekeeping Role </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94EN0181B Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT in Finnish 1 Dec 93 p 6 </F>
<F P=103> 94EN0181B </F>
<F P=104>  Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Finnish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Most Finns Favor Conventional </F>
Peacekeeping"] 
  [Text] STT--Nearly nine out of 10 Finns support Finland's 
participation in conventional peacekeeping operations in the 
future, but only a fourth of them would be willing to expand the 
UN peacekeeping mission of the Finns so that they could 
participate in peace enforcement with combat forces. Nearly 60 
percent of them oppose this system. 
  Reports have appeared on a poll commissioned by the National 
Defense Information Planning Board in which Finns' opinions on 
our security policy are analyzed. It is also evident from them 
that more Finns than before think that their life during the 
next few years will be more insecure than now. They worry most 
about the situation in Russia, economic developments, and 
unemployment. 
  Finns take a more doubtful view than before of the chances 
of 
ending the war in the Balkans. Thirty-seven percent of them do 
not support intervention in the civil war in former Yugoslavia 
but would, instead, let the parties involved fight out their war 
among themselves. Last spring, 25 percent of the respondents 
held this view. 
  At the present time, 57 percent of all Finns want the 
international community to somehow intervene in the events 
taking place in the Balkans. This is 12 percentage points less 
than last spring. 
  Nearly 80 percent of them support humanitarian aid for the 
Balkan theater of operations and aid for the refugees. 
Furthermore, over 70 percent hope that the UN peacekeeping 
forces will try to keep the warring factions apart from one 
another. The same number also support peaceful sanctions and an 
embargo of the Balkans. 
<H5>  Life Looks Gloomier Than Before </H5>
  How Finns feel about the security and insecurity of their 
own 
lives was also examined in the poll. Less than half of the 
respondents, 46 percent, think that their personal lives will 
become more insecure in the course of the next five years. On 
the other hand, 16 percent of the respondents think they will be 
more secure than now, and 31 percent think there will be no 
difference. 
  The number of those who felt that their lives were insecure 
in the fall of 1990 has increased by 16 percentage points. On 
the other hand, the number of respondents who viewed their lives 
as being secure has decreased by 5 percentage points. 
  Women's and men's views of the future clearly differ from 
one 
another. Sixty-one percent of the women view the future as being 
more insecure, while 48 percent of the men do. The members of 
the youngest age group, 15 to 24, viewed this most favorably. 
One out of every five of them viewed the future as being more 
secure. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57995 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004aa_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 January 19943 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   UK's General Rose To Command UN Forces in Bosnia </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501214194 London PRESS ASSOCIATION in English 1606 GMT 5 
Jan 94 </F>

<F P=103> LD0501214194 </F>
<F P=104>  London PRESS ASSOCIATION </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [By Charles Miller, PRESS ASSOCIATION defence correspondent] </F>
  [Text] Former SAS [Special Air Service] chief Lieutenant 
General Sir Mike Rose is to take command of United Nations 
forces in Bosnia. He will replace Belgian Lieutenant General 
Francis Briquemont, who asked to be relieved of his duties after 
criticising the UN handling of the crisis. A formal UN 
announcement was expected later today, said the Ministry of 
Defence. 
  Gen Briquemont, 58, who has led the UN protection force 
[UNPROFOR] since last July, has repeatedly expressed frustration 
with his mandate and the lack of support. He attacked the UN 
Security Council last week for setting lofty goals while failing 
to send adequate numbers of troops to carry them out. "There is 
a fantastic gap between all these Security Council resolutions 
and the means available to execute them," he said. 
  He stressed that he needed at least 10,000 fresh troops to 
carry out resolutions, including one to set up "safe areas" 
around Muslim enclaves threatened by Bosnian Serb forces. 
  Gen Rose, 53, will command some 12,000 troops from a dozen 
different nations in a humanitarian operation that has become 
increasingly difficult to maintain because of the attitude of 
all three warring factions. 
  Aid convoys have been deliberately halted and both the 
British and French Governments have hinted they might pull out 
this spring if peace is not reached. 
  Gen Rose, who is currently commander of the UK Field Army, 
will be based at the UNPROFOR headquarters at Kiseljak midway 
between Sarajevo and the main UK base at Vitez. He will be 
responsible to the overall commander of UN forces across the 
former Yugoslavia, French General Jean Cot. 
  Gen Rose, who was commissioned into the Coldstream Guards in 
1964, takes over command at a time when the British are 
represented by the Coldstreams. The general has spent a 
significant part of his Army career working undercover with the 
elite SAS. He commanded 22 SAS Regiment from 1979 to 1982 
through the Iranian Embassy siege crisis and the Falklands 
conflict. He masterminded the daring SAS behind-the-lines 
operations in the Falklands and played a key role in negotiating 
an end to the fighting with Argentine commanders. For more than 
a week before the Argentine surrender, he directed a vital 
operation to set up direct lines of communication with the 
Argentine commander General Menendez and his staff. Once the 
Argentines agreed to lay down their arms, he flew by helicopter 
into Port Stanley for final negotiations with Gen Menendez. 
  Gen Rose's SAS experience included operations in Northern 
Ireland and two years after the Falklands conflict he was 
appointed to the command of 39 Infantry Brigade in Belfast. He 
was then appointed Director Special Forces as the overall head 
of the SAS and the Royal Marines' maritime equivalent the 
Special Boat Service. 
  On promotion to general, he took command of the Army's 
North-East District and 2nd Infantry Division. He was most 
recently commandant of the Army Staff College in Camberley, 
Surrey, before taking up his current appointment as commander of 
the UK Field Army. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57996 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004aa_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 January 19943 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   French General on Briquemont's Departure, UN Role </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0501125394 Brussels LE SOIR in French 5 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> BR0501125394 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels LE SOIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with French General Philippe Morillon, former </F>
commander of the UN Protection Force in Bosnia, by Jacques Cordy 
in Paris; date not given: "On Belgian General Francis 
Briquemont's Departure From Bosnia"] 
  [Text] [Cordy] General Briquemont will soon be leaving 
Sarajevo and giving up his command of the blue helmets, as you 
did six months ago. Has anything changed in Bosnia since then ? 
  [Morillon] He would no doubt be better able to speak of the 
present situation than me. He took over a situation, the 
consequences and difficulties of which I had analyzed. Remember 
that in June 1993 I expressed the fear that the UN mission in 
the former Yugoslavia would become impossible if things 
continued to develop as they were. General Briquemont has 
assessed on the spot the elements on which his decision was 
based. 
  [Cordy] He is making his decision at a very particular time. 
  [Morillon] Yes, at a very important period: International 
pressure on the parties involved in the drama must be stepped up 
on the eve of the NATO summit in Brussels. It was to be 
expected that the situation would deteriorate. If General 
Briquemont has chosen such a course of action, then I have every 
confidence in him. 
  [Cordy] You left, and nothing changed. He is now leaving. 
What can change? Is his departure not really a rather 
meaningless gesture, as was your own? 
  [Morillon] I do not believe that you have to interpret it 
like that: I was replaced because there was a change of 
mission. His departure, under the present conditions, marks a 
new development in the crisis. Perhaps not the final one, but 
one which I hope will prove useful. Let it be a shock which is 
well understood, both by public opinion worldwide and above all 
in the field. There must no longer be any pretexts for delaying 
peace. Any gesture which helps speed up a solution in favor of 
peace is worth making. 
  [Cordy] It is said that General Briquemont is a friend of 
yours. 
  [Morillon] Absolutely. I know him very well. We studied 
together at the Ecole de Guerre here in Paris, and I regard him 
very highly. 
  [Cordy] But what can he -- or someone else -- achieve? 
  [Morillon] First of all, the international community must be 
agreed on the principles. The first principle, in my view, is 
not to be party to the pursuit of a policy of "ethnic 
cleansing." And I am told that this is included in the draft 
Constitution. Belgrade is now asking for economic sanctions to 
be lifted. As the European Community ministers have indicated, 
this is something which cannot be negotiated on the basis of 
good promises, but on concrete acts and behavior. Starting 
perhaps with the implementation of the resolutions on safe areas 
and -- as a matter of priority -- Sarajevo. The Serbs must make 
a real gesture to show their genuine commitment to peace, which 
is at present still in doubt. The agreements on the 
demilitarization of Sarajevo (and other Bosnian towns), in order 
to place them under UN protection, have already been prepared. 
As, indeed, they already had been at the time that I left my 
command. I am sure that General Briquemont has tried to 
continue working on this. This is a first step which I feel 
must be demanded in return for any kind of negotiation 
whatsoever. 
  [Cordy] In the meantime, does the double-dealing not 
continue 
? 
  [Morillon] This is of course intolerable. The positions 
taken by General Cot and General Briquemont correspond 
completely to what I always said and thought when I was 
responsible on the spot. 
  [Cordy] As regards the West, do the politicians still make 
the decisions? 
  [Morillon] This has always been the case. I have defended 
the prime importance of political negotiation in this matter, as 
in the case of any use of the armed forces. Once again, I 
believe that the Brussels NATO meeting should be very important 
in this respect. This is why it is good for public opinion to be 
made aware of this problem which was no doubt tending to be 
forgotten as other crises came along. 
  [Cordy] You have just published (with Grasset) a book 
entitled Believing and Daring. What is there left to 
believe in today? 
  [Morillon] The need for and the usefulness of this mission! 
That has always been the very basis of the action of our men and 
the maintenance of their morale. The sacrifices made in the 
former Yugoslavia are not useless, because we can see every day 
how human lives are being saved. Believing that this mission is 
necessary, but at the same time knowing that it is not enough: 
We are all perfectly aware of this. 
  [Cordy] And the priorities ? 
  [Morillon] I have sought to give public opinion certain 
keys: 
We must not confuse the United Nations' priority mission -- 
which is to help these populations to survive -- with what is 
the accompaniment to the diplomatic and political measures which 
are being negotiated in Geneva. We must not confuse Geneva with 
Sarajevo. First of all there is the rule of law. Then, the 
military there is to uphold the law. But it is not because 
peace is late in coming that we should cease to try to relieve 
the suffering. 
  [Cordy] Humanitarian aid is arriving in dribs and drabs? 
  [Morillon] And depending on good or bad intentions. This is 
nothing new: Long and humiliating negotiations have always been 
needed. The UN force must not be totally impotent, its action 
totally ineffective, but this is a matter for the military 
chiefs. To return to the title of my book: We must believe and 
dare in order not to be purely passive, because it is passivity 
which is ignominious. This means that a military chief cannot 
hide behind the rules in order not to act. And General 
Briquemont most certainly cannot be accused of that! I remain 
convinced that the most worthwhile task to be undertaken in that 
country is to avoid despair. As long as an international 
presence remains, there will also remain a glimmer of hope. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57997 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu004aa_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 January 19943 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Butrus-Ghali on Future UN Role </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0501174094 Stockholm SVENSKA DAGBLADET in Swedish 31 Dec 
93 p 4 </F>

<F P=103> PM0501174094 </F>
<F P=104>  Stockholm SVENSKA DAGBLADET </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Swedish </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report on interview with UN Secretary General Butrus </F>
Butrus-Ghali in New York; no date given] 
  [Text] New York -- He leaves no one indifferent, he is 
loved and hated, he is called "the dictator" and "the genius," 
he wants to achieve miracles in the new world order which has 
prevailed since the end of the Cold War. Never before has the 
United Nations had such acontroversial a leader. 
  And on this dark December afternoon, with large snowflakes 
falling over New York on the eve of the new year, UN Secretary 
General Butrus Butrus-Ghali is alert, provocative, and 
pugnacious. He is full of ideas and vision which he discussed 
energetically during the hour-long interview he gave while 
seated on the leather sofa on the 38th floor of UN Headquarters. 
  As usual, he was dressed in a pin-stripe suit, but today his 
eyes were more tired than usual. Butrus-Ghali has just returned 
from a mission to North Korea, where he has been trying to 
persuade Pyongyang to allow the United Nations to inspect 
installations where it is suspected that nuclear arms are being 
developed. In this his first interview since his visit to North 
Korea Butrus-Ghali said that "the political will actually exists 
to avoid an escalation of the nuclear arms conflict." 
  "It was a very fruitful visit. There is a crisis of such 
proportions that a solution here would have an effect on the 
spread of nuclear arms in the world. It is something positive 
that there is a political will in both North and South Korea to 
resolve the crisis using peaceful means. 
  "Whether North Korea has nuclear arms? I do not know. But 
we have to have a swift solution since there are many people 
interested in buying nuclear arms," Butrus-Ghali said, clearly 
referring to countries like Iraq, Libya, and Pakistan. 
  The new idea which the UN chief has developed but which is 
upsetting many UN countries and is causing many employees to 
leave the world organization relates to the UN's future role of 
"peace-enforcing" instead of "peacemaking" or "peacekeeping." 
In simple terms this means that the United Nations would shoot 
to create peace in conflict-torn countries. Somalia is an 
example, but an unhappy one. In Somalia the United Nations used 
military force in an attempt to enforce peace. But the 
operation went awry, and many UN soldiers were killed as were 
Somali civilians. But Butrus-Ghali still thinks that the idea 
of greater militarization for the United Nations is a good one. 
  "If the power of the state in a country is divided, we need 
to go in to replace the police in a country, as in Somalia. 
And, if the narcotics mafia takes over in a country, it could 
happen that the United Nations would go in and restore order," 
he said. 
  Asked whether the United Nations is to be some sort of world 
policeman he replied gruffly: 
  "Who else would do the job? 
  "The UN countries should have national troops in readiness 
for peace-enforcing and peacekeeping operations. This means 
that within 24 hours I would be able to have 80,000 UN soldiers 
ready," said the UN head, who believes that "80 percent of all 
conflicts today are regional and could be resolved using a few 
thousand men." 
  But the United Nations must combine the three strategies in 
the future. The three missions of "peace-enforcing, 
peacekeeping, and peacemaking" should go hand in hand, in 
Butrus-Ghali's view. Once a peace has been enforced societies 
and countries must be rebuilt, confidence must be created 
between those in conflict, rivals must be disarmed, and 
"preventive diplomacy" must be used to prevent new conflicts 
before they break out. And here the United Nations will play 
the main role. 
  But in the view of critics the three UN roles are 
irreconcilable. If the United Nations starts to hunt the person 
pointed out as the villain in a conflict, the United Nations 
would also become part of the conflict -- something that 
conflicts with the whole UN idea of objectivity and 
impartiality. A vengeful "UN enemy" could select humanitarian 
aid operations as a target for shelling. 
  The "villains" in the conflict are also needed in the 
reconstruction of the country, but they are hardly likely to 
want to work with a United Nations which has killed their men. 
The arguments against "peace-enforcing" are being stacked up by 
irritated UN countries which are asking with concern where their 
almost 50-year-old peace organization is heading. 
  "Of course there are risks. But you have to accept the risk 
of dying to defend peace. Nor can we provide humanitarian aid 
without peace, and this is why peace must first be made. And 
also, if a war continues, the need for humanitarian aid becomes 
so much the greater." 
  Sweden's Jan Eliasson, assistant secretary general for the 
UN 
humanitarian aid operations, recently made headlines when he 
decided to leave his post as one of Butrus-Ghali's closest 
aides. It has been reported that two reasons for his resignation 
are the UN head's ideas about soldiers instead of humanitarian 
aid, and the difficulties of working with Butrus-Ghali who has 
the reputation of being intolerant, despotic, and arrogant. 
  "No, no, no. There are no problems between us. Eliasson's 
family was not happy here in New York and went back to Sweden. 
Eliasson wants to be with his family. That is how simple things 
are. There are no problems about working together. Naturally, 
everybody has problems sometimes; that is only normal," 
Butrus-Ghali said brusquely. 
  He went on to patiently defend himself against the criticism 
of his "dictatorial behavior" and of the UN headquarters as 
"pharaoh's court." 
  "I think that things are working very well. I never reach 
decisions without first discussing things very carefully with 
others. Arrogant? That is a misreading of self-confidence," he 
said, adding, not without some pride: 
  "Did anyone care about the United Nations three years ago? 
Now the United Nations has become important. Perhaps the 
United Nations has too much credibility nowadays, more than we 
deserve," Butrus-Ghali said, explaining why he is a good UN head. 
  "I am an activist. I have a great deal of faith in the UN 
system and have been writing books on the subject for more than 
50 years. I am also proud of being physically able to cope with 
this work load! But even if I am Superman and Einstein, I am 
nothing without the help of the UN countries." 
  He said that the United Nations has radically increased its 
peacekeeping operations from two to 22 over a few years, while 
the budget for peacekeeping operations has only increased from 
$1 billion to $4 billion, and UN staff numbers are the same as 
before. 
  "This is my greatest success as UN secretary general. My 
biggest failure is the economic crisis at the United Nations 
which I will unfortunately not be able to resolve. Many 
countries are refusing to pay until the UN administration is 
reformed. Pay now, then we will reform!" Butrus-Ghali roared, 
adding irritatedly that "the members paid billions during the 
Cold War, but now they are not paying a penny to make the UN 
more powerful. They are not prepared to give the United Nations 
a new role." 
  In Butrus-Ghali's view, countries do not perceive the 
threats 
in the world in the same way as during the Cold War. Previously 
there was a "black-and-white" situation with a well-defined 
enemy that you had to defend yourself against. 
  "For the Soviet Union the enemy was capitalism, while the 
Soviet Union was `the evil empire' for the Western world. Today 
the threats are more diffuse and more difficult to explain to 
public opinion. How do you explain that environmental damage 
can harm the world more than a war, that ethnic wars are a 
sickness which could infect the whole world, that a new type of 
poverty in rich cities is growing, that the narcotics trade is 
worth as much as defense during the Cold War, that AIDS is as 
dangerous as the plague in the Middle Ages? These problems are 
not producing the same involvement as during the Cold War," he 
said. 
  "The problem with the problems is that we have far too many 
problems at one and the same time." 
  The UN head takes the view that the rules in "the new 
world" are still unclear, as is the future role of the United 
Nations. Much is expected from the United Nations, but the UN 
nations lack determination. 
  "Some countries want to give the United Nations a new role, 
but they do not want to risk lives in peacekeeping operations. 
Many countries are prepared to see their own soldiers fall in 
defense of their homelands, but they have not understood that 
their sons could also die to defend other countries!" 
Butrus-Ghali also believes that increased globalization leads 
to increased religious fundamentalism, not only among Muslims, 
but also among Jews, Christians, and Hindus. 
  "People feel less secure in this age of increased 
globalization. To feel more secure they go back to their 
tribes, traditions, to old values. We have not succeeded in 
finding a new ideology since the collapse of Marxism. When 
everything collapsed a vacuum was formed -- and this is now 
being filled by fundamentalism in different forms." 
  But in two countries things seem to have "collapsed" more 
than in others. These are the former Yugoslavia and Somalia. 
However, the UN head takes the view that the humanitarian 
efforts in Bosnia have been successful, but that "on the other 
hand we have not succeeded in finding a political solution." He 
said that what is needed is "more patience, political 
imagination, and persuasion." 
  "In Somalia the failure is limited to southern Mogadishu. In 
95 percent of the country we have succeeded and famine has 
decreased. What is important now is to achieve peace between the 
various parties within a couple of months," the UN Head said 
with a sigh. 
  The burden of responsibility lies heavy on his shoulders, 
perhaps also because he never has time off, can never go to the 
theater or relax. There is no such thing as leisure time in 
Butrus-Ghali's life -- "that is one of my frustrations." If, 
contrary to expectations, he were to take a holiday, "I sleep 
all the time." But in 1995 he will have more time. 
Butrus-Ghali has determined to retire after a term of five 
years, in order to write more books. 
  "I do not want to continue after 1995. I will then be 74. 
You cannot go on after that age without becoming senile. Let 
us be practical." 
  After that, 10 to 20 years into the future, his dream is a 
United Nations which is the world's "think tank." 
  "The ideal is a House of Reflection to which the UN 
countries 
will come and discuss long-term developments. Social 
developments are accelerating more and more rapidly and we are 
finding ourselves with new global problems. That is why we 
should think about solutions to problems 20 year into the 
future, but implement them now. But for this, a whole new 
mentality is needed." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57998 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> International Affairs </F>
<H3> <TI>   Interpol Chief on Fight Against Narcotics </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401153394 Paris LE NOUVEL OBSERVATEUR in French 30 Dec 
93-5 Jan 94 pp 50-53--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0401153394 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE NOUVEL OBSERVATEUR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Raymond Kendall, Interpol Secretary General, </F>
by Vincent Jauvert; place and date not given: "Drugs -- The 
Confession of Interpol Chief"] 
  [Text] [Jauvert] You are very pessimistic at present.... 
  [Kendall] Yes, the situation has deteriorated enormously. In 
the early 1970's, when I headed the Interpol's Narcotics 
Division, there was no real drug problem in Europe: Trafficking 
was essentially directed toward the United States. What is the 
situation now at the beginning of 1994? In Paris, London, 
Frankfurt or Rome, in all the great European cities, the drug 
market is booming, with an ever increasing number of drug 
addicts. This is why I am sounding the alarm, making an appeal 
to politicians, and saying: Beware, if we continue fighting 
against drug abuse in the way we have for the past 20 years, we 
will definitely lose the battle -- perhaps we have already lost 
it, for that matter.... 
  [Jauvert] Can you suggest any solutions? 
  [Kendall] There is only one possible solution: Doing 
everything in our power to reduce consumption. Our rulers must 
finally acknowledge this: Whatever efforts the law-enforcement 
agencies make, drug producers and dealers will continue to 
thrive as long as there are millions of consumers in our 
countries. The only way of breaking the market, is to make 
demand drop dramatically. 
  [Jauvert] What about hitting the producing countries even 
harder? 
  [Kendall] You can try to, of course.... Recently, a French 
politician even said that they should be attacked militarily, if 
necessary.... 
  [Jauvert] It was Charles Pasqua [interior minister], am I 
right? 
  [Kendall] You are saying so. 
  [Jauvert] Was it not a good idea? 
  [Kendall] Let us be realistic. Let us take, for example, the 
case of Medellin cartel's boss Pablo Escobar. Will the fact 
that he was eliminated change anything at all? No, it may 
perhaps have a psychological effect on other drug dealers but, 
as to the rest, we know for some considerable time that his 
cartel has been replaced by that of Cali. In other words, the 
economic and social conditions in the producing countries are 
such that it is nonsense to believe that people there are going 
to deprive themselves of the financial benefits derived from 
producing coca, opium, or cannabis. Of course, we must try to 
convince them, one way or the other. But we should not expect 
significant results in the short or even in the long term on 
that front. 
  [Jauvert] What if we help those countries convert their 
production to coffee, wheat, rice.... 
  [Kendall] We must do so, obviously. But, there again, let us 
be realistic and look at the results. In Thailand, for example, 
a conversion policy has now been implemeted for over 15 years, 
but this did not prevent a heroin production boom from taking 
place in the Golden Triangle. No, that is not how the problem 
will be solved. 
  [Jauvert] Nor do you believe it will take us any further to 
concentrate our efforts on the drug trade itself and, therefore, 
on repressive measures. 
  [Kendall] No. Every year we are seizing greater and greater 
quantities of drugs and arresting an ever increasing number of 
dealers. However, at the same time, the amount of narcotics 
available in our countries is increasing. Therefore, let us 
continue by all means to crack down on dealers but, there again, 
let us not hope for miracles. 
  [Jauvert] Not even if the means of repression were 
considerably increased? 
  [Kendall] Let us imagine that we double the financial 
resources available for the narcotics brigades. Will we thereby 
multiply by two the seizures? I do not think so. We will get 
to know the problem better; we will develop what is today called 
"criminal intelligence," that is to say, information techniques 
on organized crime. This is important, but how can it improve 
the root problem, namely consumption? A few years ago, the 
Ameriacans tried to determine the ratio between seizures and the 
amount of drugs actually available. Well then, according to 
this study, in certain countries the ratio is as low as 5 
percent, and the maximum is 25 percent. Now, researchers have 
estimated that it would be necessary to seize 40 percent or even 
50 percent, according to a recent investigation, in order to 
have a real impact on the market, that is, in order to reduce 
consumption. We are very far from these figures. The 
traffickers' stocks are gigantic. In other words, even by 
increasing the repressive means considerably, we would not 
achieve a significant impact on drug addiction. 
  [Jauvert] It might also be possible to intensify the fight 
against the laundering of narco-dollars, which has become very 
topical over the past few months. 
  [Kendall] It must be done, of course. But I am afraid that 
this new hobby-horse may lead us to lose sight of the real 
problem. Combating the laundering of money is not an end in 
itself, it is only a means for stopping drug dealers, and one 
which is not -- let us be frank about it -- particularly 
effective. Let us take, for example, the BCCI affair, the 
greatest laundering operation ever to be discovered. What did 
it come to? After four years' work, after mobilizing a huge 
number of police, only three people have been prosecuted for 
laundering 14 million dollars. Now, the annual turnover for 
drug dealing is estimated at 350 billion dollars, about 100 of 
which would appear to be invested in the international financial 
circuit. Fourteen million out of 350 billion: This is little 
more than drop of water in the sea! 
  [Jauvert] Since then, special brigades have been set up to 
combat money-laundering. 
  [Kendall] So much the better. But what resources do they 
have at their disposal? In France, for example, the team 
comprises some twenty people. Ask them how many cases they are 
able to crack in a year. You will be surprised at the 
ridiculously small figure they will quote. You will object that 
their personnel could be increased. This would of course be 
positive, but it would not change the root problem in the least. 
There is, in our countries, considerable demand for narcotics, 
and as long as this is the case -- you can rest assured -- 
people will continue to produce drugs, deal in them, and will 
continue to launder money. 
  [Jauvert] In your view, then, this demand can be reduced? 
  [Kendall] In any case, we should try to. Until now, there 
have been few efforts in this direction. Politicians speak of 
"war" on drug addiction, and they are right because the future 
of our democracies is at stake. Nevertheless, let us compare 
the defense budget to that available for special centers for 
drug addicts. Do the resources available, say in France or 
Britain, exceed the price of a single fighter plane? If this 
were so, I would be very surprised to learn it. The Swedes, 
however, have shown that, when a genuine political will is 
there, demand can be curtailed. For some years now, they have 
been spending considerable sums of money in information 
campaigns and aid programs aimed at drug addicts. As a result, 
consumption has dropped dramatically. I am not saying that the 
Swedish model can be transplanted anywhere, but it should be 
studied more closely. 
  [Jauvert] Why are Western governments, in your opinion, 
being 
so inactive? 
  [Kendall] I have often asked myself that question, and I 
have 
found three reasons. In the first place, developing an 
effective prevention and help program for drug addicts is 
unquestionably a difficult task. We know the motivations of 
drug dealers, but it is much more difficult to pinpoint the 
social and psychological reasons that lead a person to heroin. 
Even those who are supposedly specialists in the field do not 
agree on the most effective form of treatment. Secondly, such 
programs are extremely expensive and only lead to positive 
results after a number of years -- even as long as a decade. 
The third reason results from the first: If they have to 
invest resources in combating drug addiction, politicians prefer 
to concentrate their efforts on repression, the results of which 
are more readily perceived by public opinion. However, if we 
took our time, results would follow. Consider what happened in 
the case of tobacco: Following years of campaigning to 
sensitize public opinion, consumption finally dropped. Why 
should it be impossible to do the same in the case of drug 
addiction? 
  [Jauvert] To curtail demand, you advocate "decriminalizing" 
drug abuse. Why? 
  [Kendall] Because regarding consumers as offenders serves no 
useful purpose. In fact, it is even dangerous. A convicted 
person discovers a culture in prison which may make him become 
something he was not when he first came in, namely, a criminal. 
Note, however, that I am speaking of decriminalizing drug 
abuse, not of legalizing it. I believe drug addicts must not be 
put in jail, but rather, forced to undergo treatment in a 
specialized medical center. 
  [Jauvert] Are you in favor, then, of "decriminalizing" the 
use of heroin and cocaine as well as cannabis? 
  [Kendall] Yes, medical doctors have muddled the issue for a 
long time by trying to draw a difference between "soft" and 
"hard" drugs. As a matter of fact, we now know that both are 
toxic products. The substance contained in cannabis, THC, is 
hazardous for the brain, its negative effects last longer than 
those of alcohol, for example. So why should the two types of 
drug be treated differently? 
  [Jauvert] You said that the police should be able to force 
drug addicts to undergo treatment. In fact, this is now almost 
the case in France, with the so-called therapeutic injunction, 
although few people are aware of this. Once arrested, drug 
users (as opposed to peddlers) can theoretically choose between 
treatment or prison. 
  [Kendall] Yes, but this law is not being enforced through a 
lack of means. How many places are available in the specialized 
centers that can provide treatment for drug addicts? Ten, 20 
times as many would be required in order to be effective. 
Throughout Europe, the state has so far relied too heavily on 
charity organizations. However, it is up to the state now to 
take the initiative. On the other hand, this choice between 
treatment or inprisonment seems to me to be inappropriate: 
Prison is in no case an effective solution. Drug addicts must 
be treated -- even forced to do so -- and doctors must be given 
the means to help them. 
  [Jauvert] Forced? How? 
  [Kendall] I do not know. It is the specialists who must 
decide. 
  [Jauvert] Do you think doctors should be allowed to 
prescribe 
substitute products, such as methadone, or even heroin? 
  [Kendall] Why not? If results can be achieved in this 
way...I have only one reservation: Substitute products should 
not replace one form of dependence with another for any great 
length of time. But, once again, this is a matter for 
specialists. 
  [Jauvert] As a matter of fact, a few days ago, the highest 
medical authority in the United States announced it was 
favorable toward legalization, purely and simply.... 
  [Kendall] I am totally opposed to such a view. 
  [Jauvert] Why? 
  [Kendall] Simply because legalizing drugs would 
automatically 
lead to an increase in consumption. Do you know why more and 
more people are in favor of legalization? Because, through 
laziness or ignorance, the phenomenon has been trivialized. 
When 400 kilos of canabis are seized in Calais, who cares? 
Nevertheless, if tomorrow a chemical plant dumps toxic products 
into a river and kills some fish, that will stir up a scandal. 
Drug dealers do that every day, by placing products that are 
highly toxic to humans on the market, and nobody says a word. 
  [Jauvert] Yet, alcohol and cigarettes are sold freely.... 
  [Kendall] So what? Two toxic products are already socially 
accepted. Is this a reason to add two more to the list? What 
else should be legalized next -- crack, LSD? At what age? 
  [Jauvert] It is also argued that legalizing drug consumption 
would reduce the incidence of crime. 
  [Kendall] For a while, perhaps. But did the end of 
prohibition cause the mafia or gangsters to disappear in the 
United States? Of course not. Dealers will find other sources 
of profit. 
  [Jauvert] Nevertheless, this solution is being advocated by 
policemen in many countries. 
  [Kendall] True. I have recently discussed the subject with 
some British colleagues. A few years ago they would have said 
an outright "no" to decriminalization, whereas today some 
Scotland Yard officials are publicly posing the question of 
legalization. I understand their viewpoint. A policeman is 
there to enforce the law. Now, the laws on drug abuse are 
flouted a thousand times a day. So they ask themselves: Why 
not abolish them? It is a legitimate feeling, even if I do not 
share it. 
  [Jauvert] So you believe that the moment has come to start a 
major debate? 
  [Kendall] Yes, let everyone clearly express their opinon. 
Today Europeans are very sensitive to ethical and individual 
responsibility issues. Let us take advantage of this, before it 
is too late.... 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57999 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Inter-European Affairs </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kinkel Plans `Construction Collaboration' With Greece </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0101143094 Hamburg DPA in German 1348 GMT 1 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0101143094 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Bonn (DPA) -- On the occasion of the EU [European 
Union] presidency passing from Belgium to Greece, German Foreign 
Minister Klaus Kinkel wishes the Greeks good luck and success. 
With a view to Germany taking on the presidency itself in six 
months, he announced today that there would be "constructive 
collaboration." 
  "This year, 1994, the EU is facing a new stage of European 
integration and enormous tasks, in view of profound upheavals in 
world politics and global economic challenges," Kinkel said. 
Particular attention must be paid to securing Europe as an 
investment location. It is also important to deepen relations 
between the EU and the states of Central and East Europe, and to 
support the reform process in Russia. Relations with the 
Asiatic region and the southern African states also have to be 
strengthened. 
  Negotiations with the EFTA [European Free Trade Association] 
states (Norway, Finland, Sweden, and Austria) on expansion must 
be concluded by 1 March in order to allow these countries to 
join on 1 January 1995. In addition, cooperation has to be 
improved between the 12 EU states, particularly in the area of 
asylum law, Kinkel said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58000 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Inter-European Affairs </F>
<H3> <TI>   Editorial on Greek Commitment to EC Presidency </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR2712135093 Brussels EUROPE in English 23 Dec 93--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR2712135093 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels EUROPE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Editorial by Emanuele Gazzo: "The Greek Commitment to </F>
Presidency"; as released by Brussels TEXTLINE database] 
  [Text] The Presidency of the Council moves to Greece on 1 
January for a six month period. You will recall that the 
Presidency does not "lead" the Community, as public opinion 
often has it. It is a "public service" to the Community and 
cannot nor should be "nationalized." It is, for six months, a 
question of organising the work of the Council of Ministers, 
that is to say the Institution, which, in the current system, 
takes the decisions (but on proposals by the Commission and in 
agreement with the European Parliament). Greece inherits a 
presidency, that of Belgium, which no doubt was exemplary and 
which had to manage at least two dossiers of capital importance. 
  The first was the completion of the ratification process and 
thus the entry into force of the Treaty on the Union; all was 
done for the transition to take place smoothly and, in the 
fields of competency of the three "pillars," for the 
Institutions to play their roles. The second dossier concerns 
the follow-up to the Copenhagen Summit and notably the 
presentation of the White Paper (growth, competitiveness, 
employment) and organising its passage to its operational stage. 
The Greek presidency has let it clearly be known, through Mr. 
Pangalos that it was assuming this inheritance in perfect 
awareness of the effort that will be required to advance without 
hesitation along the path set out, and to reach tangible 
results. It is important to know that Greece's commitment is 
total, without mental reservations or "opt outs" and with a very 
clear vision of the "political" scope of the role it has to 
play. Which, moreover, is in accordance with its belonging to a 
culture which brought an exceptional contribution to the 
civilization in which we live. This is why Mr. Pangalos' 
declaration on the need to begin already in preparing the 1996 
institutional reforms, and to move towards the creation of a 
"European Constitution," and more precisely a "federal" 
constitution, deserves to be stressed. 
  We can of course discuss the modalities and procedures, but 
it is important to open the debate quickly (which should already 
have been done at the extraordinary Summit of 29 October). The 
suggestion of rapidly setting up an "Ad Hoc Group" with the 
participation, as observers, of the countries candidates for 
accession, shows the will to succeed as Twelve Member States 
first: which shocks the partisans of "dilution," and obliges 
them to come out into the open. 
  This leads us to recall that Mr. Papandreou, who for the 
first time chaired the European Council in December 1983, in a 
letter to his colleagues at the time, wrote: "We must know what 
kind of Europe we want to move towards." What is more topical 
than this question? Well, the Athens Summit ended in total 
failure and Mr. Papandreou's merit was not to have tried to 
disguise this. Despite pressures from his entourage, he blankly 
refused to make public the traditional "Conclusions" which 
should have spoken of totally nonexistent progress. At the time, 
in the face of a Commission manifestly weakened by national 
egotisms over-excited by the demands of Mrs. Thatcher, the 
Community was almost paralysed by the demand to assure its 
long-term funding, to develop new policies in future fields, to 
end the interminable negotiations over accession by Spain and 
Portugal. But nobody dared assume the responsibility of a 
crisis, and preferred navigating with land in sight. The logic 
of despair (as Jacques Delors called it at the time) risked 
prevailing. It took the shock, provoked some months later, of 
the massive vote by the European Parliament in favour of the 
Spinelli project for European Union, to provoke a chain-reaction 
ending in the relaunch based on the Single Act. The task of the 
Greek presidency will not be easy at all. So be it! The line 
chosen and based on the very substantial work load it has 
presented, will no doubt be supported by the founders of the 
European Community who -- geographically situated in the North 
and South of the Continent -- share in the inspiration. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58001 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Ministry Denies Expulsion of Kurds </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401121994 Brussels BELGA in French 1939 GMT 3 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0401121994 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels BELGA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed Article: "Expulsion of Kurds Denied By Foreign </F>
Ministry"; as released by Brussels BELGA Database] 
  [Text] Brussels, 3 Jan (BELGA) -- Willy Claes, Belgian 
foreign minister, has indicated that any expulsion of militant 
Kurds from Belgium would have to be a government decision and 
that departments other than his own are much better placed to 
decide on the matter, a foreign ministry spokesman stated on 
Monday [3 January] evening. 
  Mr. Claes has also condemned any use of force for political 
purposes. He stated that Belgium, with its tradition of 
welcoming political refugees, refused "to become the theater for 
violent confrontations between foreign groups," the spokesman 
added. According to AFP, the semi-official Turkish agency in 
Anatolia had confirmed that Mr. Claes had promised on Monday 
during a telephone conversation with his Turkish opposite 
number, Hikmet Cetin, that Kurd demonstrators "would be 
expelled" from Belgium. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58002 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Justice Ministry Issues Statement on Khan's Release </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR3012105193 Brussels BELGA in Dutch 1712 GMT 29 Dec 93--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR3012105193 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels BELGA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Dutch </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article signed MVS/ARS: "Justice Ministry Makes Declaration </F>
on Khan Release"; as released by Brussels BELGA Database] 
  [Text] Brussels, 29 Dec (BELGA) -- "The deputy prime 
minister and minister of justice, Melchior Wathelet, have 
refused, by a ministerial decree of 26 December 1993, to 
extradite Amanullah Khan to the Indian authorities, in so far as 
this extradition application was based on the arrest warrants 
issued on 26 April 1990 and 26 October 1993 by the court of 
Jammu-Kashmir. This decision was based on the negative advice 
of the Chamber of Indictment," the Justice Ministry said early 
on Wednesday [29 December] evening. 
  "As a result of this decision, the person concerned was put 
at the disposal of the Aliens Affairs Department in the course 
of the afternoon of 28 December 1993, at the order of the public 
prosecutor in Brussels." 
  "On 29 December 1993 the Aliens Affairs Department decided, 
given that the person concerned did not have valid residence 
papers in Belgium, to issue an order to leave the country. The 
person concerned was taken to the border and given a ticket to 
Pakistan," the Justice Ministry statement said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58003 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu003__a94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-94-003-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Netherlands </F>
<H3> <TI>   Justice Ministry Demands GSM Eavesdropping </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401145494 Swanley MOBILE EUROPE in English Nov 93 p 
10--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0401145494 </F>
<F P=104>  Swanley MOBILE EUROPE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Dutch GSM Launch Security Fears"] </F>
  [Text] In the run-up to the commercial launch of GSM 
[Global System for Mobile Communications] services in July 1994, 
Dutch Ministry of Justice officials have effectively snared the 
progress being made by PTT Telecom by demanding that a system is 
implemented in which telephone calls on the new digital cellular 
network are capable of being intercepted, decoded and monitored 
-- for reasons of security. 
  There is concern that this requirement will delay the GSM 
launch whilst one party or another makes the undertaking to pay 
the cost for the decoder system, a cost estimated at around 100 
million Dutch guilders. PTT Telecom was informed earlier this 
year by the ministry that it wanted to have the ability of 
intercept, decode, and monitor calls on the GSM network, yet PTT 
Telecom said it was not willing to pay for the developing of 
applications to decode calls. The Dutch Government has the right 
to eavesdrop as set out in draft legislation. 
  This legislation will end PTT Telecom's monopoly oN mobile 
communications services in the Netherlands and will prepare the 
ground for a second GSM network operator. The proposed 
legislation obliges operators of GSM networks to co-operate with 
any "special order to monitor data," though it does not specify 
who will be responsible for paying for the necessary decoding 
systems. 
  The financing question will be clarified by a separate piece 
of legislation currently being drafted. Eavesdropping 
technology on GSM networks has not yet been developed, and PTT 
Telecom says it is not prepared to finance its research. The 
PTT does provide the Ministry of Justice with the facilities for 
monitoring calls on the PSTN [public switched-telephone network] 
and on the NMT [Nordic Mobile Telephone network]-based ATF [car 
telephone network] analogue cellular networks. Additionally, 
the Dutch Government intends to issue a competitive tender for 
another GSM licence before the end of the year. Unlike the 
recent trend for "higher bidder" GSM licence auctions, the 
second Dutch GSM licence is expected to be awarded to the "best 
application." 
  PTT Telecom is still a state-owned monopoly, and the 
government wants to fatten up the firm for a financial slaughter 
before privatisation. Major investment in GSM may heavily 
deplete finances and the issue of security and concern for 
international drug baron activity, though important, may all be 
a diversionary tactic for ulterior motives. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58004 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> International Affairs </F>
<H3> <TI>   Owen Blames All Yugoslav Leaders for War in Bosnia </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0601200594 Hamburg DPA in German 1844 GMT 6 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0601200594 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Bonn (DPA) -- In a sweeping criticism of all parties 
involved in the Yugoslavia conflict, today in Bonn European 
Union mediator Lord Owen apportioned equal blame for the 
continuation of the war to all the leaders. Together with the 
other co-chairman of the Geneva Yugoslavia conference, Thorvald 
Stoltenberg, Lord Owen spoke with [German] Foreign Minister 
Klaus Kinkel about the civil war situation. While Kinkel 
expressly warned against optimism, Lord Owen went a step further 
and said that the leaders of all the warring parties were 
indifferent to the fates of the people "because they have lost 
touch with reality." They still thought that advantages were to 
be derived from continuing the fighting. 
  The discussion with the two Yugoslavia mediators followed a 
meeting between Bosnian Prime Minister Haris Silajdzic, in the 
run-up to a two-way conference between Presidents Franjo Tudjman 
(Croatia) and Alija Izetbegovic (Bosnia-Herzegovina), who 
planned to meet at their own request in Bonn on Saturday [8 
January]. 
  Stoltenberg, too, spoke of a "deterioration in the 
situation." He regretted the lack of UN forces to enforce the UN 
Security Council resolutions, and warned against further force 
withdrawals. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58005 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> International Affairs </F>
<H3> <TI>   Belgium's Delcroix Thanks Briquemont for Work in Bosnia </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0601143894 Brussels BELGA in French 1648 GMT 5 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0601143894 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels BELGA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article signed GGD/RAY: "Mr. Delcroix Thanks General </F>
Briquemont for the Mission Accomplished"; as released by 
Brussels BELGA Database] 
  [Text] Brussels, 5 Jan (BELGA) -- Belgian Defense Minister 
Delcroix confirmed on Wednesday [5 January] the replacement "as 
soon as possible" of Lieutenant General Francis Briquemont by a 
British general as commander of the UN Protection Force 
(UNPROFOR) in Bosnia-Herzegovina. 
  Mr. Delcroix "has learned of the favorable decision by UN 
Secretary General Butrus Butrus-Ghali, to replace Lieutenant 
General Francis Briquemont," the National Defense Ministry 
announced in a communique. 
  General Briquemont, who has commanded the UNPROFOR in Bosnia 
since mid-July, had addressed his request to be relieved of his 
post to Mr. Delcroix back in December. Belgium then passed on 
this request to the UN headquarters in New York, at the same 
time proposing to provide another general to complete General 
Briquemont's one year mandate. 
  The United Nations did not, however, accept the latter 
proposal and has chosen to appoint a British officer, General 
Michael Rose. 
  According to Mr. Delcroix, UN practices dictate that when a 
high ranking officer is relieved of a military command in the 
framework of a UN mandate, his replacement must be of a 
different nationality, the communique notes. General Briquemont 
had succeeded France's Philippe Morillon in Bosnia, who had 
himself replaced Canada's Lewis Mackenzie. 
  Finally, Mr. Delcroix thanked General Briquemont for the 
"remarkable job he has done under very difficult conditions over 
recent months" as commander of the UNPROFOR in Bosnia. 
  General Briquemont, aged 59, will return to his dual post as 
commander of Belgium's 1st Army Corps and commander in chief of 
the Belgian forces in Germany (CCFA). He was invested in the 
latter capacity in early July just a few days before he left for 
Sarajevo. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58006 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> International Affairs </F>
<H3> <TI>   Comments on Withdrawing UN Troops </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0601142294 Brussels BELGA in French 1921 GMT 5 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0601142294 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels BELGA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article signed GGD (SVD): "Mr. Delcroix Speaks of </F>
Withdrawing Blue Helmets"; as released by Brussels BELGA 
Database] 
  [Text] Brussels, 5 Jan 94 (BELGA) -- Belgian Defense 
Minister Leo Delcroix threatened on Wednesday [5 January] to 
withdraw the Belgian Blue Helmets from Bosnia-Herzegovina, where 
they are 300 of the 12,000 soldiers in the UN Protection Force 
(UNPROFOR) in this former Yugoslav republic. 
  France, Spain, Great Britain, and Canada, the principal 
suppliers of men to Bosnia, have begun to reexamine the mission 
of their Blue Helmets. Lord David Owen, the European mediator 
for the former Yugoslavia, believes the UN forces may withdraw 
next spring if no apparent progress is made in the peace talks 
within the next two months. 
  Interviewed on Wednesday evening by RTBF [French-language 
Belgian broadcast media] Television, Mr. Delcroix also spoke of 
the possibility of withdrawing Belgian forces from Bosnia in the 
absence of a "political solution" to the civil war between the 
Serbs, Croats, and Muslims. "We must wait until the end of the 
winter," the defense minister added. In March or April, we will 
have to "think of new means (of continuing the UNPROFOR mission) 
or withdraw," he stated. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58007 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Inter-European Affairs </F>
<H3> <TI>   Commission Proposes `Tough, Tender' Migrant Policy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0601140694 London THE GUARDIAN in English 6 Jan 94 p 
10--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM0601140694 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE GUARDIAN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by John Carvel: "EU Is `Tough and Tender' on </F>
Migrants"] 
  [Text] Brussels -- Legislation to crack down on employers 
who give jobs to illegal immigrants is included in a package of 
ideas which the European Commission is preparing for its first 
substantial foray into immigration policy under new powers in 
the Maastricht treaty. 
  Companies would be penalised for hiring illegal residents 
and 
public sector contractors would be held responsible for 
non-compliance by subcontractors. 
  The Commission plans to publish a green paper later this 
month to trigger a public debate about migration issues which 
have previously been handled in secret by justice and home 
affairs ministers. 
  The almost-final version now being discussed inside the 
Commission contains a blend of tough and tender policies that 
would buttress Europe against further immigration, but would 
improve the lot of people from ethnic minorities who live in the 
European Union [EU] legally. 
  The Commission says that failure to get these policies right 
could threaten democracy. Faulty perceptions about the numbers 
of immigrants have contributed to the "ferocity of 
racially-motivated attacks which have scarred the immediate 
past." 
  Governments should emphasise the economic and social 
benefits 
of immigration, but they need a strategy to show that it is 
under control, says the paper by Padraig Flynn, the social 
affairs commissioner. 
  He appears sceptical about plans agreed by the EU ministers 
for identifying and expelling illegal immigrants. "It is 
unlikely that the police will be in a position to invest many 
resources in locating illegal immigrants. Nor is it easy for the 
police to identify these people in a multicultural society." 
  The alternative was to act against employers of clandestine 
labour. The Commission stood ready to table measures to 
establish a common legislative approach across the EU. 
  The idea is part of a 30 point action programme to turn 
piecemeal and unenforceable agreements among ministers into a 
comprehensive EU policy on immigration. This would be 
impossible without more reliance on legally binding accords. 
  The Commission wants a migration "observatory" to monitor 
inflows and provide early warning of big movements. It thinks 
EU foreign policy should penalise human rights violations in 
countries from which refugees are fleeing. The overseas 
development programme should concentrate on areas where economic 
or environmental schemes could help to retain local populations. 
This could be helped by "profiling" migrants to provide jobs 
and housing in rural areas before they move to the cities and 
thence to Europe. 
  "Migration management" in the EU might include a convention 
to determine how long families could be made to wait to be 
reunited and admissibility of unmarried partners. 
  Third-country nationals who are legally resident in one EU 
country might be given priority for filling job vacancies in 
another. That would require "an effective Union-wide labour 
exchange." Favourable treatment might be needed for groups such 
as women who are victims of prostitution traffickers. 
  The Commission calls for asylum policy to be harmonised, 
with 
a common definition of who is a refugee and how to treat those 
who fail to qualify. 
  It wants better arrangements for coping with sudden influxes 
of crisis victims. No formal commitment would be needed to share 
the burden among member states, but countries facing serious 
problems should be able to reckon with support. 
  The Commission proposes harmonising procedures for 
repatriating illegal immigrants. But it also wants much stronger 
measures to combat racial discrimination and help the 9 million 
third-country nationals who are legally resident to overcome 
problems of unemployment and bad housing. 
  The document says it is paradoxical that third-country 
nationals who live in one member state are unable to take 
advantage of the single market by moving to another, though it 
stops short of recommending full mobility. 
  The Maastricht Treaty gave the Commission new rights in this 
area of policy, but national governments retain the whip hand. 
Immigrant support groups will fear that ministers might select 
the more restrictive proposals from the green paper and ignore 
its liberal ingredients. 
  Restrictions on political asylum imposed last year cut the 
number of refugees entering Germany by more than 25 per cent to 
323,000, Bonn's interior ministry said yesterday. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58008 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Inter-European Affairs </F>
<H3> <TI>   Greek Stand on Macedonia EU `Embarrassment' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0601132294 London THE GUARDIAN in English 6 Jan 94 p 
9--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM0601132294 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE GUARDIAN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by John Palmer: "Macedonia Clouds New EU </F>
Presidency"] 
  [Text] Athens -- The formal launch yesterday of Greece's 
presidency of the European Union [EU] was overshadowed by fears 
of renewed tension between the government in Athens and 
Macedonia, its Balkan neighbour. Most EU governments have now 
established diplomatic relations with Macedonia, in defiance of 
Greek protests. 
  At a ceremenony in Athens, the Greek prime minister, Andreas 
Papandreou, refused to rule out that his government might close 
the border with Macedonia, even though the former Yugoslav 
republic is entirely dependent on aid and trade crossing from 
Greece. 
  While insisting that he had "no plans whatsoever at present 
to close the border," Mr Papandreou said there could be no 
normalisation of relations with Macedonia unless the government 
in Skopje bowed to a series of Greek demands. These included 
changes in the official flag of Macedonia, an amendment to its 
national constitution and a joint declaration on the 
inviolability of its border with Greece. 
  Mr Papandreou spelled out Greece's terms for easing tension 
with Macedonia at a press conference to mark its assumption of 
the presidency of the EU, given with the president of the 
European Commission, Jacques Delors. 
  "I regret the decision of the other EU governments in 
establishing diplomatic relations with Skopje (Macedonia), but 
we will make the best we can out of it," he declared. 
  Mr Delors attempted to steer clear of Greek sensitivies over 
Macedonia, but left no doubt about his strong disapproval of 
recent outspoken attacks on Germany by Greek ministers. "We in 
the European Union can have frank and honest exchanges with each 
other but they should always be courteous exchanges. That is how 
we make progress in the European family of which Greece is a 
full part," he said. 
  Last month the Greek minister for European affairs, 
Theodhoros Pangalos, described Germany as "having bestial 
strength but the intelligence of a child." Another minister, 
Evangelos Yannopoulos, said Germany was using "the power of the 
D-mark to create a Fourth Reich." 
  Defending his government's stance towards the Macedonian 
state, Mr Papandreou said Skopje's decision to include the "Sun 
of Vergina"--the emblem of the ancient Macedonian monarchy--in 
its national flag was "a clear provocation." He added that the 
choice of the emblem, which was only discovered in the Greek 
northern province of Macedonia in the 1970s, together with 
references in the Macedonian constitution to the "liberation of 
all the Macedonian people," implied a claim on Greek soil. 
  Speaking to journalists later, Mr Pangalos went further when 
asked why Greece found itself isolated in the EU over relations 
with Macedonia. "You want us to love people who hate us. They 
hate us like the IRA hates Britain, and they claim one-third of 
my country," he said. 
  Mr Pangalos said that he could not promise that Greece would 
establish diplomatic relations with Macedonia even if all the 
conditions set by the Greek government were met. 
  Asked why he would not accept repeated declarations by the 
Macedonian prime minister, Kiro Gligorov, that his government 
had no wish to alter its frontier with Greece, Mr Pangalos 
replied: "They have added a codicil to their constitution, 
reassuring the Bulgarians about the frontier issue. They are 
afraid of the Bulgarians and the Serbians and the Albanians 
--all of whom have territorial claims on them--but they are not 
afraid of us." 
  Greece's preoccupation with Macedonia and its perceived 
sympathy with Serbia is a continuing embarrassment to the rest 
of the European Union. Some senior commissioners also fear that 
the Greek presidency will not be able to give a strong lead on 
key problems facing the European Union. 
  The European Commission shares the Greek concern to defend 
social rights but fears that Mr Papandreou's Pasok [Panhellenic 
Socialist Party] government will have no interest in pushing for 
liberalisation of telecommunications and other services--which 
are at the core of the economic recovery agenda backed by the 
other EU states. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58009 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Inter-European Affairs </F>
<H3> <TI>   Editorial Sees Greek Presidency as EC Test </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0501140494 London THE INDEPENDENT in English 5 Jan 94 p 
13--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM0501140494 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE INDEPENDENT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Editorial: "Greek Presidency Tests the Twelve"] </F>
  [Text] The Greek presidency of the European Union will 
test the Union as severely as Greece itself. The government 
that now takes over the business of the Union is led by a sick 
and elderly man who has made his new wife his chief assistant. 
The top ranks of the civil service have been almost wholly 
replaced by new people, sweeping away many with deep experience 
of European affairs. 
  The foreign minister of this government has called Germany 
"a 
bestial giant with a child's brain." His deputy, who will chair 
meetings of foreign ministers, has called the Turkish Government 
"muggers...dragging bloody boots cross the carpets of Europe." 
  The country these men lead is widely regarded in Brussels as 
more of a liability than an asset to the Union. Its economy is 
the worst performer of the Twelve and the gap with the others is 
widening. It relies on billions of pounds in subsidies from 
Brussels for about 10 percent of its GNP. A substantial 
proportion of these subsidies is believed to drift into private 
pockets, regardless of the government in power, so corrupt is 
the political culture of Greece. Andreas Papandreou himself, 
risen from the political dead to return as prime minister, only 
narrowly escaped conviction for corruption after his last term 
in office. 
  With another 13 billion [U.S. trillion] pounds of "cohesion 
funds" pledged for the next six years, the enthusiasm of Greek 
politicians for European integration is easily understood. The 
enthusiasm is not reciprocated. The particular fear now is that 
the Union will be further burdened by Greece's obsession with 
Macedonia, its sympathy for Serbia and its long hostility to 
Turkey. 
  If the next six months go as badly as everyone expects, the 
case for institutional reform will be strengthened. With 
enlargement looming, the Union may no longer be able to afford 
the uneven quality and discontinuity of the rotating presidency 
in its present form. 
  Indeed, Greece itself is proposing that a committee of "wise 
men" be set up to study a future European constitution. It 
would be a nice irony if Greece's tenure of the presidency 
brought forward reforms, such as presidential partnerships of 
large and small countries with longer tenure, that had the 
effect of preventing Greece from holding the presidency on its 
own again. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58010 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Brussels Response to Developments in Zaire `Cautious' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0501154394 Brussels BELGA in French 1214 GMT 5 Jan 93--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0501154394 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels BELGA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article signed JCH/MAR: "Cautious Response From Belgian </F>
Foreign Ministry Following Mobutu Statements"; as released by 
Brussels BELGA Database] 
  [Text] Brussels, 5 Jan (BELGA) -- "After an initial 
analysis, it would appear from the statements made by Zairian 
President Mobutu that he seems to be taking into account a 
number of points mentioned in the latest approaches taken by 
Belgium, France, and the United States, by coming out in favor 
of the rapid signing of the agreements on the transition to and 
implementation of a government," said a spokesman for the 
Belgian Foreign Ministry, in response to the latest political 
statements made by Marshal Mobutu. 
  "It is clear, however, that all these points, especially the 
delicate question of the opposition appointing a prime minister, 
must be cleared up. As in the past, we remain vigilant," the 
same source said. 
  "President Mobutu is advocating presidential, parliamentary, 
and local elections before the end of the year, but for us it is 
essential that these elections be able to be held under good 
conditions and that they be free and fair. Only a government of 
national unity will be able to ensure such conditions," the 
spokesman continued. 
  "In a country that has no infrastructure or means of 
communication, organizing elections presents enormous 
difficulties. At first glance, a one year deadline seems 
inadequate," the Foreign Ministry affirmed, saying that "this 
question will also have to be the subject of consultations 
between the Zairian parties involved." 
  "Belgium will continue consultations with its Western 
partners as well as with the Twelve. At present, the policy 
established vis-a-vis Zaire is not subject to change. We feel 
the criteria of this policy were clearly established by the 
trilateral approach of 10 December 1993," the spokesman 
concluded. 
  The approach of 10 December 1993 was made jointly by 
Belgium, 
France, and the United States to President Mobutu and Prime 
Minister Tshisekedi. 
  Motivated by the breakdown of the democratization process 
and 
the alarming economic situation, the aim of the approach was to 
lead to concluding the transition agreements negotiated since 10 
September between the opposition and the supporters of the 
president, appointing the prime minister from within the 
opposition, and rapidly implementing an efficient government of 
national unity. 
  This approach was taken at the request of the Western 
countries by Lakhdar Brahimi, special envoy of the the UN 
secretary general. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58011 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Netherlands </F>
<H3> <TI>   Lubbers `Happy' With Good U.S. Relations </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0601153594 Brussels BELGA in Dutch 0738 GMT 6 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0601153594 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels BELGA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Dutch </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article signed KVB: "Lubbers Happy With U.S.-European </F>
Relations"; as released by Brussels BELGA Database] 
  [Text] Washington, 6 Jan (ANP) -- Europe and the United 
States are adopting the same attitude regarding the future of 
NATO, said Netherlands Prime Minister Ruud Lubbers following 
talks with U.S. Secretary of State Christopher. 
  The U.S. Partnership for Peace plan, which will feature on 
the agenda at next week's NATO summit meeting, will serve as the 
basis for relations with East Europe, leading ultimately to an 
expansion of NATO but without setting a date for this. 
  Lubbers, who is being accompanied by Foreign Minister 
Kooijmans, said he was happy with the good U.S.-Netherlands 
relations. The fact that President Clinton will visit Europe 
three times this year makes it clear that these relations are 
being given the greatest consideration. 
  In his talks with Mr. Christopher, Lubbers once again 
emphasized that the conflict in Bosnia is one for which both 
Europe and the United States bear some responsibility. The top 
priority is to ensure that the parties involved in the conflict 
must first reach an agreement themselves. However, there must 
be a viable threat to stimulate its implementation -- i.e., NATO 
-- which could implement the agreement by using force if 
necessary. Lubbers compared the situation with a horse and a 
cart: The parties involved in the conflict form the cart, while 
NATO must serve as the cart horse. According to Mr. Lubbers, 
Secretary of State Christopher said the United States is 
prepared to participate in the implementation of any agreement 
reached. This agreement is important in principle, said the 
prime minister, although it is no blank check. 
  One complication for the United States is that they must 
submit the control of troops on the ground to Congress. That is 
no easy matter, whereby Lubbers claimed that it is important 
that the U.S. Government brings its full weight to bear in this 
respect. 
  The prime minister did not want to say whether the U.S. 
Government acted prudently last spring, when it first threatened 
to use force, only to do a U-turn when the Europeans expressed 
their opposition. Lubbers said, however, that in the future a 
stern approach would be better than muddling on. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58012 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> United Kingdom </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hurd Criticizes Gaza Conditions, Unveils Aid Plans </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0601145294 London THE TIMES in English 6 Jan 94 p 11--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM0601145294 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE TIMES </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Richard Beeston: "Hurd Condemns Squalid State of </F>
Gaza"] 
  [Text] Gaza -- Douglas Hurd, the Foreign Secretary, set 
aside his normally cool manner yesterday when he visited the 
Gaza Strip and spoke with emotion about the squalor and 
deprivation he witnessed. 
  "Whether you know it well or are here for the first time, 
you 
can be sure of one thing, this is no way to run a community of 
this number of people," said Mr Hurd, whose Israeli police 
escort attracted a hail of stones from Palestinian youngsters. 
"There is built-in disease, pollution on a monstrous scale and 
violence which has not improved since the Israel-PLO agreement. 
These are getting worse. There is evidence of greater cynicism 
and frustration." 
  To improve conditions, Britain is spending 70 million pounds 
in the occupied territories during the next three years; 
yesterday Mr Hurd also unveiled plans to help to set up a 
Palestinian government, including offering to help organise 
elections scheduled for the occupied territories in July and to 
train Palestinian civil servants. 
  There was still no clear sign yesterday of when the Israelis 
and Palestinians would return to the negotiating table. 
Disagreements over future sovereignty, security and land have 
delayed the transfer from Israeli military control to 
Palestinian self-rule, which had been due to take place in Gaza 
and in the West Bank town of Jericho on December 13. The sense 
of crisis was compounded by attempts yesterday to resolve new 
splits between the PLO and Jordan and between the Palestinians. 
  Mr Hurd said that the 26-year Israeli military occupation, 
which he described as a "denial of human rights", must come to 
an end and he asked opponents of the agreement what alternative 
they had to the deal signed in Washington last year. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58013 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> United Kingdom </F>
<H3> <TI>   Major Urged To `Clarify' Ulster Declaration </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0601131294 London THE GUARDIAN in English 6 Jan 94 p 6 
--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM0601131294 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE GUARDIAN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Owen Bowcott: "PM Urged To Clarify Peace </F>
Document"] 
  [Text] Belfast -- Kevin Macnamara, the Labour spokesman on 
Northern Ireland, yesterday added his support to the growing 
number of calls for clarification of the Downing Street 
declaration. 
  His intervention came as the Sinn Fein president, Gerry 
Adams, indicated that he would be writing to the Prime Minister 
in the coming days to seek an explanation of "key issues" in the 
document. 
  In Belfast, more optimistic expressions have emerged from 
republicans who are considering the declaration. At a meeting 
of the city council this week, a Sinn Fein councillor, Martin 
O'Mulleoir, said that he believed the peace process could 
succeed. "We are hopeful that if properly managed a process to 
bring about a lasting peace, a permanent peace, can be 
established," he said. 
  Direct dialogue with both the British and Irish governments 
would help clarify the numerous ambiguities in the document, he 
added. 
  Mr Macnamara's call for such a process of clarification 
followed a statement on Tuesday [4 January] from John Hume MP, 
the leader of the Social Democratic and Labour Party, in which 
he suggested that the peace process would be aided by Downing 
Street offering to discuss the issues. 
  Yesterday the Labour spokesman said he would be surprised if 
the Government was not already involved in exchanges with 
republicans via the secret channels of communications revealed 
last year. 
  "The British and Irish governments should provide 
clarification of the Downing Street declaration if it's helpful 
in the quest for peace," he said yesterday during an interview 
on BBC Radio Ulster. He added: "But what is important is that 
clarification should not become negotiation." 
  Mr Adams, who welcomed John Hume's plea for further 
contacts, 
yesterday accused the Government of "hypocrisy and cynicism." 
John Major, he said, "cannot complain about the caution with 
which Sinn Fein has approached the contradictions of the 
declaration if he refuses the very reasonable request to have 
these matters clarified. 
  "There is a growing belief that the British Government do 
not 
want a positive response from republicans to this declaration 
but that they are seeking a public justification for a renewed 
onslaught on Irish nationalists. I will be writing to Mr Major 
in the next few days about these issues." 
  Nigel Dodds, a Democratic Unionist Party councillor in 
Belfast, has in the meantime challenged the Prime Minister to 
reveal whether or not he is involved in secret discussions with 
Sinn Fein. 
  In Dublin, the government is still considering whether or 
not 
to let the broadcasting ban imposed on Sinn Fein lapse later 
thus month. Some cabinet members believe that removing the 
long-standing restrictions would encourage the republican 
movement to take part in normal constitutional politics. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58014 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> United Kingdom </F>
<H3> <TI>   Poll Shows Tories Likely To Lose Out in Euro-Elections </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0601141094 London THE TIMES in English 6 Jan 94 p 8--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM0601141094 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE TIMES </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Peter Riddel: "Tories Face Euro-Poll Trouncing"] </F>
  [Text] The Tories face sweeping losses in June's 
Euro-elections when up to 11 seats could be captured by the 
Liberal Democrats, according to current voting trends. 
  This prospect, with further big gains by Labour, would be a 
shattering blow for the Conservatives. It would make many Tory 
MPs in southern England nervous as to whether they would retain 
their seats in the Commons. 
  The latest MORI aggregate for THE TIMES of voting intention 
polls from October to December underlines the vulnerability of 
the Tory position in both the Euro-elections and council 
elections in early May. MORI has used the figures to project 
the results in England's 71 European Parliament constituencies 
to take account of the boundary changes proposed last month. 
  If the change in votes since the general election were 
uniform throughout England, the Tories would win 17 seats, 
Labour would capture 51 and the Liberal Democrats 3. On this 
basis, Labour would win 11 or 12 seats in Scotland and Wales and 
the Nationalists 1 or 2. This would give Labour a national 
total of 62 or 63. 
  The Liberal Democrats could win several more seats according 
to a regional breakdown of voting intentions. This is because 
of the concentration of Liberal Democrat votes in southern 
England and the larger increase in the party's support in this 
region since the 1992 election. Taking account of these 
regional variations, the Tories might win only 13 seats, Labour 
47 and the Liberal Democrats 11. 
  An exact comparison with the current position is not 
possible 
since the number of seats in Britain has been increased by 6. 
At present, Labour holds 45 in Britain as a whole, the Tories 
32, the Scottish Nationalists 1 and the Liberal Democrats 0. 
The projected results would be a triumph for Labour, building 
on an already strong position, but the advance by the Liberal 
Democrats is what would worry the Tories above all, since it 
would threaten their strongholds across southern England. 
  Depending on the strength of their performance, the Liberal 
Democrats could capture not only the Euro-seats in Cornwall, 
Devon and Somerset, but also spread their gains along the South 
Coast south Kent and up through Hampshire to Wiltshire. They 
might even capture the Cotswolds and the seat of Essex and 
Suffolk South. 
  These findings are especially significant since, nationally, 
support for the Liberal Democrats dropped from 25 to 22 percent 
during October to December, compared with the previous three 
months. The party's rating dropped from 43 to 39 percent in the 
South West, but that left it still well out in front and well 
ahead of its general election share of 31 percent. 
  The Tories stood at 31 percent in the fourth quarter in the 
South West, with Labour at 28 percent. 
  In the South East outside London, the Tories remain the lead 
at 36 percent, but this represents a drop of 19 percentage 
points compared with the general election. Liberal Democrats 
are 32 percent, up from 23 percent in April 1992, while Labour 
has advanced from 21 to 29 percent. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58015 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   `No Differences' Between Kohl, Ruehe on NATO Expansion </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0701125894 Hamburg DPA in German 1115 GMT 7 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0701125894 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Excerpt] Bonn (DPA) -- According to government spokesman 
Dieter Vogel, there are no differences of opinion between 
Chancellor Helmut Kohl and Defense Minister Volker Ruehe on the 
issue of expanding NATO to include East Europe. Speaking to the 
press in Bonn on Friday [7 January], Vogel rejected a report in 
the HANNOVERSCHE ALLGEMEINE ZEITUNG that Ruehe is opposed to 
Kohl in this matter. 
  According to Vogel, the minister telephoned the chancellor 
on 
Friday to assure him that he agreed with him and Foreign 
Minister Klaus Kinkel that Hungary, Poland, and the Czech and 
Slovak Republics should be the first to be offered the U.S. 
Partnership for Peace proposal at the NATO summit in Brussels 
next Monday. The Defense Ministry said that Ruehe takes the view 
that the NATO expansion should be shaped "as a process which 
should be initiated at the NATO summit." The minister sees the 
Partnership for Peace initiative as an important stage in this 
process, but not as a substitute for the expansion of NATO. 
[Passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58016 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kinkel: NATO To Offer East `Closer Cooperation' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0701141894 Hamburg DPA in German 1331 GMT 7 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0701141894 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Bonn (DPA) -- According to German Foreign Minister 
Klaus Kinkel, NATO will offer the East closer cooperation, but 
not full membership, at its summit in Brussels on Monday [10 
January] and Tuesday. Full membership, which would create new 
rifts between the Central and East European states and the CIS 
republics, could not be in the interests of all involved, the 
foreign minister said in his annual survey of foreign policy on 
Friday. 
  A fundamental decision is to be announced in Brussels, 
Kinkel 
announced. Bringing the states of Central and East Europe 
closer to Western institutions is a top priority of German 
foreign policy. After taking over the presidency of the European 
Union on 1 July 1994, Bonn will work hard on the early 
conclusion of a cooperation agreement with Russia. This would 
bring Moscow into increasingly close partnership. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58017 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Minister Receives Bosnian Prime Minister 6 Jan </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0601183594 Hamburg DPA in German 1714 GMT 6 Jan 93--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0601183594 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Bonn (DPA) -- Federal Foreign Minister Klaus Kinkel 
received Bosnian Prime Minister Haris Silajdzic for a talk in 
Bonn today, thus introducing a new phase in the peace efforts. 
Following a one and one-half hour discussion, he told the media 
he hoped for a partial cease-fire in Bosnia. 
  Immediately afterward, Kinkel met Lord Owen and Thorvald 
Stoltenberg, the most important mediators in the Balkan conflict 
and the cochairmen of the Geneva conference on Yugoslavia. The 
intensity of the new efforts also became clear in parallel 
telephone talks between Kinkel and U.S. Secretary of State 
Warren Christopher and French Foreign Minister Alain Juppe, who 
asked about the latest developments. 
  The talks took place in the run-up to a meeting of the 
presidents of Bosnia and Croatia, for which Franjo Tudjman and 
Alija Izetbegovic are coming to Bonn on Saturday [8 January] at 
their own request. The Federal Government gladly made itself 
available as hosts, Kinkel said today. It offered its "good 
offices" and made available the guesthouse on Petersberg hill. 
The bilateral presidential conference, which will, according to 
Kinkel, take place without any specific German participation and 
may go on until Sunday, will also be attended by Lord Owen and 
Stoltenberg, the two mediators. 
  The head of the Bosnian Government thanked the German 
Government for its intervention and addressed an urgent appeal 
to the international community to "stop the carnage in Bosnia." 
Kinkel also spoke of "oppressive human suffering," particularly 
in Sarajevo, but in other areas of Bosnia as well. A solution 
would have to be found "that secures viable areas for the 
weakest, and that means the Muslims." 
  The Bosnian-Croatian presidential conference is taking place 
without Serbian participation. Diplomats pointed out that the 
most that could be achieved would be a limited armistice 
[begrenzter Waffenstillstand] or a cease-fire 
[Feuereinstellung], which would then be restricted to the war 
between Croats and Muslims in central Bosnia. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58018 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Government Appeals to Iran To Pardon Engineer </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501125394 Hamburg DPA in German 1156 GMT 5 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0501125394 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Excerpts] Bonn/Tehran (DPA)--German Foreign Ministry 
spokesman Martin Erdmann said today that the German Government, 
which formally appealed for a pardon immediately after the 
Iranian death sentence against the German engineer Helmut 
Szimkus was confirmed, is still hoping for his release. [passage 
omitted] 
  Intensive and close contacts are apparently being used 
between Bonn and Tehran to stop the death sentence from being 
carried out. This does not appear impossible, according to 
informed sources. The German Foreign Ministry merely confirmed 
that the formal petition for pardon had only been possible once 
the long legal procedure ended with the Supreme Court rejecting 
the appeal. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58019 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Vogel Comments </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501171994 Hamburg DPA in German 1543 GMT 5 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0501171994 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Excerpts] Bonn/Tehran (DPA) -- The Federal Government 
trusts that the death sentence confirmed by the Supreme Court in 
Tehran against German engineer Helmut Szimkus will not be 
carried out. "The assurance given on this by the Iranian 
Government still applies," Minister of State Bernd Schmidbauer 
(Christian Democratic Union) told BILD newspaper today. 
  Government spokesman Dieter Vogel said the government will 
also bring public pressure to bear in order to obtain a pardon 
for the German, who was convicted of spying for Iraq. It will 
be made clear to the Iranian Government that it is in its own 
interests to grant the appeal for a pardon, Vogel said. [passage 
omitted] 
  Vogel pointed out that carrying out the death sentence could 
have an unfavorable effect on German public opinion. Attitudes 
could worsen to Iran's detriment. In any case, the Federal 
Government regards the accused as "basically innocent." [passage 
omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58020 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bonn Reschedules Peruvian Debt Repayment </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501140194 Hamburg DPA in German 0946 GMT 5 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0501140194 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Bonn (DPA)--The Federal Government is to allow Peru 
to defer the repayment of around 150 million German marks [DM] 
in public debts. A corresponding rescheduling agreement has now 
been signed, the Federal Finance Ministry said today. The 
agreement gives Peru breathing space for repaying to Germany the 
majority of the debts, which would otherwise have been due by 31 
March 1996. The repayment has now been extended over 15 to 20 
years. The debts are based on credits as part of German 
development aid, Hermes-guaranteed export credits, as well as 
trade deals with the former GDR. Peru is to be excused 
repayment of DM30 million of the development aid credit if it 
uses one-third of that sum to protect and maintain the 
environment. 
  The new debt regulation serves as further support for the 
reform process in Peru, the Finance Ministry said. Peru has 
already brought inflation under control, through its efforts 
since 1990 to stabilize the economy: Inflation dropped from 
7,600 percent in 1990 to 57 percent in 1992, and it is to be 
reduced further to 27 percent. In 1991, real economic growth, 
of 2.5 percent, was achieved again. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58021 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistical Office Reports Employment Figures </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501164094 Hamburg DPA in German 1145 GMT 5 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0501164094 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Wiesbaden (DPA) -- The Federal Statistical Office in 
Wiesbaden announced its job figures today. During the course of 
a year, 696,000 jobs were lost in western Germany. The number 
of people employed in former West Germany fell by 2.4 percent to 
almost 28.5 million between November 1992 and November 1993. 
  From October to November 1993 alone, the number of people 
employed in the west fell by 167,000. That can be partially 
explained, however, by the usual seasonal drop, according to the 
statisticians. After seasonal adjustments, however, 67,000 jobs 
were still lost during this period. The Federal Statistical 
Office has no figures for former East Germany. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58022 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Economics Ministry Notes Decline in Industrial Orders </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501135294 Hamburg DPA in German 1015 GMT 5 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0501135294 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Excerpt] Bonn (DPA)--There was a slight fall in the number 
of incoming orders for west German industry in November, 
following a similar drop in October. Orders fell by 1 percent 
after price and seasonal adjustments, the Federal Economics 
Ministry announced in Bonn today. Domestic orders fell by 0.5 
percent, foreign orders by 1.5 percent. For the first time in 
1993, however, a month slightly exceeded (by 0.4 percent) the 
figure for the corresponding month in 1992, the ministry 
stressed. 
  Demand remained unchanged in the more significant two month 
comparison between October/November and August/September. A 3.5 
percent increase in foreign orders made up for a 2.0 percent 
decrease in domestic orders. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58023 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   East, West German Railway Companies Unite </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0101141294 Hamburg DPA in German 1331 GMT 1 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0101141294 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Frankfurt/Main (DPA) -- The Deutsche Bahn AG [German 
railway company] was established in Frankfurt today. Company 
Director Hanz Duerr and board member Diethelm Vack, as well as a 
representative of the German Government signed the foundation 
document at a lawyer's office in Frankfurt. 
  The public limited company is owned outright by the German 
Government and will replace the Bundesbahn [in the west] and the 
Reichsbahn [in the east], which thereby cease to exist after 
operating for 44 and 56 years respectively. Under the 
agreement, the railway company will also transfer existing debts 
of 70 million German marks, which will now be assumed by the 
German Government. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58024 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Deutschland Radio Begins Broadcasting 1 Jan </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD3012125993 Hamburg DPA in German 0938 GMT 30 Dec 93--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD3012125993 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Berlin/Cologne (DPA) -- After years of negotiations, 
the restructured national radio station Deutschland Radio will 
begin broadcasting on 1 January. In the future, two channels 
concentrating on information and culture will be broadcast on 
VHF and medium-wave. Deutschland Radio is an amalgamation of 
three stations and will be based in both Berlin and Cologne. 
The new public broadcasting corporation will receive more than 
300 million German marks annually from radio licence fees (75 
pfennigs per month). 
  Cologne-based Deutschlandfunk, which has been financed by 
the 
federal authorities, will change very little. In Berlin, 
however, RIAS, which was financed by the United States and then 
by the Ministry for Intra-German Relations and the former GDR 
station DS-Kultur, will merge. The Berlin part of Deutschland 
Radio will be based in the RIAS building. The directors of the 
new radio will be based in Cologne. The ZDF director Dieter 
Stolte is currently in temporary control until a new director is 
appointed. The most likely candidate is Ernst Elitz, television 
chief editor at Sueddeutscher Rundfunk. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58025 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Calabria Judge Seen as Likely Target of Bomb Attack </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0701100994 Rome ANSAMAIL Database in English 1555 GMT 6 
Jan 94--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0701100994 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome ANSAMAIL Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "'Ndrangheta Informant Warns of </F>
Explosives"] 
  [Text] Reggio Calabria, 6 Jan (ANSA) -- Police in the 
Calabrian capital were searching for 350 kg of explosives that a 
'ndrangheta [Calabrian Mafia-style organization] informant had 
warned them were going to be used in an attack on a Reggio 
magistrate. 
  That search was concentrated today in an area near the 
Ionian 
coast about 30 km from the capital, investigators said. 
  A likely target of the reported plan was Giuseppe Verzera, 
assistant district prosecutor of Reggio, who has conducted some 
of the most important inquiries into organized crime in that 
region. 
  Police said they had obtained the information from several 
members of 'ndrangheta gangs who had decided to cooperate with 
the authorities, including one informant who only recently began 
to talk to police. 
  This source told investigators that the explosive (of the 
same type used in deadly car bombs that blew up in Florence, 
Milan and Rome last spring and summer) was in the hands of the 
Calabrian crime organization as well as how they intended to 
employ it. 
  In a search last July, Carabinieri found 50 kg of explosives 
hidden in a field near Montebello Ionico, an area considered to 
be under the control of the Iamonte clan. That crime group was 
recently badly hit in a major dragnet on December 6, under the 
coordination of Verzera. 
  The growing role of the 'ndrangheta in national organized 
crime circuits, both alone and in cooperation with the Sicilian 
Mafia was underlined in a report on crime filed by the 
Anti-Mafia Investigating Directorate (DIA) to parliament 
yesterday. 
  The national anticrime police unit said that the Calabrian 
'ndrangheta has been expanding rapidly since 1991, when Sicilian 
Cosa Nostra representatives intervened among warring Calabrian 
rings to negotiate a "pax mafiosa" that led to a steep decline 
in interclan murders and a much improved capacity for illicit 
business. 
  (DIA cited the 20 percent in Calabria's gangland killings in 
1992, with inter-gang deaths continuing to fall this year.) [as 
published] 
  Investigators linked the 'ndrangheta's spread to the tight 
network of secret masonic lodges in the region of Calabria, 
first brought to the attention of law enforcement officials by 
the Palmi public prosecutor's office, then under the direction 
of Judge Agostino Cordova. One third of all southern Free Masons 
live in Calabria, investigators estimate, and they are stepping 
up their inquiries into the links between criminal activity and 
the secret and semi-secret lodges. 
  In the province of Reggio Calabria alone, some 3,500 persons 
have been identified as 'ndrangheta members, while the whole 
region numbers 155 clans and at least 5,500 working for 
organized crime. Catanzaro and Cosenza were cited as other major 
crime centers. 
  'Ndrangheta activities include extortion (with 368 related 
cases of arson in 1992), usury, kidnaping and drug traffic. The 
DIA report cites the spread of Calabrian crime activities to 
Northern Italy as well as abroad to Canada, the U.S. and 
Australia. 
  In the past six months, 890 detentions or arrests have been 
ordered, including 524 regarding the 'ndrangheta, as compared to 
269 orders regarding the Sicilian Mafia, 62 involving the Sacra 
Corona Unita [United Holy Crown -- Pugliese Mafia-style 
organization] of Puglia and 35 involving the Camorra. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58026 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ciampi Satisfied With Government's Performance </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94ES0210B Milan IL SOLE--24 ORE in Italian 29 Dec 93 p 
1--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> 94ES0210B </F>
<F P=104>  Milan IL SOLE--24 ORE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Italian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Guido Compagna: "`My Government Has Accomplished </F>
Its Objectives,' Ciampi Says"] 
  [Text] The future depends on the 12 January debate on 
the motion of no confidence. The question of dissolving the two 
chambers is now in the hands of the Quirinale [office of the 
president of the Republic]. 
  Rome--Carlo Azeglio Ciampi is satisfied with what his 
government has accomplished in these eight months, especially on 
the economic front, where it has succeeded in regaining the 
confidence of the international markets. He is more than 
cautious, however, with regard to the possible political 
developments of the next few days, all of which will involve the 
procedures for dissolving the two houses of Parliament pursuant 
to the motions of no confidence introduced by Marco Pannella and 
others. 
  The political statements made by the prime minister during 
the traditional year-end press conference serve above all to 
confirm several things. First, the parliamentary debate will 
take place and the government is resigned to it, as has already 
been explained in the statement made by the Quirinale and 
published following Oscar Luigi Scalfaro's summit with the 
presidents of the Chamber of Deputies and the Senate; and 
second, at the meetings already scheduled for 4 and 5 January 
with the parliamentary groups, Ciampi will seek to clarify the 
general orientation of these groups, especially because many 
members of Parliament--who have supported the government and say 
they will continue to evaluate its action--have chosen the 
option of the no-confidence motion. 
  Before taking its next steps, Palazzo Chigi [office of the 
prime minister] is waiting for 12 January, the date already set 
for the parliamentary debate. For his part, Ciampi confirmed 
that the government--having performed its function--is ready to 
relinquish power immediately, but then insisted several times 
during the press conference that "it is not the task of this 
administration to decide if--and for how long--this legislature 
should continue," explaining that for this reason he is not yet 
in a position to know "whether it should end immediately or 
continue until the next legislature." 
  In short, we learned from Ciampi's statements that 
everything 
will depend on what develops in the course of the parliamentary 
debate, and--in particular--we learned that any decision 
concerning the date of the elections will depend on the 
assessment that the president of the Republic will make of these 
developments. 
  And concerning his own political future, Ciampi was 
particularly reserved. He offered only one certainty: he will 
not participate in the election campaign. "If it is needed, 
however," he explained, "I shall be happy if I am able to offer 
my counsel," inasmuch as he has spent a lifetime in the civil 
service. 
  The prime minister did not, however, dodge those questions 
that were in some way connected with Silvio Berlusconi's entry 
into politics, and made two firm points. The first point was 
that if he remains in Palazzo Chigi during the election 
campaign, the principal task of his administration will be to 
"guarantee the par condicio [equal treatment before 
the law] to everyone." The second point--which he expounded with 
a touch of irony in response to a question by a sports 
reporter--was that "no one can have a copyright on the motto, 
Forza Italia." The prime minister will accordingly 
continue to root for the National Team even before the 
elections, and of course afterward. 
  Ciampi--who also expressed appreciation for the pope's words 
concerning the unity of our country--did not conceal the fact 
that he twice was tempted to throw in the sponge and leave 
Palazzo Chigi: first, when it appeared that the agreement on the 
cost of labor would not be successfully concluded, and again 
following the simultaneous terrorist attacks in Rome and Milan 
on the night of 27-28 July of this year. 
  The prime minister also dealt with economic topics, 
especially in his introductory statement at the press 
conference. He emphasized the renewed confidence that Italy, 
Inc., has regained on the international markets and also the 
positive result of a current inflation rate of 4 percent, which 
makes the objective of an eventual reduction to 2.5 percent a 
realistic one. These results were also--and above all--achieved 
thanks to the agreement on the cost of labor. There remains, 
unfortunately, the "distress" over the high unemployment, the 
causes of which--Ciampi said--can be removed "if Italy will 
construct its future development on new foundations." 
  Marco Pannella, sponsor of the motion of no confidence, 
offered a favorable assessment of Ciampi's statements. "The 
press conference," Pannella said, "demonstrates that a strong 
Ciampi administration is necessary and that we must hold the 
elections to render a judgment as between the political 
coalition that has supported Ciampi, on the one hand, and the 
opposition." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58027 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Continues Consultations With Parties </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0601103594 Rome ANSAMAIL Database in English 1321 GMT 5 
Jan 93--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0601103594 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome ANSAMAIL Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Ciampi Concludes Consultations"] </F>
  [Text] Rome, 5 Jan (ANSA) -- Prime Minister Carlo Azeglio 
Ciampi on Wednesday [5 January] plans to conclude consultations 
with minor parties in view of the January 12 parliamentary 
debate on no-confidence motions submitted to the Senate and 
Lower House. 
  After his meetings yesterday with the major parties, Ciampi 
this morning met with delegations from the Network, Green and 
Communist Refoundation parties. In the afternoon, after a 
working lunch with the director of the International Monetary 
Fund, Ciampi will receive representatives from the Italian 
Social Movement, Sudtyroler Volkspartei [South Tirol People's 
Party] and Union Valdotaine [Valdostan Union]. 
  The traditional government parties yesterday urged Ciampi to 
stay at his post and delay a vote until combined European 
Parliament and early elections can be held in June, while most 
of the smaller opposition parties, as well as the Left 
Democrats, the Northern League and the Italian Social Movement 
want elections as soon as possible. 
  The no-confidence motions were submitted by Federalist Party 
leader Marco Pannella and were signed mostly by members of the 
four governing parties -- Christian Democrats, Socialists, 
Social Democrats and Liberals. The premier's resignation in fact 
would prevent the president from dissolving parliament until a 
new coalition cabinet is formed. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58028 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Anti-Mafia Bureau To Continue Fight Against Crime </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0601103194 Rome ANSAMAIL Database in English 1221 GMT 5 
Jan 93--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0601103194 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome ANSAMAIL Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "War on Mafia Far From Over, DIA </F>
Report Says"] 
  [Text] Rome, 5 Jan (ANSA) -- Organized crime has suffered 
several blows over recent years but maintains hold on 
significant economic and financial resources and continues to 
intimidate, blackmail and condition even entire communities, 
according to the half-year report by the Anti-Mafia 
investigative directorate (DIA) which Interior Minister Nicola 
Mancino presented to Parliament today. The Mafia strength, the 
report said, continues to lie in its various illegal activities 
and its influence in political, administrative and judicial 
institutions. Given such conditions, the report warned, 
enthusiasm should be controlled over the recent and important 
success by law enforcement. The DIA report went on to observe 
how a "pure terrorist phase" had been consolidated within the 
Mafia, as evidenced by last year's bomb attacks in Rome, 
Florence and Milan, while the recent confiscation of weapons 
demonstrates how organized crime can count on a significant and 
sophisticated arms arsenal. There is ample evidence, the report 
continued, to assume that leading organized crime groups have 
graduated to major wholesale arms trafficking with transactions 
standing out for both volume and value and involving other 
foreign criminal groups and military-political factions in 
foreign countries. 
  Sicily's Cosa Nostra and other domestic crime syndicates, 
the 
DIA said, have access not only to automatic weapons but also 
military explosives, missiles, cannon, armor-piercing 
projectiles and other weapons. Turning its attention to the 
various crime bosses currently behind bars, the DIA report 
underscored the need the bosses have to reinforce their 
leadership over their subjects and how this explained a number 
of "symbolic" murders. There is also a growing restlessness 
among the imprisoned so-called men of honor who are subject to 
special restrictive prison treatment and do not qualify for 
special permissions, alternative detention and working out of 
jail. This ill-feeling, the DIA claimed, has led many of these 
crime figures, over the past months, to decide to collaborate 
with justice. But this, in turn, has also opened the way for a 
new defense strategy for the part of the Mafia. This defense 
strategy, the report said, included a campaign to de-legitimized 
turncoats and state's witnesses and to spread disinformation. 
Examples of this were the statements by jailed Cosa Nostra boss 
of bosses Salvatore Riina on the "manipulation" of turncoats, 
the distorted interpretation of the American trial against the 
Gambino family and the "heavy and unjustified" attacks against 
magistrates and law enforcement. The Mafia is also seeking to 
induce the dismantlement the judicial approach set up by the 
first anti-Mafia pool, denying the existence of a secret 
association and its executive commission. 
  The DIA report when on to show how a process is currently 
underway to unify criminal financial and human resources and 
stated that evidence exists proving that these "organized 
criminal consortiums" had worked with Cosa Nostra in planning 
and carrying out the most recent episodes of Mafia terrorism. 
The evidence cited in support of this situation included 
testimony by a turncoat and a series of "signals" which 
indicated how organized crime groups in Sicily, Calabria and 
Campania and, to a lesser degree, Puglia had developed an 
intricate network of business and activities. This "horizontal" 
integration of organized crime, the DIA report continued, has 
resulted in an increase in geographic mobility and the exchange 
of assets, duties and capital which has also allowed for 
organized crime to expand abroad. Investigators, in fact, have 
known for some time of the presence of Italian criminals 
operating in France, Germany, Canada, the United States, 
Australia and South America. There has also been repeated 
confirmation demonstrating how the Mafia is expanding its 
activities, interests and investments in former socialist states 
in East and Central Europe. 
  In concert with this "horizontal" development, the DIA 
argued, the process of integrating illegal markets has also 
resulted in a "vertical" development which is not always under 
the guidance of Cosa Nostra. Contacts between various criminal 
organizations are "numerous and diversified," the report 
continued, with "elements of an illegal nature." Evidence of 
this were the proven contacts been Calabria's 'ndrangheta [local 
Mafia-style organization] and right-wing extremists in Reggio, 
dating as far back as the 1970's, and contacts between the Mafia 
and the underground leftist groups. It cannot be ruled out, the 
DIA report said, that pacts have been hammered out between these 
various illegal organizations to "pilot change in the country to 
their own advantage." 
  Looking at organized crime's sources of income, the DIA 
report underscored how racketeering "continues to constitute a 
significant source" of illicit income and, over the years, 
extortion has become a tool to take over companies. 
Loan-sharking is equally as serious, the report warned, while 
there would appear to be a decline in drug trafficking, even if 
it remains today one of organized crime's chief activities and 
money makers. Another area of illegal income, the DIA said, was 
through manipulating public works tenders and taking over retail 
activities. This allows organized crime a "clean" outlet to 
launder significant amounts of illegal profit. 
  In its section on organized crime's links with public 
institutions, the DIA report recalled how, in 1993, 34 municipal 
governments were dissolved for Mafia infiltration and 
conditioning; ten in Sicily, two in Calabria, seventeen in 
Campania, four in Puglia and one in Basilicata. A total of 76 
municipal government have been dissolved to date, while charges 
of complicity with the Mafia has reached deep into public 
institutions, law enforcement and the judiciary. 
  The battle against the Mafia, the DIA report concluded, 
represents a fundamental cornerstone in the overall effort to 
renew the State. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58029 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Court Testimony Implicates League in Taking Bribes </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0501090094 Rome ANSAMAIL Database in English 1609 GMT 4 
Jan 93--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0501090094 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome ANSAMAIL Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Montedison Official Confirms League </F>
Bribe"] 
  [Text] Milan, 4 Jan (ANSA) -- A top Montedison executive, 
Marcello Portesi, in court testimony on Tuesday [4 January] 
admitted he paid 200 million lire (117,600 dollars) in illegal 
funds to the Northern League for the 1992 election campaign. 
  Testifying at the Milan trial of financier Sergio Cusani in 
connection with kickbacks paid for the failed public-private 
joint venture, Enimont, Portesi said he met several times in 
1991 with Northern League leader Umberto Bossi and party 
treasurer Alessandro Patelli on request from the company. 
  Portesi said Bossi asked for contributions in the form of 
campaign advertising, while Patelli also suggested "financing 
for foreign companies." In the end, Portesi said he delivered 
the 200 million lire in cash to Patelli at a Rome cafe and that 
Patelli did not request the joint receipt required by laws on 
financing of political parties. 
  Patelli was arrested in connection with the funds on 7 
December and Bossi was placed under investigation for the same 
case on December 20. 
  The Northern League, which claims to be innocent of any and 
all political corruption, said the entire affair was a mistake 
by Patelli and has offered to return the money. 
  At his testimony, Portesi also described other contributions 
made by the chemical giant to politicians for the 1992 elections. 
  Today's court session, the twentieth in the trial, was the 
first attended by Cusani himself, who faces charges of 
falsifying accounts and violation of party financing laws. 
  The first person to be brought to trial in the vast Clean 
Hands scandal, Cusani spent five months in Milan's San Vittore 
jail and was granted house arrest on December 23. 
  The financial expert refused to appear in court during his 
jail term, saying he would answer questions only as a free man. 
  Among those due to take the witness stand today were the 
administrative secretaries of the Social Democrats, Liberals and 
Christian Democrats, former Socialist Senator Bruno Pellegrini, 
Socialist MP Paolo Pilliteri, Liberal MP Egidio Sterpa, and 
Vincenzo D'Urso, assistant to the late Socialist Party 
administrative secretary Vincenzo Balsamo. 
  Among those who received unrecorded campaign contributions, 
according to Portesi, were former Socialist Foreign Minister 
Gianni Di Michelis, Milan Mayor Paolo Pillitteri, Maurizio 
Pagani of the Christian Democrat Party and Republican Senator 
Antonio Del Pennino. 
  Portesi said he obtained two billion lire from Montedison 
Chairman Carlo Sama to distribute during the election campaign 
but that he did not spend it all and returned the left-over 
money to Sama. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58030 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Public Debt Grows by 500 Billion Lire Daily </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401133994 Rome ANSAMAIL Database in English 1203 GMT 4 
Jan 93--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0401133994 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome ANSAMAIL Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Public Debt Tops 1,753 Trillion </F>
Lire"] 
  [Text] Rome, 4 Jan (ANSA) -- Italy's public debt reached 
the staggering figure of 1,753.577 trillion lire (1.031 trillion 
dollars) in September, or close to 31 million lire (18,260 
dollars) for every Italian man, woman and child, the Bank of 
Italy reported today. 
  Over the 12 months from September 1992, the debt grew by 178 
trillion lire (104.7 billion dollars), or about 500 billion lire 
(294 million dollars) a day. August was the worst month, with 
debt ballooning by around one trillion lire (588 million 
dollars) a day. 
  In percentage terms, the debt was up 11.3 percent on a year 
previously, almost 25 percent on two years previously, and more 
than 42 percent on six years previously. It is almost double 
what it was six years ago. 
  The total debt in September is split into domestic debt of 
1,671.16 trillion lire, and foreign debts of 82.417 trillion 
lire. 
  The overwhelming bulk of the public sector debt derives from 
market debts (state securities, post-office savings accounts, 
etc.): 1,492.808 trillion lire. 
  The following table shows the growth of the Italian public 
debt over the last 6 years (trillions of lire): 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Period                   |Total Debt               |Foreign Debt             | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|December 1987            |885.237                  |23.322                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|December 1988            |1,012.650                |28.586                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|December 1989            |1,146.307                |34.979                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|December 1990            |1,295.773                |48.656                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|December 1991            |1,453.798                |54.720                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|December 1992            |1,637.282                |64.653                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|January 1993             |1,649.908                |64.804                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|June 1993                |1,707.520                |72.871                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|July 1993                |1,716.300                |73.438                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|August 1993              |1,724.320                |74.596                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|September 1993           |1,753.577                |82.417                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58031 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94029" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Banks Reportedly Have 65 Trillion Lire of Bad Debts </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0401153194 Rome ANSAMAIL Database in English 1308 GMT 4 
Jan 93--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0401153194 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome ANSAMAIL Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Banking System Has 65 Trillion Lire </F>
of Bad Debts"] 
  [Text] Rome, 4 Jan (ANSA) -- By the end of September 1993 
the Italian banking system -- including commercial banks and 
special credit institutes, or ICS's -- had accumulated over 65 
trillion lire of bad debts, a 19.5 percent rise on December 
1992, the Bank of Italy reported today. 
  The September figure of 65.426 trillion lire was made up of 
45.059 trillion of bad debts held by commercial banks and 20.367 
trillion held by ICS's. 
  Italian analysts estimate the proportion of these high-risk 
credits destined to become negative balance figures as 35-40 
percent. 
  The following table shows the growth of bad debts over the 
last four years (trillions of lire): 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Period            |Banks             |ICS's             |Total             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1989              |26.166            |11.060            |37.226            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1990              |28.267            |12.272            |40.539            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1991              |32.613            |14.757            |47.370            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1992              |37.428            |17.302            |54.730            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|June 1993         |42.325            |19.289            |61.614            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|September 1993    |45.059            |20.367            |65.426            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  In other figures released today, the Bank of Italy reported 
that banks had issued 230.634 trillion lire of credit 
certificates by September 1993 (compared to 201 trillion in the 
same period in 1992), while clients had deposited 410.615 
trillion lire in current accounts (against 431.273 trillion the 
previous year). 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58032 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94030" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Sweden </F>
<H3> <TI>   Oresund Bridge Project Threatens To Split Cabinet </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0501155294 London THE GUARDIAN in English 4 Jan 94 p 
9--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM0501155294 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE GUARDIAN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Greg McIvor: "Swedish Cabinet Divided on Bridge"] </F>
  [Text] Stockholm -- Sweden's rightwing coalition 
government was divided last night on whether to go ahead with a 
controversial proposed bridge link with Denmark. 
  An eagerly-awaited announcement on the future of the 1.8 
billion pound state-backed scheme was unexpectedly postponed 
because of a split that could destroy the four-party coalition. 
  The Centre Party, which opposes the project on environmental 
grounds, has repeatedly threatened to withdraw from the 
coalition and bring down the government unless the plans are 
shelved. 
  As several hundred antibridge demonstrators gathered outside 
the Swedish cabinet offices in Stockholm, Olof Johansson, the 
leader of the Centre Party and environment minister, held firm 
to his demand that the project should be dropped. 
  Forced uncharacteristically on to the defensive, the prime 
minister, Carl Bildt, denied that the government was in crisis 
and rejected allegations that he was ready to horse-trade. 
  Mr. Bildt said ministers needed more time to study the 
implications of the "very controversial" bridge. A decision is 
not expected for another week. 
  Mr. Bildt acknowledged the Centre Party's opposition to the 
plans but said Sweden intended to respect an agreement signed 
with Denmark in 1991 to build a combined bridge and tunnel link 
across the Oresund Strait between Malmo and Copenhagen. 
  "It is a principle of this government to respect the 
agreement with Denmark and carry out a tough environmental 
assessment," Mr. Bildt said. 
  Mr. Bildt said the cabinet's views on the project and those 
of Mr. Johansson did not vary widely. 
  "We are close to each other when it comes to the question of 
the Oresund bridge," he said. 
  But the prime minister admitted there was "certain tension." 
He said the cabinet still needed to collect more material on 
public transport and air and water pollution. 
  Should the Centre Party choose to leave the government, the 
coalition would be dissolved and the speaker would appoint a 
prime minister, probably Mr. Bildt, to set up a new government. 
  Bertil Fiskesjo, a Centre Party member, said the party would 
stay in the government as long as certain conditions are met. 
  "Our chances of influencing the continued assessment and 
development of the bridge would decrease if we left," he said. 
  Rigorous environmental evaluations have indicated that it 
will be difficult, if not impossible, to build the bridge 
without disturbing the environment in the strait. 
  The Centre Party, which has strong agrarian roots, believes 
any bridge will damage the environment above and below ground 
and impede salt water currents from the North Sea which 
replenish the Baltic's brackish waters. 
  The salt-water flows are vital to the health of marine life 
in the Baltic. A panel of international marine experts hired 
recently by the Swedish government to investigate the plan's 
implications could give no guarantee that a bridge would not 
block the currents. 
  "It is impossible to give guarantees for a zero solution (no 
environmental impact) on the water flow," a scientist on the 
committee told a Danish newspaper yesterday. 
  Bridge opponents also assert that it will increase traffic 
emissions and make nonsense of Sweden and Denmark's commitment 
at the Earth Summit in Brazil in 1991 to stabilise carbon 
dioxide emissions at 1990 levels by the year 2000. 
  Ecologists believe the construction of a bridge across the 
Oresund Strait will damage the marine environment in an area 
well-known for its seabirds, seals and fish. 
  But Claus Nowotny, of Swedab, the parent company behind the 
bridge consortium, said the plan was being used as an 
environmental whipping post. 
  "It has become a kind of symbol for a concrete, car-oriented 
and large-scale society," he said. 
  The combined bridge and tunnel connecting Copenhagen and 
Malmo would be the first physical link between Sweden and 
Denmark and is seen by both countries as an important emblem of 
their determination to boost trade in the Scandinavian and 
Baltic region. 
  Backers of the project say it would cut transport costs and 
help tie Sweden more firmly to the European continent. After 
two centuries of remaining on the side lines in Europe, Sweden 
has applied to join the European Union. 
  If Sweden pulls out, Denmark has threatened to take legal 
action. The continual wrangling over the project has strained 
diplomatic relations. 
  Construction is scheduled to begin this autumn and work to 
be 
completed by mid-1999. On the Danish side, more than 200 houses 
have already been demolished to make way for entry roads. 
  The Danish government has already spent 100 million pounds 
on 
a motorway connection between Copenhagen and the site of the 
bridge. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58033 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu000__a94031" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Turkey </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ciller: Partnership for Peace Is `Too Gradual' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0701141694 London THE INDEPENDENT in English 7 Jan 94 p 
10--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM0701141694 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE INDEPENDENT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report on interview with Turkish Prime Minister Tansu </F>
Ciller by Hugh Pope; place and date not given: "Ciller Makes 
Sure Turkey Knows Who Is the Boss"] 
  [Text] A two-star general sat in the waiting room of the 
Turkish Prime Minister, Tansu Ciller, drumming his fingers on a 
secret red file as he delivered his verdict on the youthful 
university professor who seven months ago became this Muslim 
country's first woman leader. 
  "She's the boss," he said. The judgement on the headstrong 
Mrs Ciller rings increasingly true, even if the Turkish state 
that she rules seems to be growing ever weaker, undermined by 
political gridlock, stark economic contradictions and a Kurdish 
rebel war that on many days kills as many people as die in 
former Yugoslavia. 
  A rare interview with European newspapers shows that 
Turkey's 
leader has come a long way since her election last June to lead 
the conservative True Path Party, the senior partner in the 
coalition government. It is already hard to remember early days 
when she was so unaccustomed to official life that while 
disembarking from official flights she could sometimes be found 
squeezed unceremoniously among a common crush of junior aides. 
  Bureaucrats, advisers and even ministers have been changed 
with bewildering speed to the point where everyone is beholden 
to her. A note of firmness has asserted itself in a voice that 
can wrap up a meeting in a few seconds. Traces creep into her 
speeches of her occasional role model, Baroness Thatcher, as she 
implies a policy is right because she believes it to be right. 
  Unlike Lady Thatcher, however, her only ideology seems to be 
reform. Like her country, she is always in a hurry and often 
late. But like her other role model, the late Turkish President 
Turgut Ozal, she bravely covers up the most gauche of statements 
("We have come a long way, baby, in democracy since the 1940's") 
with her greatest asset -- a brilliant smile in a face that 
seems a decade younger than her declared age of 47. 
  She is no longer a novice in juggling with Turkey's complex 
tangle of priorities, and brushed aside flustered aides as she 
trod on sensitive ground such as Turkey's worries about the 
enlargement of NATO and President Bill Clinton's compromise 
proposals for a Partnership for Peace to be put to next week's 
NATO summit in Brussels. 
  "I feel it's a realistic kind of attitude. I feel that we 
should be looking not for the separation of Europe, but for the 
unification of Europe. The Partnership for Peace proposal is 
even too gradual as far as we are concerned, maybe we should 
move a little faster," she said. 
  Mrs Ciller warned that the West should take seriously a 
potential Russian threat to newly-independent states in the 
Muslim southern belt of the former Soviet Union, whose 
population has ethnic links to Turkey. "Despite what President 
Yeltsin may have in mind, a theme has come to the surface now, 
not exactly going back to the old borders (but) definitely a 
nationalistic attitude. The will is there...to make Russia the 
sole protector of that region," she said. 
  But she stressed that Turkey -- which once kept watch on a 
third of NATO's front with the Warsaw Pact -- wanted to 
co-operate with its northern neighbour and had no ambitions of 
territorial expansion. But she refused to rule out completely 
military intervention to stop Armenia's victories against 
Turkey's ethnic cousins in Azerbaijan. 
  "We always are watching closely...considering and 
reconsidering. As far as Turkey is concerned, we all feel that 
Armenia should withdraw," she said. 
  When the British Prime Minister, John Major, Mr Clinton and 
other NATO leaders gather at the Brussels summit they will meet 
a woman not afraid to make demands, particularly over clamping 
down on the activities in Europe of sympathisers with the 
Marxist Kurdistan Workers Party (PKK). Turkish officials say 
reports of PKK leader Abdullah Ocalan's death in Syria are 
untrue and hope for Western pressure on Damascus to curb his 
activities, particularly after the banning of the PKK in Germany 
and France. 
  "We have to stand together on all these issues. We should 
not mix up the issue of the PKK with the Kurds living in Turkey 
and elsewhere. About 2,000 people have been killed in Turkey in 
the last year. We are trying to protect our citizens," she said. 
  Mrs Ciller showed no sign of flinching from her backing for 
the security forces' nine-year-old attempts to put down the 
separatist rebellion by force. Any hint of approaching moderate 
Kurds was muted, as was any promise of reforming Turkey's 1982 
constitution under which people are still sent to prison merely 
for speaking their mind on Kurdish and other issues. 
  "Democratisation is something we believe in. We are going to 
take giant steps in that. Not as a concession to the PKK, not 
for that region, but for the whole country," she said. That may 
be her wish, but diplomats say any major reform will only be 
possible in the unlikely event that Mrs Ciller's party receives 
substantial new backing in local elections due in March. 
  Mrs Ciller may get a more sympathetic hearing on the 
question 
of Turkey's relations with the European Union [EU]. She said 
the takeover of the EU presidency by Greece was only a minor 
problem, even though Athens has vetoed any substantial European 
aid to Turkey since 1980. She said she was pleased about a 
recent British-German initiative to establish a new consultative 
mechanism to be set up during a visit to Ankara later this month 
by the British Foreign Secretary, Douglas Hurd, and his German 
counterpart Klaus Kinkel. 
  "The major point is that the other European countries see 
the 
vitality in Turkey. We are moving very fast (towards customs 
union with Europe). It's costing us a lot. Despite this we are 
committed to doing this step by step. What we are doing must be 
recognised by our friends in Europe. There has been no other 
country that has done this on her own," she said. 
  "Turkey is a bridge to peace, a bridge to the independent 
countries that have separated from Russia, a bridge for Western 
values in the Middle East as well," she added. "When you give 
up Turkey you may end up with a border that has Muslim 
fundamentalism. We need to look not for a separation of 
cultures, but an intermingling." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58034 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> International Affairs </F>
<H3> <TI>   Owen Blames All Yugoslav Leaders for War in Bosnia </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0601200594 Hamburg DPA in German 1844 GMT 6 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0601200594 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Bonn (DPA) -- In a sweeping criticism of all parties 
involved in the Yugoslavia conflict, today in Bonn European 
Union mediator Lord Owen apportioned equal blame for the 
continuation of the war to all the leaders. Together with the 
other co-chairman of the Geneva Yugoslavia conference, Thorvald 
Stoltenberg, Lord Owen spoke with [German] Foreign Minister 
Klaus Kinkel about the civil war situation. While Kinkel 
expressly warned against optimism, Lord Owen went a step further 
and said that the leaders of all the warring parties were 
indifferent to the fates of the people "because they have lost 
touch with reality." They still thought that advantages were to 
be derived from continuing the fighting. 
  The discussion with the two Yugoslavia mediators followed a 
meeting between Bosnian Prime Minister Haris Silajdzic, in the 
run-up to a two-way conference between Presidents Franjo Tudjman 
(Croatia) and Alija Izetbegovic (Bosnia-Herzegovina), who 
planned to meet at their own request in Bonn on Saturday [8 
January]. 
  Stoltenberg, too, spoke of a "deterioration in the 
situation." He regretted the lack of UN forces to enforce the UN 
Security Council resolutions, and warned against further force 
withdrawals. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58035 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> International Affairs </F>
<H3> <TI>   Belgium's Delcroix Thanks Briquemont for Work in Bosnia </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0601143894 Brussels BELGA in French 1648 GMT 5 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0601143894 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels BELGA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article signed GGD/RAY: "Mr. Delcroix Thanks General </F>
Briquemont for the Mission Accomplished"; as released by 
Brussels BELGA Database] 
  [Text] Brussels, 5 Jan (BELGA) -- Belgian Defense Minister 
Delcroix confirmed on Wednesday [5 January] the replacement "as 
soon as possible" of Lieutenant General Francis Briquemont by a 
British general as commander of the UN Protection Force 
(UNPROFOR) in Bosnia-Herzegovina. 
  Mr. Delcroix "has learned of the favorable decision by UN 
Secretary General Butrus Butrus-Ghali, to replace Lieutenant 
General Francis Briquemont," the National Defense Ministry 
announced in a communique. 
  General Briquemont, who has commanded the UNPROFOR in Bosnia 
since mid-July, had addressed his request to be relieved of his 
post to Mr. Delcroix back in December. Belgium then passed on 
this request to the UN headquarters in New York, at the same 
time proposing to provide another general to complete General 
Briquemont's one year mandate. 
  The United Nations did not, however, accept the latter 
proposal and has chosen to appoint a British officer, General 
Michael Rose. 
  According to Mr. Delcroix, UN practices dictate that when a 
high ranking officer is relieved of a military command in the 
framework of a UN mandate, his replacement must be of a 
different nationality, the communique notes. General Briquemont 
had succeeded France's Philippe Morillon in Bosnia, who had 
himself replaced Canada's Lewis Mackenzie. 
  Finally, Mr. Delcroix thanked General Briquemont for the 
"remarkable job he has done under very difficult conditions over 
recent months" as commander of the UNPROFOR in Bosnia. 
  General Briquemont, aged 59, will return to his dual post as 
commander of Belgium's 1st Army Corps and commander in chief of 
the Belgian forces in Germany (CCFA). He was invested in the 
latter capacity in early July just a few days before he left for 
Sarajevo. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58036 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> International Affairs </F>
<H3> <TI>   Comments on Withdrawing UN Troops </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0601142294 Brussels BELGA in French 1921 GMT 5 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0601142294 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels BELGA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article signed GGD (SVD): "Mr. Delcroix Speaks of </F>
Withdrawing Blue Helmets"; as released by Brussels BELGA 
Database] 
  [Text] Brussels, 5 Jan 94 (BELGA) -- Belgian Defense 
Minister Leo Delcroix threatened on Wednesday [5 January] to 
withdraw the Belgian Blue Helmets from Bosnia-Herzegovina, where 
they are 300 of the 12,000 soldiers in the UN Protection Force 
(UNPROFOR) in this former Yugoslav republic. 
  France, Spain, Great Britain, and Canada, the principal 
suppliers of men to Bosnia, have begun to reexamine the mission 
of their Blue Helmets. Lord David Owen, the European mediator 
for the former Yugoslavia, believes the UN forces may withdraw 
next spring if no apparent progress is made in the peace talks 
within the next two months. 
  Interviewed on Wednesday evening by RTBF [French-language 
Belgian broadcast media] Television, Mr. Delcroix also spoke of 
the possibility of withdrawing Belgian forces from Bosnia in the 
absence of a "political solution" to the civil war between the 
Serbs, Croats, and Muslims. "We must wait until the end of the 
winter," the defense minister added. In March or April, we will 
have to "think of new means (of continuing the UNPROFOR mission) 
or withdraw," he stated. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58037 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Inter-European Affairs </F>
<H3> <TI>   Commission Proposes `Tough, Tender' Migrant Policy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0601140694 London THE GUARDIAN in English 6 Jan 94 p 
10--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM0601140694 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE GUARDIAN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by John Carvel: "EU Is `Tough and Tender' on </F>
Migrants"] 
  [Text] Brussels -- Legislation to crack down on employers 
who give jobs to illegal immigrants is included in a package of 
ideas which the European Commission is preparing for its first 
substantial foray into immigration policy under new powers in 
the Maastricht treaty. 
  Companies would be penalised for hiring illegal residents 
and 
public sector contractors would be held responsible for 
non-compliance by subcontractors. 
  The Commission plans to publish a green paper later this 
month to trigger a public debate about migration issues which 
have previously been handled in secret by justice and home 
affairs ministers. 
  The almost-final version now being discussed inside the 
Commission contains a blend of tough and tender policies that 
would buttress Europe against further immigration, but would 
improve the lot of people from ethnic minorities who live in the 
European Union [EU] legally. 
  The Commission says that failure to get these policies right 
could threaten democracy. Faulty perceptions about the numbers 
of immigrants have contributed to the "ferocity of 
racially-motivated attacks which have scarred the immediate 
past." 
  Governments should emphasise the economic and social 
benefits 
of immigration, but they need a strategy to show that it is 
under control, says the paper by Padraig Flynn, the social 
affairs commissioner. 
  He appears sceptical about plans agreed by the EU ministers 
for identifying and expelling illegal immigrants. "It is 
unlikely that the police will be in a position to invest many 
resources in locating illegal immigrants. Nor is it easy for the 
police to identify these people in a multicultural society." 
  The alternative was to act against employers of clandestine 
labour. The Commission stood ready to table measures to 
establish a common legislative approach across the EU. 
  The idea is part of a 30 point action programme to turn 
piecemeal and unenforceable agreements among ministers into a 
comprehensive EU policy on immigration. This would be 
impossible without more reliance on legally binding accords. 
  The Commission wants a migration "observatory" to monitor 
inflows and provide early warning of big movements. It thinks 
EU foreign policy should penalise human rights violations in 
countries from which refugees are fleeing. The overseas 
development programme should concentrate on areas where economic 
or environmental schemes could help to retain local populations. 
This could be helped by "profiling" migrants to provide jobs 
and housing in rural areas before they move to the cities and 
thence to Europe. 
  "Migration management" in the EU might include a convention 
to determine how long families could be made to wait to be 
reunited and admissibility of unmarried partners. 
  Third-country nationals who are legally resident in one EU 
country might be given priority for filling job vacancies in 
another. That would require "an effective Union-wide labour 
exchange." Favourable treatment might be needed for groups such 
as women who are victims of prostitution traffickers. 
  The Commission calls for asylum policy to be harmonised, 
with 
a common definition of who is a refugee and how to treat those 
who fail to qualify. 
  It wants better arrangements for coping with sudden influxes 
of crisis victims. No formal commitment would be needed to share 
the burden among member states, but countries facing serious 
problems should be able to reckon with support. 
  The Commission proposes harmonising procedures for 
repatriating illegal immigrants. But it also wants much stronger 
measures to combat racial discrimination and help the 9 million 
third-country nationals who are legally resident to overcome 
problems of unemployment and bad housing. 
  The document says it is paradoxical that third-country 
nationals who live in one member state are unable to take 
advantage of the single market by moving to another, though it 
stops short of recommending full mobility. 
  The Maastricht Treaty gave the Commission new rights in this 
area of policy, but national governments retain the whip hand. 
Immigrant support groups will fear that ministers might select 
the more restrictive proposals from the green paper and ignore 
its liberal ingredients. 
  Restrictions on political asylum imposed last year cut the 
number of refugees entering Germany by more than 25 per cent to 
323,000, Bonn's interior ministry said yesterday. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58038 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Inter-European Affairs </F>
<H3> <TI>   Greek Stand on Macedonia EU `Embarrassment' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0601132294 London THE GUARDIAN in English 6 Jan 94 p 
9--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM0601132294 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE GUARDIAN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by John Palmer: "Macedonia Clouds New EU </F>
Presidency"] 
  [Text] Athens -- The formal launch yesterday of Greece's 
presidency of the European Union [EU] was overshadowed by fears 
of renewed tension between the government in Athens and 
Macedonia, its Balkan neighbour. Most EU governments have now 
established diplomatic relations with Macedonia, in defiance of 
Greek protests. 
  At a ceremenony in Athens, the Greek prime minister, Andreas 
Papandreou, refused to rule out that his government might close 
the border with Macedonia, even though the former Yugoslav 
republic is entirely dependent on aid and trade crossing from 
Greece. 
  While insisting that he had "no plans whatsoever at present 
to close the border," Mr Papandreou said there could be no 
normalisation of relations with Macedonia unless the government 
in Skopje bowed to a series of Greek demands. These included 
changes in the official flag of Macedonia, an amendment to its 
national constitution and a joint declaration on the 
inviolability of its border with Greece. 
  Mr Papandreou spelled out Greece's terms for easing tension 
with Macedonia at a press conference to mark its assumption of 
the presidency of the EU, given with the president of the 
European Commission, Jacques Delors. 
  "I regret the decision of the other EU governments in 
establishing diplomatic relations with Skopje (Macedonia), but 
we will make the best we can out of it," he declared. 
  Mr Delors attempted to steer clear of Greek sensitivies over 
Macedonia, but left no doubt about his strong disapproval of 
recent outspoken attacks on Germany by Greek ministers. "We in 
the European Union can have frank and honest exchanges with each 
other but they should always be courteous exchanges. That is how 
we make progress in the European family of which Greece is a 
full part," he said. 
  Last month the Greek minister for European affairs, 
Theodhoros Pangalos, described Germany as "having bestial 
strength but the intelligence of a child." Another minister, 
Evangelos Yannopoulos, said Germany was using "the power of the 
D-mark to create a Fourth Reich." 
  Defending his government's stance towards the Macedonian 
state, Mr Papandreou said Skopje's decision to include the "Sun 
of Vergina"--the emblem of the ancient Macedonian monarchy--in 
its national flag was "a clear provocation." He added that the 
choice of the emblem, which was only discovered in the Greek 
northern province of Macedonia in the 1970s, together with 
references in the Macedonian constitution to the "liberation of 
all the Macedonian people," implied a claim on Greek soil. 
  Speaking to journalists later, Mr Pangalos went further when 
asked why Greece found itself isolated in the EU over relations 
with Macedonia. "You want us to love people who hate us. They 
hate us like the IRA hates Britain, and they claim one-third of 
my country," he said. 
  Mr Pangalos said that he could not promise that Greece would 
establish diplomatic relations with Macedonia even if all the 
conditions set by the Greek government were met. 
  Asked why he would not accept repeated declarations by the 
Macedonian prime minister, Kiro Gligorov, that his government 
had no wish to alter its frontier with Greece, Mr Pangalos 
replied: "They have added a codicil to their constitution, 
reassuring the Bulgarians about the frontier issue. They are 
afraid of the Bulgarians and the Serbians and the Albanians 
--all of whom have territorial claims on them--but they are not 
afraid of us." 
  Greece's preoccupation with Macedonia and its perceived 
sympathy with Serbia is a continuing embarrassment to the rest 
of the European Union. Some senior commissioners also fear that 
the Greek presidency will not be able to give a strong lead on 
key problems facing the European Union. 
  The European Commission shares the Greek concern to defend 
social rights but fears that Mr Papandreou's Pasok [Panhellenic 
Socialist Party] government will have no interest in pushing for 
liberalisation of telecommunications and other services--which 
are at the core of the economic recovery agenda backed by the 
other EU states. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58039 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Inter-European Affairs </F>
<H3> <TI>   Editorial Sees Greek Presidency as EC Test </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0501140494 London THE INDEPENDENT in English 5 Jan 94 p 
13--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM0501140494 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE INDEPENDENT </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Editorial: "Greek Presidency Tests the Twelve"] </F>
  [Text] The Greek presidency of the European Union will 
test the Union as severely as Greece itself. The government 
that now takes over the business of the Union is led by a sick 
and elderly man who has made his new wife his chief assistant. 
The top ranks of the civil service have been almost wholly 
replaced by new people, sweeping away many with deep experience 
of European affairs. 
  The foreign minister of this government has called Germany 
"a 
bestial giant with a child's brain." His deputy, who will chair 
meetings of foreign ministers, has called the Turkish Government 
"muggers...dragging bloody boots cross the carpets of Europe." 
  The country these men lead is widely regarded in Brussels as 
more of a liability than an asset to the Union. Its economy is 
the worst performer of the Twelve and the gap with the others is 
widening. It relies on billions of pounds in subsidies from 
Brussels for about 10 percent of its GNP. A substantial 
proportion of these subsidies is believed to drift into private 
pockets, regardless of the government in power, so corrupt is 
the political culture of Greece. Andreas Papandreou himself, 
risen from the political dead to return as prime minister, only 
narrowly escaped conviction for corruption after his last term 
in office. 
  With another 13 billion [U.S. trillion] pounds of "cohesion 
funds" pledged for the next six years, the enthusiasm of Greek 
politicians for European integration is easily understood. The 
enthusiasm is not reciprocated. The particular fear now is that 
the Union will be further burdened by Greece's obsession with 
Macedonia, its sympathy for Serbia and its long hostility to 
Turkey. 
  If the next six months go as badly as everyone expects, the 
case for institutional reform will be strengthened. With 
enlargement looming, the Union may no longer be able to afford 
the uneven quality and discontinuity of the rotating presidency 
in its present form. 
  Indeed, Greece itself is proposing that a committee of "wise 
men" be set up to study a future European constitution. It 
would be a nice irony if Greece's tenure of the presidency 
brought forward reforms, such as presidential partnerships of 
large and small countries with longer tenure, that had the 
effect of preventing Greece from holding the presidency on its 
own again. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58040 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Belgium </F>
<H3> <TI>   Brussels Response to Developments in Zaire `Cautious' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0501154394 Brussels BELGA in French 1214 GMT 5 Jan 93--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0501154394 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels BELGA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> French </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article signed JCH/MAR: "Cautious Response From Belgian </F>
Foreign Ministry Following Mobutu Statements"; as released by 
Brussels BELGA Database] 
  [Text] Brussels, 5 Jan (BELGA) -- "After an initial 
analysis, it would appear from the statements made by Zairian 
President Mobutu that he seems to be taking into account a 
number of points mentioned in the latest approaches taken by 
Belgium, France, and the United States, by coming out in favor 
of the rapid signing of the agreements on the transition to and 
implementation of a government," said a spokesman for the 
Belgian Foreign Ministry, in response to the latest political 
statements made by Marshal Mobutu. 
  "It is clear, however, that all these points, especially the 
delicate question of the opposition appointing a prime minister, 
must be cleared up. As in the past, we remain vigilant," the 
same source said. 
  "President Mobutu is advocating presidential, parliamentary, 
and local elections before the end of the year, but for us it is 
essential that these elections be able to be held under good 
conditions and that they be free and fair. Only a government of 
national unity will be able to ensure such conditions," the 
spokesman continued. 
  "In a country that has no infrastructure or means of 
communication, organizing elections presents enormous 
difficulties. At first glance, a one year deadline seems 
inadequate," the Foreign Ministry affirmed, saying that "this 
question will also have to be the subject of consultations 
between the Zairian parties involved." 
  "Belgium will continue consultations with its Western 
partners as well as with the Twelve. At present, the policy 
established vis-a-vis Zaire is not subject to change. We feel 
the criteria of this policy were clearly established by the 
trilateral approach of 10 December 1993," the spokesman 
concluded. 
  The approach of 10 December 1993 was made jointly by 
Belgium, 
France, and the United States to President Mobutu and Prime 
Minister Tshisekedi. 
  Motivated by the breakdown of the democratization process 
and 
the alarming economic situation, the aim of the approach was to 
lead to concluding the transition agreements negotiated since 10 
September between the opposition and the supporters of the 
president, appointing the prime minister from within the 
opposition, and rapidly implementing an efficient government of 
national unity. 
  This approach was taken at the request of the Western 
countries by Lakhdar Brahimi, special envoy of the the UN 
secretary general. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58041 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Netherlands </F>
<H3> <TI>   Lubbers `Happy' With Good U.S. Relations </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0601153594 Brussels BELGA in Dutch 0738 GMT 6 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0601153594 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels BELGA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Dutch </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article signed KVB: "Lubbers Happy With U.S.-European </F>
Relations"; as released by Brussels BELGA Database] 
  [Text] Washington, 6 Jan (ANP) -- Europe and the United 
States are adopting the same attitude regarding the future of 
NATO, said Netherlands Prime Minister Ruud Lubbers following 
talks with U.S. Secretary of State Christopher. 
  The U.S. Partnership for Peace plan, which will feature on 
the agenda at next week's NATO summit meeting, will serve as the 
basis for relations with East Europe, leading ultimately to an 
expansion of NATO but without setting a date for this. 
  Lubbers, who is being accompanied by Foreign Minister 
Kooijmans, said he was happy with the good U.S.-Netherlands 
relations. The fact that President Clinton will visit Europe 
three times this year makes it clear that these relations are 
being given the greatest consideration. 
  In his talks with Mr. Christopher, Lubbers once again 
emphasized that the conflict in Bosnia is one for which both 
Europe and the United States bear some responsibility. The top 
priority is to ensure that the parties involved in the conflict 
must first reach an agreement themselves. However, there must 
be a viable threat to stimulate its implementation -- i.e., NATO 
-- which could implement the agreement by using force if 
necessary. Lubbers compared the situation with a horse and a 
cart: The parties involved in the conflict form the cart, while 
NATO must serve as the cart horse. According to Mr. Lubbers, 
Secretary of State Christopher said the United States is 
prepared to participate in the implementation of any agreement 
reached. This agreement is important in principle, said the 
prime minister, although it is no blank check. 
  One complication for the United States is that they must 
submit the control of troops on the ground to Congress. That is 
no easy matter, whereby Lubbers claimed that it is important 
that the U.S. Government brings its full weight to bear in this 
respect. 
  The prime minister did not want to say whether the U.S. 
Government acted prudently last spring, when it first threatened 
to use force, only to do a U-turn when the Europeans expressed 
their opposition. Lubbers said, however, that in the future a 
stern approach would be better than muddling on. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58042 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> United Kingdom </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hurd Criticizes Gaza Conditions, Unveils Aid Plans </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0601145294 London THE TIMES in English 6 Jan 94 p 11--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM0601145294 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE TIMES </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Richard Beeston: "Hurd Condemns Squalid State of </F>
Gaza"] 
  [Text] Gaza -- Douglas Hurd, the Foreign Secretary, set 
aside his normally cool manner yesterday when he visited the 
Gaza Strip and spoke with emotion about the squalor and 
deprivation he witnessed. 
  "Whether you know it well or are here for the first time, 
you 
can be sure of one thing, this is no way to run a community of 
this number of people," said Mr Hurd, whose Israeli police 
escort attracted a hail of stones from Palestinian youngsters. 
"There is built-in disease, pollution on a monstrous scale and 
violence which has not improved since the Israel-PLO agreement. 
These are getting worse. There is evidence of greater cynicism 
and frustration." 
  To improve conditions, Britain is spending 70 million pounds 
in the occupied territories during the next three years; 
yesterday Mr Hurd also unveiled plans to help to set up a 
Palestinian government, including offering to help organise 
elections scheduled for the occupied territories in July and to 
train Palestinian civil servants. 
  There was still no clear sign yesterday of when the Israelis 
and Palestinians would return to the negotiating table. 
Disagreements over future sovereignty, security and land have 
delayed the transfer from Israeli military control to 
Palestinian self-rule, which had been due to take place in Gaza 
and in the West Bank town of Jericho on December 13. The sense 
of crisis was compounded by attempts yesterday to resolve new 
splits between the PLO and Jordan and between the Palestinians. 
  Mr Hurd said that the 26-year Israeli military occupation, 
which he described as a "denial of human rights", must come to 
an end and he asked opponents of the agreement what alternative 
they had to the deal signed in Washington last year. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58043 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> United Kingdom </F>
<H3> <TI>   Major Urged To `Clarify' Ulster Declaration </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0601131294 London THE GUARDIAN in English 6 Jan 94 p 6 
--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM0601131294 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE GUARDIAN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Owen Bowcott: "PM Urged To Clarify Peace </F>
Document"] 
  [Text] Belfast -- Kevin Macnamara, the Labour spokesman on 
Northern Ireland, yesterday added his support to the growing 
number of calls for clarification of the Downing Street 
declaration. 
  His intervention came as the Sinn Fein president, Gerry 
Adams, indicated that he would be writing to the Prime Minister 
in the coming days to seek an explanation of "key issues" in the 
document. 
  In Belfast, more optimistic expressions have emerged from 
republicans who are considering the declaration. At a meeting 
of the city council this week, a Sinn Fein councillor, Martin 
O'Mulleoir, said that he believed the peace process could 
succeed. "We are hopeful that if properly managed a process to 
bring about a lasting peace, a permanent peace, can be 
established," he said. 
  Direct dialogue with both the British and Irish governments 
would help clarify the numerous ambiguities in the document, he 
added. 
  Mr Macnamara's call for such a process of clarification 
followed a statement on Tuesday [4 January] from John Hume MP, 
the leader of the Social Democratic and Labour Party, in which 
he suggested that the peace process would be aided by Downing 
Street offering to discuss the issues. 
  Yesterday the Labour spokesman said he would be surprised if 
the Government was not already involved in exchanges with 
republicans via the secret channels of communications revealed 
last year. 
  "The British and Irish governments should provide 
clarification of the Downing Street declaration if it's helpful 
in the quest for peace," he said yesterday during an interview 
on BBC Radio Ulster. He added: "But what is important is that 
clarification should not become negotiation." 
  Mr Adams, who welcomed John Hume's plea for further 
contacts, 
yesterday accused the Government of "hypocrisy and cynicism." 
John Major, he said, "cannot complain about the caution with 
which Sinn Fein has approached the contradictions of the 
declaration if he refuses the very reasonable request to have 
these matters clarified. 
  "There is a growing belief that the British Government do 
not 
want a positive response from republicans to this declaration 
but that they are seeking a public justification for a renewed 
onslaught on Irish nationalists. I will be writing to Mr Major 
in the next few days about these issues." 
  Nigel Dodds, a Democratic Unionist Party councillor in 
Belfast, has in the meantime challenged the Prime Minister to 
reveal whether or not he is involved in secret discussions with 
Sinn Fein. 
  In Dublin, the government is still considering whether or 
not 
to let the broadcasting ban imposed on Sinn Fein lapse later 
thus month. Some cabinet members believe that removing the 
long-standing restrictions would encourage the republican 
movement to take part in normal constitutional politics. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58044 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> United Kingdom </F>
<H3> <TI>   Poll Shows Tories Likely To Lose Out in Euro-Elections </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0601141094 London THE TIMES in English 6 Jan 94 p 8--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> PM0601141094 </F>
<F P=104>  London THE TIMES </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Peter Riddel: "Tories Face Euro-Poll Trouncing"] </F>
  [Text] The Tories face sweeping losses in June's 
Euro-elections when up to 11 seats could be captured by the 
Liberal Democrats, according to current voting trends. 
  This prospect, with further big gains by Labour, would be a 
shattering blow for the Conservatives. It would make many Tory 
MPs in southern England nervous as to whether they would retain 
their seats in the Commons. 
  The latest MORI aggregate for THE TIMES of voting intention 
polls from October to December underlines the vulnerability of 
the Tory position in both the Euro-elections and council 
elections in early May. MORI has used the figures to project 
the results in England's 71 European Parliament constituencies 
to take account of the boundary changes proposed last month. 
  If the change in votes since the general election were 
uniform throughout England, the Tories would win 17 seats, 
Labour would capture 51 and the Liberal Democrats 3. On this 
basis, Labour would win 11 or 12 seats in Scotland and Wales and 
the Nationalists 1 or 2. This would give Labour a national 
total of 62 or 63. 
  The Liberal Democrats could win several more seats according 
to a regional breakdown of voting intentions. This is because 
of the concentration of Liberal Democrat votes in southern 
England and the larger increase in the party's support in this 
region since the 1992 election. Taking account of these 
regional variations, the Tories might win only 13 seats, Labour 
47 and the Liberal Democrats 11. 
  An exact comparison with the current position is not 
possible 
since the number of seats in Britain has been increased by 6. 
At present, Labour holds 45 in Britain as a whole, the Tories 
32, the Scottish Nationalists 1 and the Liberal Democrats 0. 
The projected results would be a triumph for Labour, building 
on an already strong position, but the advance by the Liberal 
Democrats is what would worry the Tories above all, since it 
would threaten their strongholds across southern England. 
  Depending on the strength of their performance, the Liberal 
Democrats could capture not only the Euro-seats in Cornwall, 
Devon and Somerset, but also spread their gains along the South 
Coast south Kent and up through Hampshire to Wiltshire. They 
might even capture the Cotswolds and the seat of Essex and 
Suffolk South. 
  These findings are especially significant since, nationally, 
support for the Liberal Democrats dropped from 25 to 22 percent 
during October to December, compared with the previous three 
months. The party's rating dropped from 43 to 39 percent in the 
South West, but that left it still well out in front and well 
ahead of its general election share of 31 percent. 
  The Tories stood at 31 percent in the fourth quarter in the 
South West, with Labour at 28 percent. 
  In the South East outside London, the Tories remain the lead 
at 36 percent, but this represents a drop of 19 percentage 
points compared with the general election. Liberal Democrats 
are 32 percent, up from 23 percent in April 1992, while Labour 
has advanced from 21 to 29 percent. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58045 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   `No Differences' Between Kohl, Ruehe on NATO Expansion </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0701125894 Hamburg DPA in German 1115 GMT 7 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0701125894 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Excerpt] Bonn (DPA) -- According to government spokesman 
Dieter Vogel, there are no differences of opinion between 
Chancellor Helmut Kohl and Defense Minister Volker Ruehe on the 
issue of expanding NATO to include East Europe. Speaking to the 
press in Bonn on Friday [7 January], Vogel rejected a report in 
the HANNOVERSCHE ALLGEMEINE ZEITUNG that Ruehe is opposed to 
Kohl in this matter. 
  According to Vogel, the minister telephoned the chancellor 
on 
Friday to assure him that he agreed with him and Foreign 
Minister Klaus Kinkel that Hungary, Poland, and the Czech and 
Slovak Republics should be the first to be offered the U.S. 
Partnership for Peace proposal at the NATO summit in Brussels 
next Monday. The Defense Ministry said that Ruehe takes the view 
that the NATO expansion should be shaped "as a process which 
should be initiated at the NATO summit." The minister sees the 
Partnership for Peace initiative as an important stage in this 
process, but not as a substitute for the expansion of NATO. 
[Passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58046 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kinkel: NATO To Offer East `Closer Cooperation' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0701141894 Hamburg DPA in German 1331 GMT 7 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0701141894 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Bonn (DPA) -- According to German Foreign Minister 
Klaus Kinkel, NATO will offer the East closer cooperation, but 
not full membership, at its summit in Brussels on Monday [10 
January] and Tuesday. Full membership, which would create new 
rifts between the Central and East European states and the CIS 
republics, could not be in the interests of all involved, the 
foreign minister said in his annual survey of foreign policy on 
Friday. 
  A fundamental decision is to be announced in Brussels, 
Kinkel 
announced. Bringing the states of Central and East Europe 
closer to Western institutions is a top priority of German 
foreign policy. After taking over the presidency of the European 
Union on 1 July 1994, Bonn will work hard on the early 
conclusion of a cooperation agreement with Russia. This would 
bring Moscow into increasingly close partnership. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58047 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Minister Receives Bosnian Prime Minister 6 Jan </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0601183594 Hamburg DPA in German 1714 GMT 6 Jan 93--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0601183594 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Bonn (DPA) -- Federal Foreign Minister Klaus Kinkel 
received Bosnian Prime Minister Haris Silajdzic for a talk in 
Bonn today, thus introducing a new phase in the peace efforts. 
Following a one and one-half hour discussion, he told the media 
he hoped for a partial cease-fire in Bosnia. 
  Immediately afterward, Kinkel met Lord Owen and Thorvald 
Stoltenberg, the most important mediators in the Balkan conflict 
and the cochairmen of the Geneva conference on Yugoslavia. The 
intensity of the new efforts also became clear in parallel 
telephone talks between Kinkel and U.S. Secretary of State 
Warren Christopher and French Foreign Minister Alain Juppe, who 
asked about the latest developments. 
  The talks took place in the run-up to a meeting of the 
presidents of Bosnia and Croatia, for which Franjo Tudjman and 
Alija Izetbegovic are coming to Bonn on Saturday [8 January] at 
their own request. The Federal Government gladly made itself 
available as hosts, Kinkel said today. It offered its "good 
offices" and made available the guesthouse on Petersberg hill. 
The bilateral presidential conference, which will, according to 
Kinkel, take place without any specific German participation and 
may go on until Sunday, will also be attended by Lord Owen and 
Stoltenberg, the two mediators. 
  The head of the Bosnian Government thanked the German 
Government for its intervention and addressed an urgent appeal 
to the international community to "stop the carnage in Bosnia." 
Kinkel also spoke of "oppressive human suffering," particularly 
in Sarajevo, but in other areas of Bosnia as well. A solution 
would have to be found "that secures viable areas for the 
weakest, and that means the Muslims." 
  The Bosnian-Croatian presidential conference is taking place 
without Serbian participation. Diplomats pointed out that the 
most that could be achieved would be a limited armistice 
[begrenzter Waffenstillstand] or a cease-fire 
[Feuereinstellung], which would then be restricted to the war 
between Croats and Muslims in central Bosnia. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58048 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Government Appeals to Iran To Pardon Engineer </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501125394 Hamburg DPA in German 1156 GMT 5 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0501125394 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Excerpts] Bonn/Tehran (DPA)--German Foreign Ministry 
spokesman Martin Erdmann said today that the German Government, 
which formally appealed for a pardon immediately after the 
Iranian death sentence against the German engineer Helmut 
Szimkus was confirmed, is still hoping for his release. [passage 
omitted] 
  Intensive and close contacts are apparently being used 
between Bonn and Tehran to stop the death sentence from being 
carried out. This does not appear impossible, according to 
informed sources. The German Foreign Ministry merely confirmed 
that the formal petition for pardon had only been possible once 
the long legal procedure ended with the Supreme Court rejecting 
the appeal. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58049 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Vogel Comments </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501171994 Hamburg DPA in German 1543 GMT 5 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0501171994 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Excerpts] Bonn/Tehran (DPA) -- The Federal Government 
trusts that the death sentence confirmed by the Supreme Court in 
Tehran against German engineer Helmut Szimkus will not be 
carried out. "The assurance given on this by the Iranian 
Government still applies," Minister of State Bernd Schmidbauer 
(Christian Democratic Union) told BILD newspaper today. 
  Government spokesman Dieter Vogel said the government will 
also bring public pressure to bear in order to obtain a pardon 
for the German, who was convicted of spying for Iraq. It will 
be made clear to the Iranian Government that it is in its own 
interests to grant the appeal for a pardon, Vogel said. [passage 
omitted] 
  Vogel pointed out that carrying out the death sentence could 
have an unfavorable effect on German public opinion. Attitudes 
could worsen to Iran's detriment. In any case, the Federal 
Government regards the accused as "basically innocent." [passage 
omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58050 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bonn Reschedules Peruvian Debt Repayment </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501140194 Hamburg DPA in German 0946 GMT 5 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0501140194 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Bonn (DPA)--The Federal Government is to allow Peru 
to defer the repayment of around 150 million German marks [DM] 
in public debts. A corresponding rescheduling agreement has now 
been signed, the Federal Finance Ministry said today. The 
agreement gives Peru breathing space for repaying to Germany the 
majority of the debts, which would otherwise have been due by 31 
March 1996. The repayment has now been extended over 15 to 20 
years. The debts are based on credits as part of German 
development aid, Hermes-guaranteed export credits, as well as 
trade deals with the former GDR. Peru is to be excused 
repayment of DM30 million of the development aid credit if it 
uses one-third of that sum to protect and maintain the 
environment. 
  The new debt regulation serves as further support for the 
reform process in Peru, the Finance Ministry said. Peru has 
already brought inflation under control, through its efforts 
since 1990 to stabilize the economy: Inflation dropped from 
7,600 percent in 1990 to 57 percent in 1992, and it is to be 
reduced further to 27 percent. In 1991, real economic growth, 
of 2.5 percent, was achieved again. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58051 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistical Office Reports Employment Figures </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501164094 Hamburg DPA in German 1145 GMT 5 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0501164094 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Wiesbaden (DPA) -- The Federal Statistical Office in 
Wiesbaden announced its job figures today. During the course of 
a year, 696,000 jobs were lost in western Germany. The number 
of people employed in former West Germany fell by 2.4 percent to 
almost 28.5 million between November 1992 and November 1993. 
  From October to November 1993 alone, the number of people 
employed in the west fell by 167,000. That can be partially 
explained, however, by the usual seasonal drop, according to the 
statisticians. After seasonal adjustments, however, 67,000 jobs 
were still lost during this period. The Federal Statistical 
Office has no figures for former East Germany. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58052 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Economics Ministry Notes Decline in Industrial Orders </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0501135294 Hamburg DPA in German 1015 GMT 5 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0501135294 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Excerpt] Bonn (DPA)--There was a slight fall in the number 
of incoming orders for west German industry in November, 
following a similar drop in October. Orders fell by 1 percent 
after price and seasonal adjustments, the Federal Economics 
Ministry announced in Bonn today. Domestic orders fell by 0.5 
percent, foreign orders by 1.5 percent. For the first time in 
1993, however, a month slightly exceeded (by 0.4 percent) the 
figure for the corresponding month in 1992, the ministry 
stressed. 
  Demand remained unchanged in the more significant two month 
comparison between October/November and August/September. A 3.5 
percent increase in foreign orders made up for a 2.0 percent 
decrease in domestic orders. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58053 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   East, West German Railway Companies Unite </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD0101141294 Hamburg DPA in German 1331 GMT 1 Jan 94--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD0101141294 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Frankfurt/Main (DPA) -- The Deutsche Bahn AG [German 
railway company] was established in Frankfurt today. Company 
Director Hanz Duerr and board member Diethelm Vack, as well as a 
representative of the German Government signed the foundation 
document at a lawyer's office in Frankfurt. 
  The public limited company is owned outright by the German 
Government and will replace the Bundesbahn [in the west] and the 
Reichsbahn [in the east], which thereby cease to exist after 
operating for 44 and 56 years respectively. Under the 
agreement, the railway company will also transfer existing debts 
of 70 million German marks, which will now be assumed by the 
German Government. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58054 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Germany </F>
<H3> <TI>   Deutschland Radio Begins Broadcasting 1 Jan </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  LD3012125993 Hamburg DPA in German 0938 GMT 30 Dec 93--FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> LD3012125993 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DPA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Berlin/Cologne (DPA) -- After years of negotiations, 
the restructured national radio station Deutschland Radio will 
begin broadcasting on 1 January. In the future, two channels 
concentrating on information and culture will be broadcast on 
VHF and medium-wave. Deutschland Radio is an amalgamation of 
three stations and will be based in both Berlin and Cologne. 
The new public broadcasting corporation will receive more than 
300 million German marks annually from radio licence fees (75 
pfennigs per month). 
  Cologne-based Deutschlandfunk, which has been financed by 
the 
federal authorities, will change very little. In Berlin, 
however, RIAS, which was financed by the United States and then 
by the Ministry for Intra-German Relations and the former GDR 
station DS-Kultur, will merge. The Berlin part of Deutschland 
Radio will be based in the RIAS building. The directors of the 
new radio will be based in Cologne. The ZDF director Dieter 
Stolte is currently in temporary control until a new director is 
appointed. The most likely candidate is Ernst Elitz, television 
chief editor at Sueddeutscher Rundfunk. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58055 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Calabria Judge Seen as Likely Target of Bomb Attack </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0701100994 Rome ANSAMAIL Database in English 1555 GMT 6 
Jan 94--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0701100994 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome ANSAMAIL Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "'Ndrangheta Informant Warns of </F>
Explosives"] 
  [Text] Reggio Calabria, 6 Jan (ANSA) -- Police in the 
Calabrian capital were searching for 350 kg of explosives that a 
'ndrangheta [Calabrian Mafia-style organization] informant had 
warned them were going to be used in an attack on a Reggio 
magistrate. 
  That search was concentrated today in an area near the 
Ionian 
coast about 30 km from the capital, investigators said. 
  A likely target of the reported plan was Giuseppe Verzera, 
assistant district prosecutor of Reggio, who has conducted some 
of the most important inquiries into organized crime in that 
region. 
  Police said they had obtained the information from several 
members of 'ndrangheta gangs who had decided to cooperate with 
the authorities, including one informant who only recently began 
to talk to police. 
  This source told investigators that the explosive (of the 
same type used in deadly car bombs that blew up in Florence, 
Milan and Rome last spring and summer) was in the hands of the 
Calabrian crime organization as well as how they intended to 
employ it. 
  In a search last July, Carabinieri found 50 kg of explosives 
hidden in a field near Montebello Ionico, an area considered to 
be under the control of the Iamonte clan. That crime group was 
recently badly hit in a major dragnet on December 6, under the 
coordination of Verzera. 
  The growing role of the 'ndrangheta in national organized 
crime circuits, both alone and in cooperation with the Sicilian 
Mafia was underlined in a report on crime filed by the 
Anti-Mafia Investigating Directorate (DIA) to parliament 
yesterday. 
  The national anticrime police unit said that the Calabrian 
'ndrangheta has been expanding rapidly since 1991, when Sicilian 
Cosa Nostra representatives intervened among warring Calabrian 
rings to negotiate a "pax mafiosa" that led to a steep decline 
in interclan murders and a much improved capacity for illicit 
business. 
  (DIA cited the 20 percent in Calabria's gangland killings in 
1992, with inter-gang deaths continuing to fall this year.) [as 
published] 
  Investigators linked the 'ndrangheta's spread to the tight 
network of secret masonic lodges in the region of Calabria, 
first brought to the attention of law enforcement officials by 
the Palmi public prosecutor's office, then under the direction 
of Judge Agostino Cordova. One third of all southern Free Masons 
live in Calabria, investigators estimate, and they are stepping 
up their inquiries into the links between criminal activity and 
the secret and semi-secret lodges. 
  In the province of Reggio Calabria alone, some 3,500 persons 
have been identified as 'ndrangheta members, while the whole 
region numbers 155 clans and at least 5,500 working for 
organized crime. Catanzaro and Cosenza were cited as other major 
crime centers. 
  'Ndrangheta activities include extortion (with 368 related 
cases of arson in 1992), usury, kidnaping and drug traffic. The 
DIA report cites the spread of Calabrian crime activities to 
Northern Italy as well as abroad to Canada, the U.S. and 
Australia. 
  In the past six months, 890 detentions or arrests have been 
ordered, including 524 regarding the 'ndrangheta, as compared to 
269 orders regarding the Sicilian Mafia, 62 involving the Sacra 
Corona Unita [United Holy Crown -- Pugliese Mafia-style 
organization] of Puglia and 35 involving the Camorra. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58056 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ciampi Satisfied With Government's Performance </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94ES0210B Milan IL SOLE--24 ORE in Italian 29 Dec 93 p 
1--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> 94ES0210B </F>
<F P=104>  Milan IL SOLE--24 ORE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Italian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Guido Compagna: "`My Government Has Accomplished </F>
Its Objectives,' Ciampi Says"] 
  [Text] The future depends on the 12 January debate on 
the motion of no confidence. The question of dissolving the two 
chambers is now in the hands of the Quirinale [office of the 
president of the Republic]. 
  Rome--Carlo Azeglio Ciampi is satisfied with what his 
government has accomplished in these eight months, especially on 
the economic front, where it has succeeded in regaining the 
confidence of the international markets. He is more than 
cautious, however, with regard to the possible political 
developments of the next few days, all of which will involve the 
procedures for dissolving the two houses of Parliament pursuant 
to the motions of no confidence introduced by Marco Pannella and 
others. 
  The political statements made by the prime minister during 
the traditional year-end press conference serve above all to 
confirm several things. First, the parliamentary debate will 
take place and the government is resigned to it, as has already 
been explained in the statement made by the Quirinale and 
published following Oscar Luigi Scalfaro's summit with the 
presidents of the Chamber of Deputies and the Senate; and 
second, at the meetings already scheduled for 4 and 5 January 
with the parliamentary groups, Ciampi will seek to clarify the 
general orientation of these groups, especially because many 
members of Parliament--who have supported the government and say 
they will continue to evaluate its action--have chosen the 
option of the no-confidence motion. 
  Before taking its next steps, Palazzo Chigi [office of the 
prime minister] is waiting for 12 January, the date already set 
for the parliamentary debate. For his part, Ciampi confirmed 
that the government--having performed its function--is ready to 
relinquish power immediately, but then insisted several times 
during the press conference that "it is not the task of this 
administration to decide if--and for how long--this legislature 
should continue," explaining that for this reason he is not yet 
in a position to know "whether it should end immediately or 
continue until the next legislature." 
  In short, we learned from Ciampi's statements that 
everything 
will depend on what develops in the course of the parliamentary 
debate, and--in particular--we learned that any decision 
concerning the date of the elections will depend on the 
assessment that the president of the Republic will make of these 
developments. 
  And concerning his own political future, Ciampi was 
particularly reserved. He offered only one certainty: he will 
not participate in the election campaign. "If it is needed, 
however," he explained, "I shall be happy if I am able to offer 
my counsel," inasmuch as he has spent a lifetime in the civil 
service. 
  The prime minister did not, however, dodge those questions 
that were in some way connected with Silvio Berlusconi's entry 
into politics, and made two firm points. The first point was 
that if he remains in Palazzo Chigi during the election 
campaign, the principal task of his administration will be to 
"guarantee the par condicio [equal treatment before 
the law] to everyone." The second point--which he expounded with 
a touch of irony in response to a question by a sports 
reporter--was that "no one can have a copyright on the motto, 
Forza Italia." The prime minister will accordingly 
continue to root for the National Team even before the 
elections, and of course afterward. 
  Ciampi--who also expressed appreciation for the pope's words 
concerning the unity of our country--did not conceal the fact 
that he twice was tempted to throw in the sponge and leave 
Palazzo Chigi: first, when it appeared that the agreement on the 
cost of labor would not be successfully concluded, and again 
following the simultaneous terrorist attacks in Rome and Milan 
on the night of 27-28 July of this year. 
  The prime minister also dealt with economic topics, 
especially in his introductory statement at the press 
conference. He emphasized the renewed confidence that Italy, 
Inc., has regained on the international markets and also the 
positive result of a current inflation rate of 4 percent, which 
makes the objective of an eventual reduction to 2.5 percent a 
realistic one. These results were also--and above all--achieved 
thanks to the agreement on the cost of labor. There remains, 
unfortunately, the "distress" over the high unemployment, the 
causes of which--Ciampi said--can be removed "if Italy will 
construct its future development on new foundations." 
  Marco Pannella, sponsor of the motion of no confidence, 
offered a favorable assessment of Ciampi's statements. "The 
press conference," Pannella said, "demonstrates that a strong 
Ciampi administration is necessary and that we must hold the 
elections to render a judgment as between the political 
coalition that has supported Ciampi, on the one hand, and the 
opposition." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58057 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drweu005__a94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-WEU-93-000-A </AU>
Document Type:Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ANNEX </F>
<F P=101> Italy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Continues Consultations With Parties </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  BR0601103594 Rome ANSAMAIL Database in English 1321 GMT 5 
Jan 93--FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> BR0601103594 </F>
<F P=104>  Rome ANSAMAIL Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Ciampi Concludes Consultations"] </F>
  [Text] Rome, 5 Jan (ANSA) -- Prime Minister Carlo Azeglio 
Ciampi on Wednesday [5 January] plans to conclude consultations 
with minor parties in view of the January 12 parliamentary 
debate on no-confidence motions submitted to the Senate and 
Lower House. 
  After his meetings yesterday with the major parties, Ciampi 
this morning met with delegations from the Network, Green and 
Communist Refoundation parties. In the afternoon, after a 
working lunch with the director of the International Monetary 
Fund, Ciampi will receive representatives from the Italian 
Social Movement, Sudtyroler Volkspartei [South Tirol People's 
Party] and Union Valdotaine [Valdostan Union]. 
  The traditional government parties yesterday urged Ciampi to 
stay at his post and delay a vote until combined European 
Parliament and early elections can be held in June, while most 
of the smaller opposition parties, as well as the Left 
Democrats, the Northern League and the Italian Social Movement 
want elections as soon as possible. 
  The no-confidence motions were submitted by Federalist Party 
leader Marco Pannella and were signed mostly by members of the 
four governing parties -- Christian Democrats, Socialists, 
Social Democrats and Liberals. The premier's resignation in fact 
would prevent the president from dissolving parliament until a 
new coalition cabinet is formed. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>
